If @theSNP so keen on EU why did it only spend £90k on EU referendum campaign? Anyone know? 
It's simply not possible to have dinner in London these days without it descending into a Brexit trauma. And then add some Trump. 
The Brexit effect: 700K new Irish passports issued this year alone. That equates to just over one sixth of the entire population of Ireland.  
Brexit .....Trump .....Bertie...... 
The Sun spent £96,000 on campaigning for Brexit  
Support for #indyref2 slumps to fewer than 1-in-3. @NicolaSturgeon should stop disrespecting the majority of Scots & bin her referendum bill  
Theresa May is 'heading for a huge defeat on Supreme Court Brexit ruling'  
And yet, millennials didn't vote for Trump or for Brexit.  I wonder if actually what they want is good governance.  
After Trump and Brexit, EU to launch defense research plan  
This will be the "best deal possible" that works for the whole country. No bloody Brexit.  
Gina Miller assumes voters are ignorant. Voters knew what Brexit meant alright. To escape ideologies like hers.  
Tusk rejects British calls to protect expat rights after Brexit  
If not for the ruthless government and media anti- #Brexit campaign I'd guess the outcome would have been 70% for …   
Brexit tariffs would cost car industry 4.5 billion pounds a year - SMMT  
Incredibly important by AC Grayling. Brexit is a coup & we are all being hustled into assent to it by manipulative & dishonest language.  
They all know that we knew what we were voting for just wasnt expecting it now trying to turn our democracy into Banana Republic #Brexit  
Theresa May and having your Brexit cake and eating it by Christian Adams - political cartoon gallery  
BBC again comparing Trump & Brexit to Naziism & fascism; without even realising just how ridiculous they sound; just unreal  #Newsnight 
Investor who PREDICTED #BREXIT now forecasts the COLLAPSE of the #Euro over Italy referendum  
'The inevitable consequence of Brexit is that the UK must recognise that what it gets will fall vastly short of what it has'#Brexitfail 
The back-lash against the Tory party in the next 15-20 years will be devastating as the #brexit generation comes of age and seeks vengeance. 
Let's start getting tough. Fetch Farage! May is 'heading for a huge defeat on Supreme Court Brexit ruling'  
#brexit observation from German friend recently returned to Munich "The UK made the news for a month now it's firmly in the comedy sketches" 
I'm in RT if you are .. but let's make this bigger the time is right for a mass protest waspi dpac brexit ITS MAYS POLL TAX MOMENT #MARCHNHS 
Newly-elected UKIP leader calls for an immediate Brexit  
Eurozone crisis: Italy’s chances of ditching Euro at 4-year high  #Brexit 
Italy's referendum will COLLAPSE EURO - chilling warning from investor who forecast Brexit  
Matteo Renzi is making an appeal to undecided voters in the last days of his referendum campaign  
A day off from racist Brexit fictions and a return for mad  @Daily_Express health bollocks  so I can update my Hot Drinks Miracle Spread ! 
"Brexit tariffs would cost car industry 4.5 billion pounds a year"British, Japanese & Korean cars are fine!  
Is it possible to Brexit but just from this tweet?  
Dear ITALIAN-AMERICAN  Trump Supporters,We must CAMPAIGN NOW for the Italy #Referendum on DEC 4 to Vote NO!#IoVotoNO #IoDicoNo 
#vinb #rteptDrunken electorate night out -party piece timeUK - "Watch this -"Brexit"US - "Watch this -"Trump"Ireland - "Hold my drink.."  
brackin: what happens when Britain reverse brexit 
Send back NOW! MPs told Brexit ‘is only way to end scandal of foreign crooks’   
Listening to ITN news.This #Brexit malarkey is NOT going well is it Theresa ?#BlameCameron 
In a direct challenge to PM May, @SadiqKhan set to outline plans to develop London-only work permits for foreign workers affected by Brexit.  
No, he is just stating facts.He's not creating uncertainty,referendum did. Eu can't do anything until uk acts in some way.It's in our hands.  
Left antisemitism, Brexit and Trump.  My talk at Syracuse University. 
Theresa May is 'heading for a huge defeat on Supreme Court Brexit ruling'  
The bridge to a glorious post Brexit future as organised by @foreignoffice #DesignisGREAT 
My cartoon - Tory aide unwittingly gives UK media a glimpse into upcoming #Brexit negotiations #BBC1News 
Brexit could lift the average price of imported cars in the U.K. by as much as $1,873  
It's time Blair, Major and Clegg spared us their patronising guff on Brexit #Premium 
The sad thing is, from a Brexit point of view, is that the UK side could be just as open and professional as EU side. Wasted opportunity. 
Significant @eucopresident, @MichelBarnier @GuyVerhofstadt et al seem far less worried about "no running commentary" about Brexit talks. 
James: Backing Brexit without knowing the terms? That’s like jumping out of a plane without checking your parachute  
Listening to Tom Watson and Stephen Kinnock completely capitulating to hard Brexit, surprised any liberals feel at home in Labour any more. 
Martin Wolf: A smooth post-Brexit transition will be vitally important  
READ: @Nigel_Farage discusses the potential downfall of the EU project in the wake of Brexit and the rise of Trump. 
Cost of #brexit black hole in public finances already high:  
In which EU negotiator @MichelBarnier provides a helpful and detailed Running Commentary on Brexit:  
DAILY TELEGRAPH FRONT PAGE: 'Merkel blocks May's Brexit deal' #skypapers 
"I predict Blair will have funds of £50-100 million to fight against #Brexit" @Respectfilmfest @TheBlairDoc 
Are you voting in Italy's referendum? We'd like to hear from you  
Euro DIVES amid fears Italy's referendum is beginning of the END of EU   
ITALEXIT LATEST: MSM Poils Claim Renzi To Win. <Translation>: Italians Set To Vote Landslide No In Upcoming Referendum Ending Euro Currency  
The #EU wants a civil war between east and west.But let's be smart and jail the Elite EuroRats instead.#Brexit #IoVotoNo  #PVV #AfD #Trump 
When the President of the European Council calls British MPs liars, you know this #Brexit thing's gonna get nasty  
An investor who predicted Brexit now says the euro is about to collapse  
If elected President of France, Marine Le Pen vowed France will have its own leave/remain referendum. Love her! 
Steve Hilton shocked to find that Brexit is not turning the UK into a more outward-looking, pro-enterprise country  
The NHS Is Not an international NHS 
@EtonOldBoys Unusual cloud formation over Downing Street seen as a personal message from God to the Prime Minister regarding Brexit.  
#Brexit started a destructive process that has spread far beyond Britain’s shores, says @VanityFair's @MarionVanR 
'There wasn't a manifesto' Gina Miller claims voters 'did NOT know what Brexit meant'. You might not, but I did!  
Brits voted Brexit,we want total freedom from EU control not gimmicks,spin or 'transitional' scams.No EEA,No EFTA,No single market  
No longer restricted by EU regulations, Brexitannia is now the world's leading manufacturer of toxic and flammable children's toys. 
Simon Jenkins in Standard: A win for Lib Dems in #RichmondPark will boost morale and aid the “soft Brexit” cause 
Investor who PREDICTED BREXIT now forecasts the COLLAPSE of the Euro amid Italy referendum  
After Brexit, where in Europe your profession will earn you the most money  
The 48% who voted Remain won’t go quiet on Brexit, says @mrjamesob, the country’s future matters too much  
Brexit means an end to the UK falling under the jurisdiction of the ECJ. #whatbrexitmeans 
Quitlings are going to be apoplectic if it goes to the ECJ. It would be the funniest Brexit moment yet  
Brexit means an end to the supremacy of EU law over domestic legislation made by our elected representatives. #whatbrexitmeans 
My 2017 Winter and Spring speaking tour on austerity, #Brexit & #NHS will be put together soon so if you want me to speak send me a request 
"...a surplus....were it not for #Brexit"Er? Were it not for the Govt's manic scheme to pursue a UK suicide policy come what may.  
Well said @paulnuttallukip let's get out NOW. Ukip to push for instant Brexit without triggering article 50   
Theresa May is 'heading for a huge defeat on Supreme Court Brexit ruling'  
Brexit might cost the economy £220bn over 5 years. Here's what we could spend that on instead  
Great thread from @faisalislam who's, once again, leading the way on Brexit journalism.  
Efta Court's Baudenbacher tells me his court easiest option for post Brexit trade dispute mech "structure exists, structure is tested" 7/10 
My cartoon - leaked memo reveals current state of government’s #Brexit plans  
Martin Wolf: Brexit supporters may think they know what Brexit means, but that is to be decided.  
Asked how possible that ECJ, which UK will leave could referee any aspect of Brexit, Sharpston: "If you join club and wish to leave.. 4/10 
Leadsom First Out of Blocks With 25 Year Brexit Plan  
700,000 Irish passports have been issued in the year of Brexit - a new record  
Brexit bashing turns into indy love-in as Irish senators swoon over Sturgeon  
The North-East is one of Brexitannia's warmest regions, its sub-tropical climate forcing the inhabitants to live semi-naked all year round. 
It is not EU leaders that have caused the limbo myself and other UK expats are now in, but Brexit itself. Which you championed 
#BBC describes our Minister for Foreign Affairs @CharlieFlanagan as "Irish Foreign Abuse" #Brexit @dfatirl  
Not difficult to find EU politicians who want an EU Military commanded centrally by Brussels. Both the EU's Brexit reps have pushed for it.  
UK will outgrow & outperform Eurozone over next decade in blow to Brexit doom-mongers, think-tank predicts…  
The Luke Skywalker of the #Remain cause - we placed @Keir_Starmer at number 5 in our #Brexit power 100  
Why Britain voted for Brexit: the short and long answers  
A splendid physicist on Radio 4 talked of "Schrodinger's Brexit"; UK both in and out of single market. Government dares not open the box 
Corbynistas like Brexiters seem to think that success comes through retreating into your own self-satisfied little bubble.#Remain #Brexit 
'We don't want to be alienated': EU citizens stand firm against Brexit.  
Dear @DonaldTusk Welcome to our #Brexit world, in which nothing that Tories say has anything to do with reality. 
Ukip to push for instant Brexit without triggering article 50  
Have any @UKIP MEPs actually resigned yet from the corrupt EU or are they too busy raking in the rewards? #Brexit 
In 2017 the City of London will, with trepidation, face the consequences of Brexit  
An investor who predicted Brexit now says the euro is about to collapse  
My thoughts on the implications of Brexit for peatland restoration  #IUCNPeatConf16 
Our leader argued Brexit should be a matter for transparent public debate—not inferences from aides' notes  
Remainers using as many legal mechanisms as they can to slow down Brexit and to create economic uncertainty  
at 7 - @SkyNewsTonight exclusive with most senior Brit lawyer at European Court of Justice - re Article 50, Brexit & timing of any reference  
Irish foreign minister pledges to help Scotland in Brexit process: via @TheCommonSpace 
There is a good Brexit deal Britain could strike - but I'm not sure it's one the public would accept:  
Irish big business has called for closer economic ties between the Republic and Scotland as hard Brexit looms:  
Dominic Raab MP warns that a vote on Article 50 could allow die-hard remainers to delay and frustrate Brexit #RespectTheResult 
Farage Says Brexit ‘Directly Led To’ Trump Win and Rise of Populists in Europe  
Excellent piece. The latest submission in my lonely quest to find Brexit opinions with which everyone can agree:  
Eddie Izzard spent £36k - including nearly £200 on chicken - during the EU referendum campaign  
Brexit: UK ready to 'buy in' & train 30,000 trade negotiators to help extricate the UK from EU. WOT!! #stopbrexit 
Will the #Brexit farce ever end? Welsh #Ukip member wants Irish gov to pay for #welsh motorway bec it has access to EU structural funds. 
Most politicians know #Brexit will be disastrous for the people of UK. Why don't they have the guts or the sense to do the right thing? 
Think Brexit will turn out like that strange 60s program The Prisoner. We'll be stopped by a big ball until we realise WE are our jailer 
The Great Brexit Bake-Off: tomorrow's @Adamstoon1 cartoon 
Within an hour of becoming UKIP Brexit spokesman @GerardBattenMEP is already setting the agenda. No more free passes for Brexit slowcoaches.  
Farage: Brexit ‘Directly Led To’ Trump Win and Rise of Populists in Europe  
Hi @johnmcdonnellMP#Brexit will screw our economy - depriving young people of jobs & old of public services.Why won't #Labour resist it? 
OVer 58% of Germans demand tough #Brexit line from Merkel  
Italy referendum NO means 8 or more banks in jeopardy as bail-ins not possible(most depositors in bonds).ECB rules break?Or Italexit?. 
EU boss Junker wants to put a stop to anymore countries having a referendum. Austria, Italy, France + Holland are all likely to vote #Brexit  
Dear Irish leaders, we have already had a referendum to decide Scotlands place in UK. It's neither your nor Sturgeons place to ignore it. Ta 
This attack on SNP for "only" spending £91k on EU referendum campaign is plain daft. 62/38 in Scotland. & Scot Gov did most of "campaigning" 
The '48 percent plus' are also increasingly fed up with Westminster's incoherent Brexit plans.  
 @NicolaSturgeon set out her response to #Brexit in the #Seanad & found new support for Scottish independence. 
"You can send 20 new Lib Dem MPs and its not going to stop Brexit". If voters elect 20 of us we have mandate to try!  
What impact has the UK's EU referendum outcome had on our profession so far?  #architects #Brexit 
The 'Brexit dividend' DOES exist: Britain to benefit from extra £32BILLION when it leaves the EU:   
Now May has revealed who’s guiding Brexit, O’Brien sums up our outrage with a single sentence [VIDEO]  #brexit 
Donald Tusk accuses British voters who backed Brexit of creating 'anxiety' for 3.3m EU migrants in UK  
YouGov: Still no Bregrets...68% of people think that Britain should go ahead with Brexit  
The hideous reality of UKIP wanting the most painful possible Brexit is that more hardship means more support for populists like them 
Richard Dawkins thinks Brexit is "xenophobic". But UKIP's points-based immigration policy is LESS DISCRIMINATORY that current EU/UK policy. 
Nick Clegg, you have no democratic mandate to block Brexit. You should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum.  
Boris Johnson will visit Chatham House on Friday to discuss UK foreign policy after Brexit - you can watch the event live, more info to come  
If you are pro Brexit cake and eating it, this will be an irritating letter from @eucopresident . Normal people will think it reasonable 
Once again #TheThickOfIt predicts real life UK Politics....#haveyourcakeandeatit #brexit #batpeople #nicolamurray #nomfup 
Why doesn't Pak have a referendum in so-called PoK & Gilgit-Baltistan. Infact they should have it across Pakistan: Maroof #PakBackedTerror 
Italian bank stocks are crashing, apparently on fear that reform referendum will lose - and Euro crisis follow  
700,000 Irish passports have been issued in the year of Brexit - a new record  
The pound climbs as the U.K. economy continues to do better than expected  
Can anyone tell me how to say "you stupid ignorant #UKIP idiot" in #Welsh please? Or just some decent swear words will do#Brexit stupidity  
Donald Tusk responds to UK MPs concerns about the rights of EU citizens; blames Brexit  
I'm doing a Facebook Live on Trump, Brexit & future of the left with @KatrinaNation at 12.15pm EST - send your Qs! 
What’s at stake in Italy’s referendum?  
Brexitannia's three major exports are cheese, umbrellas and casual racism. 
Brexit might cost the economy £220bn over 5 years. Here's what we could spend that on instead  
It may be the year of Brexit. But danes voted true european @Vestager dane-of-the-year. Congrats Margrethe - you make us proud. @ALDEParty 
The only information we have on the Government's plan for Brexit is from photos snatched of the notes of a senior Conservative official.  
The uncertainty over Brexit & that shambles of an Autumn statement are starting to tell on the Tories  
SNP accused of barely trying in EU referendum after being outspent by Wetherspoon pub chain  
No more the studied 'staying out of it' from Dublin re Indyref. That's yer Brexit for ya. 
By early 2017, Scottish govt likely to face choice: hard Brexit with UK or independence in the EU: my new report  
Five On Brexit Island is NUMBER 1 in HB Non-Fiction for the 3rd week! And these other 2 in the Top Ten!Congratulations @bruno_vincent!  
Italy's €360 billion referendum  via @POLITICOEurope 
The number of young people who want to leave the county has shot up since Brexit  
Nicola Sturgeon will publish a blueprint on Scotland’s Brexit options within weeks.Sneak preview. Some bits have been redacted.  
Irish business community calls for deeper links with Scotland due to #Brexit:  
For a post-Brexit UK going alone in the big bad world, that is not a pleasant prospect.  UK will want to enter new agreements. 
WE DIDN'T START THE FIRE- Trump questions legitimacy of election he won- God steers Brexit process- UKIP policy now to remain in the EU 
Honoured, excited to head off to the @OECD to take part in this post-Brexit/Trump/Euroblues convo about #inequality. 
If the Brexit note is accurate, we're in serious trouble  
Brexitannia is divided into two distinct geographical and socio-economic regions. These are called London and The Other Bit. 
EU states 'increasingly fed up' with not knowing UK's Brexit plans, MSPs told - Politics live  
Brexit might cost the economy £220bn over 5 years. Here's what we could spend that on instead  
It's been over 5 months since the #euref.What is the state of HMG's planning for #brexit?Please vote and RT! 
YOU MUST SEE THIS !BREXIT MINISTER 'ACCIDENTALLY' FLASHES LIST OF EU DEMANDS !#Article50 #LeaveEU #Nexit #Frexit #Italexit #Brexit #leave 
Theresa May - the"Brexit means Brexit " lady is the laughing stock of EU as she tries to hold on to EU benefits for Brits after Brexit. 
The handwritten Brexit notesWhatever the source of the information noted, there seems nothing to any thoughts developed since June. 
James O’Brien on how the Brexit vote made him realise how much the UK could lose from leaving  
Brexitannia's telecommunications infrastructure is the envy of the world. 
Wage stagnation is nowstalking UK economy and it is because of Leavers & the Brexit Bunch - NOT because of the EU. #dumpBrexit 
This is significant in cause of Scottish indy, #indyref2 & #Brexit. Scotland has lots of influential friends in EU.  
'@GerardBattenMEP appointed UKIP Spokesman on Brexit  #UKIPshuffle 
Taoiseach says if the people of Ireland support a referendum on Irish unity then it must be acted upon, however a referendum is not imminent  
#CapitalWatch - Brexit changed the game, but the U.S. Presidential Election adds greater uncertainty  @CBRE_UK 
Ukip appoints Gerard Batten as its Brexit spokesman. I profiled him a while ago at @HuffPostUKPol here:  
Italy's foreign minister writes in FT: Europe's future is at stake in Matteo Renzi's referendum  
Slightly confused by this line from UKIP's newly announced "Spokesman on Brexit" Gerard Batten:  
Farming must be recognised for its critical role in maintaining countryside post-#Brexit, @FUWpress says:  
#Brexit U-turn for @UKIP?Uproar in the #Senedd as @DavidRowlandsAM suggests Irish government seeks EU funds to pay for #M4reliefroad 
Economic armageddon continuesBritish firms plan to take on more workers as Brexit worries fade  via @telebusiness 
Lessons of "unimaginable"Brexit and Trump's election suggests time has come for thinking about unthinkables, decay of Euro only one of many  
Funny old world - when i was pleading for unity during UKIPs biggest achievement, the EU referendum, I was blocked by memebrs of the party! 
British farmers have warned of a Brexit-triggered labour crisis  
Irish foreign minister pledges to help Scotland in Brexit process 
If the choice is between Hard or Soft, then surely Brexit is more like cheese than cake?That way we can add 'Smelly' and 'Swiss' etc. 
The Sun registered as an official Leave campaign group and spent £96,000 on Brexit campaigning  
One of the most devastating comments on Brexit to date from a senior UK academic figure.   @Keir_Starmer @RCorbettMEP 
Why shouldn't we try to have our Brexit cake and eat it too?  My latest via @telegraphnews 
Full statement: Foreign minister @CharlesFlanagan says Ireland is “anxious to be helpful” to Scotland in Brexit talks  
So while Theresa May obfuscates over #Brexit there's no such secret squirrel behaviour in Scotland from @theSNP  
Brexit Record    The unfolding disaster is being covered by trade papers and local press, but rarely nationals 
After Brexit and Trump, is Italy next? What's at stake in the country's Dec. 4 referendum on constitutional reforms:  
Germans want Merkel to take tough line with UK over Brexit, poll finds  
#Brexit and #Cake - a limerick.@twitmericks 
After #Brexit 'classic' novels to have 1970s cover designs restored e.g. Kingsley Amis's The Green Man. ("A masterpiece" - New York Times)  
I don't know what's worse - Brexit, Trump or these two bellends?  
Brexit documentsThinking about the Deloitte memo and the handwritten notes yesterday: worlds apart, reality vs aspiration. 
Scotch Whisky is the biggest net contributor to UK trade in goods. I asked the Chancellor how this environment will be preserved post-Brexit  
Are you a remain voter upset about Brexit? Do you take out all your anger at leave voters by tweeting abuse at them? Call 1300-get-a-life 
The attention garnered by today’s Brexit notes shows PM needs to come up with a plan  
Tomorrow morning we're proud to present "Brexit: A Case for Special Status?" at the Baby Grand. An essential & timely debate. All welcome!  
The Conservatives plans for Brexit appear to have been snapped outside 10 Downing Street  
Are you voting in Italy's referendum? Share your thoughts and hopes with us  
In 2014 Irish leaders were cautious on #indyref. Brexit has changed things utterly. In diplomatic terms, ahead of Brexit talks, this matters 
One of the reasons why people voted Leave was to unshackle the UK from the stagnating EU economy #Brexit #ChangeBritain 
Best close-up so far of government's leaked Brexit plans. #havecakeandeatit (done for @huffpostukcom) 
Cambridge taxi driver subjected us to sustained verbal attack for being London-based economists promoting 'project fear'. Scary. #Brexit 
Exclusive: ECB ready to buy more Italian bonds if referendum rocks market - sources  
My cartoon - Tory aide unwittingly gives UK media a glimpse into upcoming #Brexit negotiations #wato 
Brexit means taking back control of our trade policy #whatbrexitmeans pic.twitter.com/3144snCWBh 
The Sun registered as an official group and spent £96,000 on Brexit campaigning  
 we have aggregated some 400 stories on Brexit economic disaster. Interesting how few come from Sun, Mail, Express.  
Which TV station does the most harm to British interests in #Brexit negotiations? 
As the UK #MSM has effectively stopped performing its duty of holding politicians & judges to account it's … #Brexit  
Malta PM reiterates all EU government heads agree that Brexit deal must be worse for Britain than current EU membership 
A warning from @mrjamesob for the Leavers trying to shut down debate on the terms of Brexit: that’s not how it works  
Brexit Redux: ECB Ready To Buy More Italian Bonds If Referendum "Rocks Markets"  
A Brexit note captured in shotReveals the government plotIs Have Cake and Eat itTho Brussels may greet itWith Shit or Get off of the Pot 
#Italy 5y, 10y borrowing costs jump to highest since Jun2015 auction as investors shun Italy risk ahead of referendum. Sold 10y BTP at 1.97%  
Brexit ref expenses:We really campaigned hard against Brexit say SNP, who spent less on it than SNP MPs claimed in travel expenses last year 
.@rowls22 @LouiseMensch @YouGov: 68% think that Britain should go ahead with Brexit, unchanged since October  
SHOW this video to anyone in the remain campaign now arguing to stay in the single market #Brexit  
~3m #EU citizens work in #UK.~1m UK citizens work in EU.#Merkel, are you sure you wants to play #Brexit hardball? 
It shouldn't take photos like this to keep us up to date with the Government's Brexit mess  
Further evidence today that the Brexit doomsayers got it completely wrong, as the OECD revises their UK growth forecast up.  
Nicola's immediate post-Brexit statement to the EU nationals resident in Scotland commended 6 months later by a speaker in the Seanad 
Bashing migrants leaves us poorer in every sense, says Green Party co-leader @jon_bartley  #brexit  
Both Britain and the European Union may be heading towards a hard Brexit: 
ECB READY TO TEMPORARILY STEP UP ITALY BOND PURCHASES IF REFERENDUM RESULT CAUSES YIELD SPIKE - SOURCES 
Good speech by First Minister @NicolaSturgeon in the #Seanad - She is one of the few politicians taking real action on #Brexit 
RT if you agree with Beefy that politicians should stop trying to block Brexit! #RespectTheResult 
AC Grayling on why now is the time for MPs to derail a disastrous Brexit deal.   
British government denies 'have cake and eat it' is official Brexit policy  
Here's a slide I like to show when talking about Brexit and universities - blue=university in local area #pahef16 
FM: "Little doubt that Brexit was also a product of inequality, of disillusionment with the established order; of a sense of alienation." 
Scotland will "unequivocally support" an open border between Ireland North and South  after #brexit - @NicolaSturgeon tells Senators 
.@NicolaSturgeon: Scotland will reconsider independence if Brexit process does not safeguard national interests. 
If those Brexit notes reflect govt policy, we're about to go over the cliff edge  
Interesting language, 'Celtic corridor'. Sense there is an appetite for creative #Brexit thinking in Dublin and Belfast. Could play well  
#Tories really should be more careful with their #Brexit memos.#CakeAndEatIt 
Another one for @GuyLongworth's Brexit in pictures series  
Brexit: SNP mock revealed notes saying UK 'wants cake and eat it', says party that wanted full independence and a currency union 
The Sun spent £6,000 more than The SNP campaigning in the EU referendum.  
Can't believe Economists for Brexit spent £54k on advice about dragons. And people say they don't want to hear from experts.  
PSD2 = the free movement of goods, services, money, people and their data #TelegraphFFT #brexit 
If Nagarpalika elections was called referendum on #DeMonetisation by opposition, then results in Maha & Guj shows massive support. 
Unemployment is currently at an 11-year low and has fallen since the EU referendum in June  
Europe responds to British government's 'secret Brexit memo'  
Speaking personally, my fears about Brexit have never been about what happens *before* Britain leaves the EU  
Immediately following the Italian referendum, there will be biscotti. 
Read this:tells all re wisdom of Norway-style inside EEA after Brexit -and dire fate if not:Cohen review's Dunt book 
My piece in today's Sun about the forthcoming Italian referendum:  
Theresa may has expressed her hope that Brexit will lead to closer cooperation with Poland.  
The case for Government to come clean and publish a clear plan for Brexit is now overwhelming - @Keir_Starmer 
Brexit:What the Hell Happens Now? My review of @IanDunt 's very good question 
Super-keen Andrea Leadsom has delivered a 25 year plan for Brexit to Downing Street:  
Absolutely. But hardly exclusive figures. Before referendum, British Med. Journal, Lancet & 75% of NHS hosp leaders said Brexit bad for NHS.  
Leadsom First Out of Blocks With 25 Year Brexit Plan  
Between Brexit and the IP Bill, it seems like the UK really, really doesn't want to have a tech industry anymore :( 
EU amazed that Brexit plan covers whole side of A4  
What Britain effectively wants is Schroedinger's Cake.#brexit 
What does Italy’s constitutional referendum mean for its banks?  
Brexit is not a game of pokerNew at  @jackofkent: 
Absolutely right! Brexit does not mean splendid isolation. Far from it. We will truly be an outward looking nation.  
To gain enough goodwill to make Brexit work, the PM may end up agreeing to have Polish taught in UK schoolsHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHA-[1/7634] 
Lib Dems out in force in #RichmondPark today! Peers and MPs united against a 3rd runway, against hard Brexit and in support of our NHS  
WATCH: Our Scottish spokesperson Jack Montgomery appeared on @RTUKNews to discuss Brexit's ongoing legal challenges.  
According to the Tories, Brexit means #havecakeandeatit 
Brexit means... #havecakeandeatit 
Richmond update: Gap between Brexit Zac & pro-EU Olney has dropped to <4% (from 20%). Pro-EU win would be big news. 
Europeans are set against giving the UK a Brexit deal that includes free trade but not free movement  
An excellent opportunity for those with inside knowledge of #Brexit announcements/leaks to make a killing on the FX markets. #Remain 
UK government hit with new Brexit lawsuit  #Brexit  
ask Zac how he can support Brexit but oppose LHR runway as Brexit will undermine EU air pollution law  
Celtic Alliance: Irish foreign minister pledges to help Scotland in Brexit process 
UK is bound to tend to maximalist "have cake and eat it" Brexit negotiating position because whatever it asks for it will get less. 
Never mind Article 50, Article 127 might just save Brexit Britain  
Ashok Vaswani CEO @BarclaysUK setting the scene for the future of Fintech in the UK post Brexit #TelegraphFFT @TelB2BEvents @TelegraphNews 
Is this maybe why @BBCScotlandNews were unable to report from Dublin?'Brexit could lead to Scottish Independence'  
Call me a conspiracy theorist but I think those secret Brexit notes caught on camera were a stunt.  
#EU leaders meet today to decide Brexit negotiating stance with UK, reports #BBC.Oddly, they don’t insist EU reveals its aims in advance... 
Italian media is reporting that Renzi is considering resigning as prime minister even if he wins the referendum.  
Libraries closing all over Britain. Because as #Brexit proves, an ignorant population is an easily manipulated population.  
Unlike exit(), the brexit() system call can be executed many times, as it is reentrant and doesn't really do anything. 
'Have cake and eat it': Is this the UK's Brexit strategy?  
No. The people voted #brexit & you are a public servant, paid (all expenses) by the people to implement democracy. Youre a disgrace  
Why all the fuss? In this #Brexit world, Cardiff celebrates with a Farage ('Ferrero Rocher') Christmas tree. Nadolig Llawen!  
@timfarron It was not a stitch-up you gormless twit.It was a democratically contested referendum and the question was answered with LEAVE!  
Exclusive: Ireland will be “conscious” of Scottish interests in Brexit talks, government minister says 
Front page FT 2day! Kid u not costofXmas pud gone up cos of ... Brexit! Establishment Elite can't accept democracy when doesn't go their way 
They're not happy with your vote after they rigged the referendum in their favour and still lost, they want another one on their terms !!  
Both Britain and the European Union may be heading towards a hard Brexit  
Daily Mail alone rounds on woman holding Brexit note. An "Essex girl" who "parties on despite gaffe". Why miss an opportunity at misogyny.  
Brexit vote is making UK a laughing stock abroad, says Tim Farron | Politics | The Guardian  
The U.K. government has had to deny its Brexit strategy is 'have cake and eat it'  
The Government's handling of Brexit is becoming more and more farcical by the day.  
Swedish furniture giant Ikea invests in UK following Brexit vote, as sales continue their upward trajectory.  
Downing St confirms 'have cake and eat it' notes "nothing to do with Brexit" - they're a rough draft of the Eric Pickles Xmas Diet. #r4today 
Yep, it gets blamed for everything . I'm surprised you hadn't realised it was -4 in Wales last night due to #Brexit as well  
.@NicolaSturgeon: 'Irish business has an ally in the Scottish Government. We will do all we can to mitigate the impact of Brexit.' 
Audience laughs when the Tory's position on Brexit - or lack of position - is mentioned. 
If only.  #Brexit #LoudDISCOMusic 
.@NicolaSturgeon addresses reps from Microsoft, Aer Lingus, Diageo & other big businesses on Brexit& trade in Dublin  
Second big laugh of the day, #Brexit related, pissing myself here, very funny.  
Morning London. This is the most read story of the last hour: Memo offers snapshot of behind-scenes Brexit thinking  
Scoop: Merkel rejected May's offer to sort out EU citizens' rights before formal Brexit talks begin:  
Brexit lot never shy about Nazi analogies - plucky little Britain standing up to totalitarian EU - so I feel fewer qualms re the following: 
BREAKING. It's official. Having cake & eating it is not govt Brexit policy. Good to know @BBCr4today 
Haseeb Hameed really is the one-man antidote to 2016. Can we put him in charge of Brexit? 
No wonder gov't refuses to reveal its Brexit hand. It's a ticket stub, a Daim wrapper and three post-its with GREAT CARDZ scribbled on them. 
Theresa May and Poland's Beata Szydlo unite against Russia, avoid Brexit pitfalls  
#EU, Can you feel it coming?What a weekend awaits you!#Austrian election and #Italian referendum..I cannot wait! 
Best line in the leaked Brexit memo: 'Very French negotiating team.' When you demand to have your cake and eat it, they will merely shrug.  
Britain’s negotiating plan for Brexit is revealed – plus the rest of the morning's headlines  
I don't know why anyone should be surprised that "have cake and eat it" is the Brexit position. It has been the Brexit position all along. 
"Let them eat cake" - Marie Antoinette"Give us cake" - UK #Brexit Gov - a crumbling reality? :) 
#Eurozone contagion trade: Deutsche Bank stocks hit by #Italy's referendum woes.  
Quick recap of the government's #brexit strategy:  
If your MP doesn't commit to voting for Article 50 unconditionally then they are effectively trying to block Brexit. Don't let them. 
Brexit can be stopped if the British people decide that, having seen what it means, the pain/gain, cost/benefit analysis doesn’t stack up. 
Prospect of Brexit triggers unraveling of cheap food economy. Quelle surprise  
Theresa May must show the Remain saboteurs who's boss over Brexit   via @telegraphnews 
Nowhere near enough.BREXIT is largely irrelevant now, the banking system will collapse the EU project.  
Today in Brexit: rotting vegetables and a labour crisis for farms. Sunlit uplands, my friends. Sunlit uplands.  
What do you mean there's no Brexit plan? Here it is copied from the original fag packet (no smoking in Downing St).  
Brexit must promote and protect financial services, the U.K. says  
I was confident that the worst Brexit hot takes were behind us; I did not reckon with Jonathan Jones  
Scepticism about a Brexit apocalypse looks increasingly justified  
Most Brits expect economy to get worse but don't regret voting for Brexit  
5 year-old son: What's Brexit?Me: Britain leaving the EU.5 year old son: To where?Me: Er... (He's nailed it) 
Just read @IanDunt book. Compulsory for anyone wanting to see beyond the flag-waving, ideological side of Brexit & understand challenges.  
Sentix #Italexit index jumps to life-time high ahead of Dec referendum. Almost 20% of investors expect #Italy to leave Euro within 12mths. 
There's a new slogan for Brexit...  
OECD's Economic Outlook of G20 2015-2018. Thanks to Brexit, we've gone from strongest to weakest in G20. Did people vote for this?  
Two of Italy’s largest banks could be the first victims of Sunday's referendum  
Draghi warns Britain's economy would be the first to suffer from a hard Brexit  
150 MPs campaigned 4 Brexit @ZacGoldsmith wasn't one of them. His last act as MP was to vote w Lab to protect rights of EU migrants #votezac 
I had hoped that UK would approach Brexit negotiations with some humility. Instead staggering arrogance revealed.  
#ITALY | Italy PM Renzi reportedly weighing option to resign even if he wins referendum …  
OBR wrong to predict Brexit will leave budget black hole, says top economist Gerard Lyons.  
No running commentary but a Downing St walk reveals tantalising notes of Brexit ministers' approach  
"Have cake and eat it" more wishful thinking than hard #Brexit strategy. Will collide with tough reality of EU politics, interests. 
"What’s the model? Have your cake and eat it" - Notes expose the omnishambles that is Brexit  
Thought Lord Mandelson had been rather somnolent. Not surprised that he &  'British Influence' are threatening to hinder BREXIT process! 
How many more warnings will our #Brexit government ignore? @FT 
Theresa May and Poland's Beata Szydlo unite against Russia, avoid Brexit pitfalls  
The single market interim option is the only sane way forward.#Brexit #EEA #Flexcit 
The Conservative Candidate Caroline Johnson is soft on BREXIT. Only UKIP want to take back control with a full English BREXIT.  
Vote for Victoria Ayling in the #Sleaford by-election. Because the Conservative Candidate Caroline Johnson is soft on BREXIT.  
Just like with Brexit, the rate of change matters way more than the absolute level of diversity when predicting voter response.  
20/ I'm not sure how Brexit happened in that context; I’m not there & don’t know. But PBS in US does not have a fraction of the audience... 
 & many others seek ban on fracking in FL by constitutional referendum. If serious about climate change, let's do it!  
Italy to DITCH euro if Prime Minister Matteo Renzi loses key referendum  
Could stop #Brexit.  
Why you should be watching the Italian referendum.  
Up to 8 Italian banks may fail if prime minister Renzi loses a constitutional referendum next weekend.  
The Ethical Argument for Free Trade: @DanielJHannan on #Brexit, Trump & more  
Ireland, do the UK a favour: refer #Brexit to CJEU - writes @JolyonMaugham in @IrishTimes 
Italian banking stocks drop further ahead of country’s crucial referendum  
Yeah. Sure. It has nothing at all to with the fact that Brexit is totally insane.  
Brexit: a Damascene conversion - the topsy-turvy world of Brexit politics ...  #Brexit  .  
UK Politics is very confusing. I'll wait until the Ministry of Silly Walks weighs in on Brexit before forming an opinion.  
Britain’s Brexit plan is to “have cake and eat it” according to this note carried by a Conservative official  
Bless Theresa May. Misquoted again. A reporter actually asked her 'so what's the plan for Brexit?'. And her response - 'God knows'. #dear 
Secret Brexit Says "Bisto Gravy Granule History Month" Should Be Introduced In Schools #SecretBrexit 
UK Gov Announces Referendum On Banning Eric Bristow. Vote Like For 'Yes', Share For 'Hell Yes' #EricBristow 
DCM Dr Joseph Garcia with Gibraltar delegation to discuss Brexit with Government of Wales in Cardiff.  
New British PM Theresa May says faith in God behind all her decisions - including how to proceed with Brexit  
Government statement not leaked or photographed outside No. 10 reveals the truth about #Brexit vote.  
Of all challenges she faces as Britain's PM, it is #Brexit that keeps #TheresaMay awake at night  
Full statement from @theSNP Europe spokesperson @StephenGethins on the Tories' embarrassing & deeply troubling #quietbatpeople Brexit memo.  
Brilliant: Nick Cohen skewers the Brexit Pollyannas with wit and rigourIt’s time to challenge the Brexit Pollyannas  
2016 so far:- Trump victory- Brexit- Syria crisis- Turkey coup attempt- North Korea nuclear tests- ISIS attacks- Brazil impeachment 
Germaine Greer talking rubbish on #TheAgenda East Anglia overwhelmingly voted for Brexit. 
High and mighty Sturgeon grandstands on taxpayers money then REFUSES to publish minutes of EU Brexit meetings  
Investor who predicted Brexit now dooms the euro  
Anti-Brexit Sir John Major gets £25K a pop FROM EU every time he speaks out on the EU!  
Brexit, Trump, Le Pen: Is it over for the left? The Nation Editor @KatrinaNation talks to @mehdirhasan, 1720GMT Nov 29. Send your questions. 
" #Brexit is beginning to bite " explains my colleague @GlenisWillmott , Chair of @UKLabour NEC : 
Labour MPs attack party leadership for 'laying down and accepting hard Brexit'  
"Govt hasn't got Brexit plan!""Govt must reveal Brexit plan""Look there's the Brexit plan""Disgraceful the Govt revealed its Brexit plan" 
Make no mistake #brexit is going to put Britain on a collision course with 1933.   #ukip #TheresaMay 
Never mind #Trump & #Brexit - the real ticking nuke is the ECB-run #eurozone 
UK Government #brexit strategy revealed as 'have cake and eat it'. Can really see the EU27 falling for that one. 
So, today in Brexit: faith in god will guide us to have our cake and eat it. Also, that Mark Carney is short. Can't wait for  tomorrow. 
Tory aide inadvertently reveals transcript of Theresa May's Brexit strategy  
A fitting metaphor for our strategy on Brexit: scarcely-comprehensible scrawlings, with reference to something proverbially impossible.  
Tuesday's TIMES: '"Have cake and eat it' - aide reveals Brexit tactic" #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Oops - what if EU won't let us 'have our cake & eat it' #Brexit  
Brexit chaos, straight out of The Thick of It playbook. Have your cake and eat it is just wishful thinking, not a negotiating strategy.  
TIMES: 'Have cake and eat it' - aide reveals Brexit tactic #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Really quite an incredible statistic. Essentially Brexit is costing this country £60bn per year. EU membership costs £8.5bn yearly. GULP! 
One thing I wont tolerate are those few but disruptive members calling for unity now yet screwed Nigel and others over during the referendum 
Liberal Democrat leader Tim Farron said there is 'no mandate' for a hard Brexit  
Theresa May admits Brexit is 'hugely challenging' in a rare personal interview  
THE GUARDIAN FRONT PAGE: 'Have your cake and eat it' - is this the Tory Brexit plan?' #skypapers 
What kind of government allows our Parliamentary representatives to debate and vote on Brexit only when forced to do so by the High Court? 
The decommissioning of an EU-owned nuclear facility has become a potential flashpoint in Brexit negotiations  
Brexit: What the Hell Happens Now? @NickCohen4 reviews @IanDunt's book:  
It’s time to challenge the Brexit Pollyannas, says Nick Cohen in the @spectator (can't think who he has in mind!) 
Britain’s Brexit plan is to “have cake and eat it” according to this note carried by a Conservative official  
.@ericbristow Hi Eric, I was just wondering which way you voted in the June 23rd referendum? 
Now learnt more about UK Govt approach to Brexit via a leak than they've told parliament: 'Have cake and eat it'!  
Remainer Nicky Morgan tells moaning MPs to STOP blocking Brexit and trigger Article 50  
Brexit notes photograph played down by government  
I thought "have our cake and eat it" was just a jokey Brexit sound bite. Turns out it is the actual strategy  via @FT 
Tuesday's FT: "Brexit will impose  heavier toll on U.K. than Eurozone Draghi warns" #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Very welcome supportive statement from Ireland. Would be nice to now see UK government help protect Scotland's place in Europe #Brexit  
The Tory right must now take responsibility for the £58bn 'Brexit bill' - Pat McFadden -   
Tory 'Brexit plan' photographed in Downing Street  
Brexit is unlikely to curb EU immigration - but will increase vulnerability of workers via wordpressdotcom 
FT: Brexit will impose  heavier toll on U.K. than Eurozone Draghi warns #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
European Greens to gather in Scotland against Brexit 
Can somebody show Paddy "they want a 2nd referendum" Ashdown this?Cc @IsabelOakeshott From @whatukthinks 
It's the opposite - a majority of voters DONT want a second referendum !!  
Brexit teen says education system BIASED towards EU as she talks of backlash at university.   
Petition - We like this one "PAY £350M PER WEEK TO THE NHS OR RE-RUN THE REFERENDUM"  Please do RT it won't you..... 
FINANCIAL TIMES FRONT PAGE: 'Brexit will impose heavier toll on UK than eurozone, Draghi warns' #skypapers 
Britons were cruelly mis-sold the truth about Brexit | the big issue  
Faisal really is struggling with #Brexit. He'll be paying for "associate citizenship" until he realises it a political con.  
This is why politicians should respect the result of the EU referendum.  
Defeating Zac Goldsmith could turn the tide on Brexit.   
I hope everyone's ready for the Wexit referendum in 2019 (via @DMReporter) 
TRUMP SETS THE STAGE: Italy Expected To See Their ‘Brexit’ Day Soon As Establishment Falls  
London's mayor says EU citizens may stay in capital after Brexit  
Thanks, I'll fly BA. #brexit  
Ask 2 things from any leaver1 Name one " EU" law you would abolish 2 Name an opportunity for the poor arising from Brexit 
New Sturgeon secrecy row as SNP chief refuses to publish minutes of EU Brexit meetings  
'The only country in the world with absolute sovereignty is North Korea' - @NickCohen4 on @IanDunt and Brexit  
TONIGHT: We're with Nicola Sturgeon in Dublin at the FM takes her #Brexit battle on tour. Will the trip work? #scotnight 
Secret Brexit memo: UK won’t get single market access  via @POLITICOEurope 
Brexit means BREXIT: Fury as Remoaners threaten FRESH action to stop us leaving EU  
Remainer Nicky Morgan tells moaning MPs to STOP blocking Brexit and trigger Article 50 NOW  
.@ProfSteveKeen @KingstonUni on Italy referendum, EU, Italian banks & France’s presidential elections.   via 
What's next for Europe?Presidential election in #Austria (with far right candidate Hofer) & Referendum on constitutional reform in #Italy. 
'Xenophobia' declared word of the year due to Brexit, Trump's win  
People (I mean "men") who stand drinking at the bar when it's clear people behind them are trying to get served: proper Brexit. 
Delighted to be elected head of policy for @BrusselsLibDems. We will fight for free movement rights, EU citizenship & against hard #Brexit 
So that's why Private Health Bosses are working so hard to make sure Brexit doesn't happen.  
Running commentary on Brexit thinking in form of notes photographed in Westminster — @MailOnline  
Sir Humphrey Keeps Forgetting Brexit Means Brexit  
The EU must compromise to win a good #Brexit deal for Britain and the rest of the union, warns Polish PM 
These notes might reveal the government's approach to Brexit  
"This may well be the moment for that," says Nicola Sturgeon on prospect of Scottish independence amid Brexit @PA 
After talks with @nicolasturgeon in Dublin, @CharlieFlanagan says Ireland anxious to be helpful to Scotland #Brexit  
Attacks on Brexit judges are bad for democracy, says former law lord  
North Kingston:Your vote can change the direction of this hard-Brexit government. Vote @sarahjolney1 on Thursday. 
Attacks on Brexit judges are bad for democracy, says former law lord  
Govt cannot tell us #brexit plans so we end up zooming in on Tory aide carrying a note pad for info #brexitshambles 
This reads like @DavidDavisMP view of what Brexit will mean  
Tomorrow @ScotNational  Michael Gray @GrayInGlasgow on Brexit and the prospect of a Celtic Alliance  
The unscrupulous rich have realized that the uneducated find it easier to relate to the bling-rich than to the highly-educated#Brexit 
Eliminate or marginalize the thinkers & experts and you can rule without fear of your lies and slogans being questioned.#Remain #Brexit 
Pol Pot knew the real enemy, the intellectuals, thinkers & experts. The same 'metropolitan elite' derided by #Brexit politicians.#Remain 
"We think it's unlikely we'll be offered single market"Did this blunder just reveal the Tories' Brexit strategy?  
Useful meetings in Brussels today talking about Europol and options for policing & security cooperation post Brexit @CommonsHomeAffs 
I prefer to see this through the prism of aspiration and identity, not Brexit and anxiety.  
Without Brexit/Nigel, Trump may not have won. That's obvious even to Team Trump. So what's your point, Indy?  
UK manufacturers march on despite Brexit  #ukmfg #engineering 
"What's the model? Have cake & eat it."Sincerely,#Brexit negotiating team  
My guide to next week’s Brexit hearing in the @UKSupremeCourt for @FullFact.  Part two to follow. 
Why is Labour turning its back on the 65% of its voters who voted against Brexit? Your statement is extremely disappointing. 
Pretty sure this is the plot to an episode of The Thick Of It. Aide snapped with "have cake and eat it" Brexit plan 
Brexit has become the major constitutional issue: Parliament marginalised; 16&17yr.olds excluded; 13m didn't vote; based on poor information  
Idea of soft Brexit as a happy medium between two extremes is deluded. Sole extreme is hard Brexit. Moderation, unity & stability is Remain. 
Did this Tory aide just give away the Government's 'have cake and eat it' Brexit strategy? 
BREXIT: ‘Leaving the EU negatively effects every industry in the UK’ warns independent think tank.Sorry. I mean. ‘Experts are too gloomy.’ 
Does anyone remember voting to open the borders and bring an end to our culture & civilization?No me neither.#IoVotoNo #FPÖ #Brexit #Trump 
#Italia #Österreich We The People of the World support your fight for freedom: #IoVotoNo #FPÖ.The tide is turning. Keep fighting.#Brexit  
READ: Transcribed No.10 Brexit Notes >> "Loathe to do" transitional arrangement, policy is "to have cake and eat it"  
Interesting - legal cases are being prepared in other parts of the EU to slow or stop #Brexit 
A decent snap transcript of that #Brexit memo leak. The plan: "have cake & eat it."  
The way Italy & France are going @spowe, the #Euro could be over before #Brexit begins--which is why I voted for it  
This is fascinating. Most of it Brexit 101 stuff but then: 'Canada plus'.  
A vote for the #LibDems in the #richmondparkbyelection is a vote for a return to decent politics #SarahOlney #LibDemFightback #Brexit #Trump 
I spoke about young pple getting a bigger say over Brexit at the @Open_Britain event today - @WeAreUndivided is doing great work on this! 
Don't think I've a single foreign-looking/sounded friend who hasn't experienced something like this since the Brexit vote. 
New legal challenge against hard #brexit - the power of Article 127:  
Portugal Bond Yields Hover Near Brexit Highs As Bank Bosses Quit Ahead Of Bailout  
The use of EU nationals as 'pawns' in the #Brexit process is a breach of Article 8 of Human Rights Act.  
READ: Leave.EU Co-Founder, @TiceRichard in the @Telegraph.'PM must show Remain saboteurs who's boss over Brexit.' 
James: Theresa May said God will help guide her through Brexit. Imagine Sadiq Khan had said the same about Allah...  
if you voted for #Brexit and now regret it, you need to contact ur MP to explain u were misled and to demand it is stopped  
I don't support calls nor would I get involved with any group working for a 2nd #EUref but I do oppose a Hard Brexit  
.@OwenSmith_MP will vote to BLOCK Brexit. RT if you believe he should #RespectTheResult 
Carney wants two-year Brexit delay. Give him 2 month notice to quit job! 
#brexit logic: If the EU is a failed project nowhere else wants to emulate, why are other regions forming trading blocs and customs unions?  
Paul Nuttall wants to hold a referendum on bringing back the death penalty. A dangerous and stupid man. 
"My sleepless Brexit nights have been over-intrepeted" @theresa_may said to me. Sounds like the title of a Country & Western Xmas number 1 
But let's be clear 'the lesson of Brexit/Trump' is not that we must avoiding reporting the views of politicians. That's bananas. 
Euro doom? Investor who backed Brexit now predicts looming collapse of eurozone  
Brexit is simply a return to normality. It is normal for countries to control own money , borders and laws. 
Here are four things to watch for as Italy prepares to vote in a referendum called by prime minister Matteo Renzi  
BBC News - Brexit: Legal battle over UK's single market membership. Art 127 needs to be triggered before Art 50! Lol  
See my "Forecasters have been much too pessimistic about Brexit", treat #OBR’s crystal ball-gazing with scepticism 
One lad is not very happy with the new Football Manager game. Bloody Brexit.   
A week after Jo Cox verdict, UKIP's new leader warns anti-Brexit MPs: "we are coming after you"  
Join us on Wednesday for the next webcast in our #Brexit series. Live 30th November at 2pm.  
The Lord Mayor of London says the City will not be destroyed by #Brexit.  Just like we have been saying all along 
Brexit will SAVE the NHS: Cancer specialist says leaving EU will rescue our health service  
First Minister @NicolaSturgeon is answering questions from our female reps on issues surrounding Brexit & gender equality in politics  
This is Brexit fake-reason no 2. Only works when you forget most of EU countries are stable, prosperous, w higher living standards than UK  
So, Theresa May is getting her invisible sky friend involved with the whole #Brexit cockup. That makes us feel loads better. #Brexshit 
.@theresa_may and Polish PM @BeataSzydlo meet to discuss Russia and #Brexit  
It’s time to challenge the Brexit Pollyannas, says @NickCohen4  
#ukip has always been about defrauding the British voter b/c in their 23 years of existence they never created a post Brexit blueprint. 
The Polish PM is now thanking the UK PM for her support in the hate crimes over the Polish community in the UK following #Brexit. How sad. 
#Brexit could savage British science, says @julianhuppert #research #academic 
PM: "made significant progress on Brexit... I will trigger Article 50" by end MArch.. hopes reciprocal citizen issue can be settled "early" 
Brexit will be tougher for UK than for eurozone, warns Draghi  
The Remainers incessant obstruction to #Brexit is fast becoming guerrilla warfare.Only this time La Resistance are NOT the good guys 
Why the Government could face another #Brexit legal challenge  
Brexit is really hitting home for some people... @FootballManager may never be the same again!  
Latest #Brexit legal challenge will not be ‘back door’ to Single Market, says @ProfKAArmstrong  
Gibraltar Government delegation discuss Brexit issues at official lunch with Government of Wales in Cardiff.  
Greens from across Europe are coming to Glasgow to hold post-Brexit council meeting 
.@chukaumunna on LBC Radio this morning: the  Government should aim for us to continue to be a member of the Single Market after #Brexit  
Why Italy's referendum on Sunday could lead to a fresh crisis for EU.Read more: #Renzi #italyreferendum #italy 
European Central Bank chief Mario Draghi tells EU Parliament Brexit economic impact "would first and foremost weigh on the UK economy" ... 
European president pleads for no more referendum because they'll all VOTE leave.. HA GETTING WORRIED??? AND SO YOU SHOULD..NO MORE EU :):) 
Nick #Clegg on Tony #Blair "Formidable Politician"One word:Vurping (throwing up a little in your mouth)#Brexit! 
is this the first insight into Brexit seen going into No10 from the Brexit/cabinet office women holding was with Mark Field MP ?  
Clegg still isn't listening to the electorate. Swap the word formidable for the words War Criminal. #Chilcot #Brexit  
.@Rte ask Sturgeon about the Celtic Alliance that's forming on Brexit. Sturgeon says there's much "common ground".  
By @JananGanesh on Tony Blair and Brexit  
Join the Famous Five as they tackle... - Parenting- Gluten Free food- Strategy Away Days- Teetotalism- Brexit 
Race & religion related abuse/Hate crime rose after Brexit & Trump election-leaving many of us vulnerable & afraid. Yet- poor Nigel Farage  
Those who backed Leave will be held to account for whatever impact Brexit has on people’s jobs and wages  
Theresa May must show the Remain saboteurs who's boss over Brexit   
Trump's win, along w/ Brexit, instilling fear in European Elites  
Nigel Farage's Brexit march on Supreme Court cancelled amid claims that the folk who vote for Nigel Farage might show up.  
Simply put allowing #tonyblair to speak against #brexit guarantees Brexit. He is a poisoned challice. 
Szydło: "Poland stands ready to help its old friend Britain reach the best possible Brexit deal."  
From 2014 to Brexit to Trump to even Maharashtra municipal polls - a particular class of elite 'commentators' are getting EVERYTHING wrong. 
The word "elite" seems to have a new meaning, at least in the Brexit debate.  The word now appears to mean those out of power. 
Brilliant news after Brexit, fishing apprenticeships return to the North East.Not only have we taken control of our country but our fish  
Continued membership of the single market or EEA would basically be membership of the EU under another name #eea #brexit #europe 
Surely the Maharashtra municipal polls ought to be considered a mini referendum on #Demonitization - no? 
The new legal challenge that could stop Theresa May's Brexit  
It is a rubbish story, but who would you trust to advise the PM on Brexit: 
Only way to defeat #brexit is to expose #Ukip for what it is -a trojan horse built by billionaires to cut their taxes & privatise the NHS. 
Italian Bond Risk Spikes To 30-Month Highs As Referendum Fear Batters Banks  
First Brexit now Trump recount. Constantly having to fight battles already won. Why? Because the left hates democracy & are sore losers. 
Got the last chicken bake from Gregg's today right before some old woman asked for one, that's what ya get for voting Brexit ya hag 
Clegg: Now even discussing the practicalities of leaving is verboten by Brexit dogma  
Even if Nuttall is talking about political "colour" this looks like a threat to harm #Remain supporters. He should be prosecuted.#Brexit  
#KejriwalRisesForSikhRightsFinally the Sikh community has an Indian Hindu voice speaking for their human rights and right of referendum 
Live poll...80% of IT managers think Brexit will have a big impact on their datacentre and cloud strategy #gartnerdc 
I propose the "Badger" as the post-Brexit unit of weight.  
How the decommissioning of an EU-owned nuclear facility has become a potential flashpoint in Brexit negotiations  
48% cannot stay silent 2016 chaos bring decades of hardship UK needs supporters of democracy in a united cause to stop brexit  
Stopping #Brexit will defend not only the country & its future, but the future of democracy itself, says @acgrayling  
Call to establish Celtic Sea alliance. Wales urged to do deal with Ireland to secure EU funds post-Brexit  
Scepticism about a Brexit apocalypse looks increasingly justified  
We are a whisker away from causing a major upset for this Brexit government  
Interesting that European Cen Bank boss Draghi - highly influential on € crisis diplomacy -now weighing in on Brexit  
You all know what to do. Sarah is the Anti Brexit candidate. Cast your vote.....  
Note how Farage put the word "legitimate" very near to "violence is the next step", without actually saying violence is legitimate#Brexit  
Meeting with ECB President Draghi on economic situation, December #EUCO and Brexit. 
Testing begins on the UK's post-Brexit emmigration process. Broadstairs, 2017.  
#Brexit to raise government borrowing by £226m/week - almost the amount Leave liars said we'd GAIN! (Via @InFactsOrg 
Some of the biggest U.K. banks may not clear new public stress tests  
Theresa May appoints new Minister for Brexit  
Surely this pile of horse dung would make a more effective Ambassador to Washington than Nigel Farage.#Brexit #Brexitcon #UKIPLeadership 
@UnvirtuousAbbey In these uncertain times, with Brexit & Trump, for a wise and experienced Queen, we give thanks. 
Polish PM: EU Must Compromise to Get a Good Brexit Deal  
The pound slumped 0.7% this morning after the debate over Brexit intensified  
#Italy's consumer confidence has fallen to 16mth low in Nov, not a good sign for the Renzi govt heading into Referendum this Sun. (via AP)  
Pound breaks below $1.24 as Brexit debate intensifies  
Just finished reading @IanDunt's short and brutal "Brexit: what the hell happens now  Highly recommended 
Swiss says NO! Proposal to close all Switzerland's nuclear power plants rejected in referendum  
"...we advocated leaving the Single Market.."Advocate until the cows come home. It wasn't on the ballot. Simples#Brexit#Article127 
SIU has called for the ScotGov to drop plans for an unnecessary and divisive referendum. See our response here:  
Everytime a wealthy PM invokes god you just know the poor, were moved a littler further away from paradise. #brexit 
'Some remainers....don't seem to understand the meaning of the word democracy.' Gordon Henderson MP #Brexit  
"Humour is a tool we use to get us through our daily lives." Fancy #MondayMotivation from @TrevorNoah? Talking his book, #Brexit and #Trump. 
Brexit. Trump. These two actually agreeing on something. 2016 has been FULL of surprises #Neighbours 
My fellow Welsh brothers and sisters need to wake up now we did it for Brexit  its time to vote UKIP and rid ourselves of labour  
UK PM saying re Brexit she is guided by God like a pilot saying "we've lost control of the plane but I'm going to let God land this thing" 
Paul Nuttall wants privatization in the NHS and Aaron Banks wants a tax haven #Brexit for the rich. The turkeys voted for Xmas#Remain 
What God might tell Theresa May about Brexit  
The longer May drags her Brexit feet the more nonsense remoaners will dig up to stop it.God's sake woman get your finger out & do something.  
#UPDATE Britain's anti-EU party UKIP elects Paul Nuttall as leader to take over from Brexit firebrand Nigel Farage  
‘We hold the cards’ Brexit negotiators BULLISH ahead of EU showdown  
OECd devastating on negative impacts Brexit UK to grow 1.2% '17 1% '18 Rees_Moggy Gove IDS set to go after them too? 
I'll hear no more criticism from the SNP on lack of clarity on Brexit given how they misled us on currency, pensions and much more. Still do 
.@paulnuttallukip: We will hold the Governments feet to the fire to ensure Brexit really does mean Brexit. #UKIPLeadership 
Spolier alert: if you love Brexit, you'll hate this 
Jaguar's #Brexit boost with plans for 10,000 new jobs as #UK sees investment, export and retail all rise  @MailOnline 
Lib Dem win in #RichmondPark will send a clear message that Theresa May should rein in her hard Brexit agenda  
Perhaps the definitive comment on the the losses that #Brexit and populism are inflicting on our society.#Remain #YesEU 
A lot of new Irish citizens post-Brexit  
#Brexit vote provided mandate to leave the single market.These legal challenges are undemocratic sabotage attempts. 
SHOW this video to anyone in the remain campaign now arguing to stay in the single market #Brexit  
Christmas pudding pricier after Brexit hits pound  
Had May kept the word of the British Prime minister and tripped article 50 the day after the referendum we would now be well on the way. 
Finished @IanDunt's very good Brexit book at the weekend. It was like a Stephen King story - sharp, terrifying and full of utter clowns 
Reports that Tony Blair & Nick Clegg to launch new Anti-Brexit party. What part of democracy don't they understand?  
Oh, that's all right then. We were all starting to worry that Brexit might mean Total Societal and Economic Goatfuck, but now...  
"We'll ensure Brexit really does mean Brexit" - new UKIP leader's 1st speech #UKIPLeadership  
Marie Curie Alumna @MazzucatoM on @bbcquestiontime: EU improved environment and workers' rights. #Brexit cuts research funding by billions.  
Paul Nuttall wants to privatise the NHS, hold a referendum on abortion & allow firms to discriminate against gay ppl  
Article 50: punishment clause designed to destroy economy of any country foolish enough to try to implement it - from @IanDunt's Brexit book  
#Ukip new leader is @paulnuttallukip Good luck Paul from all of us in the west midlands #Brexit @willowbrookwolf All the best @Nigel_Farage 
What were the odds on a Pope's visit to Ireland coinciding with the increased debate around reproductive rights and a referendum? (High). 
Italian banks fall fast on referendum jitters  
#Brexit "directly led" to @realDonaldTrump's victory in the US election, says @Nigel_Farage  
Commentariat tweeting Nigel is getting big headed about Brexit being precursor to President Trump. Ignoring that is basically Trump's view. 
There is no reason why we can't have a reasoned and measured discussion on a #UnitedIreland ahead of a unity referendum - @M_McGuinness_SF 
Nigel Farage predicts that Renzi will lose Italy's referendum and Hofer will win in Austria. Some men just want to see the world burn. 
NEWS! God tells Theresa May he’s not touching Brexit with a bargepole  
The young didn’t choose Trump or Brexit  
Brexit in one image[Vatican Library, MS Urb. Lat. 365]  
#Brexit is a busted flushPlans on God's intervention"Jump off cliff w/o 'chute; God help us!" says Queen Tess(hubby has money chutes)  
Thanks to the brilliant @Keir_Starmer for excelent debate on Brexit and for helping start our #CareforhteNHS campaign 
How international banks, which have long favored London as their European base, are planning to cope with Brexit  
There is no doubt the referendum was not legally binding but of course politicians have taken it to be politically binding.  
2016 has been an annus horribilis for the regressive left. They lost to Brexit. They lost to Trump. And now they have lost #fidelcastro  
Let Theresa May know that a bloke on my time line has managed to sort out Brexit. Let's press the button. It's going to be fine. 
The PM said God will guide her through Brexit. @mrjamesob asks if you'd feel the same if Sadiq was guided by Allah?  
Wales urged to do deal with Ireland to secure EU funds post-Brexit  
Brexit Faces Yet Another Legal Challenge From Pro-EU Think Tank  
BREXIT: Racists on the Daily Mail comment boards have reacted well to a call for people to stop calling them racist.  
Here is @paddyashdown just before the referendum result. Now he wants a rerun. Via @Mike_Fabricant. 
The shipping industry can help the UK 'make a success' of Brexit. Our Blueprint for Growth shows how.  #brexit  
We need to show #LondonIsOpen to new talent. That's why I've invested £2.5m into start-ups since the Brexit vote.  
When a leader claims to be guided by God, what they mean is that they are immune to reason. #Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
13. What it does show is that there so many unforeseen problems with Brexit, legal or otherwise. Isn't Brexit a fascinating mess?/Ends. 
First May wants to exercise the powers of a Tudor monarch, now she claims to be guided by God. She's 500 years out.#Brexit #Remain 
8.  The referendum question, of course, was expressly about UK membership of the EU. The EEA was not mentioned. 
To be fair to Theresa May, she has been misquoted. The reporter said "Just what is the plan for Brexit?" and she said, "God knows". 
Also God is doing everything he can to warn us that Brexit will be disaster of Biblical proportions - though to be fair he does enjoy those. 
Brexit jihad.  
OECD on Brexit: 3% drop in UK GDP by 2020 and 5% fall by 2030 (£3,200 per household). In worse case could be a 7.7% fall in GDP by 2030 
The very notion that Jesus, a man of infinite tolerance and acceptance, would be for Brexit is simply ludicrous. 
Gov: "Instead of challenging it, people should be helping make a success of Brexit""Ok, so... what's the plan?""NONE OF YOUR BUSINESS!" 
Brexit hipster.  
How will investment banks restructure after Brexit? Here is a guide:  
This Christmas, why not start a lovely argument at the dinner table?Tshirts £20Hoodies £35DM to order.#brexit #Mansplaining #Vegan 
PM who earlier opposed Brexit now says God tells her it’s the ‘right thing' to do  
Defeating Zac Goldsmith could turn the tide on Brexit  
Let's face it: The UK is no longer a democracy. It's a dictatorship of lawyers, corrupt judges & the political class. #BREXIT #BrexitJustice 
Soubry will vote for Article 50, Chuka doesn't back a 2nd referendum and wants "fair movement" not "free movement". Remainers fragmenting.  
In backing Brexit @ZacGoldsmith helped inflict on the UK the worst decision of our lifetime robbing kids of future 
Brexit: Legal battle over UK's single market membership. As Shakespeare put it "First, we hang the lawyers'   
At last Clegg says something true & useful! Off camera remark admitting Remainers won't be able to block Brexit 
Tory MP Anna Soubry: "I don't flinch in saying I believe in the free movement of people" #brexit  
Theresa May pretty much admits she hasn't got a clue what's going on with Brexit and nor do any of her earthly advisors...  
Theresa May's suggestion that God is helping with Brexit is reassuring. Great to know that we've got top people working on it. 
Throwing the baby out with the bathwater, & the bath out of the window? @jonlis1 on Brexit JR #SingleMarket #Art127 
Theresa May faces new legal challenge to block her Brexit plan  
Clegg, Soubry and Umunna are calling for the UK to remain in the European single market. Presser imminent #brexit  
We will be reporting from the Seanad later today on the FM's speech and the debate about post-Brexit post-UK politics 
The OBR estimates the UK will need to borrow an additional £6 billion a year due to reduced immigration #Brexit 
Oggi siamo a #Napoli #10milakmperilNO  tappa Hotel Ramada H 16 @LavoratoriPerNO @forza_italia @GruppoFICamera #referendum #iovotoNO 
Brexit: UK government faces legal challenge over single market  
Brexit: lawyers argue leaving EEA is not automatic & would happen only if UK triggers Article 127 of EEA agreement.   
SNP Minister forced to deny diplomatic shambles over Brexit  
Funny hearing Theresa May claiming God will help her with Brexit. If He existed, like that £350m-a-day we were saving, we'd be peachy!! 
Crushed since the Brexit referendum, trade-weighted sterling eyes its best month since Jan 2009, second best in 30 years.  
Coming Up: 30 Nov – OPEC meeting 2 Dec – Nonfarm Payrolls 4 Dec – Italian Referendum5 Dec – Eurogroup (Greece)8 Dec – ECB Meeting 
Ouch! #Italy bank stocks tumble as referendum shakes investor confidence.  
We will muddle through Brexit and endure Trump. But Lucy K leaving FT is 'end of civilisation' acc to letter writer  
@murdo_fraser thinks it's lovely that our country's leader consults an imaginary friend - I think it's terrifying. #indyref2 #brexit  
The London mayor's ploughed £2.5m into startups since Brexit  
Even Nick Clegg admits impotent Remainers can't block Brexit. How about they stop the moaning and get on board? 
Italian banks stocks are wobbling six days ahead of the country's referendum  
Let members of the travelling community negotiate Brexit, excellent hagglers and will not be pushed around#serious 
Tony Blair calls for a second Referendum by Matt - political cartoon gallery  
So @bbcnickrobinson, the BBC's **POLITICAL EDITOR!!!** doesn't know that Switzerland is NOT in the EEA. #Brexit 
Brexit: Government could face legal challenge over single market  
Tory, Labour, and Lib Dem MPs say the government's Brexit plan is a 'simplistic fantasy'  
Juncker on Brexit: not a question of revenge, but British cannot have same rights and advantages once they leave. @euronews 
First Minister @NicolaSturgeon begins two-day trip to Dublin #Brexit  
Hard Brexit to hurt almost all sectors of Brit economy: report  
Lets #Brexit and get out of the EU gravy train  now! Enough of our hard earned taxes going to Brussels 
#Brexit could force university closures, warns academic:  
On Planet Lefty Moron.Brexit voters are all hateful, racist Thomas Mair clones.And Castro was a happy-go-lucky, loveable socialist hero.  
Firms plan to take on more workers as Brexit worries fade  via @telebusiness 
Brexit leader Nigel Farage says he fears for his life 
Theresa May overheard: “God knows what’s happening with Brexit!"  
Italians go to the polls next week – but what will Italy’s referendum mean for the euro?  
Carney proposes ‘buffer’ period to ease Brexit – plus the rest of the morning headlines  
Turns out God is in charge of Brexit, via Theresa May  
Polls say that Francois Fillon will beat Le Pen in the French election. Do the French have different polls to Brexit & US elections?  
It appears that whether you live in the UK or the USA a sore loser is a sore loser.Man up the lot of you. You lost.#Brexit #Trump 
. @AndrewBridgenMP clearly thinks we should all be locked-up in the self-inflicted prison Britain created by the #Brexit fanatics#Remain 
Tory MP @AndrewBridgenMP loathes the idea that EU citizenship might be retained on a voluntary individual basis. #Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
Human rights after Brexit: the effect of Henry VIII clauses in the Great Repeal ActNew analysis by @JoelleGrogan:  
"Brexit is legitimising hate"?So now it's hateful to reject having your laws imposed on you by an unelected foreign body?Dream on, boyos!  
An investor who backed Brexit reckons the euro could collapse in less than five years  
The least damaging option would be to stay in the EU. A 'soft' #Brexit will only ever be second best. Come on MPs put the country first!  
It’s no longer about hard or soft Brexit – it's about a stupid or intelligent one  
So, in pushing for a hard #Brexit, @theresa_may thinks she is doing God's work... What utter nonsense ... to think this was the 21st century 
Chuka Umunna tells LBC parliament must vote on Brexit deal: “Leave voters are hypocritical if they don’t want parliament to have a say.” 
Brexit no longer fit for law and policy commentry.  Over to the theologians.  
let's get this straight - polls didn't fail us either in Brexit or in US. Pundits interpreting the polls failed  
Cross party study shows that a 'Hard' #Brexit would damage 'almost every sector' of UK economy  
Why the Italian referendum vote is unlikely to mean a swift exit from the euro  
I am all in favour of adopting the badger as our national unit of weight measurement post-Brexit  
The EU must compromise to win a good #Brexit deal for Britain and the rest of the union, warns Polish PM  
Lining God up as a scapegoat for the Brexit shambles. That's new.  
Repeat after me. "Soft Brexit" = no Brexit. It's a rhetorical device for those who despise the will of the people to try and subvert it! 
Sterling heading best month in EIGHT YEARS as EURO in crisis. But but ... #Brexit = apocalypse etc etc   
He called Brexit AND Trump correctly, tonight on @theprojecttv @StevePriceMedia calls another: Tony Abbott WILL BE BACK as Aussie PM. 
We are one of the most secular countries in the World. Even if we weren't, you can't say "Brexit will be cool cos .. God" You r the PM ffs! 
Successive Prime Ministers have proven that they have no respect for votersMajor, Blair, Brown have ruined this country.#Brexit #Article50 
More Brexit litigation.  
Here is a podcast of our @intelligence2 debate on @BBCWorld about #Brexit.  
Brexit has a new slogan...  
Theresa May seeks to charm Poland's leaders during historic visit in bid to secure allies for Brexit talks  via @FT 
Scots FM goes to Ireland for Brexit talks. BBC digs up unheard of ex Irish PM to rubbish it. 
Politicians who led Brexit campaign have 'legitimised hate', says Human Rights commission  
Brexit-style scaremongering brought to you by FT  
UK identifies its Brexit negotiating strengths  
What do u say West CountriesWill it just be the 2 of them,#BRexit#USexitOr will other countriesfinally stompout evil  #Globalism 
A union needs 40% of total electorate - whether or not all vote - to strike. #Brexit needs a simple majority of one, even if only 3 vote -  
Don't let the #Brexiteers hustle us past 'whether or not to Brexit' (aka whether or not to accept 'advice' of 37%): that's not settled! 
Theresa May to host Polish PM in Brexit talks amid anger at central bank chief's buffer plan  
Big news this morning... trifle sales are up 34% #TrifleGate #DontStifleTheTrifle #Brexit #RoyalBaby 
Only now do ppl debate the downside #BrexitReality tragically after the Referendum. "WTO Goodness" via @thetimes 
Photos of historical England 'challenge Downton Abbey myth'  Back to the future post-#brexit, Fool Britannia. 
Nick Clegg caught FINALLY admitting Remoaners CANNOT block Britain quitting the EU  
Leader of the LIBDEMS Tim Fallon said Farage doesn't represent British Values Fallons values are to just let us make all decisions for You 
Hard Brexit would damage 'almost every sector' of UK economy  
Elites threaten "bank failures" if Italians vote against pro-EU Renzi referendum -- never heard that one before.  
Hard Brexit would damage 'almost every sector' of UK economy 
1st Brexit , Then Trump Victory & Soon This Courageous Young Lady Takes Reins Of Power Fr The Globalists & Returns Power 2 People Of France  
Brexit leader Nigel Farage says he fears for his life 
Does @HelloCullen know this is a Pokémon purchase poll and not a referendum on the actual moon 
A v nice man in my show today told me he had voted brexit, didn't realise the consequences and thought we shouldn't now go through with it. 
Hard Brexit trade deals could take 25 years and damage the UK's economy, report warns  
brexit asked me out on a date 
"Eight of Italy’s banks risk failing if prime minister Matteo Renzi loses a constitutional referendum next weekend.”  
ITALY THREAT: Fears mount of multiple bank failures if Renzi loses referendum...#IoVotoNO#ItalExit  
Nigel Farage – Tony Blair So Unpopular, Anti-Brexit Campaign Sure To Backfire  
Tens of thousands of Italians protest in Rome against the upcoming referendum on constitutional reform  
Market reactions> Brexit: sharp dip, few days to recoverTrump: sharp dip, few hours to recoverItaly: probably just straight up 
That's what they said about Hillary winning too. And Brexit. Don't listen to polls.  
Brexit and Trump were a step in the right direction. 
Up To Eight Italian Banks May Fail If Renzi Loses Referendum  
Via @NPR: Francois Fillon Wins France's Conservative Presidential Primary   >> Brexit. Trump. And now... 
“If we will lose the referendum, this is not a problem for me. It’s a problem for the new generation of Italians” -- @matteorenzi #60Minutes 
Brexit: the worst possible option - staying in the EU by stealth ...  #Brexit.  
ITALY THREAT:  Fears mount of multiple bank failures if Renzi loses referendum...  
Well that's us all fucked then eh? We're waiting on God triggering #brexit the last time a PM heard God we ended up in Iraq at war #Blair pic.twitter.com/c4ngSY2HD4 
Apparently Theresa May will rely on God and faith to steer us through Brexit. The strategy has served humanity so well throughout history. 
Brexit leader Nigel Farage says he fears for his life 
The EU must compromise to win a good Brexit deal for Britain and the rest of the union, warns Polish PM   
The Lib Dems winning Richmond could have a substantial impact on Brexit.  
Hard Brexit would damage 'almost every sector' of UK economy  
Seems increasingly obvious now that those who voted for brexit are going to have to fight if they want to see it. democracy is struggling. 
"Theresa May is absolutely right not to tell us what Brexit means," says Juliet Samuel #premium #brexit 
Exactly this (regardless of any exciting headlines you may have read about God leading us through Brexit)  
Hey Teacher union bosses that is a referendum on your leadership It's time to wake up  
After a miscarriage of justice it’s irrelevant how many people start 'accepting' it over time. It doesn’t change. Same with Brexit 'mandate' 
Great to see The Sun call out "the enormity of Brexit" here, though perhaps they just didn't think to check what "enormity" means.  
As he should - the left hides its violent hatred behind smiles of tolerance and rainbow flags - these are not good people, folks.#Brexit  
The OBR and the Chancellor got it wrong, wrong, wrong and wrong. Brexit will raise, not lower growth  
Farage: "Clinton has accepted Trump’s win with good grace. Why can’t the UK’s politicians accept Brexit?"  
THE DAILY TELEGRAPH FRONT PAGE: 'EU must compromise on Brexit' #skypapers 
Theresa May says her faith in God will guide her with #Brexit.There is, therefore, no hope. The PM employs magical thinking via a 'Deity' 
The Brexit-Trump Syndrome: it’s the economics, stupid  
Calamity Clegg caught on camera finally admitting Remainers will never be able to block Brexit  
Cameron promised Article 50 within hours of a Brexit vote. It's now five months.  We want Article 50 NOW. 
You might say VMRO is riding the Visegrad/Brexit/MAGA wave, but I'd say we were there when it started  
Well at least now we're one step closer to knowing what Brexit means Brexit stands for. An unelected PM believing in God guiding her.  
There's a new slogan for Brexit... 
This week in #Brexit   
Nigel Farage says if the Remainers keep trying to obstruct Brexit, they’ll be pushing 17m people “to the edge”  
Brexit leader Nigel Farage says he fears for his life 
RT It isn't Britain that's confused about Brexit, it's the EU, says John Redwood MP   
As when Johnny Marr told you about the Smiths, you do NOT get to be an Ed Balls fan. Please stick to talking shite about Brexit for cash.  
Renzi faces pressure to stay in office as Italy referendum defeat looms  
Politicians who led Brexit campaign have 'legitimised hate', says Human Rights commission   
Brexit teen says education system BIASED towards EU as she talks of backlash at university  
Anti-Brexit party:Alistair CampbellTony BlairJohn MajorKenneth ClarkeAnna SoubryDavid LammyTim FarronNick CleggNicola Sturgeon 
URGENT: 2017 will see the collapse of the EU dictatorship structureWe must support:Geert W:  NEXITBeppe G: ITALEXITTheresa M: BREXIT...  
Who will win the #RichmondPark #ByElection this Thursday? #ZacGoldsmith or #SarahOlney? #BackZac #LibDemFightback #Heathrow #Brexit Pls RT! 
Tens of thousands of Italians protest in Rome against the upcoming referendum on constitutional reform  
She's just politely but firmly disagreeing with him. In response to the brexit thing she said "are you fucking kidding me?" 
Accepting #Brexit is like planning a sat nav journey & sticking with it even if you're passing signs saying "cliff" and still driving off it  
Apparently it's undemocratic to start a political movement in bracing Brexit Britain. Maybe it'll be banned.  
It would be an interesting popular, if perhaps unintended, statement, if in the Brexit year an EU national (ie Finnish) won UK #xfactor 
The best bit was when he said he picked his vote on brexit by doing eeny meeny miny moe...  
Reports that Tony Blair & Nick Clegg to launch new Anti-Brexit party. What part of democracy don't they understand?  
EXPOSED by #Wikileaks: the elite knows that Muslim migrants will lead to misery for years to come. It's the plan.#IoVotoNO #Brexit #Trump 
The people who are watching X-Factor instead of Planet Earth are probably the same ones who voted for Brexit 
I think it's time for the @LibDems and the @TheGreenParty to publicly work together to fight #Brexit. A great start in #RichmondPark. 
Brexit bus finally spotted  
Brexit now #edxit - time to say goodbye to 2016 #Strictly 
Man Who Led Brexit Movement Moving To The US  #Brexit #NigelFarage 
Blair CONSPIRING with Brussels? Europhile 'plotting with EU' to stop Brexit, Lord says   
How's about a second referendum on Edxit? @edballs @SCD_UK #strictly 
Fears mount of multiple bank failures if #Italy's Renzi loses referendum.  
He holds no elected formal position in the UK and fucked off when he might have stayed to shape post-brexit.  
Exclusive figures obtained by @LibDems show how #Brexit will devastate our #NHS - find out more here:  
I'm channelling the spirit of midnight to 3am on Brexit and US election nights and shouting "there still a chance" at the tv. #Strictly 
Brexit explained in one tweet...  
Oh I think we all know how this ends with Ed Balls. This is the same feeling I had on EU referendum night and US election night  #strictly 
EU president Juncker and EU Parliament Brexit negotiator Verhofstadt are both committed European federalists intent on abolishing the UK. 
There's a new slogan for Brexit...  
Basically this research shows most Britons to be grotesquely ill-informed by media & politicians about the realities of #Brexit#Remain 
Most Britons still living in the fantasy world in which we get the single market plus migration controls #Brexit 
Thanks @hampsteadlabour - we need a team Labour approach to Brexit both in the PLP & across the membership. These discussions so important.  
Somewhere, reason prevails Swiss referendum on nuclear exit cc @bradplumer @drvox @Ed_Crooks @AmyAHarder @DrSimEvans 
Car Crash: The SNP's Fiona Hyslop on Brexit & #IndyRef2  
YES! Thank you @carolinelucas. Probably at least 16m people right behind you on this decision. #Article50 #brexitshambles #brexit  
Roman mayor on brink of Brexit-style bombshell that could destroy EU  
Sooner or later, May and Hammond will have to put #Britain before #Brexit |(Via @pollytoynbee ) 
At this rate there may well not be an EU for us to Brexit from. However it happens (demise of the EU) is fine by me.  
.@OwenSmith_MP will vote to BLOCK Brexit. RT if you believe he should #RespectTheResult 
Wait, which referendum are we talking about here?  
The UK has only 4 possible negotiating positions on Brexit. Two aren't available and May won't decide on the others  
Brexit voters were well-meaning not racist, says equality watchdog  
Mark Carney has one mission. To stop #Brexit. Why does #TheresaMay allow him to stay in situ unless…. 
This is Liam Fox.Liam has been missing for a number of weeks.He is delusional and of limited intelligence.If you see him do nothing #brexit  
Like or not Britain is now dominated by the politics of Farage+Brexit so our Gov needs to use him not sneer at him   
If @michaelgove is making a bid for Leader of @Conservatives by demanding hard BREXIT remember who will gain  
It would be good to see @nick_clegg even just once speak up explicitly for those many of us who want to stop BREXIT. Soft is just half-life.  
Italy's upcoming referendum may well decide the fate of the entire European project  
Italy bank fears mount over Renzi referendum  
Crikey! Watch... People still don't know who David Davis is. Brexit is a colossal political upheaval and so many are still disconnected. Doh  
Mark Carney under fire from Tory eurosceptics over Brexit transitional deal reports  via @PoliticsHome - we need him! 
Gina Miller spends £60,000 on security measures amid Brexit court caseFarage has been abused, by lefties for years!  
Education opens up a global world of change and opportunity, those without it see only threats and so try to shut that world out#Brexit 
Compelling analysis of how the Brexit deal could end nastily by @CER_London's chairman John Kerr: 
Dexit? Nexit? Swexit? Political revolution will sweep across West, @Nigel_Farage vows. @Daily_Express #Brexit  
Here's @Keir_Starmer calling for EU environmental law to be retained post-Brexit as an Act of Parliament - 100% the right approach  
Would you be willing to pay to be an EU citizen if Brexit is followed through with and the option was available? 
Hey you know a great way to find out if Canadians want electoral reform (and if so, what kind)?By asking them. In a referendum.#cdnpoli 
Comment: Scotland should never fall for the 'more powers' fiasco again. Full independence is the only answer to conservative brexit Britain.  
Welcome, it is a fairly frequent sentiment expressed by a large proportion of #libdemnewbies since #Brexit  
Brexit fears grow in UK aviation industry @InFactsOrg 
Anti-Brexit Branson. Bankrolling the plotters.  
Currently Leftists are:1 trying to subvert #Brexit2 trying to overturn #Trump3 celebrating #FidelCastroNasty, anti-democratic morons. 
The definition of #Brexit  
University staff are incessantly lecturing students on how Brexit was wrong and should never have happened  
Brexit teen says education system BIASED towards EU as she talks of backlash at university to @Nigel_Farage  
Don't choke on your crumpet, but Brexit has already cost the U.K. $1.5 trillion in wealth.  
JUST IN: Brexit leader Nigel Farage says he fears for his life 
Why I won't vote to trigger #Article50 - without guarantees as to what #Brexit entails, it's reckless to support it  
It's been estimated that the cost of Brexit will be £1000 per household. Are you prepared to pay this?  
Westwood jeering the little shit on whilst she thinks it's 1976 all over again. Theresa May putting her "faith in God" re Brexit, ffs. Doom 
On Thursday, your vote can change the direction of this hard-Brexit government, but only if I am elected as your MP:  
Current thoughts on book 1 : - This is so British.- Dudley seems like the kind of kid who'd grow up and support Brexit.#MargotReadsHP 
The time is now, Germany. We The People are winning! Remove #Merkel #abmerkeln #merkelmusswegLet us #DrainTheSwamp & follow #Brexit  
Brexit is like deciding to leave your spouse to marry another person whom you know nothing about. 
Renzi faces pressure to stay in office as Italy referendum defeat looms  
Reuters refers to ex-Belgian PM Guy Verhofstadt, the EU Parliament's top Brexit negotiator, as a 'European federalist'.Get the picture? pic.twitter.com/Y61eQKnJAD 
Dear remainers.We will consider request for a 2nd referendum, if you give a guarantee we can have a 3rd ref if we don't like the result. 
Brexit voters were well-meaning not racist, says equality watchdog  
BREXIT: ‘Leave voters aren’t racist’ rules Equality watchdog.Quite right. Many aren’t. I’ll just leave these here…  
I think #markcarney is doing what a Govenor of BofE should which is preserve the integrity of the economy. #brexit 
 “Monty Python and the Holy Brexit” 
More than 270,000 people have now watched @mrjamesob’s list of the reasons why Remain would win a second referendum  
The idea that Brexit, Trump, Corbyn, the SNP, Le Pen, Podemos etc etc can all be traced to the same root cause is weird magical thinking. 
Smart by @EmilyThornberry. We can't yet know if a second referendum is needed. Or, indeed, if it isn't.  
Theresa May says her faith in God will guide our path out of Europe as she admits Brexit is keeping her awake  
In the wake of #Brexit and #Trump, here's a 3 step manifesto for a smarter, fairer economy  #SmartCities 
We voted to take back control of our money, our laws, trade deals and our borders = leaving Single Market. #Brexit 
Brexit politicians have 'legitimised hate' says Human Rights Commission  
Labour has 3 options: A 2nd referendum; B no 2nd ref; C pretend B but prepare to change mind later. Thornberry tried for C, ended with A 
Number of dollar millionaires in Britain has slumped by 15% since Brexit vote  
Brilliant by Louise Trethowan! Let's now see Lab & Con MPs hammering home these arguments! We already know Brexit offers nothing but ruin  
Brexit teen says education system BIASED towards EU as she talks of backlash at university  
Germany NEEDS British trade deal after Brexit to stop its own economy CRASHING, Bavarian minister says  
Nigel Farage - "We have an American President who wants to put us at the front of the queue. So we need to crack on." #Brexit 
The fight back is warming up nicely. Farage made to look a complete fool by callers stating facts. #Brexit 
Politicians warned Brexit rhetoric has ‘legitimised’ hatred and homophobia  
Petition for second referendum once exit terms have been agreed has been launched  #Brexit #Bregret 
David Cameron's political career isn't the first casualty of an EU ideology or will it be the last, esp if our MP's try blocking #Brexit.  
Labour can't win this constituency so it will be best if the #LibDems bloody the Tories #brexit nose.  
Since we won the House, the Senate, the White House and Brexit, I can only surmise that stealing elections is harder than it looks. 
Words for the new Brexit bus: 'Leaving the EU costs £1.3bn a week - 3 times more than staying in. Let's take that from NHS'(Photoshoppers?)  
"Alright, we'll call it Transitional Brexit"  
Well I think that just about covers every angle.... #Brexit  
"On second thoughts let's not Brexit, 'tis a silly idea"  
Leave supporters reject plans reportedly backed by the Bank of England for a Brexit buffer.  
Farage: Major and Blair calling for second referendum is proof the liberal elite is still trying to stop UK leaving  
Finally we know exactly what #brexit means... and it is an extremely good example of madness too  
What Brexit austerity? Bank of England spends £100k of YOUR cash on PARTY days after vote.  
Blair and Major compared to HAMMER HOUSE OF HORRORS as they come back from dead for Brexit  
'John Major is WRONG' People will be angry if we have another EU Referendum, Gove warns  
@Bonn1eGreer @Change_Britain @SGoodair  Great analysis by Prof. Boyle on the less than convincing referendum result and implications for MPs  
Chance of 'orderly' Brexit within 2 years below 50% - Lord Kerr, UK's former EU negotiator, on run-up to the talks.  
Football Manager 2017 includes a Brexit scenario, some players are not happy 
Scottish Sec, David Mundell: Brexit could = new powers on agriculture, fisheries, environment and criminal justice. 
Tories & Lab split on Brexit &no one willing to go public & say why: Whole thing is a stupid, unworkable, shambolic mess of their own making 
Humankind's biggest struggle has always been  against The #Irrational. It is on the ascendant-again.#Brexit#Trump 
Politicians who led Brexit campaign have 'legitimised hate', says Human Rights commission   
May given huge Brexit boost as Germany’s industrial powerhouse calls for ‘comprehensive’ post-referendum trade deal.  
Gove has a psychopathic disregard for the massive economic impact of Brexit. He's a rabid, unhinged ideologue #marr  
FACT: Brexit is bad for Britain. It is time that we cared about the facts. Let's make Britain Great again #Brexit  
@seanhannity we just exposed @AnadeRothschild as the globalist behind @DrJillStein funding Millions in 3 days 2 bring down #Trump & #Brexit 
#IndiaFramedHarminderSingh     We are ready to support Referendum for Khalistan, Indians have oppressed them enough  
#IndiaFramedHarminderSingh  Khalistan and referendum 2020 are now the only solution to solve the problem of Sikhs  
Sad @tom_watson that the Labour party is offering such feeble opposition to Brexit knowing how damaging it is for everybody's future.  
my mother is getting on a bit but during the referendum she said "I'm not falling for that bollocks", voted stay.words to live by 
I'm really lucky in this too - family united on Brexit. Many friends I've spoken to still struggling to speak to their parents.  
Brexit biggest risk to NHS. Recognise this @tom_watson & step up to the mark. Stop papering over cracks and make the case. #brexitshambles 
Is Soros really that much of a badass?  Republicans are now the most powerful they've been in 80 years and Brexit passed. 
.@nick_clegg: Lib Dem victory in Richmond Park by-election could force Govt to rethink its hard Brexit agenda  
That they want to have their say on the final Brexit deal  
That they want an MP who will oppose a hard Brexit  
First Brexit then Trump. Is Italy next for the west’s populist wave?  
And we wonder why people lose faith in the #media...one law for Farage, another for else #brexit #journalism 
Germany will prefer to protect the EU which takes 50% of its exports rather than the UK which takes 7.5% #Brexit 
Comment: If you voted no in the 2014 independence referendum you voted for these people to govern you.  
I hope this is not true but if it is I will oppose it to the last fibre of my being. #brexit  
Michael Gove calling for hard Brexit whilst topping up his MPs salary with another salary from Rupert Murdoch  
"Encourage a diversity of perspectives within your company." | 1 of 6 principles for business beyond #Brexit  
Politicians have 'legitimised hate' with Brexit campaign, says Human Rights Commission  
Chance of an 'orderly' Brexit within two years is less than 50% – peer  
Nick Clegg, you have no democratic mandate to block Brexit. You should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum.  
Labour should run on promise of 2nd referendum. 
We need a 2nd referendum now that the implications of Brexit are clear & can't be hidden behind xenophobic lies. Deceit is not democracy. 
Britain’s Autumn Statement hints at how painful Brexit is going to be: 
-the referendum was advisory-you are the political elite-fucktrumpet 
James O’Brien draws up a quick list of all the reasons he’s sure that Remain would win a second referendum  
Blair, Major, Farron: the political elite who want to block Brexit. They should respect the referendum result!  
If #TheresaMay has any decency in her she should address the nation and call on Remainers to stop waging hate campaigns against #Brexit 
#Italia #Österreich We The People of the World support your fight for freedom: #IoVotoNo  #FPÖ.The tide is turning. Keep fighting.#Brexit  
Someone is going to come on #bbcsp next week & suggest having referendum to decide if we have 2nd referendum. Our politicians are a clueless 
.@theresa_may admits Brexit is keeping her awake at night, offering a glimpse of the challenge she is grappling with  
This tweet finally defines what #Brexit means  
It's almost frightening that David Mundell is 'Scotland's voice' in cabinet. Brexit cluelessness almost personified. #scopoliticssunday 
There is no plan. There is no logic. Brexit is a straightforward disaster.  
Underneath all that David Mundell incoherence it seems that the UK Government won't block a second referendum. #sundaypoliticsscotland 
TRAITOR John MAJOR wants a second and a Third Referendum Until he gets the answer he wanted We've had a referendum Majority voted to Leave 
'Second Referendum': the mantra of the anti-democrats.Stand up for democracy, dismiss the Remoaners. Accept the result, and let's Brexit! pic.twitter.com/7itn0Eplfq 
The @LibDems are at it again treating the British People with utter contempt on #Brexit! How can anyone take them seriously? #OopsTheyDon't 
No. Under-funding of last 6 years: recession+austerity+Tory. Brexit means no funds now to rescue NHS & soc care. Brexit = excuse for endgame  
Can we stop saying ‘soft’ and ‘hard’ Brexit? It’s going to be hard whatever. More like ‘hard’ and ‘absolutely diabolically hard’ Brexit. 
Paddy Ashdown speculating wildly that a "majority" of British voters want a second referendum #bbcsp I've seen no evidence of this 
Just like crooked #EU, if people like Paddy Pantsdown don't like verdict, have another referendum until "right result" is attained. #bbcsp 
Second referendum? I'd vote leave again and wouldn't think twice. 
Genuine q: How wd a 2nd referendum work? If question is "should we accept the deal?" what happens if answer is no? Article 50 irreversible! 
If EU leaders think we might have another EU referendum, they'll give us the "worst possible deal" warns @Owen_PatersonMP 
Paddy Ashdown "A soft #Brexit means staying in the Single Market"= keeping unlimited immigration into the U.K. = subverting our decision 
I've voted Labour before  but definitely never again. Utterly dismayed by approach to #Brexit 
Dying to be trim? Read our blog on why Brexit should close UK borders to cruel fur trade.  
Human rights watchdog asks UK to dampen divisive Brexit rhetoric  
Stephen Dorrell absolutely right. The current dangerous Brexit budget will break NHS & social care. Woefully underfunded & in crisis. #Marr 
.@TrevorNoah describes how #Brexit and that "weird quirky guy" in the US (@Nigel_Farage) are perceived by Americans  
The conspiracy between the British government & the European Union, both of whom are pretending to be battling over brexit is fooling no one 
I see making up hate crimes has become a full-time job for members of some minorities who use #Brexit to blatantly slander British people. 
SIU opposes another referendum, but we'd need facts if there was one.Our 'Truth Commission' proposal in Sunday Times  
maybe @AlexSalmond + fellow Blair-haters could probe proven Brexit campaign lies rather than yet another Iraq inquiry to prove nobody lied 
If @UKLabour continue on this path I will cancel my membership. I will fight Brexit all the way. @Scientists4EU @tom_watson 
But real risk to vulnerable is Brexit blow to NHS & social care. Labour =party of NHS? What's @tom_watson thinking?! 
This is absolutely brilliant. If only our MPs could do as good a job as this at taking on the non Brexit strategy   
The OBR & the Chancellor got it wrong, wrong, wrong & wrong. Brexit will raise, not lower growth  via @telegraphnews 
I will certainly not be availing myself of #Virgin products - Branson does not respect the Brexit decision made by the British Electorate  
Pensioners to be '£105 worse off within five years' as UK faces £1.3billion #Brexit black hole  
Looky look, @tom_watson - you're popular with UKIP & The Express... backing a Brexit that breaks NHS & social care. This where u want to be?  
PM @Theresa_May was outfoxed when a constituent challenged her on #Brexit. Must-read account, please share:  
On BBC Brexit fanatic Michael Gove wouldn't even let me become EU citizen if i wanted to ! Unhinged !!  
#Labour MPs: Every day you drift farther away from my vote. You're not defending workers' jobs, you're defending your own jobs. #Brexit  
"There is a tendency to over-complicate" Brexit, says Michael Gove, confidently #marr 
Tom Watson says Lib Dems "trying to recover some sort of electoral relevance by coming out as Brexit Deniers". Gets my vote. Labour won't. 
Join @Nigel_Farage on LBC at 10 as he talks about Trump, Brexit and a lot more besides  
It's all been consumed already. Like we said it would. EU net contribution is ~0.5% of UK spending - trivial compared to Brexit £ losses.  
Listen Gove, you pointless Murdoch turd, the impact of Brexit will not fully hit the economy until we actually Brexit. #marr 
Labour MPs like Thornberry  continue to campaign to stay in EU by the back door. SICK AND TIRED OF HEARING IT ! WE VOTED FOR  #BREXIT #Marr 
Emily is correct #Marr you can't have GOV ie one party make all decisions secretly on Brexit when SUPPOSED to represent 100% OF COUNTRY! 
.@EmilyThornberry tells Marr that on Brexit, the Govt "need to act on behalf of 100% and not on behalf of an extreme 5% of the 52%." 
#marr @EmilyThornberry right to say that the government has no idea what it's doing on #brexit Where's the plan? Reject a bad brexit!  
No pre #Brexit hangover for Britain's consumers as sales volumes rise highest in 12 years  
"There's no money for luxuries like caring for the old & frail. We have to spend it on grammar schools, cuts to corporation tax, Brexit etc"  
BBC now panicking that Italy is about to deliver a hammer blow to the EU when Renzi's referendum is defeated. #marrshow 
'They tell me not to speak Polish': students on life after Brexit vote  
“Whoever wishes to govern with us needs to know that the euro must be destroyed” . Italy's referendum in 7 days' time 
To paraphrase myself during the campaign "The irony is the people who voted for Brexit will be those that needed the EU most"  
 No. We can't afford to care for the elderly any more because we're spending the money on "Brexit". 
These amounts small compared to damage done by Brexit on NHS & social care. That's where danger lies for elderly.  
Labour voter 4 20yrs. Since JC won't fight Brexit I've joined #LibDems iwith many others. 
The cost of a Brexit budget: "failure to fund social care will have 'human cost', warns Tory council leader"  
Blair and Major don’t deserve this venom for joining Brexit debate | Andrew Rawnsley  
McDonnell's shift on a Brexit is so condescending to the working class. The very people who will be damaged the most. 
H1/16: Vote for #Brexit so we can give £350m a week to the #NHS.H2/16: You voted for Brexit, so we need to cut £22b from NHS funding.  
“The biggest vote for change this country has ever known. Brexit means Brexit – and we’re going to make a success of it.” - @theresa_may 
The OBR and the Chancellor got it WRONG, WRONG, WRONG and WRONG. Brexit will raise, not lower growth  
Jesus Christ this is perfect. The irony.   #farage #Ukip #brexit  
Hard Brexit. Does Theresa May et al have a mandate to make UK and its people poorer? Is this what 52% voted for? I don't think so#RemainUK 
Blair and Major don’t deserve this venom for joining Brexit debate  
Brexit might take a decade so give the pound a break, investors say  
Diane Abbott (Shad Home Sec) says we should accept uncontrolled immigration as part of #Brexit. She justbhanded North of England to #Ukip. 
Roman mayor on brink of Brexit-style bombshell that could destroy EU  
Donald Trump has destroyed the myth of post-Brexit sovereignty   >  Mail On Sunday  >   
McDonnell supports tax cuts for the wealthy, giving more in benefits to those who need them least and a Hard Brexit.  
Seems hate crime is a one-way street: No mention of hate directed at Brexit voters by everyone else inc. the Media?  
Of course the forecasts are bad: no one has a plan for Brexit  
Looks like only LDs are offering a political voice to the 48%+ opposed to Brexit. This is not smart from @UKLabour! 
First Brexit then Trump. Is Italy next for the west’s populist wave?  
9am on #marr: Castro, Brexit + more with @michaelgove @EmilyThornberry @paulmasonnews @FraserNelson @greenmiranda Ed Harris & Jools Holland 
Brexit accounts for almost half of extra borrowing needed over the next 5 years  
It's The Hamilton Musical's Fault We Didn't Learn From Brexit 
READ: May reveals desire to “get on with [Brexit] deal” as Mark Carney oversteps the line, again. @thesundaytimes 
#NigelFarage talking about #TonyBlair trying to block #Brexit"I couldn’t be happier! He is so unpopular in #Britain"#BrexitBritain #Marr 
Italy is poised to become next country to reject the globalism establishment  @MailOnline #Brexit #Trump #Italexit 
In 50 or 100 years time who will be remembered ?Retweet for #NigelFarageFav for #DavidCameron#Brexit #PoliticalRevolution #UKIP 
Man Who Led Brexit Movement Moving To The US  #Brexit #NigelFarage 
Nigel Farage: I live in fear of violent attacks after Brexit and Donald Trump's victory   
The message that's going to Richmond Park  voters from the GRN backed LD campaign on making Thursday's by-election about impeding BREXIT  
this whole election is a referendum on the gullibility of the American voter  
Since brexit my loom band business has gone down hill 
Nigel Farage – Tony Blair So Unpopular, Anti-Brexit Campaign Sure To Backfire  
Britain after #Brexit- viewing the rest of the world?  
Just. Like. #Brexit.  
The Trump election and Brexit are the 2 greatest non violent revolutions in world history 
Nigel Farage: 'I fear for my life' ~A prophet is not welcome in his hometown.~ #Brexit #UKIP #MAGA 
Send this to those "project fear: Brexit black hole" ppl. Cost of BoE measures now in. Brexit bill £220bn so far. 
.@swapan55's column | Thanks to DeMo, 2019 will be a near-referendum on NaMo  via @TOIOpinion 
FAST-TRACK BREXIT NEWS: So as this top lawyer shows, the unwritten British Constitution means Britain can leave NOW 
You aren't funny any more Boris @BorisJohnson. No one is laughing any more except at us. You must stop this buffoonery now and stop Brexit.  
Howard Hotson’s suggestion: disaster capitalism, from Naomi Klein – Brexit like New Orleans after Hurricane Katrina 
This makes me so angry.yet there's money for Trident, Brexit damage, 3rd runway. Tories aren't nasty they're vicious  
Bid to challenge Brexit gathers pace among pro-remain politicians  
Brexit backlash against McDonnell gathers pace as shadow Chancellor adopts ‘Ukip nationalist’ position •  • 
Obama inaction on Syria will go down as turning point in West's history:Led to ISIS + refugee crisis, which contributed to Brexit + Trump. 
"If we vote to leave, then we will leave. There will not be another renegotiation and another referendum."  
Looks like a mini backlash at best - a softer Brexit BUT still a Brexit!Labour must OPPOSE Brexit#LabourRIP 
Ken Loach Has Some Advice For Filmmakers in the Age of Trump and Brexit  
I've received another one of those 'accept Brexit & make it work' tweets >@FergusMason1 
. @tom_watson shamefully making a tyrant's use of the notion of the 'people' to denigrate & vilify political opposition. #Remain #Brexit  
Blair CONSPIRING with Brussels? Europhile 'plotting with EU' to stop Brexit, Lord says   
#Italia #Österreich We The People of the World support your fight for freedom: #IoVotoNo #FPÖ.The tide is turning. Keep fighting.#Brexit  
Cameron’s bungled ref gives us a civil war situation. Like it or not, that’s a political fact. MPs either stop Brexit now or accept mob rule 
What’s to ‘respect’ in this Brexit result? I just don’t get it. Not a real majority, built on lies, ignorance & hate, & in no one’s interest 
After Brexit: The dystopian future drawn up by a Tory party out of control. Read @iainmacwhirter damning indictment in tomorrow's paper 
The world going nuts as the alliances of the past return we are gonna #MAGA! #Brexit #Frexit #Grexit 
Brexit will SAVE the NHS: Cancer specialist says leaving EU will rescue our health service  
Pissed off with Tom Watson's statements on Brexit? Then donate big to Sarah Olney's @sarahjolney1 Richmond campaign: 
Theresa May admits Brexit difficulty in rare personal interview  
Well, Labour leadership doesn't.... Others in Labour are going absolutely mental that Brexit will break working class families & the NHS.  
#brexit logic: If the EU is so bad for UK global trade, why does Germany export $92 bn to China compared with $18.7bn for the UK? 
The #Brexit con trick. Have you seen these suspects? If so just assume they'll carry on regardless.  They don't give a toss.#TheresaMay 
READERSHIP: And the comment of the day is… #Brexit  
Brexit: Michael Gove's attack on OBR forecast for 'missing £200m-a-week dividend' dismissed by watchdog as wrong  
Jaguar Land Rover gear up to build electric cars in Britain creating 10,000 new jobs. #Brexit means more jobs!  
Anti-Brexit Branson. Just Say 'No'!  
BREXIT BOOM NEWS: Jaguar Land Rover To Create 10,000 New British Jobs As 'Project Fear' Remaniacs Exposed As Liars  
Farage ‘couldn’t be happier’ Blair’s trying to BLOCK BREXIT as it will ‘repel people’  
I think Trump and Brexit are up there with Moses Jake   
Brexit, trump, honey G!?democracy doesn't work. Socialism is the way forward!!#XFactor2016 
Jeremy Corbyn, guaranteed to lubricate and smooth the passage of the toughest #Brexit.#Remain #YesEU 
Spot the post-Brexit export boom. What, you can't? No, neither can I.  
#recap This comment from a reader of the FT has gone viral because it nails the remainer/leaver Brexit row 
Economy will suffer unless the doom-mongering stops  #Brexit 
Dominic Raab MP warns that a vote on Article 50 could allow die-hard remainers to delay and frustrate Brexit #RespectTheResult 
Italy NEXT to reject establishment as protest vote set to WIN referendum, shock poll finds  
Our government and the #Brexit billionaire press are pandering to the scum who celebrated Jo Cox's death #Remain 
Count me in - I don't want anything to do with Tom Watson and I don't want anything to do with accepting Brexit.  
Once again, @GuyVerhofstadt fights for the rights of the millions of Brits against #Brexit.Thank you Guy!  
Irish PM says it will be "impossible" for UK to agree full Brexit deal within the two years set out in Article 50  
Britain is arguing internally over what sort of Brexit it wants: wait for even harder talks with the EU  
Pls vote for @sarahjolney1 if you're in the #RichmondPark area,she is the only strong anti-brexit candidate standing  
Saara winning #XFactor would be the biggest 2 fingers to brexit and that would make me happy lol 
This from the head of the European Union.  Hallelujah for #Brexit Juncker's legacy will be several EU membership withdrawals. France next.  
Your Europe Needs You: Anti-Brexit group to hold first pro-EU meeting in Cheltenham | Gloucestershire Live  
Recap of 2016:1. Brexit happened2. Hillary lost3. Fidel diedDawwwwg this year treatin me well #BurnInHellFidel 
Hi #Brexit'ers. Curious to learn what you're hoping to do when we stop EU migrant workers coming over and taking your jobs: 
Fears of catastrophic consequences of #Brexit grow in UK aviation industry (via @InFactsOrg) 
If chillingly arrogant Tony Blair and John Major get their way on Brexit, it would be the death of democracy 
Forget about Trump Forget about BrexitVictor Moses is the shock of 2016 
Every time #Tories are on the ropes Corbyn & Watson of #labour ride to their rescue. Latest example is Brexit!  
Sturgeon rubbished by Wales. Was she completely unaware the Welsh voted for Brexit?  
Italy: Polls of #polls shows a swing from Yes to No in Italy's constitutional referendum (Dec 4). #referendumcostituzionale 
Let's be clear, for many any Brexit would be an extreme concern, whether: hard, soft, real, unreal, virtual, delayed, redesigned...etc.  
Pensioners '£105 worse off within five years' as UK faces Brexit leaves £1.3 billion black hole bill 
#Brexit is complex but GBP WILL eventually rise.#EU got no way forward so bet on EURO and kiss your money goodbye! 
Leaked email says Virgin boss is helping to fund Blair’s anti-Brexit campaign :  
Brexit may have happened. Trump is president. Cubs won the World Series. But I swear if OSU loses I will purge 2016 from the history books 
What @tom_watson conveniently forgets is that #Brexit vote was won on lies written on the side of a bus. This is not a mandate.  
Rather than providing extra funding for NHS - as claimed - Brexit will cause massive damage. Doesn't this completely invalidate Leave vote?  
Brexit dealmaker Verhofstadt backs paid EU membership for Britons  
Unless UK comes to its senses and decides to retain the status quo as quickly as possible: say no to Brexit!  
Meanwhile in the real world the Brexit deficit will swallow up that 4-5x over, please stop lying Gisela  
There's a new slogan for Brexit...  
Thanks to @MoreUnitedUK for all your support today: @LibDems for a more united less divided Britain - not more #Brexit #Trump @ZacGoldsmith 
Brexit and Trump have exposed the left’s crucial flaw: playing by the rules | Jonathan Freedland  
It's officially @UKLabour party policy to keep the UK in the EU by the back door. No taking back control. No successful #Brexit.  
You might be able to pay to keep your EU citizenship after Brexit  
Benjamin Zephaniah: 'After the Brexit vote I experienced racism that I hadn't since the 80s'  
Allow me to speak for my state: BEGONE, FOUL WITCH, YOUR DARK ARTS ARE NOT WANTED HERE! #brexit  
Britons could pay fee to keep benefits of EU citizenship after Brexit  
@LabourList @tom_watson How can you justify #Brexit position?  You are in contravention of conference & democracy in general .. COWARDS  
Been to my first #Brexit panto. @HackneyEmpire dame appeared in a half EU half Union Jack crinoline & declared "I like a bit of both." 
You voted for Brexit. Now he's plotting to block it.  
Branson is anti-Brexit. Branson is carving up our NHS for profit. What's to like?  
Brexit will turn the orange line into a hockey stick.  
And so it begins.... Bid to challenge Brexit gathers pace among pro-remain politicians 
Great day meeting public in Troon today, changing views on the National Question, NO voters changing to YES because of #brexit. @TroonSNP 
President Trump, Brexit, Castro is Dead, W.S. Champion Cubs.I guess that hippy chick who told me the world would self-correct was right.  
The number of young people who want to leave the county has shot up since Brexit  
Brexit WILL happen – New plan to force Bill through Parliament in FIVE DAYS  
Long Nights: Electricity Usage at 10 Downing Street During Brexit & US ElectionData: Viz:  
Hottakes:What Trump and Castro Have In CommonWhat Castro's Death Means For BrexitWhy Fidel's Death Is An Opportunity for Blockchain 
Brexit means Clusterf*ck - get the t-shirt now!  
James Delingpole: EU 'Climate Change Risk' Pension Fund Rules Make Brexit more Urgent than Ever  
Brexit's good for tech, Brexit's bad for tech  
Labour's Keir Starmer vows to fight for environmentally-friendly Brexit  
Nigel Farage is told he shouldn't "hold his breath" for a U.S. role  
Welsh First Minister Carwyn Jones dismisses Nicola Sturgeon's plan for bespoke Brexit deal for Scotland, you can't make it up, bounced again 
Leave.EU is the only #Brexit campaign still running. Let's finish what we all started on June 23rd. 
Q: Why did the United Kingdom vote for #Brexit to leave the EUA:  
What's the current status of the post-Brexit UK? Has civil society collapsed yet? I may have missed it. 
#PlenPE - Marine Le Pen continues to shake up the French #Globalists as her popularity continues to rise. #Brexit #Frexit #LePen2017 
What does Brexit mean? UK business has no idea  via @Bfly 
Project Fear from Major and Toxic Tony #brexit #remoaners #BrexitDeniers @campbellclaret 
Between Brexit, Hillary not winning, and now Castro all within a few months of eachother, Freedom is looking pretty damn good lately. 
Great to be back on @FoxNews earlier. Talked about how Blair and others are trying to stop Brexit. The people spoke on June 23rd!  
When Italians reject Renzi's referendum and the French chose #MarineLePen the globalist world order comes crashing down  
Brexit supporter can’t handle what Brexit’s done to Football Manager  
Brexit will save the NHS from collapse, says leading cancer specialists, end of uncontrolled immigration & ditching EU orders can rescue it. 
Why #Optimistic?! There is No #Brexit from People's #Talent @MassChallenge  
#LMEEGM votes to agree our position on #Brexit & lobby internally to make this the party's position.  
Power cut in Winchester across the whole of the city. Cars burning & overturned in the street, people screaming & children crying. #Brexit 
The Swiss to cast ballots in a referendum on a measure to speed up the country's exit from nuclear energy.  
After months of heartache over #brexit and days of tears over #Trump, coming to #WE2016 has reenergised me and the fight back starts now.  
Brexit has achieved nothing except the reawakening of the European in the British people. A government who ignores that is in for a shock. 
Thank God for #Brexit.  
Ex-PM John Major: Brexit terms can’t be decided by ‘tyranny of majority’ - (it used to be called Democracy) 
Labour will fight for environmental rights protection in Brexit negotiations & in Great Repeal Bill.   
Brexit could be justified by this tweet alone.  
Britons could pay for EU citizenship after Brexit, says top negotiator  
We were promised a surplus of £350m a week from Brexit for NHS. Instead we get £59bn extra borrowing as economy struggles #brexitshambles 
The 'Brexit Dividend' is minus tens of *BILLIONS* of £s*You bunch of thundering pisswizards.*£ also worth 20% than it was so >expensive  
I know Little Havana is celebrating right now, but don't they realize what Brexit and Trump mean for the futures of ALL OF US??? 
No matter how much the biased left-wing media tries to deceive the public into fearing Brexit, Brexit WILL be delivered. #BetterOffOut 
Brexit dealmaker Verhofstadt backs paid EU membership for Britons  
European Parliament's lead Brexit negotiator backs plans to let UK citizens "opt in" individually to EU membership  
All you need to know that #Brexit was right @JunckerEU 
Another route to avoid #Brexit.pay PRIVATELY to hold #EU citizenship? OK.It must have ZERO legal input on UK life! 
Farage ‘couldn’t be happier’ Blair’s trying to BLOCK BREXIT as it will ‘repel people’  
#saintsfc v #efc preview on @EvertonArentWe.With more Koeman face, dull ports and Brexit. Not much togger really. 
Zac just walked into the Lib Dem pub by Kingston  HQ. Time for a pint & quick Q&A on Brexit & the £60 billion cost of it over the nxt 5 yrs? 
We the people need to stand up to Moany Blair, John Major and all the other remoaners trying to stop Brexit! 
Game developer game theorizes Brexit outcomes that politicians don’t even consider.  
Labour vows to fight for environmentally friendly Brexit  
Last night, the Scottish Government published its intervention in the Art. 50 Brexit case. So what's their argument? 
Brexit is not the will of the British people – it never has been   
There's a new slogan for Brexit...  
Farage ‘couldn’t be happier’ Blair’s trying to BLOCK BREXIT as it will ‘repel people’  
Brexit WILL happen – New plan to force Bill through Parliament in FIVE DAYS  
We planned for Brexit at Football Manager. So why did no one else? | Miles Jacobson  
SHOW this video to anyone in the remain campaign now arguing to stay in the single market #Brexit  
The human factor gave us both Brexit and Trump | Ian Jack  
It's the year of unthinkable's. - Leicester winning the Prem.- Brexit.- Donald Trump POTUS- Paul Robinson assist's Dean Marney. 
In democracy we should have right to have say again if new info changes things. #Brexit politicians admitted they lied on NHS, immigration.. 
.@Nigel_Farage on @FoxNews "Establishment looks disdainfully upon the views of voters. We have a big battle to get #Brexit in place"  
Can someone please explain why @NicolaSturgeon is acting like Scotland voted to leave the UK in their referendum. They most certainly didn't 
Three cheers for Brexit.  
most sensible thing I've read about Trump/ Brexit 
The pound is the only major currency to have risen against the dollar this month  
90% of voters want Britain to stay in the European single market after Brexit  via @PoliticsHome 
Norman Lamont wishes his old boss John Major would stop talking about a second EU referendum.   
Massive thanks to the Brexit Resistance for inspiring the nation to leave EU. Toxic Tony, Calamity Clegg, Chuka, Mandy & Major we salute you  
After the Brexit vote, a laid-off British window cleaner personally returns a French physicist to the continent, for stealing his job. 2016.  
Italian constitutional referendum: much ado about nothing?Not the watershed moment many are making it out to be  
#TUV2016 Allister on #Brexit: 2016 will go down in history as a year when there was a true uprising of true patriots  
One of Britain’s leading cancer specialists has said that #Brexit will save the NHS from collapse.  
Brexit will SAVE the NHS: Cancer specialist says leaving EU will rescue our health service  #tweko 
Brexit WILL happen – New plan to force Bill through Parliament in five days.  
Victory in the Richmond by-election could stop hard Brexit, says Nick CleggWhat about LibDem's defeat in Sleaford? 
Number of young people wanting to leave UK has doubled since Brexit referendum:  — this is my surprised face: :-| 
Reports that Tony Blair & Nick Clegg to launch new Anti-Brexit party. What part of democracy don't they understand?  
The OBR and the Chancellor got it wrong, wrong, wrong and wrong. Brexit will raise, not lower growth  
Italy's referendum could send shockwaves through the EU and beyond.   
Why Italy should vote no in its referendum:The country needs far-reaching reforms, just not the ones on offer. 
If we are 'equal partners', it's time for UK to take Scottish, Welsh and NI concerns seriously. PM May didn't even attend #BICwales #Brexit  
SHOW this video to anyone calling for a second referendum #RespectTheResult 
Out campaigning for anti-Brexit liberal candidate Sarah Olney in Kew with lovely Jo and Catherine @MoreUnitedUK 
Our cartoon for the day: 'I didn't think we'd take our country back this far' #Brexit  
Major and Blair who denied us a referendum when they were the P.M.... call for another referendum?!  Oh how we laughed!!#traitors 
Out helping @MoreUnitedUK in #RichmondPark today with @Lambeth4Europe we have to send a clear message to the #brexit government  
"Bid to challenge Brexit gathers pace among pro-remain politicians"  
Defeated Remain voters could opt out of Brexit by buying EU citizenship  
EU 'Climate Change Risk' Pension Fund Rules Make Brexit more Urgent than Ever  
5 months on and still no new material ... bit like the Brexit planning then   
Letter of #FidelCastro to Greek PM Alexis  Tsipras on outcome of referendum in July 2015. Memorabilia. #Greece 
ACCEPT IT! Sir Ian Botham goes on FURIOUS rant at Remainers trying to stop Brexit  
I spoke to Kate Bush about #BeforeTheDawn, creativity, Ireland, writing books, Brexit...   @KateBushMusic 
BBC: 'Following the incomprehensible,disastrous Brexit vote, heroic global icon Fidel Castro has died of a broken heart. He was only 90' 
Ex-PM John Major: Brexit terms can’t be decided by ‘tyranny of majority’ - (it used to be called Democracy)  #Brexit  
The enemies of democracy.#Brexit  
Verhofstadt, #EU #Brexit negotiator and advocate of 'US of Europe' says we should be allowed to pay for EU citizenship.I'd pay not to be! 
Can we afford the cost of #brexit ? Who'll pay £3200 a year per household? Please RT 
For my money the finest characterisation of Brexit as an entity anyone's yet produced:  
Britons could pay fee to retain benefits of EU citizenship after Brexit, says Europe's chief negotiator  
Who said the advisory referendum result is set in stone? The situation and outlook have  changed dramatically since. Time to reflect!  
Years of gruel for the JAMs but caviar all the way for the Brexit 'elite' - today's column 
It's telling of the intellectual fraudulence of Leavers that they cannot admit Remainers right about the unfolding chaos & cost of Brexit. 
The practical complexity of associate EU citizenship for Brits after #Brexit may ultimately mean it can't happen. But I see no harm trying. 
Aparently infrastructure, law & order, and health are just magically provided. This from one of the idiots who thought up Brexit  
Is it my imagination or do we & uk company's have a new energy since Brexit we seem to be steaming ahead against all the odds, BUY BRITISH!  
Karl-Heinz Rummenigge: "There were malicious media campaigns against Pep. Similarities with Brexit and US election."  
Brexit must not be part of Theresa May's plan. It must be her whole plan. Totally agree. It will redefine our Nation  
Britons could pay to keep EU citizenship after Brexit, top negotiator says. Subversion being proposed here by EU  
Brexit is fully revealed as taking billions from the neediest in Britain when they need it most. Let's spend it on NHS, jobs, wages instead  
You can see how the vote to #Brexit has damaged the UK here!   
"The UK does not have constitutional provisions which would require the results of a referendum to be implemented".  
Pro-EU alliance offers only positive option, which if well planned could stop Brexit & address all social issues...  
What a spin. Jaguar are staying despite Brexit not because of it - & only IF the gov stumps up a ton in investment  
"Bid to challenge Brexit gathers pace among pro-remain politicians" - good, 48% starting to get bolder rep in parl  
Fidel Castro has died, even Fidel could not survive 2016 #brexit #Trump 
After Brexit, young Australians looking for a new London have found it in BerlinGermany, not Britain leads now.  
Good idea. Even better idea: cancel #Brexit  
With rampant Brexit populism and intolerance, Watson opts to attack Lib-Dems. Dismal. 
Britons could pay to retain the benefits of EU citizenship after Brexit under plans being considered by MEPs  
Even the Daily Express admits the Brexit referendum was non-binding  
Trump invited Hungarian patriot Viktor Orban to DC. It started with Brexit - this is a global revolt by the people! 
Right message;Tainted messenger. Tony's Brexit plea fatally pushed  by McTernan, architect of Labour's Scottish collapse & Gillard's demise 
Theresa May accused of contempt by SNP over Brexit hotline  
Bullish Britain shrugs off post-Brexit anxiety.Jaguar's announcement of 10,000 jobs, Facebook, Google 3,000 jobs & a new Apple HQ in London  
Glossary: Effexit - the effects of Brexit before Brexit has happened. 
After #Castro, the Cuban people want #Brexit++++  
Brexit agreement 'impossible' within two-year period, says Irish PM | The Independent  
EXC: Brexit bill will be pushed through Commons in just five days if government loses Supreme Court battle  
NEW - Brussels Brexit chief backs individual EU citizenship for UK nationals:  A good idea? #brexit  
We boarded Britain's longest train journey to ask passengers what they thought of Brexit  
Jaguar promises to create 10,000 new jobs in Midlands electric car revolution as Brexit Britain defies doom-mongers  
Worryingly incisive analysis of he impact of Brexit on NI"of one of the biggest mistakes of a modern European democracy."  
This is Brexit year, a year of defiant humans. Ed will certainly make it to the final.  
Britons could pay to retain benefits of EU citizenship after Brexit  
Italy NEXT to reject establishment as protest vote set to WIN referendum, shock poll finds  
.Benjamin Zephaniah: 'After the Brexit vote I experienced racism that I hadn't since the 80s'  
Yes @juliehinukeu! You are not alone, we are together. Remain! Stop destructive and unnecessary #Brexit madness.  
In Richmond, Lib Dems hope that Brexit will decide the byelection - The Guardian  
experts said doom & gloom for businesses post #Brexit. The #AutumnStatement wld've been same in or out of EU too @QuentinWillson @HowardCCox 
The people running @UKIP in Swindon have quit, over what they describe as the "farce" the national party has become since the #Brexit vote. 
The elite funded UKIP in order to get Brexit.  Tell me again how Brexit was a working class vote?  
Nasty @ScotTories smear machine in action again today no doubt to disguise their embarrassment re #Brexit in bocca al lupa! @ToniGiugliano x 
Bullish Britain shrugs off post-Brexit anxiety. Business and consumer spending rise after EU vote.  
2016, a sad year for the Left - Brexit, Duterte, Trump, ISIS getting their behinds kicked, and now Castro is dead.#GoodnightGlobalistSide 
Britain holds the aces in Brexit talks.  
Bid to challenge Brexit gathers pace among pro-remain politicians  
The UK has just lost its one voice in @EU_Commission’s Scientific Advice Mechanism #brexit @Scientists4EU 
Benjamin Zephaniah: 'After the Brexit vote I experienced racism that I hadn't since the 80s'  
It's telling of the intellectual fraudulence of Leavers that they cannot admit Remainers right about the unfolding chaos & cost of Brexit. 
#PakistanSupportsKhalistan    We are ready to support Referendum for Khalistan, Indians have oppressed them enough  
#PakistanSupportsKhalistan The road to Khalistan lies in giving referendum to Punjab. We demand a peaceful resolve  
This year has been so crazy, I've already forgotten Brexit.  
After Brexit, young Australians looking for a new London have found it in Berlin  | @ErykBagshaw 
The turnout at the 2016 UK Referendum on the EU was higher than the turnouts at the last FIVE UK general elections. pic.twitter.com/txsdKhOXjE 
First Brexit, then the "No" wins in Colombia, then Trump wins the presidency and now Fidel Castro is dead, this has been a hell of a year! 
Brexit, Trump, Castro off to hell -- looks like 2016 is ending strong. 
David BowieBrexitPrinceHillaryNow Fidel- what a year! 
.@Newsweek senior editor @kurteichenwald wrote/said Putin interfered w German elections, Brexit, & installed Trump  
BREXIT: Make no mistake. By attempting to challenge the Brexit majority vote by the British People, these plotters threaten our democracy.  
37% of the electorate pro#Brexit. Do you think Remainers have changed in light of facts? No. Leavers changing? Definitely Yes. Now 27%? 
Britons could pay to keep EU benefits post-Brexit under new plans  
If Brexit Britain loses some business to Berlin and Paris, it might at least pick up tech companies fleeing Trump  
The very same people who wanted Britain to join the single currency (€) are now pushing for a 2nd referendum, same old faces#UsualSuspects 
#BrexitBritain will see a boom in manufacturing, exports & Tourism#Brexit #globaltrade #OpenBritain #Freetrade #LeaveEU 
Brexit leader Nigel Farage moving to the US: report  
I love british people !!! fish n chips, tea, the queen, and ... *Looks at smudged writing on hand* brexit 
I advocate internationally supervised referendum in Crimea so they determine their own destiny 
In short, this year's Autumn Statement hinted at how painful Brexit is going to be  
Britons could pay to keep EU citizenship after Brexit, top negotiator says  
It's eye-wateringly obvious that the health & welfare of the country are being savaged by #Brexit. Why do May et al persist? Other agendas? 
In the UK we too have an 'electoral college' for Referendum votes - it's called House of Commons, but our MPs are too scared to use it  
Football Manager 2017's Brexit is causing a bit of a panic amongst football fans. 
Brexit should be a personal choice uno, like some of u lot can leave the EU but the rest are staying g, I'm brexiting Brexit 
Make no mistake. The quislings attempting to delay and block the democratic Will of The British People will stop at nothing to steal Brexit. 
Let's stop faffing about with the entropic Brexit & begin the #indy2 case. Agree entirely with @DerekBateman2:  
The next drama in this political year: Italy will vote on a constitutional referendum next week, Sunday's #60Minutes  
Scotland sets out legal case to have a say on Brexit trigger  
Great news: Ecuador's pioneering #taxhaven referendum gets the green light @CdnTaxFairness @JosephEStiglitz @yanisvaroufakis @justiciafiscal 
Brexiteers opposing the *idea* of associate EU citizenship for individual Brits are vindictive shits. You've got your #Brexit, ok? 
'Jonathan Pie' said he re-assessed 'the left' on basis of his facebook friends reaction to Brexit. How scientific  
VIDEO: Prices up. Wages down. James explains why he's "absolutely certain" Remain would win 2nd referendum  
Nigel Farage planning to move to US #Brexit #TruePundit 
Tony Blair, former British Prime Minister, says Brexit can still be stopped  
The so-called "Brexit dividend" is minus many billions. I'd rather that weren't chalked up against the NHS account, thanks.  
The Brexit dividend should be spent on our priorities – the most important of which is our NHS  
What price #Brexit now as remainers talk down UK but confidence rises for post #Brexit as another giant shows confidence in this country.  
Brexit leader Nigel Farage moving to the US: report  
Britons could pay for EU citizenship after Brexit, says top negotiator  
#Brexit vs. Trump? @JoyAnnReid asks Londoners right now on #PMJoy! 
It'd really be helpful if #Labour briefly just shut up about #Brexit.They're utterly risible, & trawling for #UKIP votes is sadly shabby. 
This post-Brexit vote @BernieSanders op-ed from June is a brutal read today.  
HRC is to blame for lack of policy substance because she chose to make the election a referendum on Trump's personality traits @paulkrugman 
The number of young people who want to leave the UK has doubled since Brexit.  
People deserve a say in a referendum on the Brexit deal. Tom prefers to leave it to the Tories.  We won't support a blank cheque Brexit.  
Dear #Brexit fans. Hear this from Matthew Parris. Please post your plan to Mrs May. Yes, *your* plan. She hasn't a clue. Help her.  
Remainers carry on trying to drag our country & #Brexit down with doom and gloom. This is what real people are doing  
Saturday's Daily Mail:"Jaguar's Brexit boost!"#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers(via @suttonnick) 
Is it me, or is brexit looking shakier everyday? Off to plant some flags tonight, just for u my 'paisan'. The Mafia.  
.@PrivateEyeNews you say today I want farming powers given to London after Brexit. Er..no, in fact I've said the exact opposite. #Posttruth? 
Germany NEEDS British trade deal after Brexit to stop its own economy CRASHING, Bavarian minister says  
Why do we get all the straight talk from outside the UK?All we get from our Gov is "Brexit means Brexit" and we'll "make a success of it".  
Looks like the UK gov will more than offset any potential loss of EU funding (our own money of course) post-Brexit.  
Before #article50 happens each resident should get unbiased info as to what they stand to gain or lose from #brexit 
Don't choke on your crumpet, but Brexit has already cost the U.K. $1.5 trillion in wealth.  
Cheap jokes at the expense of the Lib Dems while dooming the country to the catastrophic costs of Brexit. Absolutely pathetic. 
Danny Baker getting voted off #imaceleb is a bigger disgrace than Brexit and Trump combined. Shame on you, the public. Democracy is broken. 
I can accept Brexit. I can almost accept Trump. But Danny Baker being voted first out of #ImACeleb is where my faith in democracy ends. 
Asked polish guy who attended Nat. Survey meeting, how #Inverness treated him post #Brexit vote. He said 'showered with kindness.' #Proud 
Michael Gove tried to challenge the official Brexit economic forecast. He got publicly dismissed  
Tim Farron says Lib Dems will vote against triggering Article 50 unless second referendum guaranteed  
Italy NEXT to reject establishment as protest vote set to WIN referendum, shock poll finds  
As if Branson's carving up our NHS for profit weren't bad enough, to then go & bankroll anti-Brexit/anti-democratic plots. A bridge too far.  
Tomorrow's @TimesBusiness front page: Bullish Britain shrugs off post-Brexit anxiety #tomorrowspaperstoday 
The same people were repeatedly told by Cameron & Osborne it would be financial Armageddon to Brexit! Are they all deaf?  
Peter Brookes's Nature Notes: Tony Blair calls for a second referendum - political cartoon gallery  
OK, so if there is a 2nd Referendum & it reverses the decision, can Leave then demand another one? Where does this nonsense end?  
Great to join @sarahjolney1 tonight to talk #Brexit in #Richmond. Thanks to all who came along. Catch up here:  
Main reason there should no 2nd EU Referendum is to make the great British public realise just how important a vote actually is. 
From this view, it seems Boris & Gove might be right? >>Bavarian minister warns Brexit could be 'higher risk' to German economy than thought 
"A democracy that cannot change its mind ceases to be a democracy" - @DavidDavisMP who is I believe for Brexit @piersmorgan  
VIRGIN BOYCOTT LATEST: Thousands Cancel Virgin Products & Services As Backlash Against Anti-Democratic Anti-Brexit Branson Builds -ZeroHedge  
If 'the people' rise up & refuse to accept a democratic referendum result, then we are no longer a democracy.  
VIDEO: Prices up. Wages down. James explains why he's "absolutely certain" Remain would win 2nd referendum  
If I had voted brexit (I didn't) and supported Farage (I do not, to put it mildly) I would feel pretty betrayed by him leaving the country. 
Saturday's Daily Mail:Jaguar's Brexit boost!#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
DAILY MAIL FRONT PAGE: 'Jaguar's Brexit boost!' #skypapers 
The Champions League is an annual tournament. The EU Referendum, as we were repeatedly told, was a one-off irrevocable event.  
This is one of those interventions that can't possibly be retweeted enough #brexit #indyref2 
What Brexit will mean for many by Ben Jennings - political cartoon gallery  
Germany NEEDS British trade deal after Brexit to stop its own economy CRASHING, Bavarian minister says  
Scotland sets out legal case to have a say on Brexit trigger  
Irish Taoiseach bluntly dismisses hopes for quick Brexit deal & reiterates there'll be no talks until Art 50 invoked 
Martin Rowson on Brexit and Black Friday – cartoon  
Unbelievable! Lower the voting age and allow govt. into schools to brainwash students. Libs not waiting for referendum to put plan in action  
New #Referendum then. Now everyone knows there will be less not more £s for #NHS & the economic forecasts of #brexit were real  
"Scotland joined the 'UK' as a free peeople. It can leave any time it likes. But it hasn't, and the Union voted for #Brexit" LIVE @talkRADIO 
Brexit must not be part of Theresa May's plan. It must be her whole plan#premium 
Pretty loud applause (and more interestingly no booing) when @campbellclaret tells Sheffield #bbcaq audience Brexit should be reversed. 
Benjamin Zephaniah: 'After the Brexit vote I experienced racism that I hadn't since the 80s'  
you say "unemployed Glaswegian" like I'm some shit on your shoe. Engineer for 24 years, screwed by Brexit but I'm not @hrtbps 
EU leaders 'not bluffing' over Brexit terms, warns Malta's PM - neither are we. It will be a full #brexit  
Germany NEEDS British trade deal after Brexit to stop its own economy CRASHING, Bavarian minister says  
Tony Blair wants a second Brexit referendum. Nick Ferrari has a one word response for him: “Chilcot"  
Brexiteers you have decided to be poor for decades as a remainer I don't want to be poor because you believe in nirvana Brexit #StopBrexit 
Correct. #brexit is crumbling, every week it is exposed as a miscarriage of democracy that needs to be reversed. #wewillremain. 
"I agree with Lord Bell that Blair leading opposition to Brexit would be the best way to ensure it happens. I hope he does." LIVE @talkRADIO 
Elsie knows Scotland can't get a separate deal from rUK.Her plan is to call a grievance fueled referendum the day Article 50 is triggered. 
"If Blair were to succeed in halting Brexit, next step would be President of the EU. So we'd have to call him President Blair." @talkRADIO 
John Major warns of tyranny of majority. If he gets his way for a 2nd referendum & majority vote for remain will that be tyranny 
John Major and Tony Blair seek a second Referendum by Bob Moran - political cartoon gallery  
John Major has described #brexit result as 'the tyranny of the majority.' I like this phrase. LGBT people know that tyranny all too well. 
Brexit leader Nigel Farage moving to the US: report  
Brexit boost: Jaguar Land Rover has unveiled plans to create 10,000 jobs in the Midlands.  
RT if you agree that millionaires & Blairites shouldn't be allowed to block Brexit #RespectTheResult 
Rummenigge: 'There were malicious media campaigns against Pep. Similarities with Brexit and US election. 2016 a black year for the media' 
Scotland sets out legal case to have a say on Brexit trigger  
QUISLING WATCH LATEST: What these quislings like Branson, Bliar, Major, Fallon et al don't seem to realise is, they make the case FOR Brexit 
Tony Blair, former British Prime Minister, says Brexit can still be stopped  
Remoaners would like us to remain in the single market So means you haven't left the EU And maybe one day we will rejoin the EU DREAM ON 
I'm holding a town hall meeting with @nick_clegg tonight on Europe & Brexit - tune in live:  
#BREAKING: 'Hard Brexit' will entirely wipe out UK exports of processed food, apparel, meat to EU.  @ESRIDublin 
"I know many decent people oppose Brexit. But you'll be led into battle by the most indecent British PM in modern history" @talkRADIO 
Italy’s Padoan is seen as the likely premier if referendum is defeated  
BREAKING ACCEPT IT! Sir Ian Botham goes on FURIOUS rant at Remainers trying to stop Brexit  
"Blair is now the leader of the fight to block #Brexit. What a dilemma for the SNP" LIVE @talkRADIO 
Anti-Brexit forces are gathering in strength; don't let them devalue our democracy  
Has reality stopped mattering in Brexit #Britain? @IanDunt explores the #EUref hysteria >>  
Tory MP says Blair and Major are 'living on another planet' over Brexit 
These are strange times. Apparently it's now an affront to democracy even to express an opinion that Brexit is a bad idea.  
That anti-Brexiter and Curry shagger John Major came up with a pearl - 'tyranny of the majority'. The man's a moron. #Brexit 
Germany NEEDS British trade deal after Brexit to stop its own economy CRASHING, Bavarian minister says  
Scotland & Wales both want single market access after #Brexit, says @NicolaSturgeon, but no clarity from UKgov 
'Some remainers....don't seem to understand the meaning of the word democracy.' Gordon Henderson MP #Brexit  
John Major suggests second referendum necessary to give people final say on Brexit deal. The same man who blocked the Maastricht referendum. 
John Major says Brexit shouldn't be decided by "tyranny of the majority." Or democracy, as it's otherwise known. 
Brexit champion and Trump friend Nigel Farage plans to immigrate to U.S.: Report  
The Scottish government arguments in the Article 50 Brexit case. Argues that the revocability of the Article 50 notification isn't relevant.  
Welsh First Minister rejects 'unworkable' Nicola Sturgeon plan for separate Scottish Brexit deal 
Certificate etc arrived today. Proud to be a part of the LeaveEU Campaign  @LeaveEUOfficial #brexit #leaveeu 
Well IDS, if Brexit is so good what's the problem letting UK vote on final terms, think you might lose now all your lies have been exposed?  
Pls Read my latest column, I look at the rise in hate crime in the UK since #Brexit & ask "Where's our humanity?"  
*Brexit Explained*  
want some insight into why Brexit and Trump happened? read our book: 
Dear remoaners,#EU referendum was heavily slanted in YOUR favour courtesy of establishment, banks & big business.You STILL lost.Move on. 
When the new referendum happens 16 yr. olds must vote. Old folk shouldn't be allowed to bugger up their future. #NoBrexit 
The SNP is getting found out, but Brexit necessitates a rethink of the UK. (My weekly newsletter for Reaction)  
Brexit leader Nigel Farage moving to the US: report  
Think you will find that people have change their minds about you Tony ya lying terrorism appeasing arsehole #brexit  
Sir Ian says; ACCEPT IT! Sir Ian Botham goes on FURIOUS rant at Remainers trying to stop Brexit  
Regardless of your position on Brexit this news should be welcomed.  
If a tradesman conned an old lady out of £50 they'd be prosecuted... These conmen have robbed the British people of £220,000,000,000 #Brexit pic.twitter.com/ic2FvgpEuO 
UK airlines could lose routes in the EU & Britain could lose negotiating & voting rights on regulations #Brexit 
If your democratically elected government is dictated to by anyone other than the people, by definition, you're in a dictatorship. #Brexit  
Missed opportunity for British PM at today's Ministerial meeting in Wales.Not turning up means avoiding telling us what #Brexit means !!!  
Tony Blair's office deny there was any collusion or contact between him and John Major over their recent comments on Brexit 
Here are six charts to help you understand Italy’s referendum 
Germany NEEDS British trade deal after Brexit to stop its own economy CRASHING, Bavarian minister says  
Nigel Farage tells me, on recent Brexit remarks by Blair & Major: "given the timings it would be very surprising if there wasn't collusion" 
Of course if the govt acknowledges we can't have the Single Market & migration controls the Conservative party will fall apart.#Brexit 
'Tyranny of majority must NOT dictate EU exit terms', John Major’s furious blast at Brexit  NO IT'S CALLED DEMOCRACY 
Government deception in pretending that Britain can be in the single market & have migration controls#Brexit #YesEU 
Welsh First Minister rejects 'unworkable' Nicola Sturgeon plan for separate Scottish Brexit deal  via @telegraphnews 
Leaked email says Virgin boss is helping to fund Blair’s anti-Brexit campaign :  
All this good news is very depressing for forecastersBusiness investment robust after Brexit vote  
'For God's sake!' Tony Blair ripped into after shameless Brexit intervention  
Ireland's Prime Minister Enda Kenny says it'll be impossible for the UK and EU to reach a Brexit deal in two years  
ACCEPT IT! Sir Ian Botham goes on FURIOUS rant at Remainers trying to stop Brexit  
If UK government could choose between EU and UK media knowing its Brexit negotiating position, the UK would choose the EU.Like a shot. 
The UK is not worried about the EU knowing its Brexit negotiation stance, but UK media.UK media is the real opponent in this negotiation. 
Un-f*cking-believableNot content with their Red Bus #BrexitLies, son of Vote Leave is now doubling down on #PostTruth #Brexit bull#bbcpm 
We are paying these people ridiculous amounts of money to interfere with things outside their remit. #SNPGTF #Brexit 
Jaguar Land Rover wants to make electric cars and create thousands of jobs after Brexit  
On #Agenda this Sunday at 12 we're in Rome to discuss the upcoming referendum! Will Renzi lose and resign? And what does it mean for Europe?  
The UK economy grew in 3 months after Brexit vote, confounding expert forecasts of an immediate downturn   via @FT 
White supremacist found guilty of murdering British lawmaker Jo Cox during country's bitter Brexit campaign  pic.twitter.com/rvPPNVKqAD 
UK Firms Show No Brexit Hit in Third Quarter as Investment Grows  
In the real world: If you liked the Great Recession, you're going to love Brexit  
Germany NEEDS British trade deal after Brexit to stop its own economy CRASHING, Bavarian minister says  
Many of us have been saying this since before the referendum: 2 yrs to A50 fr/work deal; then 2-5 trans period; 10 to settled place in world  
Patriotic Farage loves the UK so much, especially post-Brexit, that he is planning on... leaving. And becoming an immigrant. To the U.S.  
'Boycott Virgin' - Branson faces boycott blacklash after plans to bankroll campaign to overturn Brexit 
Blocking BREXIT - The Sort of Undemocratic Action From Which Revolutions Can Spring. #tcot 
Venetians push for their dialect to be recognised as a language ahead of referendum on autonomy from Rome 
There may be extra money to spend, but not as much as the extra borrowing needed due to Brexit, the OBR predicts. 
John Major and Tony Blair agree there's a case for another referendum. Neither the Spice Girls nor Hale & Pace have given their views yet. 
FM @NicolaSturgeon met @fmwales Carwyn Jones to discuss Brexit:  
The British Pound was good as gold, until Brexit ruined everything.  
Germany calls for a post-Brexit EU trade deal with Britain to minimise their own economic fallout.  Bless 'em. 
Make no mistake Leave campaign did just lie during the referendum they defrauded the voter. #brexit #borisjohnson 
WATCH: What Brexit fears? A collection of this week's good news stories to defy the Brexit scaremongering!  
A shout out to anyone who thinks this #brexit stuff is straightforward... here's some of my afternoon.  
Brexit-blockers are multi-millionaires in non-jobs who don't experience the problems of the silent majority of tax payers. 
Nigel needs a job! Should Theresa May reach out to @Nigel_Farage and give him an official role in the Brexit process? 
When is Elsie going to concede that all her Brexit plans are in tatters?All she is doing is playing to the gallery & it has to end.  
Are John Major and Tony Blair the only people with the bottle to stand against Brexit in Westminster?  God help us.  
You’re an idiot who did not know what he was doing when he voted for #Brexit. That one’s on the house. 
Germany NEEDS British trade deal after Brexit to stop its own economy CRASHING, Bavarian minister says  
John Major: case for second Brexit referendum is credible  
Oh look, it's the war criminal trying to overturn a democratic referendum.  
The Government's Brexit plans are  'impossible'   
That's because ....er.... Brexit hadn't happened yet  
British companies brushed off the "uncertainty" over #Brexit since the referendum and INCREASED investment official figures showed today 
"A United Ireland would be the best solution for the north after Brexit."- Taoiseach Enda Kenny TD #UnityRef  
Little-known amendment means Scottish parliament may have legal right to stop Brexit  
"Tony Blair can't stop Brexit. He's the one who caused it," says Tim Stanley 
Irish PM: 'Impossible' to do Brexit deal in two years  
Brexit voters less likely to change their underpants every day  via @POLITICOEurope 
Exclusive: Irish PM Enda Kenny tells me a Brexit transition deal "inevitable" as "impossible to do all the negotiations" in A50 2 year frame 
Tony Blair, former British Prime Minister, says Brexit can still be stopped  
Delay is not an option, @MaryLouMcDonald says referendum on #repealthe8th needed sooner rather than later –  
BREXIT BRITAIN #FFS @ForeignBeggars @djnonames @brappTV 
Those Politicians have got some front asking for another Referendum on something we was Never asked if we wanted to join in the first place 
Sky News Exclusive interview Irish PM @EndaKennyTD with me on @SkyNewsTonight at 7 - news on Brexit, transition, customs union, passports 
Anti-Brexit forces are gathering in strength; don't let them devalue our democracy  
'Brexit is terrific' Rees-Mogg savages gloomy forecasts & beams happy days are here again  
Cricket legend Sir Ian Botham tells Remainers to ‘ACCEPT’ Brexit and ‘MOVE ON’  
If @LibDems win #RichmondPark, the message to Theresa May will be she'll lose seats by opting for a hard Brexit 
BREAKING NEWS: UWindsor GSS referendum vote results. 457 - YES / 290 - NO. $73M Lancer Sports and Recreation Centre project is a go!  
.@GerryAdamsSF says Sinn Féin will launch a new discussion document, ‘Towards a United Ireland’, in Belfast and Dublin on Monday. #Brexit  
The British people will be appalled at Tony Blair's plan to block Brexit. No wonder he's now so unpopular.  
Both Govt and Miller argue in Brexit Supreme Court case that issue of Art 50 revocability unimportant. May be effort to steer away from ECJ  
List of TRAITORS Ted Heath One Act of Treason He Lied his European Communities Act 1972 Would not abolish our Sovereignty This was a Lie 
Brexit voters less likely to change their underpants every day  via @POLITICOEurope | Getty 
Former PM Sir John Major, who denied Brits a referendum on Maastricht which created the EU in 1992, backs a SECOND Referendum on the EU now! pic.twitter.com/7oULUbL8X1 
NEWS! Theresa May picks up Brexit strategy in Black Friday sale  
J.MAJOR We had a referendum we voted to Leave the single market & EU We don't need. Second Vote Seems they didn't like the answer they got 
The breakfast diners backing #Brexit  
Nigel Farage's pro-Brexit march on Supreme Court 'postponed' over fears of far-right hijacking  #2ndThoughts #Brexit 
#leavers what exactly did you vote for? #brexit  
GDP growth confirmed in three months after Brexit vote - the guardian  
Enemy of the people: John Major sparks fury by declaring #Brexit cannot be decided by 'tyranny of the majority'  
Buried in the official documents of the OBR is Brexit Britain will get a £10bn a year bonus from cancelled payments to Brussels. 
NFU President has held constructive & robust talks with @andrealeadsom MP on implications of #Brexit for British farming. More to follow....  
480 MPs (out of 650) voted Remain. Why are you now quiet? Grow a pair! put your country first & speak up against this #Brexit madness!  
Nurses from EU countries are going home after suffering racist abuse following #Brexit vote, a hospital chief says  
Blair says #Brexit can be stopped if voters decide that the cost-benefit analysis doesn’t stack up  via @NewStatesman 
A couple of claims in the #AutumnStatement caught our eye - what's the cost of #Brexit? And is there a "bonus"?   
Iain Duncan Smith accuses Sir John Major of 'dismissing democracy' after he backs a second referendum.  
It was an advisory referendum & in our representative democracy our MPs would be failing in their duty if they took advice to wreck the UK.  
I remember #JohnMajor's government it was a horror show for ordinary working people but as he was a Tory PM a paradise for the rich. #brexit 
Blair & Major talk complete sense on Brexit, which I'll argue against at tedious length till the last moment.  
With the #UK hurtling towards a cliff edge, there are bound to be a few #Brexit disaster movies. Share your #BrexitMovie inspiration with us 
Appalling murder of Jo Cox is being exploited by anti-Brexit campaigners!  
An absolute tour de force by Prof. Grayling. Makes one proud to be standing up for our country against the the #brexit con-men and wreckers.  
The SNATS screaming about people voting for Brexit without knowing the implications appear to have done the exact same in 2014. #pensions 
'We don't want to be alienated': EU citizens stand firm against Brexit  
Where was the referendum on your Maastricht Treaty, John Major?  
If you think Brexit must be delivered however many jobs are lost or people reduced to poverty, you’re not a democrat you're a dangerous fool 
Rather than attacking experts and their forecasts of future woe, why don't the Brexit people spell out the advantages to leaving the EU? 
If the Brexit deal is a catastrophe and people decide they’d sooner avoid it, that would be common sense not an attack on democracy. 
Gamer leaves a one-star review after #Brexit ruins his game of @FootballManager    
"We should avoid a needlessly self-harming version of Brexit" says @nick_clegg #wato 
Am delighted to support @sarahjolney1 in #RichmondPark by-election! She'll fight #Brexit  
Here are four things to watch for as Italy prepares to vote in a referendum called by prime minister Matteo Renzi  
Germany needs post-Brexit trade deal with Britain to minimise own economy fallout, minister warns 
Agreed @nick_clegg the #48% must come together & stand up to the new #Brexit elite - hard line ideologist bully boys 
Panic is setting in. Having played the "will of the people" card they know there's a cast iron case for a 2nd referendum. Which they'd lose.  
A reminder that Brexit negotiations must be open, transparent and inclusive  
Major, Blair and Clark had to speak out on Brexit because of feckless narcissism of Labour under Corbyn and absence of any real Opoosition 
It looks like Colombia will get a peace deal after all, without holding another referendum:  
[Sir] John Major talks of a referendum in terms of "tyranny of the majority". This the PM who rammed through Maastricht on a 3 line whip. 
Labour was a vehicle for Blair's Neo-Liberal ideas. His profiteering out of Global misery & wealth alignment show his true colours. #brexit  
AC Grayling @acgrayling wrote to Parliament about Brexit, got a reply, and then sent THIS glorious bloody response:  
The 1975 referendum had an overwhelming 67% pro-EEC vote, so utterly futile trying to challenge it. 
Order this film for Christmas in-store DVD HMV + DVD and digital download iTunes Amazon etc #Blair #Corbyn #Brexit #IRAQ #Syria #ISIS 
Scotland and Wales both want single market access after #Brexit, says @NicolaSturgeon, but no clarity from UK government at #BICWales 
UKIP's @GerardBattenMEP absolutely nailed on yet another cynical lie of the Leave campaign by @Jo_Coburn. #bbcdp #brexit  
I don't really understand why it's automatically undemocratic if ppl suggest second vote at stage that we know what Brexit deal looks like. 
Benjamin Zephaniah: 'Brexit has empowered racists'  
Brexit supporter leaves furious review after EU exit “ruins” his Football Manager 2017 game  
The number of young people who want to leave the UK has doubled since Brexit  
Soft Brexit? Hard Brexit? The EU, not Britain, will decide | Timothy Garton Ash  
BREXIT: Reality kicks in so we return to spreading the £350m NHS claim with no proof other than Michael Gove’s word.  
Tony Blair, former British Prime Minister, says Brexit can still be stopped  
FT (might have to file this!): "UK's economy has confounded the forecasters and grown in the three months following the EU referendum". 
Remainers who use Brexit ref 2 term J Cox murderer White Nationalist don’t do same with this Remain murderer!  
Funny how BritScots balk at the idea Scotland could veto UK wide Brexit, but cheer idea Spain would veto Scotland's membership of EU. 
"Plaid Cymru will oppose a hard #Brexit ... there are opportunities for the devolved Governments to influence" @leannewood #postbrexitcymru 
Thks to @faisalislam for being one of  few journos  looking at #Brexit from pov of #ruleoflaw#ParliamentIsSovereign 
However u voted on EU we can't afford 2 let Tories dominate debate about what Brexit looks like: Register here:  
#Brexit has boosted the EU's standing with the public.  
Hypocrite Iain Duncan Smith used to like the OBR - until they said that #brexit will damage the economy  
Brexit will cause immeasurable economic harm to the UK but seeming the Brexiters want that. Are they mad? 
Forget Article 50! Britain can IGNORE Lisbon Treaty and quit the EU NOW, top lawyer claims  #brexit  
RT if you agree with Beefy that politicians should stop trying to block Brexit! #RespectTheResult 
A second referendum is not just credible, but essential  
Tories are using #Brexit as a smokescreen for 6yrs of George Osborne economic incompetence. #bbcdp 
The 'Brexit dividend' DOES exist: Britain to benefit from extra £32BILLION when it leaves the EU:   
Anybody remember John Major's Referendum on the Maastricht Treaty which abolished Common Market and created the EU in 1992? Me neither...  
Sturgeon’s bid for Scotland to strike a Brexit deal separate from the rest of the UK was dealt a double blow today: 
There's a new slogan for Brexit...  
Is a second referendum a bad idea? Not if we ask the right question | Simon Jenkins  
Major & Blair want a second referendum; between them, in 17 years of government they failed to hold the first one. 
British retail sales grew at their fastest rate in more than a year earlier this month, another #Brexit myth quashed 
The referendum campaign all over again. We need an honest exit from the EU not a fake Brexit  
John Major who cost Britain 14 billion pounds is back giving advice suggesting the majority be ignored in brexit.  Send in Edwina Curry !!!! 
Brexit voters less likely to change their underwear every day*. My favourite thing about Brexit so far. TBF, competition not high.*YouGov 
Brexit voters less likely to change their underpants every day  
EU-funded IFS claims wage growth will be worst since WWII in post-Brexit years.It couldn't have an ulterior motive, could it?  
Austrian presidential candidate Hofer says a #referendum for #Austria's exit from the #EU is "possible" in case he's elected. 
There's a new slogan for Brexit...  
Why the Remainers will find it so hard to block Brexit.  
Tony Blair says Brexit can be stopped as Sir John Major backs bid for second referendum  
Sir John Major does not accept 17 million tyrants who voted for Brexit.  
When are these people going to accept and get on with the fact that we had a referendum....and the country voted "LEAVE"  !!Move on..!! 
Brussels & Berlin can only influence the UK's Brexit deal if we let them. Walk away first, negotiate later. Article 50 + repeal EC Act. 
It's Good news Friday here!! 70% of companies maintaining or increasing post-Brexit innovation investment, says CBI  
"There is absolutely no bluffing that #EU leaders will push for a hard #Brexit"SUITS US JUST FINE.Bring it on! 
Brexiteers never accepted the result of the 1975 EU referendum so why should I accept the result in 2016? 
John Major & Tony Blair who both took us to war in Iraq without listening to the people now want to give a 2nd EU referendum to the people. 
Thanks to Brexit I now know the likes of  Better Together, Blair McDougall, Labour, Tories Have NOTHING they can scare me with re indyref2 
On @BrexitCentral Sir John Major's ex-local vice chairman @nickdebois hits back at his call for a second Brexit vote  
#5Things-No Brexit effect in U.K. GDP-Bond rout too far?-Lira continues to weaken-Markets quiet-Black Friday 
BREXIT: Mail readers have their own happy place to retreat to when reality get too detailed for them.  
We need to see the Nissan letter, and until we do, Brexit has nothing else to say. 
In John Major we have a man elected PM with 42% of the vote calling a 52% referendum result the 'Tyranny of the majority' Mind blowing. 
A sensible Tory backs Lib Dem policy on Brexit.  
Sick of Brexit? Columnist @PCollinsTimes was set the task of reading all the books on #Brexit  
Trump Voters and Brexit VotersAnyone have a great link to an essay or article comparing them? 
How come some of those who slagged of the SNP over a second referendum are calling for a never-endum on the EU? 
I will be on @daily_politics at 12.15 discussing Tony Blair's attempts to deny Brexit to the 17,410,742 people that voted for it. 
A 37% vote of a gerrymandered electorate, for an empty slogan & a rag-bag of incompatible promises & lies is no mandate for #Brexit#Remain 
.@JamesMcGrory this morning talking about the £58.7bn 'Brexit effect' extra borrowing that the @OBR_UK has forecast 
The first big fiscal event since the Brexit referendum was modest and boring  
#Brexit supporters fear a #EURef2 on the final deal because they know there is no majority for any real #Brexit scheme.#Remain 
"Brexit Fantasy Island" (cont) attacks highly rated "experts" from IFS as well as OBR for unwelcome economic news  
Tony Blair wants 2nd referendum. Doesn't He get fact people are turned off politics by him and his open door policy on immigration 
I'm 90 and my pension is more than I need. Labour won't get my support until it starts opposing brexit 
The ABC of #Fintech: #Acquisitions, Brexit and Collaboration#mergers Survey [PDF]  
Exactly.... even during the 18 months preceding the referendum, most knew we'd take a hit financially, we still chose it. I still would.  
Guess which march is pro-remain and which one is pro-brexit?  
No, Brexit is not clear. Exiting single market and customs union will make you poorer. You have my word for it  
Tony Blair can't stop Brexit. He's the one who caused it  via @TelegraphNews 
"Bourgeoisie elite" have brought us Brexit, poverty & a run down national health service, is it time, they disappeared, up their own Arses ? 
READ: Our response to John Major's comments that "Brexit cannot be decided by ‘tyranny of the majority".  
U.K. post-Brexit data shows investment growth  
Business investment helps UK growth stay firm after Brexit vote  
Leavers were told lies - do we continue to walk towards the abyss as the mad reality of Brexit becomes clear? I think not... 
>>>>>>Brexit Britain - the future is revealedLet's not go there!#Remain 
John Major: case for second Brexit referendum is credible  
Sir John Major - he who labelled those opposed to EU integration "bastards" proves that is exactly what he is as he demands a 2nd Referendum 
The Scottish parliament may have the legal right to block Brexit  
Malta's PM on Boris Johnson's claims for a superior deal on #Brexit terms: "And I could win the Olympic 100 metres".  
POLITCS: Farage denies reports he’s moving to America; “we’ll stay in the UK until Brexit then I’ll move wherever my wife’s deported to.” 
"Leading" #Brexiteer indulging in playground name-calling. Another sign that #Brexit zealots being overtaken by harsh reality of their dream  
Tony Blair can't stop Brexit. He's the one who caused it 
Watch Branson fall over as media increasingly attack him for his stand on brexit. We don't need him, he should return to his Island. 
Rare alternate shots of The Brexit Deer™  
U.K. post-Brexit data shows investment growth  
In perhaps the most heartbreaking moment of #Brexit the channel tunnel is filled in, with flags of friendship returned on both sides  
David Cameron's political career isn't the first casualty of an EU ideology or will it be the last, esp if our MP's try blocking brexit. 
Blair responsible for Iraq war,open door immigration &PPI rip off deals.Wanted to join Euro.Broke promise on EU Constitution referendum. 
Tyranny Of The Minority now advocated by Major, who, always semi-detached at best, took UK into both ERM & Maastricht with no referendum.  
Somehow I don't recall the referendum being predicated on the basis that we would need a 2nd referendum if we voted for Brexit. Funny that. 
From the John Major who stubbornly railroaded Britain into both ERM & Maastricht without even one referendum, never mind a second.  
No, Britain isn't going to have £32 billion extra to spend after Brexit 
It comes to something when the most effective opponent of the racist, xenophobic poison unleashed by Brexit is the host of Match of the Day. 
#Brexit The UK is the fastest growing economy in the G7 and today the top country for inward investment in the world #PostBrexitCymru 
EU referendum result: Huntingdonshire votes to leave. Sir John Major speaks against his OWN former Constituency!   
Tony Blair, former British Prime Minister, says Brexit can still be stopped  
Please RT @talk2meradiouk poll: Is John Major right? Should we have a second EU referendum?  
There is a "perfectly credible case" for a second referendum on Britain's EU membership, says Sir John Major.  
What do #Brexit, #Trump and #Italy's No #referendum vote have in common?  
About to start #BICWALES meeting on #Brexit, our focus on retaining full and unfettered access to the single market is unwavering 
If Brexit goes ahead and triple-lock remains then "respect your elders" can take a huff on a chimney. Shafted by the boomers, over and over. 
Recounts, overruling the electoral college, second referendums, blocking #Brexit. Why can't the liberal elite accept the result?  
How Italy's referendum could send shockwaves through the EU and beyond  
Tony Blair wants a second Brexit referendum. Nick Ferrari has a one word response for him: “Chilcot"  
BREAKING: British economy shows no sign of Brexit effect - spending rises as GDP grows 0.5%  
UK business investment rises by 0.9% in Q3. Economists had expected a 1% fall. Still no sign of that Brexit downturn! 
Reading Tim Shipman's excellent book on Brexit. Lifts lid on shabby way ITV and Downing St tried to fix TV debates. Shameful @chrisshipitv 
"The ‘cost of Brexit’ highlighted in the Autumn Statement will undoubtedly be wrong.” @DrGerardLyons 
EU getting serious Brexit: "There won't be a situation when the UK has a better deal than it has today." 
If David Cameron was honest he would say what he believes. #Brexit is bad for Britain. His failure to do so, unlike #Major, speaks volumes. 
Chart showing what R100 invested on 1 January 2016 would have yielded. Chose 50 popular traders. Iron Ore wins, bad fashion & Brexit lose  
The Corbyn 'left' are in full panic mode. They've realised that Corbyn & McDonnell fully support Tory 'hard brexit' for ideological reasons. 
Sir John Major, who betrayed Britain by signing the Maastricht Treaty without a referendum, wants a second vote on EU membership. 
The Brexit vandals who glibbly state that 'out means out' whatever the cost, are the same who'll whinge and moan when they can't afford Sky 
#Brexit: Sir John Major says 'perfectly credible' case for second referendum & warns against 'tyranny of majority' 
Brexiters definitely not worried about losing second referendum  
Liberals across the Atlantic must accept some responsibility for Brexit and the rise of Trump:  via @benabyad 
#RichmondPark is a chance to tell Government you're unhappy with its Brexit plans. Watch me at end of BBC news at 10  
EU prioritising Brexit transition deal, refusing U.K. insistence on parallel final deal negotiations in early talks:  
Yet another blow for pensioners as UKGov abandons the "Triple Lock" we heard Cameron and Osborne boast of so frequently. #Brexit #Waspi 
Hard Brexit will be catastrophic for Britain - @Keir_Starmer 
There's a new slogan for Brexit...  
TFW you remember Brexit is happening...  
Sir John Major needs to forget Brexit and sort out his "Cones Hotline" I have been on hold since 1992! 
.@oflynnmep: John McDonnell realises Brexit will allow politicians to think freely again; when will others catch up?  
Brexit will cost £226 million a week. Let's fund our NHS instead.  
#TheresaMay will struggle to avoid #Brexit cliff-edge (via @InFactsOrg) 
The basic error Tony Blair, John Major & their Remoaner pals make is they think Brexit was all about money. It wasn't then. And it isn't now 
I feel it's time for another outing for this. The referendum on 23 June WAS the 2nd referendum.  
Former prime minister Sir John Major says there is a 'perfectly credible' case for a second #Brexit referendum 
The political has-beens are out in force to stop Brexit. They're yesterday's men for very good reason. We have a new plan now: FREEDOM. 
#Brexit could harm UK #scientists but also damage European #research says @EuroSurg @TheLancet  @Scientists4EU 
EX-CON PM John Major jumps into the BREXIT debate saying there’s a credible case for a second referendum  
Brexit is dominating a London election that was supposed to be about Heathrow  
John Major: Second Brexit referendum ‘perfectly credible’  
From now on, when I'm confronted by a Remainer ... I'm just going to reply with this :-)#Brexit #Article50NOW #Article50 #LeaveEU #leave 
Forget Brexit and Trump, “post-truth” was spawned by the liberal left long ago  
Suspect Brexit will turn out to be a symptom not a cause: just shuffling cards to find the best way to exploit us. 
Fail Establishment Elite fight back.Major issues warning to May that Brexit must not be dictated by the 'majority'   
We're being lied to on a grotesque scale by politicians, "economists" & media, they simply don't want Brexit and will fight it tooth & nail. 
#Blair's comments and those of #Major are the only sane comments on #Brexit disaster of recent days. Of course there is a case for #EUref2 
Major: Tyranny of the majority must not set Brexit termsIt's called democracy you clown 
JohnMajor says there's a good case for a 2nd referendum, but 'accepts UK won't be in EU'. We should accept no such thing. Remain is the aim. 
Ex-prime ministers can see a way out of Brexit - plus the rest of the morning headlines  
The war Criminal who only listens to himself. Tony #Blair claims #Brexit can be stopped  
So Cameron, Blair, Sir John Major and Clegg all say Brexit is a bad idea. But y'all choose to believe Nigel 'im emigrating' Farage...... 
Blair tries to convince the public to 'Repent the Sin of Brexit......'    #lbc @lbc 
Brexit: Sir John Major says 'perfectly credible' case for second referendum on terms of Brexit  
“Brexit means Brexit. And we’re going to make a success of it.” One of these statements is meaningless. The other is a lie. 
Sir John Major: 'Perfectly cedible case' for 2nd EU referendum  
Not only will NHS not get £350 mn extra p/wk post Brexit but instead Brexit will cost £60 Bn over 5 yrs. Did Brexiteers say this in EU ref? 
Mr Muscat says the EU parliament might veto a Brexit deal. In which case we should simply leave. This is a sovereign, democratic nation. 
There was an even more 'credible' case for a referendum over Maastricht, but we didn't get one.  
No. Fall in real wages ‘08-14 was due to financial crisis. Nothing to do with EUIf they fall in coming yrs, almost certainly down to Brexit  
If anybody thinks those who support Brexit are going to blame Brexit for the economic effects of Brexit then they are fools. 
I'll sum this up: pro-#remain protesters live in or near London and have time to spare. Pro-#brexit are busy working  
John Major decries tyranny of majority.-"perfectly credible case for 2nd referendum". -"No one can determine by osmosis the minds of 52%".  
#Farron & co. will keep wasting our time and cost billions to the tax payer by #Brexit delay.No #Neverendum!Time 
Could more of our current MPs speak out like this? Brexit must not be decided by gvmt acting alone and unchecked.  
The Sun so worried about a bleak Brexit calls for cuts to foreign aid and NHS insurance & means-testing charging. Then contradicts itself  
Spain vows to block plot to keep Scotland in single market. Sturgeon, give Brexit a chance and stop your tantrum! 
Have heard several people argue that hard Brexit is best understood as a religious faith. Can't be shifted by evidence or rational argument.  
John Major comes out in favour of the the @LibDems policy of a vote on the #Brexit deal.  
Benjamin Zephaniah: 'After the Brexit vote I experienced racism that I hadn't since the 80s'  
The cost of Tory Brexit - £58 billion bill - spot on by @patmcfaddenmp 
This part of the Autumn Statement was ignored by desperate Remain fanatics eager to spike #Brexit strategy guns. Try again @GuidoFawkes 
Things we know about Brexit: Tories have no plan, no friends in Europe (Le Pen excluded), no idea what to do next and Adam doesn't do irony.  
'Brexit is terrific' Rees-Mogg savages gloomy forecasts & beams happy days are here again  
Undemocratic to give the people another chance to demand #Brexit? If it's so right for country, they'll choose it again, right? Doubt it.  
#Brexit: Former PM says ‘tyranny of the majority’ should not dictate manner of UK’s exit from #EUHear, hear. 
Brexit: Sir John Major says 'perfectly credible' case for second referendum  
lol can't wait to get back to the uk to enjoy the last two years of data roaming that I won't need a mortgage to pay off #brexit 
An insightful reading from president @KagutaMuseveni on #Brexit #Trump win in the US elections   Via @newvisionwire 
Brexit: Sir John Major says 'perfectly credible' case for second referendum  
Spanish MEP leader: Spain would oppose Nicola Sturgeon single market Brexit plan  via @telegraphnews 
EU leaders 'not bluffing' over Brexit terms, warns Malta's PM  
Don't forget that the £58.7bn deficit figure is based on projections of the softest Brexit possible. Hard Brexit and it will be much worse! 
Opposition calling for Referendum #DemonetizationActual Referendum reqd for -Scrapping #RajyaSabha or-Reducing its powers significantly 
There's a new slogan for Brexit...  
COME ON BREXITEERS OF SLEAFORD, GET OUT AND VOTE FOR BREXIT AGAIN  
Man Who Led Brexit Movement Moving To The US  
LIVE on : Chris Patten on Trump and Brexit at the FCC  
Brexit: compounding the lies - Gove et al are telling porkies ... again.   #Brexit.  
Lets make #Brexit Happenvote for @VAylingukip1 in the #Sleaford and #NorthHykeham #ByElection#UKIP #BrexitBritain #BelieveInBritain 
Brexit leader Nigel Farage moving to the US: report  
BLAIR: BRITAIN CAN STOP ITS EXIT FROM EU...STOP BLAIR! WE NEED #BREXIT! DO IT!  
In this case I do mean nationalist, as in English nationalist, not British. That's really what Brexit was/is  
After causing #Brexit without a clue how to finish the job, Farage now plans to emigrate to US to be buds with Trump  
every MP KNOWS it was an advisory referendum in which the vote was about 50-50; only 37.5% of electorate voted to leave; MPs must now decide  
The sheer desperation or call it stupidity of politicians amazes me. Constitution has no provision for referendum, yet Mamta wants it. 
GoCardless spies a glimmer of hope for UK fintech amid the Brexit gloom  
A peace deal-do-over in Colombia bypasses voters, who rejected an earlier deal in an October referendum:  
'BREXIT BOOM' LATEST: Vote Leave Campaign Vindicated As OBR Review Finds Britain Will Be GBP 32 BILLION Better Off  
BOYCOTT VIRGIN LATEST: Campaign Gathers Pace As Huge Backlash Surges Against Anti-Brexit Richard Branson & Virgin  
'THANK YOU' Nigel Farage salutes the Express for being the FIRST newspaper to back Brexit  
Anyone who says Brexit / trump hasn't emboldened racists needs to get out into the real world and stop lying to themselves. 
nothing binding about the vote and no legal obligation for the government to pursue Brexit. It can, it should, it must be stopped. No Brexit  
Just watched BBC question time,im so sick of everything being blamed in brexit I'm sick of every time it's mentioned the word racist comes ! 
Tory #Brexit Britain encapsulated in one front page.  
Between the Trump Bump and the Brexit Bounce — why do markets keep misreading the political climate?  
I used to say 'I'm British' with a barely perceptible swagger.  Now I just apologise.  Upfront.  Repeatedly.  #Brexit 
Brexit leader Nigel Farage moving to the US: report  
!Loose Talk from Irish Leader- Oh My God!"Irish Taoiseach Enda Kenny says Brexit could bring about united Ireland" 
The best brexit was when @piersmorgan left the country. Anyways, happy thanksgiving y'all 
The time is now, Germany. We The People are winning! Remove #Merkel #abmerkeln #merkelmusswegLet us #DrainTheSwamp & follow #Brexit  
The data don't always tell you what to do. Look at Brexit & Trump polls. So meaningful use of metrics is key. @profvinnycho #ades2016 
Given Jacob Rees-Mogg's attempt to quote from Cicero I though this one might be pertinent to the on-going Brexit debate...#NoBrexit #Remain 
"perfectly credible case" for 2nd referendum: Ex PM John Major"tyranny of the majority""bigotry" of campaign 
Benjamin Zephaniah: 'After the Brexit vote I experienced racism that I hadn't since the 80s'  
EU votes to prevent Turkey from joining. All the lies on this told by Vote Leave were worthless, of course. #brexit  
"I cant remember the last time I talked about a second referendum - I hear R Davidson talking about it all the time"  
Why do I have to pay @BBC £145 a yr so they can tell me I'm an idiot & a racist, who did not know what I was doing when I voted for #Brexit? 
Vote Leave Alumni Tell May To Spend Brexit Dividend on NHS:  
Corbyn is facilitating the biggest extreme right project in modern British history, Blair is opposing it. Who is more socialist?#Brexit 
Top Tories are tearing themselves apart following poor economic forecasts for Brexit Britain  
Sorry, what was that @johnredwood ? You want a second referendum? Nice of you to be so clear on this matter. We agree mate. U-turn now???  
Kevin O'Leary may run to be Canada's Trump.  Brexit, Trump, Canada. Is Globalism on the run?  
Cons say $38m could be better used than 24 Sussex. #pnpcbc I say $300m for referendum wld be better to help w/ clean water & housing for F/N 
Things we know about Brexit: the Tories don't know anything about Brexit.  
UK will be ‘screwed into the floor’ in Brexit talks warns Ryanair boss  
A fitting @Adamstoon1 cartoon for tonight's #bbcqt debate #NHS #passports #NigelFarage #Brexit  
Brexit leader Nigel Farage moving to the US: report  
I don't think people voted Brexit out of ignorance. It was a choice. Easier to face change with fear & anger than courage & faith in others. 
Brexit Backer Instructs Lawyers After CNN Kremlin Smear  
1st Question Brexit 2nd Question Farage 3rd Question Immigration #bbcqt wtf makes me watch this shit 
If you aren't anti #Brexit,anti Trump,and anti Farage you don't get on #bbcqt 
Why wouldn't you keep your options open? Tony Blair has something to say about BREXIT and it seems more sensible than Mrs Mays own cabinet!  
#NHS is literally on its last legs, funding cuts left right & centre 4 many vital services, but let's bang on some more abt #brexit! #bbcqt 
If Brexit was the solution then what was the problem? Perhaps the problem is we didn't have a proper diagnosis of that problem @MazzucatoM 
Dimbleby "We are half way through the programme and all we've talked about is BREXIT, let's have a question about Nigel Farage" #bbcqt 
The sheer bone-headedness of people 'we want hard Brexit irrespective of the economic catastrophe it will unleash' #bbcqt 
Even by 2021 wages won't have returned to pre-crisis 2008 levels. Impact of Brexit looks like a lost decade (at least) for working people  
Is it true the BBC are thinking of renaming 'Question Time' to - 'Brexit's the problem, now what's the question?' #bbcqt 
Absurdity hitting new highs. - Just stop the whole sorry #Brexit mess.  
Oh, GOD.Watching #bbcqt is like being stuck in a perpetual sense of Deja Vu... #BREXIT #BREXIT #BREXIT  
Ever since June 24th, the BBC has led the charge to try and avert #Brexit. The weekly #bbcqt circus is just one more effort to do this. 
I'll just manslpain how Brexit will create an opportunity, says the cobbler to the world famous economist. #bbcqt 
Dear @timfarron We don't need to 'reconsider' Brexit thanks! #bbcqt 
Economist on #bbcqt asks "If Brexit was the solution what was the problem?"The answer is being in the EU. Next question? 
It genuinely baffles me that months later, people still don't understand that #brexit hasn't even happened yet #bbcqt 
I'm sick of Brexit's silly indignation at the idea of a 2nd ref. Anyone would think they had lost confidence in their teeny majority #bbcqt 
If you voted leave and believe it's the will of the people, why would you be scared of a second referendum on the negotiations ? #bbcqt 
As a remain voter I'm ashamed to have Tim Farron & others on my side. Accept democracy, Brexit is happening let's make it a success! #bbcqt 
#bbcqt are debating Brexit4 out of 5 of panellists are ardent #REMOANERSBBC bias is so blatantWhen are we to get some fair debate on BBC? 
Day 2 of 'anyone who says Brexit might be damaging is stupid/biased/wrong because we say so'   
There is Brexit, only Brexit. Only devastating, destructive no good will come of it Brexit. The UK should decide no Brexit.  
Brexit is a ridiculous & unnecessary risk. It's ludicrous to complain that intelligent people are being negative about its realities #bbcqt 
#bbcqt The cost of #brexit is indeed high. @timfarron and @ChrisLeslieMP are right about #brexitshambles 
Isn't it interesting that the BBC seem unable to find any politician to robustly defend #Brexit. This is yet another butt hurt Remain panel 
The things we know about Brexit: This Tory Brexit is the most clueless exercise ever undertaken by any UK Government..... 
Tim Farron just gave a more robust opposition to Brexit in 2 minutes on Question Time than Corbyn has in months of stumbling. #bbcqt 
At start of #bbcqt @timfarron gets applause saying British people should have the right to stay in the EU if they don't like #Brexit deal 
Things we know about Brexit: You don't have a plan and your government's position has been thrown out of the courts. Go home.  
"We don't have to go for a hard Brexit" - Tim Farron. AKA No Brexit. Applauded by Remainiac audience on #bbcqt 
excuse you you did it first you let brexit happen 
Wages - ShrinkingBrexit - UnravellingPrisons - RiotingHospitals - FailingSocial Care - Struggling#Austerity  - Not Working#bbcqt 
this just sounds so pathetic coming from a guy who voted against brexit but now supports this epic self-harm for party loyalty 
Things we know about Brexit: the SNP is horribly out of its depth on the European stage, with zero diplomatic know-how or ability (3/3) 
"Turkey will join the EU"Turkey accession talks suspended"Lets spend £350m a week on the NHS"Brexit leaves us £100ms a week poorer.  
Things we know about Brexit: it is the United Kingdom, not Scotland, that will negotiate the UK's exit from the EU (1/3) 
#Hammond insists he's doing the best for the UK economy but fails to say that killing #Brexit would help enormously.#posttruth by omission 
Eurocrats believe they can BULLY and FRIGHTEN Britain to stop Brexit, reveals Tory MEP  WE WILLNOT BE BULLIED BY YOU 
'The UK is a hotbed of cocaine and gonorrhoea'  The government announces what it plans to export, post-Brexit. 
Spain will reject any special Brexit deal for Scotland, according to high-ranking Spanish MEP Esteban Gonzalez Pons.  
Michael Gove demands that Theresa May spend a £13 billion ‘Brexit dividend’ on the NHS  
Brexit, Trump, Honey G, Ed Balls, Martin.... imagine what odds you would have got on this all winning!! 
i FRONT PAGE: 'Blair's mission to stop Brexit' #skypapers 
Soft Brexit? Hard Brexit? The EU, not Britain, will decide.By Timothy Garton Ash 
Spanish MEP leader: Spain would oppose Nicola Sturgeon single market Brexit plan  
Ideally the consequences of Brexit wld fall on individuals, bespoke, according to whether they voted for it. But pensioners have triple lock 
Questions you won't hear on #bbcqt is Theresa May out of her depth on Brexit, why did the Tories cheat, in GE15  
Brexit is going to Make Britain Great again by keeping wages down until 2031. Well done.  
Brexit leader Nigel Farage moving to the US: report  
Hey Better Together @blairmcdougall this #Brexit Britain you have lumbered us with is an absolute disaster!  
'Mr Brexit' Nigel Farage to cash in on lucrative coast-to-coast new year speaking tour in 20 American cities  
Nicola Sturgeon: Autumn Statement exposed reality of ‘Brexit con’  
Tomorrow's front page: Back to the 1920s ... Brexit means UK workers will face worst decade for living standards for nearly 100 years  
Now that @economist has recommended a No, we know the Yes vote has a real chance at #Italy's #referendum.  
Every household 'will lose £1,250 a year' because of Brexit  
#brexit is about destroying the UK. It has nothing to do with patriotism or nationhood. So far, Brexit destruction is working well. 
MORGAN STANLEY: The government's post-Brexit economic forecasts are far too optimistic  via @BIUK_Finance 
NATO chief takes swipe at EU army and admits Brexit has made military alliance STRONGER  
This is a disgusting #bbcqt stitch-up. You've 4 super heavyweight #Brexicidal #Remainaics against John Timpson. #Brexit  
Soft Brexit? Hard Brexit? The EU, not Britain, will decide | Timothy Garton Ash  
History and politics... #brexit  
Our anti-#brexit campaign #WeWouldMissYou won the #politikaward. Thank you for your support! 
Amazing really when you consider UK government doesn't have the balls to stop Brexit which they know is an outright disaster for UK  
Just closed a Virgin account & told the customer service bod its because of Branson's anti-Brexit stance. Hit the corporate elite in pocket  
Furious Leave voters to boycott Virgin as Branson 'funds Brexit blocking group'  
Merits of Italy's constitutional referendum to one side, arguments in @TheEconomist editorial are incoherent and ignore reality of Italy 
Tories #donaldtrump,austerity & #Brexit will return Britain & USA to the "dirty thirties"  I experienced as a boy  
She girns about the No vote. She girns about the Leave vote. She girns about Brexit. Tomorrow she'll still be girning #GirningNicola 
Most-read on @spectator website: Britain holds the aces in Brexit talks, by James Forsyth. This week's cover story:  
Italy NEXT to reject establishment as protest vote set to WIN referendum, shock poll finds.  
I admire @TheEconomist1 and learn much from it.But its editorial comment on the Italian referendum is unbelievably superficial #ColonialNews 
Please find my full @realvision interview on the Italian Referendum w Professor Onida and Rodolfo de Benedetti   
Brexit leader Nigel Farage moving to the US: report  
I write about 'Soft or hard Brexit? The EU, not Britain, has the whip hand' @CER_Grant @Hugodixon #brexit  
The new Brexit battle bus.  
One of Britain's most senior academics is warning that universities could close without guarantees over Brexit  
I agree. If 2015 was the “last” with FPTP, referendum should be on which system should replace it.  
Tech companies seem to think the advantages of staying in London outweigh Brexit risk—for now  
This really is the best example of "couldn't make it up". Of course the majority of ppl affected by Brexit will not have this choice.  
Guardian asks: Can Brexit really be stopped? Why would they EVEN ASK THE QUESTION if they were a British newspaper in favour of democracy? 
Great to hear @strathearnrose confirm Brexit won't diminish Scottish Government commitment to protecting environment at #natureofscotland 
#Brexit was the first brick knocked out of the establishment wall#NigelFarage #PoliticalRevolution #EUspring #No2EU #BrexitBritain #bbcqt 
An American PR company boasts that it conned UK voters into voting for #Brexit via @wordpressdotcom 
SHOW this video to anyone calling for a second referendum #RespectTheResult 
Meet one of the new elite behind the scenes backing #Trump, Brexit backer Arron Banks revealed in Panama Papers  
Please RTLet's all BOYCOTT @Virgin The fight isn't over yet..#brexit 
Sky Sources: EU prioritises Brexit transition deal, refusing UK ask of parallel final trade talks. Full story:  
GoCardless spies a glimmer of hope for UK fintech amid the Brexit gloom  by @riptari 
Italian referendum: Latest poll finds protest vote set to WIN   
"If establishment needs Tony Blair to save it, if second referendum campaign need him, they are done for" LIVE @COMMENT_PressTV 
Looking forward to the alt-right running the west from now on#Brexit#Trump#Le PenNo more sissy politics …   
Can Brexit really be stopped?  
British support for the EU up 7% since Brexit referendum | The Independent  
"Brexit will cost £226 million a week. Let's fund our NHS instead.Put that slogan on a bus."By @JamesMelville pic.twitter.com/EsUL1ybnHZ 
Serious question. What has Nicola done for Scotland?She made a mess of the NHS on her watch....As for #Brexit.. #awkward 
Why European Union countries are likely to be tough in Brexit negotiations: 
Furious Leave voters to boycott Virgin as Branson 'funds Brexit blocking group  
The British people give their government a great chance to make their country great again through #Brexit and it f..ks it up. Morons! 
Theresa May has asked Mauricio Pochettino to lead her Brexit negotiations as he has managed to get Spurs out of Europe in just two months.  
The electoral reform committee is set to recommend a referendum.  #ERRE #cdnpoli 
They've officially changed em  #Toblerone #Brexit  
EU adopting three-tier approach to Brexit, sources tell Sky News  
Britain's going to have to borrow more to prepare for Brexit. Watch the #AutumnStatement highlights in charts:  
Thanks Brexitears. We all lost.UK living standards squeeze 'will be worse than after global crash'  #Brexit #Ukip 
Amazing, isn't it? Remainers whip up a campaign of hatred against #Brexit and scream that they are victims of hatred. Sick thugs! 
Enraged by negative views of #brexit  leading brexiters  reveal proposals for a new government ministry.  
WATCH: Investor and entrepreneur @Jimmhk gives us his view on upcoming events on the continent. #LePen, #ItalyRef, #Brexit ¦ @MasterInvestor 
I'm giving Theresa May and her cabinet every chance to come good on Brexit. But good they must come. That means 100% exit: FREEDOM! 
Brexit leader Nigel Farage moving to the US: report  
Anti-Brexit types claiming Brexit will increase national debt by 3%. The banking bust increased it 100% and we didn't get our country back. 
UK-EU Brexit SummitEU: "this is is the EU's position".May: "we are not giving a running commentary on the UK position".[Silence.] 
Tony Blair rescuing us from Brexit is like James Caan being pulled alive from that car crash by Kathy Bates in Misery 
Memo to Mr Gove et. al. re Autumn Statement: looks like the experts were right about the danger of #Brexit - 
I began campaigning for this Referendum result about a year ago. We achieved a BINDING result five months ago. I'm still having to campaign. 
Tories have utterly failed in economic terms #6WastedYears failed in terms of social justice and morality & failed to prepare for Brexit  
Forget Brexit and Trump, “post-truth” was spawned by the liberal left long ago  
The true cost of #Brexit has been revealed by the #OBR. @bigginslondon shows how we should get it out there: 
So Brexit, Trump, Arron Banks, UKIP, Stop the War, Corbyn, Le Pen- all part of a Russian plot. The Establishment must think we're morons. 
I'm very concerned that Brexit will overcook & dry out my turkey, and I know Putin intends to hack my cornbread stuffing. Staying vigilant. 
Brexit Britain, also known as  
In a "secure reading room" in Whitehall, there is a sheet of paper headed "Brexit".The sheet is otherwise blank.  
Pro-Brexit MPs should note: the support for #Brexit has withered. Time to support #Remain if they want to keep their jobs. 
Considering we are no where near #brexit yet that is cobblers ..... time to give up your trying to put this country down  
Last 36hrs were the wake-up call: Brexit is not a game. 15yrs of flat living standards. Poor get a lot poorer. And that's with a soft Brexit 
And here's IDS, praising the independence of the OBR until he didn't like what it forecast about Brexit  
IFS, OBR and Resolution Foundation forecast Brexit economic gloom. Part of the solution to avoid the gloom is-obviously- not to Brexit. 
Why European Union countries are likely to be tough in Brexit negotiations  
IT'S BECAUSE OF #BREXIT, YOU MONSTROUS WANKPUFFIN.  
#OnThisDay in 1995 the Divorce Referendum was passed by just 10,000 votes with Dublin vote being decisive #DublinSince1922 
Brexit punishment!  
How can anyone truly believe the EU Referendum has been an influence for the good of our nation? It has been divisive and legitimised hate.  
Brexit architect plans to move to the US — here are 4 reasons we must keep this dangerous refugee out  
A "dreadful" decade of wage stagnation lies ahead, according to the IFS  
On CNN today, @joshrogin says Brexit was a Russian operation, funded and planned by Putin  
All submissions here // Brexit –The Claimant’s Case for the Supreme Court | Edwin Coe LLP  
Brexit article 50 appeal to @UKSupremeCourt: link to the written submissions of the government and both respondents:  
MORGAN STANLEY: The government's post-Brexit economic forecasts are far too optimistic  via @BIUK_Finance 
If the June 23rd BREXIT referendum had been restricted to those who changed their underpants/knickers every day LEAVE would have lost  
Furious Leave voters to boycott Virgin as Branson 'funds Brexit blocking group'  
Hofer Says He May Back EU Referendum in Austria  
Brexit will cost £226 million a week. Let's fund our NHS instead.Put that slogan on a bus. 
Some things the #Brexit borrowing money could have brought: 9,800 primary schools 108 hospitals over 2m nurses  
Lead Brexit advocate plans a Brexit (to America) of his own  
Brexit can be stopped if the British people want it, Tony Blair has said as he makes his return to British politics  
Report: Brexit leader Nigel Farage moving to the United States  
Hofer Says He May Back EU Referendum in Austria  
No wonder #quitlings are hiding today. Anyone heard from the #brexiteers lately? #brexit making us poorer. Look what you've done #leavers 
Tony Blair Launching Online Movement to 'Stop' Brexit and Fight ‘Popular’ Politics  
DeVos is part of "donor class" derided by Trump. She & husband "led campaign to pass anti-gay-marriage referendum."  
Furious Leave voters to boycott Virgin as Branson 'funds Brexit blocking group' He has lost at least 17.4M customers! 
Most imp. lesson of Autumn. Statement for gov is there must be Brexit plan. 'No running commentary' won't do when consequences so profound. 
Dominic Grieve is absolutely right about @OBR_UK forecasts - the cost of #Brexit to British livelihoods "simply can't be ignored."  
UK must borrow £59bn extra by 2020 due to Brexit. UK's EU membership=£8.5bn... taking back control doesn't add up  
Brexit STILL might not happen, says desperate BlairEvil, most hated man in UK, joined by now by Branson & Geldof!  
They promised us a net surplus from Brexit of £350m a week...and delivered £59bn in extra borrowing (OBR p19). It disgusts me 
Brilliant piece by @patmcfaddenmp on what the £58.7 billion Brexit bill could have bought. Quite a lot it turns out: 
"Everyone who voted Trump or Brexit is a Neo-Nazi murderer." My take on @DAaronovitch's tripe in today's Times 
Blair rules out return to frontline politics as media would go to "destroy mode" & says #Brexit can be stopped  
Brexit can be stopped, insists Tony Blair as he rules out return to frontline politics. 17.4m say it can’t. Bye Tony  
"20% of NHS workforce comes from overseas" @Dafydd_Wigley seeks assurance that EUcitizens will be guaranteed right to work in UK post-Brexit  
The Tory #Brexit con: £225m per week in extra borrowing & not a penny more for the NHS. #FMQs 
The Tory leavers must be held account for the £58bn Brexit bill, writes @patmcfaddenmp 
Spying on all their citizens, controlling what porn they consume, brimming isolation almost with Brexit, choking up public services. 
Also: if Brexit backlash is about people 'economically left behind', why are British youths the most pro-EU and olders voters most anti-EU? 
Tony Blair says that Brexit can be stopped if the British people decide that the pain outweighs the gain  
Unionist parties are in a shambles and #Brexit is an absolute mess causing a constitutional crises, so let's talk about Trains 
As a followup - this is a smart piece by @MilesSI on coding & planning the many Brexit scenarios into FM  
Football Manager, the first casualty of Brexit. Apart from truth, tolerance and rational thought 
MEPs’ vote to freeze accession means Turkey’s chance of joining EU is minuscule. Those backing Brexit through fears about Turkey were duped.  
(ltr I checked and the review is not fake, Football Manager 2017 really does have brexit) 
Bloody autocorrect keeps changing #Brexit to 'racist-driven damn-fool destructive waste of time and money' 
There's a new slogan for Brexit...  
'@Nigel_Farage "Both with Brexit and the Trump victory, 2016 is the year that marks the return of nation state democracies."  
I'm sick of hearing about Brexit. Sick of thinking about it, and having it affect my life. But it HAS effected my life. For 5 endless months 
Brexit leader Nigel Farage moving to the US: report  
IFS warns of biggest squeeze on pay for 70 years over Brexit  
Spoke #HouseofLords today in debate re Brexit effect on health and social care workforce. Retain and value all those who care for vulnerable 
Brexit needs to be stopped now before any further damage is done to the UK.  
"This year’s Autumn Statement...hinted at how painful Brexit is going to be" 
The turkeys-voting-for-Xmas nature of Brexit in two tweets: "Yay! We're making ourselves poorer and poorer!"  
What do we want?Brexit!Are we willing to pay £60bn for it?Ermmm... 
Furious Leave voters to boycott Virgin as Sir Richard Branson 'funds Brexit blocking group':  
And  Zac also doesn't want people in #RichmondPark to know that he's massively pro #Brexit too. So please don't RT this. No, really...  
Football Manager 2017 has been adjusted for our age- no purchasing of foreign players without UK work permit. #brexit  
TFW you voted Brexit but then get upset the consequences ruin your game of Football Manager  
Five months today since the Brexit referendum result.Lots of noise and forecasts; but in substance, little has actually changed. 
Sooner or later, @theresa_may and @PHammondMP will have to put Britain before #Brexit | @pollytoynbee  via @Guardian 
Popular simulation game Football Manager has a "Brexit" mode involving Article 50, work permits etc via @hansmollman  
'Remain Positive': Blair is absolutely right, Brexit isn't a fait accompli, it can and must be stopped.  
A more accurate description of what's going on - Ryanair boss warns of 'lunatic optimism' in UK on Brexit 
Holy shit, CNN are now claiming that Brexit was funded by the Russians and have just claimed, on air, that @Arron_banks is a Russian agent. 
As I had said in a much earlier tweet, Theresa May went to India & Bangladesh while we got Brexit fame Boris Johnson! An insult to Pakistan! 
After Brexit and Trump’s victory, Europeans are beginning to like the E.U. again  
Happy Thanksgiving. 2016 saw 3 "black swan" events (oil, Brexit, election surprise), but equities took it in stride--I am thankful for that! 
Where does JC Juncker get off treating Spanish Minister Luis de Guindos like this ?Drunk or Just Barmy ?#GOJuncker #Brexit #Spexit #leave 
"Northern Ireland is appallingly ill-prepared for Brexit." @DPhinnemore @lsebrexitvote  
The economic reality of Brexit. Scots knew it and voted to stay. I feel sorry for pro-Europe No voters in 2014-they should be furious.  
Brexit leader Nigel Farage moving to the US: report  
British workers face longest period of wage stagnation in at least 70 years, IFS says  
Guardian article attacks an emoji () -- specifically for its use as a symbol of gloating after Brexit and Trump's election@RitaPanahi 
London's property prices "may be falling faster than official reports suggest"  
Fucking Brexit man  
All MPs and zombie remain campaigners should see this graph: it shows referendum votes translated into MP seats.  
2016 was a terrible year for democracy decency & just simple kindness-if we don't fight back civilisation will wither in 2017 #trump #brexit 
Farage: Seismic shock coming if Brexit not delivered by corrupt political class.  
'Brexit is terrific' Rees-Mogg savages gloomy forecasts & beams happy days are here again  
'Brexit will cause HIGHER growth' OBR's gloomy report shredded to pieces on Daily Politics  
Who's benefitting from the pound's post-Brexit plunge? It's a "gift for U.K.-based global funds,” says fund manager  
Now THATS what we call a Brexit!  
Furious Leave voters to boycott Virgin as Branson 'funds Brexit blocking group':  
WE ARE IN TROUBLE - Here's the awkward truth behind Brexit MPs' claims:  via @HuffPostUK 
Blair: Brits can stop Brexit if they want to  
This Tory leadership has no answers for us. Nor do they have any vision to secure our future after Brexit.  
War criminal vows to use his money and influence to stop #Brexit.  
We're likely to be borrowing more per week by 2020 to pay for Brexit than we sent to the EU in 2015. #AutumnStatement 
A conversation with Murdoc of @gorillaz about booze, Brexit and 'Carry on Matron'  
#NigelFarage calls for ‘#TOTALREVOLUTION in #Britain following #Brexit & #DonaldTrump #victories #BREXIT #BREXITNOW 
Why Britain voted for #Brexit: a look back 200 years  
Tony Blair: It's not treason to say Brexit could be stopped  
Debt isn't increasing b/c of Brexit, but b/c govt spends too much money.@DouglasCarswell couldn't be more correct. 
Simple fact is  #tonyblair involvement in anti #brexit movement whether it's big or small is a political hand grenade with pin pulled out. 
If Theresa May was a corporate CEO she would have been fired over her Brexit negotiations  
Why the forecasts of the "cost of Brexit" are nonsense - me on #SkyPapers last night. 
From @nsoamesmp: IDS, old friend, knock it off. Let's listen to the Brexit options - not close our minds in advance.  
Stop Brexit: Tony Blair and Sir John Major urge the "solid centre" to speak out against "extremes".   
Sir John Major,  called yesterday for the 48% of people who voted against Brexit in June's referendum to have their views considered. 
Sena's Uddhav Thackeray suggests #Brexit-like vote on #notesban  
Sooner or later, May and Hammond will have to put Britain before Brexit | Polly Toynbee  
In last 24 hours, two of main arguments used by Leave camp to justify Brexit have exploded: Turkey and £350m/week. 
Odd how pro-EU Left/‘Liberals’, who had no objection as Debt rose x 3 fm £0.5trn 2005 → £1.6trn 2016, now object to *poss* +£59bn for Brexit 
Nice of Barclay brothers to throw a not at all elitist party at the Ritz for @Nigel_Farage - now pay tax to plug Brexit black hole u tossers 
@Arron_banks @Nigel_Farage @theritzlondon Bad Boys of Brexit before our Thank-you to Nigel party #nigelfarage 
Today I've sat down with local businesses alongside @paddyashdown and @TheDon_Foster to discuss the findings of our local Brexit survey  
Funny how some #Leave supporters like to pretend Farage and Bojo never promised £350m for the NHS  #Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
He played cricket the weekend after Brexit, so makes sense he'd be a fan  
The bill for leaving the EU has arrived—Blame Brexit for half the extra money the U.K. must borrow in years ahead pic.twitter.com/nUWspLbOuZ 
Brexit reality. Wages face biggest squeeze for 70 years. Real wages in 2021 below 2008 figure 
RETWEET if you think that Tony Blair should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum and not seek to delay or frustrate the result  
MPs better take note. Public opinion very much for remain. #brexit boosts EU survey results  via @BertelsmannSt 
Nail on headBrexit-bashers like Blair and Branson are the real enemies of the people  
OBR estimate borrowing will be £290 million A WEEK higher thanks to Brexit.Put THAT on a bloody bus 
Only Fckn Tories, the Scum Newspaper + the Daily Heil could tout 15years of austerity+£2Tr debt+Brexit as a Success  
Tony Blair is absolutely correct. Public need to know the Hard Truth about Hard Brexit. This is the serious bit  
As the #Autumn Statement unravels it's clear that despite Govts best efforts ppl will be worse off & #Brexit is a major reason why 
We boarded Britain's longest train journey to ask passengers where they stood on Brexit  
If Farage loves UK more than ... say me.... why is he leaving his post Brexit paradise while I remain? Answers on a postcard @Nigel_Farage 
As Tory Brexit chaos and austerity continue to hit the country what is the big priority for Labour's deputy leader, Tom Watson?....  
IFS chief Paul Johnson: "One cannot stress enough how dreadful this is. A decade without real earnings growth." 2008 crash + Brexit to blame 
Sooner or later, May and Hammond will have to put Britain before Brexit | Polly Toynbee  
Breaking NewsTheresa May has asked Brendan Rodgers to lead her Brexit negotiations as he's managed to get Sellick out of Europe in 2 months 
Nigel Farage warns of 'seismic shock' if Brexit not delivered. Totally agree with #farage 
After Trump victory, Italy referendum is seen as test of populism's rise  
Britain holds the aces in Brexit talks - @spectator cover story by James Forsyth: 
.@IanDunt absolutely right about the dangers of a hard #Brexit moving onto WTO tariffs. From @TheNewEuropean:  
If Theresa May was a CEO she would have been fired over Brexit  
Brexit 'can be stopped', says Tony Blair 
British global funds benefit from pound’s Brexit plunge   
There's a new slogan for Brexit...  
Hard #Brexit would cause recession in UK, chief economic adviser at Allianz Mohamed El-Erian tells @BBCHARDtalk 
The Tory #Brexit con: £225m per week in extra borrowing & not a penny more for the NHS. #FMQs 
Tory Debt is now totally out of control due to #brexit ... Yeah but we got our country back innit #r4today 
Brussels taxi driver: "If we had an EU referendum, everyone would vote to leave!". 
Read more about the true cost of #Brexit revealed in the #AutumnStatement here:  #FMQs 
Tony Blair insists Brexit CAN be stopped as he announces return to politics 
I didn't hold an EU referendum because I would probably have lost, admits Tony Blair  
Even Jo Cox' husband said his wifes killing had nothing to do with Brexit. Yet the BBC and Labour continue to link the two #bbcdp 
Labour / remainers DID use Jo Cox's murder to try win them the EU Referendum vote, stop trying to claim otherwise Yvette Cooper.  #bbcdp 
Our donors funded Brexit. Massively - country before party as usual  
Love or loathe him, at least #Blair is standing up and saying "#Brexit is a terrible idea" not capitulating like JC 
Blair says Brexit can be stopped - Politics live  
There's a new slogan for Brexit...  
OPPORTUNITY: We're searching for 20 paid ambassadors to represent Undivided from across the UK. Interested? Get in touch #Brexit #WeDemand 
Tony Blair: Brexit could be stopped if Britons change their minds  
After Trump victory, Italy referendum is seen as test of populism's rise  
.@OwenSmith_MP will vote to BLOCK Brexit. RT if you believe he should #RespectTheResult 
Forget Brexit and Trump, “post-truth” was spawned by the liberal left long ago  
‘My country should stay in #EU’, if there were a #referendum:77% Poland69% Germany69% Spain62% EU53% France51% Italy(@BStBrussels) 
Nigel Farage vows to fight for the people's Brexit 'revolution' on a gold leaf staircase in Mayfair  
If  Brexit is stolen from us - you will see Nationalism go thru the UK roof!  
Nice to see brexit is represented by such a broad range of people, from old white haired men, through to old white haired women. 
Oh the irony! The EU cranks up its propaganda arm to combat 'fake news' i.e. narratives they don't like  #'Brexit 
"The referendum gave legitimacy to prejudices that are suppressed in normal times". Important column in @thetimes  
'Some remainers....don't seem to understand the meaning of the word democracy.' Gordon Henderson MP #Brexit  
"Anti establishment" #Farage drinking champagne at Ritz with Newspaper & Hedge fund owners while cost of #brexit being spelt out to nation 
Enough. Stop selling desperate people independence or Brexit as simplistic solutions to the complex challenges we face. It harms us all. 
Hard #Brexit would cause recession in UK, chief economic adviser at Allianz Mohamed El-Erian tells @BBCHARDtalk 
Majority of Scots would prefer to be outside EU and maintain border-free trade with rest of UK. #Brexit  
Cameron's weak leadership got us into this Brexit mess and Hammond's weak leadership will leave us in it  
A Nazi assassination; Brexit; a huge spike in racist attacks; Govt moves right...The Guardian: The far right is fractured and dispirited. 
The Brexit Bus has been fixed! #Euref #bremain #brexit 
Oh. Is that Morgan Stanley who said if we vote #Brexit they would move 5,000 staff from London then in July 2016 recruited 1,000 ADDITIONAL?  
Q: Will agriculture & fisheries be fully devolved to Scotland following Brexit: Yes or No?A: Ah. Um. Err......  
Fact 2:The deficit is forecast to rise by £122bn by 2020/21.Of this,less than half is due to Brexit.The rest from 6years of failed austerity 
After Brexit and Trump's victory, Europeans are beginning to like the European Union again  
Good people voted leave I've no doubt, we have to be able to try and help people's prospects through Brexit without being called traitors 
.@Nigel_Farage warns of "seismic shock" if #Brexit not delivered  
Watch out as those of us who care what happens to UK start to work through Brexit economic problems.Others will use hate to cover their lies 
The evidence is in. #Brexit must be stopped: not soon, but now; not with half measures, but completely. When a mistake is made, right it. 
Tony Blair: I will help the millions left politically homeless after Brexit  
AHAHAHAAA Absolutey tanks our country with Brexit lies and then runs off to be an immigrant *weeps*  
If #Brexit wil indeed lead to a recession, also immigration will decrease. After all, the best way to curb migration is to wreck the economy 
Tony Blair on Trump, halting Brexit and his new political mission - interview now online  
#Brexit means soaring poverty, in particular for those who voted for itNot for the billionaire elites who sold you the lie#brexitshambles 
#Farage's big bash at the #Ritz should give #Brexit voters a strong sense of what they voted for - to make some very rich people very happy. 
There's a new slogan for Brexit...  
Meeting with Prime Minister @JosephMuscat_JM & @edward_scicluna about future of the EMU, tax issues, Brexit #eurogroup #EU2017MT 
Britain’s EU expats mount campaign for Brexit rights.  @EurActiv @The3Million @NewEuropeans 
Hammond is *smiling* b/cos he's managed to cover up 6yrs of bungling economic incompetence by Osborne & Co by blaming it on BREXIT#BBCNews 
Farage plays the ambassador at Brexit party  
The way things are going, people, only a military coup can save Britain. The left are out of control and won't listen to reason. #Brexit 
Following yesterday's court events, UKIP are still happy to spread the message that critics of the Brexit process "hate our country".  
"Clean Brexit" is realising that you're too stupid to work a parachute and jumping without one, pleased you'll get to the ground faster 
Michael Russell’s Brexit blunder shows the need for accuracy, writes @TomPeterkin  
Love this from @Alison_McGovern:             Cost of Brexit £188m a week "Put that on your bus, Boris"  
'Brexit is terrific' Rees-Mogg savages gloomy forecasts & beams happy days are here again  
Murdering Cohen's Hallelujah. Fuckin scum. This is Brexit. pic.twitter.com/0bVbZ5rbMh 
German car chief warns that a long period of uncertainty will block future investments in Britain #Remain #Brexit 
The architects of Brexit all merrily fucking off and leaving it to someone else - only need Boris to go and live on Moonbase Alpha now. 
I still hear people say , we need to be part of the #EU to reform it ?you cant reform something that doesnt want reforming#Brexit #No2EU 
Introducing the #Brexit Credit Card  
Pitiful turn-out to pro-#brexit demo outside Parliament: 100, 2 of them Rees-Mogg and Davis.The People Have Spoken? 
Nigel Farage - a narcissistic lying abusive scumbag & cynical inciter of violence.#Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
On my @Talkradio show: is everything Brexit's fault? Gay serial killer, Black Friday risks, Jo Cox killer, belief in Santa, cooking for kids 
Me for @TheTimes: May has no #Brexit plan and Autumn Statement suggests she has no plan to build one nation either  
Yup over 10 yrs on infrastructure invstmt,R&D & SME spprt. Your boy George borrowed £750bn for  prdctvty, wages, inflation &amp; Brexit chaos  
Mussolini - the role model for Trump and Farage's rhetoric. #Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
Can't believe that, after 2008 financial crisis, which we never emerged from, people would vote for another, potentially bigger one. #Brexit 
After Brexit and Trump: don't demonise; localise! - The Ecologist  
"The OBR has done its work very seriously and responsibly, but on fundamentally mistaken assumptions." - Jacob Rees Mogg MP #Brexit  
@johnreesevans your speech at the Brexit demonstration was  are a born leader 
Predictable that Tories use their economic failure & Brexit as excuse to lie 'We can't afford your public services'  
How Brussels thinks an Article 50 Brexit deal might work - my latest for @thetimes 
Career politician Nigel #Farage celebrates at The Ritz on the day the UK discovers true cost of #Brexit & sees #JoCox's murder sentenced. 
Actually revolted by the idea of millionaires/ toads partying at the Ritz on the day the cost of Brexit was revealed  
WATCH: "The UK people voted overwhelmingly to leave. This Parliament here is holding it up all they can". #Brexit #Article50 ¦ @RTUKNews 
Nigel Farage is told he shouldn't "hold his breath" for a U.S. role  
Nigel Farage warns of 'seismic shock' if Brexit not delivered  
NEWS! Brexit now to be known as ‘Bruckup’  
This is an absolute must read if you're interested in what happens next on Brexit  
Nigel Farage gloats at Ritz party hours after news Brexit will cost £60 billion. And now he's planning to emigrate  
Presumably if Nigel Farage is fleeing Brexit Britain and emigrating to the US he will be flying there on airplane powered only by irony.  
Average real earnings forecast to be £830 a year lower in 2020, compared to the March 2016 outlook #Brexit #Remain 
Step 1 delay article 50 for 9 months. Step 2 Fake 'negotiations' for 2 yearsStep 3 bogus BREXIT in 2019Anyone still not getting it ?  
Happy Thanksgiving to all the Americans out there.  In Britain we're giving thanks that you took attention away from us voting for Brexit 
Many countries have had their economies ruined by weak governments pandering to unrealistic popular demands.So it is with #Brexit#Remain 
Spot on from my @UKLabour colleague @Alison_McGovern. We must fight this economic Brexit madness.  
Some didn't vote #Brexit to avoid WW3 or Migrant Camps in Dover. Stop peddling fear Soubry, its beneath you.   
The Government's mismanagement of the economy over the last six wasted years has left us unprepared for the challenges of Brexit.  
£360m to renovate Buckingham Palace£100bn on Trident£200bn lost on Brexit 11% pay rise for MPsBut no money to help the 40,000 homeless. 
What a terrifyingly forlorn question. The big red bus of lies. #brexit @maryellenfield @Colvinius 
. @JohnReesEvans speaking yesterday at the Brexit rally in Parliament Square (and quoting Cromwell! :))  
The dire forecasts of the OBR are dismissed by some as too pessimistic. I think the opposite, given they assume a soft & bump-free Brexit. 
Brexit won't be experienced as a Greece-esque crash but as a long, slow, Italy-esque decline. A gradual wearing-down of the national fabric. 
Conservative Brexit MPs appear to be objecting to independent financial forecasting being based on facts instead of patriotic hope. #brexit 
No.  But the EU used European Taxpayers' money for their anti-Brexit campaign.  
How Brussels thinks Brexit should work. @Simon_Nixon on how the EU is shifting into problem-solving mode: 
"Extreme nationalism of the kind that inspired Jo Cox’s murderer was given an outlet during the referendum campaign"  
We need more of our MPs to speak out. Brexit is unachievable without the total ruination of uk economy. #stopbrexit 
Brexit vote: "Tick this box and things will be better." Five months later:  "Thanks! By the way, that tick cost you £60 billion." 
Brexit means....billions more debt.  
Nigel Farage likes Brexit so much that he's leaving the country before it happens.  
Meanwhile Brexit Fantasy Island floats further out to sea....  
The economic plan for Brexit:-Magic money treesTooth fairyUnicornsNarniaFather ChristmasBrexit means Brexit 
BREXIT PROTEST: Fury as government ignore the will of the people; all 12 of them.  
#radio4today The "uncertainty around #Brexit" is manageable & curable. Dump it. Uncertainty gone.#Hammond@BBCr4today 
The bill for leaving the EU has arrived - plus the rest of the Brexit headlines  
The cost of #Brexit is £122bn over next 5 years. So where's the mythical £350m per week for the NHS coming from?  
Here's the real challenge @PHammondMP is facing - and it's not just Brexit  My Economics Blog #AutumnStatement 
Chancellor Philip Hammond says the Government does not know "what the discussion will look like" when Brexit negotiations begin next year 
"Brexit MPs call gloomy economic predictions wrong" - this from the people who predicted an extra £350 million per week on the side of a bus 
Brexit predicted to cost UK millions each week, those who pushed it still blaming "establishment" they're part of for their failings. Do one  
Hammond warned against Brexit and no one listened. Now it's payback  
Why Westminster is looking to blame Brexit for the looming debt crisis - and the graph that proves they're wrong   
Nigel Farage hands out Ferrero Rocher chocolates at Ritz party to celebrate Brexit victory  
>Only the Tories, the Scum Newspaper + the Daily Heil could tout 15years of austerity+£2Tr debt+Brexit as a Success  
The OBR points to huge economic problems attached to Brexit - yet Brexit MPs are in denial and without any plan. Still ignoring the experts. 
Citi on #Italy: After Brexit, EU might increasingly struggle to survive w/ a key chaotic partner & debtor w/ a banking industry under stress  
• #Brexit cost: £122 billion• #NHS shortfall: £22 billionAlternative plan:• Cancel Brexit• Fix NHS• £100 billion on housing 
The UK has given its first official economic update since the Brexit vote. Here are 5 points in the #AutumnStatement  
The experts strike back: Martin Wolf on Brexit, economic forecasts and a poorer Britain  via @FT 
Curious the way no one is asking what return we will get on our £58.7 billion investment in Brexit. 
Brexit is not going to help the people who voted for it, World Bank warns  
The Brexit bill is in: £58.7bn  
Conservative Brexit MPs appear to be objecting to independent financial forecasting being based on facts instead of patriotic hope. 
Brussels is starting to think pragmatically about how Brexit might work. My latest.  
Chancellor warns of 'eye-watering' Brexit debt. Yeah but we got our country back Innit #brexit Idiots #r4today 
Hammond warned against Brexit and no one listened. Now it's payback  
Brexit will blow £59bn hole in public finances, admits Hammond  
Whilst we're all talking about huge sums of money let's remind ourselves what our EU membership has cost us!#Brexit #AutumnStatement 
This is the reply @acgrayling got when he wrote to parliament about #Brexit >>  
Brexit will cost the country £59bn (just until 2020). That's £3390 each #VoteLeave supporter owes us.  #r4today 
Cal me petty, but on Thanksgiving I'm thankful Megyn's book failed . It was a referendum of her hatred for Trump, & as such , IT's TRASH 
Gosh five months. Hasn't the time flown by? Need to get on with Brexit now. Every day is costing us more money. 
Brexiter refusing to believe Government finances now £122bn worse off until it’s written on a bus  #Brexit #Ukip 
When will wealthy pro-Brexit MPs stop dismissing the experts and be honest? Brexit will have a massive cost and the poor will pay for it! 
OBR, Treasury, Carney united in forecasting Brexit-created economic sinkhole ahead.  Brexiteers fantasise with manic self-serving optimism. 
OBR: "What does Brexit mean?"Govn't: "We don't know yet"Brexiters: "The OBR are a bunch of soothsayers trying to guess what Brexit means!" 
This comment from a reader of the FT has gone viral because it nails the Brexit row and it is massively worth a read 
Consett in 1974 by Don McCullin. Six years later the steelworks closed. The seeds of Brexit Britain were sowed decades ago.  
Capital is fleeing Italy ahead of Renzi's referendum on 4 Dec. Target 2 deficit now bigger than during 2011-2 panic  
Why markets are right to worry about #Italy's referendum.  
@richardbranson listen to the voters. Respect their decision & help make Britain great again. #Brexit #MAGA 
As we move into an era of repression (Trump/Brexit/etc), we need to stay on our toes about this kind of thing. Don't think it won't happen. 
Only that not all apps are downloaded. Heard of referendum dimwit ? Its sought directly from people, not thru studio editions.  
"We send the EU £350m a week""Brexit vote will cost UK £225m a week"Well, to my mind that makes us £125m a week better off, AND out of EU. 
‘Brexit means Brexit!’ Rally outside British parliament demands swift exit from EU (PHOTOS, VIDEO)  
Brexit aftermath: past 5 months uncertainty & bluster prove either electorate were hoodwinked or policians ignorant of implications, or both 
Farage calls for ‘TOTAL REVOLUTION’ in Britain following Brexit and Donald Trump victories  #Brexit 
Very few knew definitively what they were voting for in the EU Referendum; it must be one of the greatest political con tricks ever.  
A great article on how the US Democrat party became neoliberal in the 1970s which lead to Blairism, Brexit, Trump  
#Brexit fallout to cost UK extra 122 billion pounds over 5 years  
History will show that #Brexit has accelerated the rebalancing of UK economy. Inflated sterling was choking exports & manufacturing. 
I can't decide what I'm more excited to shill for in 2017:California seceding from the US or France Brexit 3.0  
"The truth can be subversive, can’t it?" Ken Loach on Trump, Brexit and more:  
Brexit and Whitehall: the need for a new minister-civil servant relationship?  
'THANK YOU' Nigel Farage salutes the Express for being the FIRST newspaper to back Brexit  
#brexit is collapsing #england are u saying #trump will be the downfall of #America?  Huh? 
Demonetisation: 90% back move in PM Modi’s app survey || Unrelated aside, Musharraf had 98% vote in 2002 referendum  
A right-wing extremist is convicted of murdering Jo Cox, a Labour Party lawmaker, one week before the Brexit vote:  
Brexit and Trump win bearish thesis sounded intelligent. Couldn't think of better example of why all that matters is price, ignore NOISE! 
LISTEN: Brexit Could Cost UK $150bn  
First BrexitThen TrumpNext AustriaThen ItalyThen France, Germany, NetherlandsThe globalist prog is finished worldwide 
Theresa May has asked Mauricio Pochettino to lead her Brexit negotiations as he has managed to get Spurs out of Europe in just two months...  
BREXIT SUCCESS: Migration will be 80,000 a year LOWER after UK quits the EU, claims OBR  
RT  ##TheresaMay @theresa_may  waiting. #WarCriminalTonyBlair #BOYCOTTRichardBranson @richardbranson #JimMurphy #BoycottVirgin kill #BREXIT  
And yet the fools who voted for Brexit still rejoice - self inflicted pain for the Britain  
If MPs won't follow Mrs May's example in not voting with her Remain majority constituency, a 2nd referendum is needed: the facts are in. 
Beautifully written and brilliantly argued Brexit-bashers like Blair and Branson are the real enemies of the people  
Bonkers! Generation of childrens future wasted opportunity gambled away by Political Greed! #brexit #bregrets #remo 
Nigel Farage celebrates Brexit and Trump victory at millionaire's party hours after bleak Autumn Statement  
Brexit will blow £59bn hole in public finances, admits Hammond  
#RichardBranson backed the #EU & now he is doing is upmost to frustrate #BrexitRe-tweet if you will boycott all #Virgin companies 
The results of the referendum on the #Community Right to Build Order for Atmos #Totnes  
The media didn't just buy it, they drove it. Both austerity and Brexit  
More austerity,bigger debt, BREXIT to cost rather than save, productivity falls,growth prediction halved, NHS in crisis yes it's a #ToryGovt 
"Brexit is built on a fearsome alliance of arrogance, ignorance and nostalgia."  
Man who killed British lawmaker before the Brexit vote in June was convicted of murder.  
"What do we want?""Brexit!""What will it cost?""£58 billion!""..err, hang on.." 
The current establishment line seems to be they didn't want Brexit so they are looking for ways to make it fail to prove their point 
“Brexit won’t deliver those things. How are the public going to feel when they discover that?” says senior Tory MP 
MPs - stop this train wreck of #Brexit. Do it. You have the right & the means. Parliament is sovereign. 
The bad news is #ProjectFear was right.The good news is we can use #Brexit to hide our economic incompetence of the past six years.  
Are our MPs taking note? The unnecessary punitive cost of #Brexit, the fact it has no (& never had) majority support, the loss of so much - 
That awkward moment when a Chocolate £1 is stronger than the real £1 #Brexit  
The "Trump betrayed us" meme is a Soros creation. Saw exact same thing after Brexit. Obvious effort to drive a wedge. Don't fall for it. 
.@Nigel_Farage plays the ambassador, handing out the Ferrero Rochers at a #Brexit reception at the Ritz pic.twitter.com/K7XKj1PnbB 
Amused by the inspirational, stiff upper lip, "we shall overcome" voxpops; as if Brexit isn't both self-inflicted and avoidable. #newsnight 
Funny that's the gist of what Tories once said to kids like me in 1931 when to survive we ate out of restaurant rubbish bins. #Trump #brexit  
Why doesn't Polly Toynbee fuck off back to her Tuscan villa and leave the UK to get on with Brexit? #newsnight 
Another pointless Polly Toynbee soundbite on #Brexit "People didn't vote to become poorer"... but they do, EVERY general election #newsnight 
Farage calls for ‘TOTAL REVOLUTION’ in Britain following Brexit and Donald Trump victories  
Did you vote for a referendum? 8 days until #ERRE report - Dec 1 #cdnpoli #voterequality 
.@IanDunt“Reality is a barrier to the successful implementation of Brexit and must therefore be ignored”Too true 
Chocolates celebrate #Brexit  with @Nigel_Farage  @realDonaldTrump @Arron_banks @MailOnline  
Theresa May has asked Mauricio Pochettino to lead her Brexit negotiations as he has managed to get Spurs out of Europe in just two months.  
This is your 'strong Tory opposition' to the SNP on day we learnt Tory #Brexit will deteriorate finances by £220bn  
Black holes in the budget and a rallying cry for far right extremism... #brexit is wrong, time to stop it before it gets worse 
In fact, If Julien Baptiste dies before figuring this l out - I'll take it more badly than Brexit.  #TheMissing 
.@Nigel_Farage declares Brexit victory as "unfinished business" against the "career, professional, political class".  
@evertonfc2 "We want to get off this #Brexit train," yelled commuters as joint HS2/Toblerone venture results in several missing carriages.  
Don’t be fobbed off with anything less than Remain. Brexit on 37% of the electorate wasn’t for the having in the first place.  
Rebecca Long-Bailey the govt has mismanaged the finances - and its not down to #Brexit.  #newsnight 
I don't often agree with you but the level of incompetence is staggering . The country is in effect bankrupt ( Brexit or otherwise )  
Pro-Brexit newspapers desperately trying to spin the grim economic impact of the referendum.  
David Gauke, Chief Secretary to the Treasury confirms that the UK economy would have reached a surplus were it not for Brexit #Newsnight 
Now Brexiteers attack OBR. They can't win argument for hard, destructive  Brexit based on truth so have to try and win based on fantasy. 
We finally know the true cost of Brexit, and it's astounding  
Remoaners whinging when OBR says Gov to borrow extra £59billion over 5 years due to #BrexitGov bailout of banks cost taxpayer £850billion 
Thursday's i front page:"The Brexit black hole" #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers #AutumnStatement (via @suttonnick 
My column: Brexit Britain needed a radical vision, but timid Hammond played it safe  via @telebusiness 
A multi £billion black hole inflicted by morons, bigots, chauvinists and liars. #Brexit  
"..older generation who voted overwhelmingly for #Brexit-means they'll lose  triple-lock on their pension"@davidschneider#AutumnStatement 
Papers mostly trying to find lines in Budget to fit their Brexit prejudices tomorrow. All should actually have led on the Jo Cox verdict. 
-£58.7 billion for Brexit (£58,700,000,000)Stick that on yer bus and smoke it, @BorisJohnson. And don't forget to mention the #NHS. 
£58.7bn worse off because of Brexit, voted for by 52%. If another referendum tmrw, what do you reckon % result would be? 
Thursday's Times front page:"Hammond builds for Brexit"#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers #AutumnStatement 
Cameron's weak political leadership got us the Brexit mess &Hammond's weak economic leadership will leave us in it  
This was Nigel Farage celebrating at The Ritz tonight as the £60bn cost of Brexit was revealed  
Manfred Weber said Boris Johnson displayed "unbelievable arrogance" with regard to Brexit. What an embarrasment to the UK this fool is. 
Nigel Farage rehearses for job as US ambassador party to celebrate Brexit win  
An anxious summary from @Peston of the financial situation facing Britain post-Brexit:  
Nigel Farage celebrates at Ritz party with millionaire chums as Brexit set to batter UK  
Well done Vote Leave & all your lies, thanks! #Brexit This will be the most costly mistake the UK has ever made!  
I feel that Britain never learns its lessons until it is too late b/c I think despite the arguments against it we're going for a hard brexit 
Theresa May has asked Brendan Rodgers to lead her Brexit negotiations as he has managed to get Celtic out of Europe in just two months! 
Key reason OBR cut growth forecast not to do with Brexit. They scrapped housing model as was rubbish and gave mortgage debt £212bn too high  
Brexit Means Brexit - thanks for speaking at today's rally in Lindon @JohnReesEvans 
Brexit won't be experienced as a Greece-esque crash but as a long, slow, Italy-esque decline. A gradual wearing-down of the national fabric.  
The small print: 13,000 fewer affordable houses, payments to the EU could actually go up after Brexit..  
Thursday's Independent digital:Tories borrow £122bn to fill Brexit black hole (and it could get worse)#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Punchy blog warning on debt & Brexit by @Peston 
The blue bits = the cost of Brexit. How can any Govt carry on with such a gigantic waste of OUR money?  
YouGov poll reveals 68% now support #Brexit."Let's go"  
Brexit is economic madness. Tens of billions added to the deficit. Austerity extended & Article 50 negotiations have NOT EVEN STARTED YET 
It can be pleasing in politics to be proved right. Today, in light of the economic cost of #Brexit, there is no pleasure in being correct 
How Brussels thinks Brexit should work  
1. Poor people vote Brexit for extra NHS cash2. Billions added to deficit; everyone poorer3. Billionaires & elites celebrate at the Ritz 
Every Brexit Supporter Needs To Boycott this traitor and his empire. This will teach him. RT if you agree  
What very obvious remedy might come to Parliament's mind as it ponders the economic #Brexit mess before them? Yes, I agree.....#Remain 
truly amazed that another utterly useless tory chnclr says he can do nothing to boost growth or real wages & help folks who voted for brexit  
Richard, the result of the EU referendum was no protest vote. It was a democratic people reclaiming full democratic control of their country  
Brexit likely to cost UK government nearly £60 billion over next five years  via @POLITICOEurope 
I would RT but they're too thick to understand how destructive their Brexit vote was. So sad.  
Dominic Raab MP warns that a vote on Article 50 could allow die-hard remainers to delay and frustrate Brexit #RespectTheResult 
Branson will listen when we stop buying his products and services. Meanwhile, he's set to fund a campaign to reverse the referendum decision 
Britain gets a £60billion bill for Brexit. Farage celebrates with a party at The Ritz  
#Italia #Österreich! We The People of the World support your fight for freedom: #IoVotoNo #FPÖ.The tide is turning. Keep fighting.#Brexit  
Neo-Nazi Found Guilty of Murdering Anti-Brexit British Lawmaker Jo Cox via @politicususa 
We are witnessing the economic suicide of Britain. When will MPs tell the truth, #Brexit is not in our interests and we need to think again? 
So will Leavers who said Brexit wouldn't have an economic cost now apologise for misleading voters? My @CapX column 
Guardian piece - Irish trade unions call for referendum on abortion rights #repealthe8th #black4repeal 
For 5 years we heard the #Tories saying 'it was all #Labour's fault'Now it's all the fault of #BrexitNever mind who called the #EURef? 
The "Trump betrayed us" meme is a Soros creation. Saw exact same thing after Brexit. Don't fall for it!  Source: Paul Joseph Watson #Trump 
....because of Brexit. I don't know anyone who voted to be poorer. Why we are pursing something that will make us all worse off? 
A good turn out for pro brexit protest at Westminster today not as many as hoped but then most of us are busy at work making UK great again 
Post-election media narratives are an exact copy of Brexit, including notion that Trump has no clue what he's doing. Fake news.  
Brexidiots demonstrate desperate to get Article 50 activated bc economic consequences are becoming obvious #Brexit  
"Theresa May, don't delay. We want Brexit right away!" #Article50Now #Brexit  
Tories=austerity for 5 yearsBrexit=austerity for 15 yearsWell done brexiters, at least you've 'got your (poor) country back'. 
#brexit is a peasants revolt led by feudal lords intent on imposing harsher terms of serfdom 
My speech today at the London Brexit Protest #ThePeopleHaveSpoken 
£122bn to fund #Brexit. Could have been spent on our crumbling public services after 6 wasted years of Tory (& Lib Dem) austerity 
So the Autumn Statement 2016 has revealed that Brexit is the new budget deficit. #stopthismadness @campbellclaret @DavidLammy @ThatTimWalker 
Autumn Statement reveals Brexit 'will actually cost £226million a week'  
£1.95 trillion of UK debt forecast.£226 million per week of additional borrowing due to Brexit.Austerity scheduled for 15 years. 
Today' #AutumnStatement must be proof enough to all including politicians that Britain will not survive a hard #brexit and we must oppose it 
"Half the extra £122Bn of debt comes from Brexit other half is from 6 years of Tory Austerity" Clive Lewis #c4news 
Gross contribution is now put at £377m a week and even net contribution will be c.£250m a week by 2018 but falls to nil in 2019 thx2 Brexit  
Brexit to raise government borrowing by £226m/week @InFactsOrg  
So what has #Brexit cost the UK economy? 122 billion pounds!! That would fix the current NHS deficit for >50 years. #AutumnStatememt 
Let's just RT this some more... Philip Hammond admits Brexit vote means £122bn extra borrowing  
Make Britain Great again !! Brexit Brexiters this is your med but is going to affect everyone £2 trillion of debt by 2020 #AutumnStatement 
It's also worth bearing in mind that Hammond's gloom doesn't even include what happens after Brexit. Only the effect of the vote. 
I apologise. Last week on @bbcquestiontime I said the Brexit black hole would be £100bn. I was wrong. Hammond announced today it's  £122bn. 
On the day Jo Cox's murderer was sentenced, about 60 Brexit fanatics held a patchetic rally at which this woman saw fit to carry this sign.  
We were promised by Leave Liars that we would get £350mn a week to spend on NHS. Now Gov has to borrow £226mn a week to pay for Brexit 
My favourite number in #AutumnStatement is the OBR's estimated cost of Brexit in 2020 is £292m a week. Thanks #brexit 
$500,000 donation to NOM.$200,000 donation to Michigan's anti-gay marriage referendum.But Trump loves the gays.  
If leave voters are so determined to have Brexit at any cost, they should be happy to pay a leave voters only Brexit tax. #AutumnStatement 
Apparently whether it's Brexit or the #AutumnStatement the Tories don't have a plan. 
A reclusive neo-Nazi has been found guilty of murdering Labour MP Jo Cox a week before the Brexit referendum  
Cameron's weak political leadership got us into this Brexit mess. Hammond's economic leadership will leave us in it  
Voters were told in good faith that the Government would implement the result of the EU Referendum. Politicians need to #RespecTheResult 
The Autumn Statement is a devastating verdict on the cost of Brexit - £58.7bn so far. The Brexiteers' attempts to deny it are astonishing. 
Great Brexit rally in London today which Get Britain Out attended. Article 50 must be triggered right away  
The wages of Brexit are bigger debts  
Nice one Brexit. That's one whole generation done for.  
Remember that ridiculous fantasy bus? The true, devastating cost of Brexit is laid bare in today's #AutumnStatement 
'Inevitable' Britain will quit EU's Single Market and customs union after Brexit, MPs told  
Let's make it real.What if you get #Brexit but no state pension? Is that an OK price?Or no NHS, what about that?What *is* your price? 
1st the referendum adThen Fair CityThen the Tesco adThen presenting Children In NeedAnd now in the RTÉ guide#RoccosBack@Merriganmania 
I think the generation that pushed Brexit through should help pay for it. No more over 60's bus pass.I think that's quite fair. 
Weak pol leadership got us into #Brexit mess #Hammond's weak econ leadership will leave us in it.#autumnstatement 
The #AutumnStatement revealed cost of Brexit by 2019/20 will be £220b.That's the equivalent of 17 years of EU contributions.Cheers Boris!  
The recklessness with which we have gambled away our future is beyond belief. The eye-watering cost of #Brexit is fearful. #AutumnStatement 
British expats likely to be granted right to stay living in EU after Brexit  
It has been confirmed that Brexit is going to damage our economy to the tune of £120billion by 2020. Can we just scrap the idea now yeah? 
Trying to explain to #Brexiters why and how  Brexit is a disaster for UK is like trying to  explain to your cat how the DVD player works 
"Every month the Government delays Brexit costs the exchequer over a billion pounds. UKIP says just get on with it". 
The Tories just hinted they will finally cut pensioner benefits  So much for Brexit protecting our pensions.  
£58 billion more to be borrowed by U.K because of brexit...but but but...I thought the point is we'd be better off? 
Could old people voting for Brexit and smashing public finances finally kill the pensions Triple Lock? What would Alanis Morrissette say? 
My hubby at the Brexit rally. "What do we want?""Brexit!""When do we want it?""NOW!"  
The Brexit bill is in: £58.7bn  
'We want BREXIT NOW!' Protesters swarm Parliament over Article 50 High Court ruling. John Rees Evans gives great speechhttp://shr.gs/cOI6bZB 
In the light of all this toblerone brexit business LOOK HOW MASSIVE FUDGES ARE IN A BOX OF HEROES NOW PHWOAR  
Theresa May has asked Mauricio Pochettino to lead her Brexit negotiations as he has managed to get Spurs out of Europe in just two months.  
"What do we want? Brexit! When do we want it? Now!"Highlights from the #BrexitFeet protest outside Parliament this lunchtime. 
The #AutumnStatement is a clear indication that whatever way the Brexit goes, hard or soft-the ordinary worker will be penniless. 
You can see it whether its on housing, NHS, Brexit and so on. #TheToriesAreTheCrisis 
"Autumn Statement reveals Brexit 'will actually cost £226million a week'" 
Completely anti-Brexit biased panel again from the #BBCQT team Here's a list of payment the BBC have received from the EU 
This is not my flag. #EU is not my country.And it will NEVER be.Follow #BREXIT: #Nexit #Italexit #Frexit #IoVotoNo #Huxit #Auxit #Grexit 
So why is the govt still pursuing it? All MPs have a responsibility to do what is best for the country. Abandon brexit now.  
"Brexit has cost Britain on every measure worth looking at." The econ editor of @thetimes re autumn statement -  (£) 
Only the Tories could tout 15 years of austerity and record levels of national debt as success.#AutumnStatement #brexit #ToryBritain 
During Referendum George Osborne warned that leaving EU = 500,000 job losses. Today's OBR says employment will rise by 500,000 by 2021. 
Decent appointment #Brexit  
How should Britain avert the Brexit crisis. My suggestion 9 Nov. Read:  
Although Hammond didn’t mention Brexit today, official figures show it's hitting the economy hard  
Shadow chancellor @johnmcdonnellMP says #AutumnStatement proves Britain is facing Brexit "unprepared & ill-equipped"  
I hate to bang on about this whole '#Brexit is really bad for the economy' thing, but, you know, given that it is, how about we don't do it? 
All the people I know who voted for Brexit have now changed their minds. Given this, why is @labour not campaigning for us to remain? 
At pro-#Brexit protest outside Parliament to call for no more delays. Parliament & the Courts need to get on with it  
What drove Mair, neo-Nazi murderer of #JoCox, to strike days before EU referendum? A must-read from FT's @tomburgis  
What could £58bn pay for? It is now the forecast for the Brexit Bill - and that is before Leave Ministers pay for their promises.  
The cost of the threat of #Brexit is £58 billion but we have no idea what the cost will be after Brexit. This is madness - it must stop. 
GAH! I KNEW my moaning about #brexit would have a bad effect and NOW look what’s happened. Sorry guys! :(  
Of course it’s much better to be poorer than have so many foreigners around. I mean, it must be. That’s the point of #Brexit. 
"[The autumn statement] is a solid base on which to build and crystalise the huge benefits Brexit brings to our country." 
Those in Westminster may be fighting, but British voters have moved on & want to see the Government make a success of Brexit.  
OBR seems to have rejected idea of Brexit meaning permanently lower growth. By 2019, it expects all back to normal.  
It's official: Brexit will make Britain poorer because we'll have fewer migrants paying taxes 
How long would it take to flush £122bn worth of £20 notes down a toilet? That's #Brexit#Remain #YesEU 
After autumn statement and the fucking disaster that #Brexit is, the next time Scotland has an indyref you know which box to tick don't you? 
Ian Hodge suggests that, post Brexit, we need a British ecosystems services policy and not an agricultural policy.  
#Brexit protest today  
Brexit likely to cost UK government nearly £60 billion over next five years  via @POLITICOEurope 
The "Trump betrayed us" meme is a Soros creation. Saw exact same thing after Brexit. Obvious effort to drive a wedge. Don't fall for it. 
OBR GDP 2015-2021: 2.2, 2.1, 1.4, 1.7, 2.1, 2.1, 2.0. If that's all Brexit does to the economy I reckon most voters'll think "Is that *it*?" 
.@DerekMackaySNP on #AutumnStatement: the real cost of Brexit is revealed - lower growth & tax revenues, higher borrowing, debt & inflation  
HMTreasury forecast loss 500,000 jobs post Brexit vote .Office of Budget Responsibility now  predicting creation of 500,000 jobs! 
#BorisJohnson bef/ #Brexit: 'Turkey, no thanks'. Now: 'Turkey in the EU'. Unbelievable! Those who leave the EU can't decide over its future.  
We will owe £2tn because we spend too much, not because of Brexit. Until spending is reduced, debt & crippling interest will simply compound 
If someone had had the good sense to put #Brexit will probably make most people poorer on the side of a bus, think where we could all be now 
car crash interview on Brexit with rising Labour star Rebecca Long-Bailey with @afneil on @dailypolitics01 
and try to get an amendment in the Article 50 bill providing economic benchmarks for a second referendum. They don't, so they will not. 
Growth down, £220bn hole in budget. Time for #RichmondPark to send a shockwave to this Brexit government and force a change in direction  
Official: fewer migrants under Brexit will hit UK in the pocket to tune of £16bn.  
Cameron's weak political leadership got us into this Brexit mess; May's weak economic leadership will keep us in it  
Brexit has cost us £1,000 per head already. And it hasn't even happened yet.  
State Pensions are to disappear Whilst Gold PLATED MPs Pensions are a meal ticket for life And you keep voting for them 
Brexit Britain: Less investment, weaker consumer demand, greater uncertainty and higher inflation  
Lower tax revenues, lower growth, higher inflation & borrowing: @DerekMackaySNP on the Chancellor's #Brexit bombshell #AutumnStatement. 
EU’s Chief Brexit Negotiator Expresses Fear of Breitbart Europe in EU Parliament  
#Brexiters,Ban #Branson is fine.What about SUPPORT #Dyson?No tax dodge, Brit & #Brexit advocate.A Patriot!RT! 
Autumn Statement: The cost of Brexit? £12,643.68 per vote  
"Brexit means Brexit... and we're going to make a success of it" by borrowing >£400m per week. Thanks, baby boomers. 
Debt up. Deficit up. Growth down. The Tories have made their Brexit bed and we've all got to lie in it. #AutumnStatement 
.@TimFarron: Brexit blackhole means hundreds of billions taken out our economy when we need it most #AutumnStatement  
Extraordinary - Financial implications of Nissan deal not even given to OBR. #Brexit means secrecy  
British workers face a sharp earnings squeeze next year, says the OBR, as the weaker pound drives up inflation#Brexit  
The UK Will Have To Borrow An Extra £122 Billion Due To Brexit  via @jamesrbuk 
So #Brexit is going to cost us £188m a week and still they claim it's a victory for this country rather than act of self mutilation #deluded 
OBR lays bare fiscal cost of Brexit - Read NIESR's reaction to today's announcement in full:#AutumnStatement 
They promised to get back £350 million a week, but in fact the cost of Brexit to the Exchequer it's now estimated by UK govt at £60 billion pic.twitter.com/kIzH2Wwk6y 
So Hammond admits UK will borrow £122bn more. This I suppose is just the first part of the land of milk & honey promised thanks to #Brexit? 
British government says Brexit uncertainty could slow 2017 economic growth from 2.2% to 1.4%  
The real news in #AutumnStatement is how much Brexit is hurting our economy  
Anyone who voted for Brexit should boycott Branson's Virgin Group as he seem's to be behind funding to stop Brexit. re tweet to fight back.  
Probably the chart of the day. Brexit is the biggest driver of increased borrowing according to the OBR (caveat: the future is v. uncertain)  
Autumn statement: OBR says Brexit impact could be even worse than feared - live  
Worth remembering that surplus target would almost certainly have been missed even without Brexit. #AutumnStatement 
It's as though they're not even trying. Expect hard #brexit by default.EU negotiators find David Davis has no idea. 
Europe Begins to Take Immigration Seriously #Brexit  
Opinion: NATO's big problem isn't Trump, it's Brexit  
My new book, "What Next: How to get the best from Brexit", is published today. Here's @Peston diving into it.  
#Brexit 'will actually cost £226million a week' - that wasn't on the side of @Vote_Leave's bus:  
This is PRICELESS #DoItLikeNigel #brexit #eu 
Very good background- "What drove the murderer of Labour MP Jo Cox to strike in the days before the EU referendum?"   
Well this is awkward - Brexit 'will actually cost £226million a week'  #AutumnStatement 
I hope the people who voted Brexit don't plan to get old and sick. Society and our expectations are going to require some severe reshaping.  
NHS well on the road to privatisation. Will accelerate once Brexit is on it's way. If....  
"You don't like being called an enemy of the people? Then stop behaving like one." Brendan O'Neill on Brexit-bashers  
For passengers of the Vote Leave bus — the Brexit borrowing bill is £226 million a week.  #AS2016 @OpenBritain 
Would the 17 million who voted for Brexit like to pay their personal £3,500 contributions for lost UK income by cash or cheque?  
Agreed. We need to talk about right-wing and racist extremism, and what Brexit supporters and right-wing leaders can do about it.  
.@OBR_UK forecast that there will be a #Brexit borrowing bill of £226m a week - meaning less money for our public services #AutumnStatement 
Still no Bregrets... 68% of people think that Britain should go ahead with Brexit! It's the duty of UK Gov to implement our decision.  
OBR forecasts that lower immigration will cost UK £16bn and Brexit cost £58.7bn. 
Impact of Brexit cd be even worse than we are forecasting, says OBR -  
According to the Treasury report, #Brexit is predicted to cost £412m, purely in Whitehall admin. TAKE THAT, BRUSSELS!  
£58.7 billion = almost £1,000 less per person to spend on hospitals and schools. Shame on the Brexit campaign for their blatant lies.  
OBR says Brexit will cost us £58.7 billion over the next 5 years. Now, does anyone have a bus that I can borrow?  
Perhaps Leaver liars still denying promising £350m a week for the NHS could explain this poster now the cost of Brexit's put at £60bn-ish  
So… Let's have 2nd #Brexit referendum already. And, to apologise, spend the $58.7bn loss that Brexit would have cost us on the NHS. With me? 
'Brexit will cost £58.7bn. Let's spend it on the NHS instead.' 
OBR claims Brexit will cost £188m a week. We sure didn't see that on Nigel and Boris's battle bus ...  
Brexit vote will cost £58.7bn, says OBR -  
May said our economy can't be entrusted to Corbyn then steals Labour policies + announces a £122bn Brexit black hole  
A reclusive neo-Nazi has been found guilty of murdering Labour MP Jo Cox a week before the Brexit referendum  
Brexiters - if you don't accept figures in the Autumn statement as the cost of Brexit, what measure do you accept will show net gain/loss? 
Brexit immigration cut will cost UK billions every year  
The £220bn financial cost of Brexit  #AutumnStatement 
Cost of Brexit: a decade of slower export growth and you'll be £1,000 worse off a year  
With the cost of Brexit to the Exchequer now estimated at £60bn, this is unquestionably the biggest lie in British political history  
Gov tweaks can’t hide Brexit making UK poorer w/ less money for hospitals & schools. £350m NHS claim will haunt Brexiteers #AutumnStatement 
Theresa May said our economy can't be entrusted to Corbyn before  announcing a £122bn Brexit black hole  
So that's busted the myth that #Brexit voters are all 45 or over and white.  
The key Brexit chart from today. Leave vote created a £58.7bn hit to public finances (including £15.2bn lost cos fewer migrants from 2017)  
Extra Brexit borrowing from lower migration +£16bn, lower productivity +£18bn, economic slowdown +£26bn, higher infl +10bn. Int rates -6bn 
This is a Government that is just about managing. The official figures have revealed a £220 billion Brexit black hole. #AutumnStatement 
The big messages of this Budget are that Brexit will make us poorer and the Tories have abandoned the lie that we can cut our way to growth. 
Autumn statement: The financial reality of Brexit hits home  
No £350 million a week for the NHS in the #AutumnStatement; just a #brexit black hole in the public finances #LeaveWatch 
That OBR chart suggests that had there not been a referendum @George_Osborne would indeed have hit his surplus target in 2019/20 
Takehome message of #autumnStatement appears to be Brexit Means Broke 
For comparison. OBR says cost of Brexit is £60 Billion: half the annual cost of the NHS or £2000 per household. 
So,cost of #brexit to exchequer alone is £122bn over next5yrs.Leave campaign told us we'd GAIN money for #NHS Liars! 
So the BREXIT £350m NHS pledge is on par with the promises the Trump University gave to students signing up for expensive courses 
Or £12,000 per Brexit vote. I'm a constitutional lawyer, but even I'm surprised people care so passionately about Parliamentary Sovereignty.  
Brexit has cost us £58.7bn according to the OBR. Not far off a grand each... 
Public debt has trebled since 2005, from £0.5 trillion to £1.6 trillion. Yet today was day SW1 bubble decided to blame it on Brexit. Spivs 
The bulk of the extra forecast £118bn borrowing over 5 years is changes that arise from Brexit (in blue), says OBR, @EdConwaySky reports 
Finally some clarity! Brexit means £122 billion black hole, crippling the younger generations that voted against it. Good to know. 
Ironic so many Brexiteers were hardcore Austerians given how debt is now increasing thanks to...Brexit. But hey, let's cut more benefits!  
FINANANCE: Fury as Office for Budget Responsibility claims that Brexit will create £21bn deficit instead of TELLING US WHAT WE WANT TO HEAR. 
Brexit likely to lead to "lower trade flows, lower investment and lower net migration and hence lower output" - @OBR_UK 
To be clear, there is now a £30 billion UK deficit forecast in 2019/20, a £40 billion swing into the red. #Brexit has *not* happened *yet*. 
Great stuff from OBR. "We asked Govt what Brexit meant. They told us Brexit means Brexit, which was bloody useless."  
The Government is expected to borrow £122bn as a result of Brexit, increasing national debt to £2trillion. Bet they won't put that on a bus. 
From Brexit to America's presidential election, our misses from #TheWorldIn 2016  
That's £59bn extra debt *in this Parliament alone* because of Brexit; £16bn of it because cutting immigration is bad for public finances.  
Here's the cost of #Brexit folks.Before #EURef Osborne predicted debt in 2019/20 of £1.73tr.Now £1.95tr.That's £220 BILLION higher debt 
V useful chart from OBR showing that Brexit related revisions (in blue) are the main cause of higher govt borrowing  
Vast bulk of increases in the deficit - described by the Tories in their Manifesto as a "moral failing" - attributable to Brexit.  
Far from providing an extra £6 Billion to spend on the NHS, Brexit now looks set to increase public borrowing by £60 Billion. 
£350m a week??? Post Brexit vote sterling slide has...INCREASED EU payments by £15 million a week, 800m/yr says OBR. Its paid in Euro.  
Every month the Government delays Brexit costs the exchequer over a billion pounds. UKIP says just get on with it #AutumnStatement 
Fiscal cost of Brexit according to OBR is 15.2bn in 2020/21. (6bn of that is down to lower migration than otherwise) 15.2 is £292m per week 
This is a Government that is just about managing. Official figures have revealed a £220 billion Brexit black hole  
Very helpful of the OBR to show the direct impact of Brexit on borrowing. And in a graph too. It's the bit in blue. £58.7 billion.  
In 2017 painful truths about a hard Brexit will begin to dawn on Britain #TheWorldIn  
OBR says it couldn't factor in impact of Brexit into growth figures cos Govt told them next to nothing.  
OBR put direct Brexit-related additional borrowing at £58.7bn over 6 years. Or, if you prefer, "£188mn a week". 
Politics 2016: Two parties who want to borrow more and pursue chaotic Brexit accusing the other of borrowing more & pursuing chaotic Brexit. 
OBR: Nope. We don't know what Brexit means either.  
OBR says lower net migration after #Brexit will cost economy £15billion #AutumnStatement 
BREAKING: Theresa May has asked Mauricio Pochettino to lead Brexit negotiations as he's managed to get Spurs out of Europe in just 2 months. 
PHILIP HAMMOND: "Yes, Brexit will cost us £220bn but I urge people to consider the upsides.I'll just wait here while you do that." 
He and we should say: 'battle #Brexit.' We need to wake up to the fact that the choice is stark: it's between 'Hard Brexit ' & 'No Brexit'.  
The irony of pundits blaming Brexit for failure of successive Remain chancellors to take control of public spending.  
totally unfair to blame Brexit, Robert. £0.5bn in 05. Now £1.64Bn. Rise to £1.9bn NOT Brexit 
White nationalist convicted of killing anti-Brexit lawmaker.  
This is huge: £220bn higher debt forecast since #brexit  
Philip Hammond admits Brexit vote means £122bn extra borrowing  
Britain is paying over £350 million a week for Brexit #AutumnStatement 
#AutumnStatement - McDonnell says Gov's Brexit plans are chaotic and we must battle hard Brexit "fanatics". Yes - absolutely. 
#AutumnStatement Surprisingly, John McDonnell absolutely right that Chancellor skipped Brexit discussion -and must commit to Single Market. 
Labour once again only talking about 'access' to single market not membership. How does their position differ from Govs? Now both pro Brexit 
Here's what statistics tell us about #Brexit so far  #AutumnStatement 
Autumn Statement 2016: Hammond unveils £122bn Brexit black hole - much more than we'd save on net EU contributions?  
BREAKING: Britain's #AutumnStatement is abolished by Philip Hammond Watch his announcement: 
£122 billion extra spending by 2020-21 thanks to Brexit? I make that £587 million a week. Can we put it on the side of a bus now? 
The cost of Brexit: £122bn. Worse than predicted. Worse than feared. Via @graemeweardon#AutumnStatement 
The emerging cost of Brexit? Borrowing up by £120bn, GDP growth down £40bn, debt to over 90% of GDP, triple-lock on pensions under review. 
Perfectly OK to criticise politicians, but pointless waste of energy to bleat about a fair, democratic referendum/election result?  
Be very careful with the 2018-2021 forecasts. A lot will depend on the type of Brexit we get. 
Of course triple lock will have to go. Over 65s can't deliver Brexit and then demand only younger people suffer from the insecurity. 
Hammond to end whiplash compensation claims. "Has your country been in an economic crash when it wasn't your fault? Call 0800 BREXIT now" 
#BrexitFallout: 2.4% lower growth, lower investments, economic uncertainty.It's official: #Brexit vote wll hit the people that voted for it  
Saw someone describe Brexit as "Dumbkirk"! LOL! 
Good to know, that facing massive debts and #brexit uncertainty - this government plans to do up another stately home #AutumnStatement 
So expected cost of #Brexit now over double the expected cost of shifting to a low-carbon economy  
If those GDP figures turn out to be accurate, Theresa May will have a majority of 600 in 2020. 1.4% growth worst case post-Brexit scenario? 
Just a little reminder that growth forecasts and polls have been proven to be utter bollocks this year. #AutumnStatement #Brexit  
Never forget Nigel Farage's claim that the Brexit campaign happened "without a single bullet being fired". Jo Cox MP was shot and murdered. 
Chancellor reveals growth hit because of Brexit  
AMERICAN CLIMATE SCIENTISTS you are welcome in the UK ...we need to replace the European scientists leaving because of Brexit. 
Thomas Mair has been given a whole life sentence for the murder of Labour MP Jo Cox in June a week before the EU referendum 
BREAKING: Theresa May has asked Mauricio Pochettino to lead Brexit negotiations as he's managed to get Spurs out of Europe in just 2 months. 
hey #MAGA peeps! did you know that thanks to #brexit UK lost 1,5 trillion usd? oh wait, lügenpresse, right?  
George Osborne is to blame for debt mess. Not Brexit.    national debt trebled since 2005 
Brexit vote and Trump's election have created risks for banks, says S&P  
#Brexit forecast to push up government borrowing by £32.9bn in this & next year. An obscenely irresponsible waste of money.#Remain #YesEU 
Weren't the Treasury forecasting a recession in 2017 just a few months ago? Now +1.4%. #AutumnStatement #Brexit 
Chancellor @PHammondMP admits Brexit +  austerity has turned Osborne's +£10bn surplus into a -£21bn deficit by 2019/20 #AutumnStatement 
Neo-nazi murdered MP at height of Brexit campaign while saying "keep Britain independent" and "Britain first"  
Chancellor: #Brexit uncertainty means OBR expects lower growth#AutumnStatement  
BREAKING: Britain cuts economic growth forecast for 2017 from 2.2% to 1.4%  #AutumnStatement 
Chancellor Philip Hammond has cut the UK's growth forecasts from next year following the impact of the Brexit vote  
.@PHammondMP on first  #AutumnStatement since #Brexit vote  
Hammond says growth will be 2.4% lower as a result of #brexit, & junks his deficit targets. Taking back control? #AutumnStatement 
The damaging impact of Brexit becoming clearer. Important that we protect Scotland's place in Europe #brexitshambles #AutumnStatement 
Leavers did vote to be poorer: Brexit knocking 2.4% off economic growth in next five years, Chancellor says OBR forecasts 
HM Treasury warned of 500,000 jobs lost if Britain voted for Brexit. Hammond has just admitted reverse is true: forecasts 500,000 MORE jobs. 
Bruno Latour's Le Monde essay on Trump and Brexit available in English.  
Trump, Populism, Brexit in court, Zadie Smith and Bob Dylan in our new issue, now online:  
Philip Hammond delivered the bit in his speech about the economic benefits of Brexit like a man reading his own hostage note. 
WATCH: May knocks Farron for wanting to reverse #Brexit.May promises to give us what we want - to do so, we must leave the Single Market.  
Good time to revisit this interview with Jo Cox on Brexit, Syria and Labour  
Irish trade unions call for referendum on abortion rights  
Right wing extremist guilty of Jo Cox murder: "Atmosphere of EU referendum campaign appears to have contributed..."   
#HugelySignificantly  - Prime Minister not standing against the inevitable second Scottish Independence Referendum. #indyref2 #PMQs #pmq 
Protesters swarm Parliament over Article 50 High Court ruling. #Brexit 
.@theresa_may on Brexit strategy: "It's absolutely right we don't set out at this stage every detail." #PMQS 
Thomas Mair guilty of murdering Labour MP Jo Cox, 41, in West Yorkshire, a week before EU referendum  
.@OwenSmith_MP will vote to BLOCK Brexit. RT if you believe he should #RespectTheResult 
WATCH: A reminder once more that democracy is "government by the people, especially rule of the majority". #PMQs #Brexit  
#Brexit: "No second referendum. No weaselling out of it (we will continue down a path of disaster and #Labour will support us)"#PMQs 
.@theresa_may reassures Article 50 will be triggered by end of March 2017, and there won't be a 2nd referendum #PMQS 
"There must be no attempt to weasel out of this" - PM on Brexit #PMQs  
Theresa May has asked Mauricio Pochettino to lead her Brexit negotiations as he has managed to get Spurs out of Europe in just two months.  
PM:There must be no 2nd referendum, no attempt to weasel out of this. This is the Govt that will deliver on the wishes of the British people 
Holding the government's feet to the fire over the EU Referendum - Big pro-brexit protest outside Parliament  
hey @BritishGQ explain how a muslim moc winning a fashion poll is at all comparable to an inherently racist islamophobic referendum passing 
Maybe my favorite autocorrect ever: "Breitbart" to "Brexit art." Well done, @Android. 
Outside Parliament 200 protesters shout "What do we want? Brexit! When do we want it? Now!" #AutumnStatement 
Scotland Qs: Tory after Tory bleating about a referendum means I can't ask a question about what is being done to protect oil & gas in Abz. 
LIVE on : More from the Brexit Protest #thepeoplehavespoken 
We will have to start thinking about 2020 since the Tories are making such a hash of Brexit ...  
Joan Collins Bill was passed calling for a referendum on water not because of any one group but the thousands who kept up the pressure#R2W 
When you try to keep up with the latest developments on Brexit and the Trump presidency at the same time.  
Guardian exemplifies everything wrong with liberal-elite identity politics. The type which crashed and burned with Brexit and Clinton... 
This piece from just after the Brexit vote stands up depressingly well: We're in the furnace of a new politics  
'Beating Zac in a by-election would be a Brexit game-changer' @joemurphylondon interviews @sarahjolney1 #richmond 
'If anyone will carry Britain through #Brexit, it will be small businesses' - @emmaljones from Enterprise Nation #AmazonAcademy 
Pro #Brexit protesters saying UKGov is delaying process, democracy is dead if will of the people is not respected asap  
Good discussion earlier at Hollyhock Cafe. Lots of strong feeling that this Brexit government is taking our country in the wrong direction  
BREAKING:Most Remain voters agree the people have spoken and Government needs to deliver on #Brexit  
Pro-Brexit crowd making some noise outside Westminster (Pic credit: Sadir Zayadine)#AutumnStatement#Brexit @GeoffCutmore 
1 UK’s eurosceptic regions are starting to wake up to the economic costs of Brexit, according to a Markit survey  
Nobel laureate Sir Fraser Stoddart: Brexit far worse for science than Trump. @jgro_the reports 
Time for Bungling Brexit Minister Mike Russell to come clean.What exactly was the nature of his secret talks with Spain, if they existed?  
Mr. #Timmer,Bankers have only one interest: Profit.#Brexit will make YOUR life difficult, so I'll take my chances! 
EU leaders still think Brexit can be reversed. That's why they're talking tough. My @IBTimesUK column. 
My view from #BackBrexitFeet Protest #BackBrexit #Brexit  
Pro #Brexit #protest taking place outside #UK #Parliament, protesters demand #Article50 now @RT_com 
Brexit-bashers like Blair and Branson are the real enemies of the people, says Brendan O'Neill    
I agree with many of Corbyn's social policies, but doesn't he realize they all mean nothing if Brexit goes through?#LabourShouldRemain 
Beyond Brexit – Teamwork is essential to this sea change, SFF article in today’s Herald #seaofopportunity  
90 minutes to go until Britain's #AutumnStatement - we'll have full coverage via @Brexit and  
The bond market is signaling anxiety about the implications of Italy's referendum  via @BV 
Ukip candidate OUTRAGED after Tory claims credit for Brexit referendum on Daily Politics  
At least when Theresa enacts Brexit and sends me back home, I'll be able to visit Pornhub for the articles again. 
Reading @IanDunt 's excellent book on Brexit. Really brings home to you the scale of the irresponsibility of current govt approach. 
I hope #Hammond announces tax breaks for innovative jam makers in #AutumnStatement. Pound & markets will soar if he does.#Brexit economy  
Hard #Brexit would leave British people poorer  – see the letter I co-signed with 90 Labour MPs/MEPs:  
Unless entire farm industry works together, it won't feature in anyone's #Brexit plans, @AgindustriesUK CEO David Caffall tells #agribiz2017 
Astonishing view expressed by @bernardjenkin that Tory Government were unprepared for #Brexit because Labour didn't tell them to prepare! 
Branson did not like the result of the referendum. He is now using his wealth and Blair in an attempt to overturn the result. Boycott him. 
More coverage today of SNP Brexit Minister Mike Russell's "flight of fancy" in Brussels on Monday  
We did what we said on the tin , got the referendum & won it.  
Our Director Stephen Booth tells @CommonsEUexit it will either be bilateral FTA with EU or WTO & we'll likely leave customs union #Brexit 
Manufacturers post best month since #EURef, beating economist expectations and confounding #Brexit slowdown fears.  
The 'Nightmare on Sauchiehall Street' ad considered too negative even by Better Together standards. #indyref #Brexit  
Drip feed leaks of Autumn Statement goodies to distract from horrosr of Brexit economic sinkhole ahead. Tory created slump now inevitable 
Corbyn & John McDonnell might well be described as lubricants facilitating the smooth passage of Tory #Brexit#Remain #YesEU 
Good luck all marchers for Brexit today in London. Be careful you know the left will resort to violence  
Today at 11am GMT I will be standing up, facing towards Brussels and sighing to show my disappointment with Brexit. Join me #sigh4brexit 
On Brexit, the Labour leadership offers anxious voters … nothing | John Harris  
Turns out our Brexit ministers were the kids who giggled & mucked about at the back of the class and are now staring in horror at the exam. 
If Britain needs Farage to stay close to the US, then Trump's US is not a nation Britain should be close to.#Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
Let me guess. Poor get shafted, rich get Tax breaks. Austerity needed because of 'Brexit'. #AutumnStatement 
Dear Labour MPs, the PM has said you are representatives not delegates. A little more effort please to defend our interests: no Brexit. 
I truly believe that Tony Blair is an evil man. His return to oppose Brexit is the best proof we could have that we're doing the right thing 
Trumping Brexit: How one tweet from Trump illustrates Theresa May's predicament  via @POLITICOEurope | Getty 
Theresa May has asked Mauricio Pochettino to lead her Brexit negotiations as he has managed to get Spurs out of Europe in just two months 
Boris Johnson.Being  an Eton grad, I am sure you can put in Latin the #SNP slogan:'I moan therefore I am'#brexit 
UK economy poorer by $1.5 trillion. Brexit bill is another £100 billion. 5 per cent inflation by next year. What do Leavers not understand? 
Launched Virgin on a VAT fraud,moved his business to Switzerland to avoid paying UK taxes. financing Blair to thwart BREXIT @dunstablian 
U.K. Treasury chief to lay out the government’s tax and spending plans in first autumn statement since Brexit vote  
Brexiteer: But isn't it the case that we'll be better off because...Expert: No.How every Brexit discussion I go to plays out. 
Since the Brexit vote:•Pound down•Prices rising•Unemployment down•Consumer spending stable•Support for EU up 
Young voters don't want Brexit. Betraying them by failing to oppose Article 50 will be @jeremycorbyn's Iraq war 
With every day and every hour it becomes clearer and clearer that Brexit is an entirely unnecessary act of voluntary self-defenestration 
@BrexitBin I think we know one thing more clearly now than we did then. Brexit is a very, very, very bad idea.  
Trump would be proud of this. Shows BT's funding advantages. But Brexit chaos makes v/over's UK claims sound silly:  
Here's the incredibly negative pro-UK big budget eve-of-Scottish-referendum TV ad they canned for being too negative  
#May's #Brexit strategy revealed: Demand access to single market with no FOM. This triggers hard Brexit with neg impact on UK. May blames EU 
UK will be ‘screwed into the floor’ in Brexit talks warns Ryanair boss  
#Brexit or not, STPs are a smokescreen for £22bn NHS cutsWatch:#AutumnStatement 
"Approval of EU membership among Britons increased by seven per cent in the five months up to August" #Brexit  
Trump, not remembering Nigel Farage did Brexit.  
Seriously, John McDonnell, “It’s time we were all more positive about Brexit”? This is why I resigned from @UKLabour  
The BBC's motto used to be "Nation shall speak peace unto nation". Now it is Brexit Broadcast Communication, "Farage, nought but Farage"  
Brexit has cost us $1.5 trillion, but worse may be on the way  
This is brilliant, and utterly damning, on Labour's Brexit failure  
Colombia's government will sign new peace accord with FARC rebels after previous deal was rejected in a referendum  
As @UKLabour continues to muddle on it is clear only one major national party has clear stand against @theresa_may's #Brexit plans: @LibDems 
I really fear for the worst with this clownChancellor warns Brexit uncertainty leaves UK facing 'eye-watering' debt  
"Never in the field of human conflict has so much damage been done to so many by one man." ...#Brexit #clowns 
Hammond heads for £100bn increase in debt as economy slows, tax receipts fall post Brexit vote. Watch him invent new fiscal rule to cover up 
First #Brexit meeting between @GuyVerhofstadt and @DavidDavisMP.EU guys have documents/notebooks, #Brexit minister not even a pen...  
Brexit is not going to help the people that voted for it, World Bank warns 
British food exports outside the European Union BOOM following Brexit vote  
Trying to dig out solid facts about Brexit each morning makes me feel like a robin in a frozen field trying to find a worm. 
Just 25% of Leave voters think Brexit means foods prices will go up - former Sainsbury's CEO now says they'll rise 5% in next 6 months  
Very timely @FeileBelfast event next week to discuss #BREXIT implications & alternative options for north of Ireland #RespectOurVote 
Y'day I asked if the PM could detail the opportunities created by Brexit. My qn drew 250 likes/retweets, some abuse and not a single answer. 
I'd like to apologise for the imminent rise in UK food prices. It's my fault because I've moaned and not been positive about #brexit. Sorry. 
On Brexit, the Labour leadership offers anxious voters … nothing | John Harris  
It is too early to crown Le Pen.#France options are two 'rights'.Not the same as #Brexit & #Trump.I'm with her  
ICYMI: Education correlates strongly with support for Trump and Brexit, but a hidden third variable explains both  
The time is now, Germany. We The People are winning! Remove #Merkel #abmerkeln #merkelmusswegLet us #DrainTheSwamp & follow #Brexit  
Our new study published: We need greater media scrutiny of #Statistics in #news and #journalism including #brexit  
Brexit minister 'has no idea what Brexit means'  
John Byrne: on Paisley as 2021 City of Culture, Trump, Brexit and his new work  
We found the same with Brexit vote. The educational divide is going to be with us for generations - we should be talking about it a lot more  
Tories have "no idea" what Brexit really means.  
While Brexit diversion has consumed government, media, industry & commerce time, has anyone calculated the opportunities, time & money lost?  
#brexit causing lower growth more austerity less jobs bigger debts more pain WHY? Time for #2ndThoughts #autumnstatement 
Oh dear - now UK-based German car manufacturers issue Brexit warning. Time for another Letter of Comfort #r4today  
Off to argue with @piersmorgan@gmb re this call for more bad losing on Brexit and @realDonaldTrump  via IBTimesUK 
#Brexit must be stopped. The Brexiters hope that Remainers will begin to give ground, talk of 'soft Brexit' options, etc: don't concede. 
Brexit would be a leap into the dark, concocted by opportunists, full of bluster; all in all a massive error and huge political misjudgement  
Poll by @SkyData suggests 53% of people think it is unlikely that Brexit will damage the economy while 39% think damage is likely #AS2016 
It's Dance Dance Revolution's Fault We Didn't Learn From Brexit 
But we have that, sort of reverse-Brexit situation where people are dealing with grief but think it will get them to prosperity. 
Renzi's party wants early election in Italy if he loses referendum  
Europe's sluggish growth a bigger threat to world stability than Brexit, says IMF deputy chief  via @telegraphnews 
Tony Blair's analysis of the EU has consistently failed our country (e.g. Euro). He is the last person we should take advice from.  #Brexit 
Given Branson being outed as a co-conspirator in the Quisling Coup Faction, his 'meeting' with Mrs Remaniac May post-Brexit now makes sense. 
This tramp thinks  @Kate_Chastain may be a smidge jealous of @BenRobinsonChef & @emiliawa . She should let them #brexit in peace 
BrexitCubsTrumpIPFW2016 is just the year the world gets flipped over 
First they ignore you, then they laugh at you, then they fight you, then you win (M. Gandhi) Bring on the referendum #peipoli #honourthevote 
Brexit Britain faces threat of higher EU barriers  
So will The Chancellor announce Brexit cut in vat on domestic energy as leavers promised??  #AutumnStatement 
-Why Germany would be more sympathetic to Scottish independence after Brexit if SNP stays pro EU#IndyRef2 
Brexit means UK economy loses $1,500,000,000,000Meanwhile across the Irish Sea..... 
Britain's Trump Card: Brexit Negotiations Just Got More Complicated  via @ChristophPauly @hessemartin1 @PeterMueller9 
I wish I'd been a remainer #Brexit 
PM ask for referendum thru app with only 1 million downloadsmostly by his supporters. Will that survey reliable?#ModiScaredOfParliament 
okay also Village Green Preservation Society now makes me think about Brexit voters who felt all these things unironically NOWHERE IS SAFE 
Brexit and Trump have exposed the left’s crucial flaw: playing by the rules | Jonathan Freedland  
Best solution would be to turnaround and come back from the cliff, and ditch Brexit.  
Brexit: confusion upon confusion - Single Market or not Single Market ... that is the question ... . 
Predatory capitalism makes this a common occurrence in majority of countries. Hence Brexit, Trump & upcoming Europe movements/elections.  
MPs must say to the 17m: we decide against Brexit. We don’t disrespect your vote but we must judge in UK best interest. Here are our reasons 
4. Germany will put £32bn trade surplus with UK at risk if Merkel & Brussels try to "punish" UK for #Brexit  
Europe Begins to Take Immigration Seriously #Brexit  
All clear now everyone? Via Bloomberg @Brexit  
From Brexit to America's presidential election, our misses from #TheWorldIn 2016  
While Farage is drinking champagne in Trump tower, the poor will struggle to pay their bills. Brexit is the biggest con in living history.  
The Scottish Government won't be giving a running commentary, showing their hand would hurt negotiations #Brexit @  
a man from manchester told us he'd thought the british were the dumbest ppl on the planet after brexit. 
Just a reminder. It's been 5 months since the Brexit vote, and we are no closer to knowing WTF is going on than we were one day after. 
QUISLING WATCH: Leaked Memo Exposes Seditious Anti-Democracy Faction Plotting Brexit Coup - Branson, Geldof, Bliar  
At last we see what @ScotTories meant by strong opposition attacking witnesses they disagree with whilst a supine chair eggs them on #Brexit  
2016 so far:- Trump victory- Brexit- Syria crisis- Turkey coup attempt- North Korea nuclear tests- ISIS attacks- Brazil impeachment 
Anyone got an opinion on Brexit?  
Stood in (in a non-representative way) for @NicolaSturgeon at Saatchis' event. Huge appetite for a fightback v Brexit and calling out Trump 
Remainers warned this would happen. Most food prices were arranged 6 months in advance, pre Brexit vote. The reality is only now kicking in.  
This is what happens when thick people vote for Brexit Hang your heads in shameIBM pledges major investment in UK  
#Newsnight prove yet again that they don't understand why #BRExit or Trump won. Take a look in the mirror, guys. You are the problem. 
The worst thing about Brexit for me is not being able to change it as an individual. I hate that this country is being led over a cliff. 
UK $1.5 trillion worse off since #brexit food prices due to go up by c.5% in next 6 months. Project FEAR becomes Project FACT #newsnight 
Brexit: it's just not funny any more, Boris. The Times lead tomorrow (courtesy @suttonnick) 
DAWN OF EU ARMYAnother step closer to a federal Europe.. No wonder UK voters are regretting brexit .... not    
Such is the focus on the Tory clueless Brexit we've almost forgot about the disaster that is their economic stewardship. #AutumnStatement 
So much for supposed Brexit regret;   
Has there ever been a more clueless exercise than this Tory Brexit? Getting to unbelievable now. 
Let Big al know we haven't forgotten himSend this Brave Soldier a Christmas CardPLEASE RETWEET 
EU  negotiator Guy Verhofstadt attempts-in the many languages he speaks-  to undersand #DavidDavis on  #Brexit. 
'Bring back Harry Redknapp' - Fans react as Tottenham #Brexit faster than England  #THFC 
When labour left office annual deficit was 10.5% of GDP. OBR forecast for 2019/20 post Brexit is less than 1%. £15bn/£2000bn. #Manageable 
Incivility & anger from hard line Tory MSPs when faced with clear evidence re consequences of #Brexit for Scotland  
● Farage camp attacks ambassador as Trump backs Ukip leader ● Europeans round on top Brexit ministers #TomorrowsPapersToday 
Wednesday's Times front page:Europeans round on top Brexit ministers#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Why do Brit Nats never focus on the economic disaster of Brexit. Is it because WM knows best no matter what.  
2 - Theresa May has asked Spurs to lead her Brexit negotiations as they've managed to get kicked out of Europe within 2 months. Eliminated. 
Britain’s economy is expected to take a big hit from Brexit  
Time the idiots running this country understand that millions of voters want Farage honoured and rewarded for his brexit efforts not ignored 
Spoiler Alert: The government's FAQ on Brexit doesn't tell us what Brexit means. Enjoyed this #TrustInMe excerpt.  
I'm ashamed to live in a country where the media constantly talks down the UK & always backs the EU on Brexit@skynews @BBCNews @itvnews 
In Dublin tonight at the invitation of Deloitte to address large group of business representatives on the challenges for Ireland re #Brexit.  
UK rejects Trump's request to make Brexit leader new ambassador  
After Brexit to freeze the negotiations with Turkey is a suicide for EU... Turkey's accesion process is EU's last turn before EUexit... 
They're right, Brexit must go down in history as one of the greatest political misjudgements & the weakest in terms of strategy & consensus.  
When wankers like #Branson & #Blair start colluding to derail democracy & #Brexit its time to #BoycottVirgin & get Blair to The Hague. Twats pic.twitter.com/BUf05S3YhC 
Sometimes I wonder how Trump and Brexit happend bt then again there were 12 seasons of Two & A Half Men n just one season of Freaks & Geeks 
Expect he's not alone; ministers should have had briefings to help them understand, however, Brexit is basically a black art in all but name  
"We want our country back...in recession."#Brexit  
Brexit FAQ "Our priority is to build a national consensus around our exit from the EU."More #Brexit BS from our govt#Remain #YesEU 
The real reason Tories want Brexit - to protect the very wealthy in their tax havens.  
Please RT - BREXIT MARCH TOMORROW, 12:00; Parliament Square  
Polling of 10,000 ppl throughout EU, 21.11.16 reveals Support for EU rises since Brexit vote, average 68% approval  
If you don’t run your own countryIf you don’t control your own bordersYoure not the master of your own destiny#NigelFarage #Brexit #UKIP 
Labour's @tom_watson reckons @milesSI knows more about #Brexit than the government...  #FM17 
Tax avoiding Richard Branson is funding an anti-#BRexit group from his own private island in the Caribbean. Can't we take away his passport?  
White nationalists? Alt-right? If you see a Nazi, say Nazi | Lindy West  #FreeSpeech #Ukip #Brexit 
The 1% plotting to halt Brexit & bring back Tony Blair, leaked memo suggests  
. @johnmcdonnellMP needs to grasp that at this time there is only one #Brexit & that is a project of the nationalist & tax-dodging far right 
Brexit Britain faces threat of higher EU barriers  
Britain accused of having "no idea what Brexit really means" as preliminary negotiations to leave the EU begin  
Richard Branson's Virgin to bankroll a secret Blairite campaign to stop Brexit  
The European Parliament’s Brexit negotiator has a message for the UK's Brexit secretary: "Welcome to hell”  
The #Brexit legal nightmare is in the hands of Davis's dept which hasn't "the faintest clue" what to do. This is the UK Government. Now.  
Serge Aurier banned from UK because he is Ivorian: a non-EU national with a conviction. Post-Brexit, this will happen more often. Both ways. 
The demographics of Brexit are changing. Did you know that since June 23rd, 80,000 people who voted to leave have died... 
Richard Branson's Virgin to bankroll secret Blairite campaign to stop Brexit | The Independent  
The President of the European Court of Justice suggests there are 'many, many ways' it could intervene in Brexit  
I'm starting to get more than a little irritated at the likes of @DavidDavisMP dragging us to a #brexit he plainly does not understand. 
5 months of Brexit madness summed up in one articleVia @JamesMelville 
Time to think differently about economics by @MazzucatoM | The Brexit-Trump Syndrome: it’s the economics, stupid  
EU army agreed. Shows we were lied to on a massive scale pre referendum. How many more would have voted brexit?   
'Realistic' Brexit means UK must LEAVE the single market, eurosceptic minister claims 
Mays best buddy now funding campaign to overturn #Brexit BOYCOTT ALL VIRGIN PRODUCTS #BritFam 
Yet another twist to SNP Brexit shambles as @scotgov distance themselves from @Feorlean claims 
Nicola Sturgeon's Brexit minister caught making inaccurate claims to Brussels diplomats  via @telegraphnews 
Hey people who voted 'no' on the referendum, happy now?  
Mate, we have same problem in the UK. Some of those who voted Brexit think that our un-elected PM can now override law/judiciary with whim.  
I've asked @BorisJohnson why Nissan, the Czech Media & Angela Merkel all know more about this government's Brexit plans than business here.  
If the EU's top Brexit negotiator Verhofstadt can call the US President-elect a "clown", it must give licence to us to call the EU "clowns"! 
Well surprise, surprise! Reuters: JPMorgan says French labour law is in the way of a big move [from London] to Paris post-Brexit. 
The abusive #Brexit trolls tell us one thing. Brexit is a project of the thuggish far right and must be fought with all our efforts#Remain 
There are many abusive #Brexit trolls around. Treat them as the fascist, racist, sectarian scum that they are. #Remain #YesEU 
UK rejects Trump's request to make Brexit leader new ambassador  
Is there nothing else in the whole  UK going on, that BBC news is so obsessed w. Trump/Brexit/Farage on a daily loop for weeks now? 
Brexit blues: not a time for political accommodation or appeasement, must not bow to those who insist Brexit a foregone conclusion; it isn't 
Which, strangely, is exactly what the government requires, so as to solve all its Brexit plot difficulties.  
Let's stop comparing Trump to BrexitUnlike Brexit the American people's popular choice lost @jburnmurdoch @epkaufm 
This is why Brexit won't happen after all  
Education strongly correlates with support for Trump and Brexit, but how much of that is due to personality?  
Machinery firm Hewden (founded 1961) collapses weeks after saying Brexit vote hurt business - jobs lost.  
A united @UKLabour NEC away day focussed entirely on external matters of policy, #Brexit, 6 years of Tory economic failure, 2017 elections! 
The first savings from Brexit as UK officials start to be brought home  
Squeezing out a hard Brexit.  
SHOW this video to anyone calling for a second referendum #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
What does hard Brexit look like? Blocked roads and empty shelves. Worrying analysis by @IanDunt 
As many lawyers have been warning for many months, @thetimes reports Whitehall can’t cope with legal nightmare of Brexit, say experts.  
Lords debating EU report on Invoking Article 50. Number of Tory remain peers express #Brexit Referendum as 'greatest political mistake' 
The Brexit-Trump Syndrome: it's the economics, stupid  
Brexit Won’t Benefit Many Who Voted for It, World Bank Warns  
This comment from a reader of the FT has gone viral because it nails the remainer/leaver Brexit row  
Sir, I noticed you didn't mention the upcoming Italian referendum even once in your highly biased post.  
Britain slaps down Trump idea for Brexit campaigner Nigel Farage to be U.K. ambassador to U.S.  pic.twitter.com/eVfVkXsMQP 
Brexit, Trump & now Fillon: Surprise result of French center-right primary  
Bi-lateral, post-Brexit trade deal with the US? U better believe Big Pharma will aim to rocket up charges on #NHS 
Quelle surpriseNicola Sturgeon's Brexit minister caught making inaccurate claims to Brussels diplomats  
Alan Harvey white supremacist associate of #ThomasMair pictured here on Brexit Day and a little earlier. Feast your eyes on the master race  
Britain accused of having "no idea what Brexit really means" as preliminary negotiations to leave the EU begin  
EU Negotiator: Brexit Talks to Be Concluded in 15 Months  
Richard Branson has pledged to help fund a campaign to block Brexit  
VERY useful thread in understanding the "chasm" between those who feel Brexit is being derailed and those accused of standing in its way  
9. Even if constitutionally acceptable, this is bad politics. It ignores the Referendum flaws, embeds the grievance and widens the chasm. 
7. And if Parliament has a real role, Remainers must accept there is a mandate to deliver Brexit: undesirable for us. 
5. You do that by giving a role to our democratically elected Parliament. It should decide *respecting the outcome* what Brexit means. 
Remain formulates their plan B while Brexit still doesn't even have a plan A.   
During the referendum, the remain campaign said that leaving the EU would mean leaving the single market. Why have they changed their minds? 
The BBC will never regain the trust it lost in the immediate aftermath of our decision to Leave the European Union.#Brexit 
UKIP is being investigated over claims it misspent EU funding on trying to win the Brexit vote  
The Government’s Brexit FAQ is the most passive aggressive gov.uk page ever  
Richard Branson's Virgin to bankroll secret Blairite campaign to stop Brexit 
Brexit won't benefit many who voted for it, the World Bank warns  
London remains #fintech capital of the world, topping index for 2nd year. But index didnt take #Brexit into account. 
-name?-theresa may-specialist subject?-brexit-you have 2 minutes on brexit starting now. what is brexit?-brexit-define brexit-brexit 
Putin wanted Brexit -> surprise Brexit winPutin wanted Trump -> surprise Trump winPutin wanted Fillon -> surprise Fillon win#JustSaying 
'You've got NO IDEA' Frustrated Sturgeon BLASTS May in furious Brexit rant. Nichola has lost it! Time for Her To Go!  
Pro-Brexit radio host Julia Hartley-Brewer has the stupidest excuse for the £350m NHS pledge yet  #brexit 
TECHNOLOGY: Government to fund faster broadband forYES FINE BUT WHAT ABOUT IMMIGRANTS AND BREXIT??!?  
Five months after the referendum, the government has now published this FAQ.There you go, remoaners: progress.  
British gov't rejects Pres.-elect Trump's suggestion of Brexit leader Nigel Farage as ambassador to US.  
David Davis says EU Brexit negotiator meeting 'a good start'  
So Uk is playing Hard brexit on Serge Aurier… when Leo Messi who’s been sentenced too for Tax Fraud is free to go… What a time to be alive 
If we're going to fight a hard #brexit Britain needs an army of ordinary people telling their stories on social media-not #tonyblair. 
Trumping Brexit: How one tweet from Trump illustrates Theresa May's predicament  via @POLITICOEurope | Getty 
Dublin is looking forward to Business Brexodus from Brexit Britain 
Reports: Trump asked leaders of the Brexit movement to push back against wind farms in Scotland  
Farage wanting to be the UK ambassador is only another part of the right wing coup spurred on by Brexit. These fascists want power. 
EU leaders say the UK appears to be clueless about #Brexit implications  
EU policy makers say Britain appears clueless about the implications of Brexit  
EU army becomes reality after new EU push for military integration - @UKIP MEP @MikeHookemMEP  #UKIP #Brexit 
EU leaders step up criticism of Theresa May's Brexit strategy, saying Britain seems clueless  
#brexit didn't happen over night it began when politicians like #TonyBlair embraced globalisation for profit of the 1% & plunged us into war 
A plea from @TheUnapologists' @PeterC17 for the Left to get behind #basicincome or face more Trump & Brexit results.  
Brexit deadlock could halt flights to Europe, warns Ryanair boss  
Meet the pro-EU candidates in the #RichmondPark 'brexit by-election'!  
When will it end! First it was @QualityStreetUK then @Toblerone and now it's @armani #brexit  
It's hugely disappointing this doesn't include:Q: What does Brexit mean?A: Brexit 
Exclusive - Renzi's party wants early election in Italy if referendum lost  
The government has just published this "FAQ" on Brexit:  
Nicola Sturgeon gets it wrong AGAIN Norway buries SNP’s Brexit block bid and urges friendly deal with UK  
"Eurocrats believe they can BULLY and FRIGHTEN Britain to stop #Brexit"...They also think #EU will hold together. 
Magna Carta 800 Year of Protection for the people 
.@NicolaSturgeon condemns UK govt for putting up "not welcome here" message to EU nationals #Brexit 
The UK economy is slowing – experts debate the Brexit watch data  
Make The World Great Again Check List [✓] Brexit[✓] Trump[ ] Hofler[ ] Wilders[ ] Frauke [ ] Le Pen[ ] Uncuck Canada  
A Reminder that #Trump and #Brexit are related. Both courted, needed and got out the Xenophobic vote to win. The consequences are the same.  
Calexit: Leftists File Papers for 2018 Secession Referendum <-- it's the new Confederacy!  
Still in prison Free this Brave Soldier 
Tomorrow's #autumnstatement will hit like hard winter's rain to everyone but the 1%. But it isn't #Brexit that caused it but Tory austerity. 
The entire Brexit debate summed up in 20 hilarious sentences  
"It’s like Dad’s Army"Michael O'Leary slams Brexit strategy, saying UK will be "screwed into the floor" in EU talks 
Richard Branson to fund anti-Brexit campaign  via @POLITICOEurope | EPA 
Brexit vote wiped $1.5 trillion off UK household wealth in 2016, per Credit Suisse global wealth report  
In 'Undercover Migrant', we go undercover to unearth the conditions migrants are up against in Brexit Britain. Coming soon to VICE.  
Civil service unable to cope with Brexit, warns former Whitehall chief  
So, Brexit means Brexit means no NHS, no state pension, no free education, no workers rights, no legal aid, no disability aid. #Democracy 
Brexit has given a voice to the racists xenophobes homophobes misogynists & bigots that have spent their lives lurking in the shadows. 
Trump is a tragedy for the US and a disaster for Brexit Britain  
Remain's posturing about "post-truth" politics would be less nauseating if it weren't for things like this  #brexit 
How ridiculous. It means Brexit, of course  
FARAGE: I Am Prepared to Help Britain Work with President Trump#Brexit #MAGA 
UK will be ‘screwed into the floor’ in Brexit talks, warns Ryanair boss  
Britain's accused of having "no idea what Brexit really means" as preliminary negotiations to leave the EU begin  
Makers of @FootballManager 2017 vid game hv done more work than Govt ministers on how Brexit will work - @tom_watson 
Britons want both a "hard" #Brexit and a "soft" #Brexit. They will be disappointed  
400,000 UK millionaires are no longer millionaires, thanks to Brexit  
Voters in Italy's struggling southern regions are poised to reject constitutional reforms in next month's referendum  
My feeling is #Labour's line in the sand must be that they will not accept a Hard #Brexit b/c to accept that will be ruin for us all. 
To act against #brexit is to act in the best interests of the nation #ChallengeBrexit #remain 
#tonyblair return to politics to fight Brexit displays a narcissism so pathological it begs the question why isn't he under a doctor's care 
Despite Brexit vote, UK opts in to EU asylum law proposal for Eurodac - revised rules re database on asylum-seekers:  
As Brexit proved, so did our election. Elites live in a self absorbing cocoon disconnected from the real world . #tcot #ccot #gop #maga pic.twitter.com/iRl2Fzh5iy 
Mike Russell needs to urgently clarify his plans on Brexit after claiming to have held discussions with Spain: 
Almost 10,000 doctors have left #Greece since 2010. UK top destination but numbers falling, possibly due to Brexit  
EU Parliament’s Brexit negotiator Verhofstadt has a message for the UK's Brexit secretary Davis: "Welcome to hell” 
Britain's accused of having "no idea what Brexit really means" as preliminary negotiations to leave the EU begin  
SHOW this video to anyone calling for a second referendum #RespectTheResult 
U.K. to Trump: 'No vacancy' for Brexit campaigner Nigel Farage to be made ambassador in Washington. Read more:  
Maybe they we get to Thanet south first , or the millions the EU spent on the referendum !  
The Brexit debate illustrated Chris Riddell:  
"Many who see themselves on left support Scottish separatism, oppose Brexit, aggressive to Russia, objectively support ISIS" LIVE, Dollar 
Nigel Farage genuinely believes 52% of voters chose Brexit because they adore him. He really does not realise just how disliked he is. 
"Example: I agree w/ Nigel Farage on 4 huge issues: Scottish seperatism, Brexit, relations w/Russia, total war vs ISIS" LIVE, Dollar Academy 
'Time to listen to the people' Plan to oust out of touch Remoaner MPs from Brexit areas  
Brexit: What The Hell Happens Now is now the number #1 bestseller in political economics  
Italy’s heading for its own Brexit moment, says Nicholas Farrell  
Post-Brexit, Britain is reeling like a boxer that has been hit by Muhammad Ali  
AIG may move its European headquarters from London to another EU country due to Brexit  
How has the Brexit vote affected the UK economy? November verdict  
/"The UK is going to walk itself off a cliff"#Brexit 
The Brexit economy: remarkable resilience as spectre of inflation looms  
Michael Gove on the inevitable success of Brexit via @prospect_uk 
Richard Branson apparently bankrolling scheme to stop #Brexit with politicians & media tycoons  
Brexit has made Brits $1.5 trillion poorer  
Considering our economic, security and geopolitical interests I plead for an intelligent #Brexit @Number10gov 
EU's Brexit negotiator, @GuyVerhofstadt: Brexit must be agreed by mid 2019.The sooner the better.  
"Italy will eventually leave the euro and a no vote on the Dec. 4 referendum will be a step in that direction": SEI Investments 
Second most asked question re: Brexit when in Dublin was “don’t the English realise the harm this will do to us?” Too ashamed to answer 
From Brexit to America's presidential election, our misses from #TheWorldIn 2016  
Reports: Trump asked Brexit architects to oppose wind farms in Scotland  
France: Should France remain a member of the European Union?, Harris poll:Yes: 64%No: 36%#Brexit #Frexit #Fillon #LePen #Sondage 
A hard #brexit will damage Britain for generations, lowering living standards, diminishing opportunity & making us more hateful. #Labour 
This is what I wrote about people on the Left voting for Brexit. I wrote this in May. Do you get it now, at least?  
Remain caught telling fibs about the Single Market again...  #Brexit #EU 
#Brexit'ers: Don't you just love them? Just incredible how deluded and irresponsible they were/are. From @domjoly's Facebook. 
More evidence that #brexit will require hiring more civil servants - which means less money for our NHS #LeaveWatch 
'Freest possible access' to the SM. Do they have a whiteboard in the Brexit dept with all these nonsense phrases and when to use them? 
The problem with May refusing to "give a running commentary on Brexit"  is that the commentary still happens but someone else is running it. 
The European Parliament’s Brexit negotiator has a message for the UK's Brexit secretary: "Welcome to hell”  
Brexit has cost us $1.5tn - and the worst is yet to come  
David Davis meets with Guy Verhofstadt to discuss Brexit  
Q. You want to remain in single market or not? A. @DavidDavisMP " ... aim is to make it as open as possible." #Brexit opacity continues. 
Remember, Trump promised to deliver Brexit 'times five.'  
My Prospect exchange with Michael Gove on why govt should get Parliamentary consent for Brexit negotiating plan.  
At meeting w Nigel Farage, leader of Brexit effort, PresElect Trump brought up unusual topic: wind farms @dannyhakim  
 Reasonably accurate summary of where we are on #brexit :  
RT if you agree that millionaires & Blairites shouldn't be allowed to block Brexit #RespectTheResult 
The public debate about Brexit is being played out by millionaires, so it's hardly surprising that regular folk are becoming disinterested. 
#Brexit IS the beginning of the #EU break-up.It is NOT the end of European collaboration.Just a change of method! 
Regardless of funding, any Blairite campaign to stop Brexit will simply strengthen the Leave side.  
What if we send all the UKIP MEPs off as ambassadors and then pretend to them we've Brexited and don't actually Brexit. That'll work, right? 
EU wants talks to begin quickly so Brexit happens before mid-2019  
Join us for the London #Brexit Protest, Tomorrow from Noon. I will be speaking! #ThePeopleHaveSpoken #PoweredByThePeople Please RT 
Many thanks to the University of Edinburgh for hosting this event #innovation #brexit  
Brexit's good for tech, Brexit's bad for tech  
Rich oligarchs are mobilising to undo referendum result.   
I am confident that Brexit can be a great opportunity for Britain to engage with the rest of the world  @CMECnews 
Italian referendum may or may not  trigger a crisis, but Italy's eurozone position is economically unsustainable  
Here's why I abstained on #eu  #brexit 
Very little to do with Farage, really!!!! Without Farage there wudnt have been a referendum.  
Household wealth in the UK slumped by 10% as a "direct result" of the #Brexit vote, Swiss bank Credit Suisse reveals  
Look at this lying Remoaner. The people have spoken. Brexit means Brexit!  
UKIP is being investigated over claims it misspent EU funding on trying to win the Brexit vote  
Brexit vote wipes $1.5tn off UK household finances in 2016  
Meeting with European Parliament's chief negotiator Guy Verhofstadt a "good start" - #Brexit Secretary David Davis  
Wee Jimmy warns Trump and May again. She's still free for panto by the way.   #SNPGTF #Brexit 
The Brexit vote and Trump's election threaten to undo the international order created at the end of WWII  
We have reached a stage now where opposition to Brexit by the elite is entering the realms of treason. Deal with them. 
#autumnstatement can support ppl in #ukpoverty as we leave EU with a fund to support jobs & inclusive growth #brexit  
.@NicolaSturgeon on how Scotland is responding to Brexit and the common challenges all parts of the UK are facing #AAMConference 
First meeting with @DavidDavisMP on Brexit. Agreement needs to be found ahead of the new 2019 European elections  
A glorious summary of the Brexit debate in the Financial Times comments section:-  
The World is not one big Coca Cola advertisement teaching everyone to Sing in harmony. It's brutal and dangerous. 
Italian companies could cope with a "no" vote in the upcoming referendum  
 The Brexit Debate by Ishtar Ostaria  
Brexit buffets Brits, Yen boosts Japanese among ranks of global rich  
Unfortunately I haven’t heard anything new f/ @DavidDavisMP today. For us it’s clear: The 4 fundamental freedoms are not negotiable. #Brexit  
With such rhetorical q's #DeMonetisationSurvey reads like Musharraf's referendum. Shows the poor opinion our PM has of democracy & people  
Weber also said 'it is still open - they are discussing - but there is no idea what Brexit really means' 
The @ElectoralCommUK is investigating @UKIP over claims it misspent EU money on UK elections and Brexit vote.  
Well, this puts phoney £350m in perspective"Brexit vote wiped $1.5tn off UK household wealth in 2016, says report":  
Branson funding the war criminal Tony Blair in an attempt to block Brexit. You know what to do people. #boycottvirgin 
Richard Branson's Virgin to bankroll secret Blairite campaign to stop Brexit  #Brexit  
Tfw when people who raged at Obama commenting on Brexit are thrilled at Trump seeking to dictate our choice of ambassador to US. 
Poland Calls for Calm During EU Brexit Talks  
Does UK want to stay in single market? @ManfredWeber ‘it is not clear… there is no idea amongst them what Brexit really means’ 
Questions for @giannipittella? Send them in using #AskGianni as we go live at 2:15 PM! #EPlenary, Turkey, Italy's referendum & more...  
@pollytoynbee prescient as ever. This is from 2008. How sad to be so accurate #trump #brexit  
Read @theipaper today for a fab extract from @IanDunt 's shocking book on #Brexit and learn how it could all go wrong  
Reading on my way to Edinburgh #brexit  
90 Labour MPs launch fierce attack on hard #Brexit #Remain #YesEU 
Bad news for @PHammondMP: absolutely no way we will only borrow £55.5bn as OBR predicted back in March & no it's not just about Brexit  
The men campaigning to reverse #Brexit. Can you trust a single one of them?  
UKIP put under investigation for allegedly misspending taxpayers' money on the EU referendum  
British households have lost £1.2 trillion of wealth since Brexit vote  
Britain slaps down Trump idea for Brexit's Farage to be ambassador  
Sir Richard Branson funding new campaign group to fight Brexit | Politics | The Guardian  
'Time to listen to the people' Plan to oust out of touch Remoaner MPs from Brexit areas  
Spot on Branson. Funding a group to reverse the referendum result.  
The UK lost more than 400,000 of its millionaires because of Brexit 
#EU Parliament #Brexit negotiator @GuyVerhofstadt: We will never accept a deal that would threaten the four freedoms of EU.↑Good.  
I am a signatory to this letter. I believe hard Brexit, indeed Brexit, will make the people I represent poorer  
Richard Branson's Virgin to bankroll a secret Blairite campaign to stop Brexit  - What a tawdry crew they make!! 
Take Back Con Troll#Brexit 
Brexit vote wiped $1.5tn off UK household wealth in 2016, says report  
'Shame on you' Owen Smith hammered after saying he will 'defy democracy' over Brexit vote  
This comment from a reader of the FT has gone viral because it nails the remainer/leaver Brexit row  
Trump ditching the TPP is good news for China, just as #Brexit is good news for Putin.Democracy under threat. #Remain #YesEU 
Owen Smith is shameless in not respecting the #Brexit vote but his constituancy went 50/50 so he can "flip a coin". 
RT: Boycott Money&Co - their CEO, @NicolaHorlick wants to ignore the people and subvert #Brexit  
So what does the British government say about Brexit plans? As little as possible.  
UK constituencies in ALL FOUR countries of the United Kingdom voted Leave at the EU Referendum in June. pic.twitter.com/whPxIYPZka 
.@cpmcgonagle on Brexit transition: Hard Brexit doable, if that's really what you want, but you need more than 2 yrs  
The gap between the Brexit deal and a new UK-EU trade deal could be very painful for Britain.   
One good thing about Farage becoming ambassador would to see him forced to serve tiny Ferrero Rocher when they're downsized after Brexit. 
BREXIT: Theresa May vows to slash the rate of tax that Starbucks and Google can avoid to 17%. 
Leavers won't be bullied out of a Brexit by Remoaners or Eurocrats, writes @danieljhannan 
Britain is on course to borrow billions more this year than officials predicted  
Great to see so many @UKLabour MPs united in their opposition to a destructive Hard Brexit #LeaveWatch 
FX Markets Signal Brexit-Like Disruption As Italy Referendum Looms  
Big offshore business and businessmen that avoid U.K. tax tend to be anti- #brexit don't they?     
Support for EU rises since Brexit vote, survey shows -  (Including in the UK. I am surprised and intrigued by this.) 
Canada quashes hopes of quick UK trade deal after #Brexit as Finance minister says EU, China & US are priority  
The PM says #brexit will present challenges but also offer opportunites. Please could she outline exactly what those opportunities might be? 
He lied to win a referendum then stepped down when asked to make his lies the reality we wanted. And he's ANOTHER WHITE SUPREMACIST. So, no!  
Last minute tickets available for tonight's event in London with us & @NewEuropeans about EU Citizens and Brexit  
I hear that Mr Juncker is thinking of proposing to No 10 that Ken Clarke "would do a great job" as Britain's chief Brexit negotiator. 
Branson now working against the people sponsoring Blair with funds to wreck brexit. Enough. Patriots boycott the pansy and his companies. 
Majority of people would now vote to stay in EU, survey suggests ...idiots realise pile of lies sold...stop Brexit 
Brexit slashes UK household wealth by $1.5 trillion, according to a new report  
#Brexit vote wiped $1.5tn off UK household wealth in 2016, saysCredit Suisse report  If only someone had warned us! 
Brexit: Britain needs to get out of the European Union as quickly as possible. @Daily_Express 
Put the Golgi apparatus in charge of Brexit. It knows how to organise a complex structure with incoming and outgoing traffic. #GolgiBrexit 
Why President Trump undermines the liberal case for Brexit:  
ITALY: Trouble for #Renzi as all regions now lean 'NO'. Still, no euro (or EU) exit if #Referendum is lost. My take:  
Front Pages: Brexit 'will hasten new vote on independence' reports @heraldscotland #brexitshambles 
Oligarchy planning to subvert verdict of popular sovereignty. Branson reportedly funding campaign to reverse Brexit  
Chatting to @JoMaloneMBE on @BBCBreakfast about Autumn Statement, Brexit, the economy and her advice for entrepreneurs:  
When the left needs to rise to the challenge of fascism & Brexit Corbyn tweets garbage like this. He's a failure   
Deeply unfunny Leftist comedians are really struggling now they're not on winning side. Brexit/Trump have taken the wind out of their sails. 
Richard Branson is reportedly bankrolling a new 'Blairite campaign' to fight against Brexit.  
This is apparently what 'taking back control' looks like: Trump telling the UK govt who to appoint. #Brexit #Farage 
A "hard" Brexit would be "very very damaging" for Britain, Labour's Jeremy Corbyn says  
You talk about #Brexit Mr Trump but do you get the bit about us taking the decisions, not a foreign power?  
"Let's take the £350m a week we give to the EU, double it, and give it to multinational companies as compensation for Brexit." #winning 
Richard Branson to fund anti-Brexit campaign 
Today Canada, yesterday Denmark. Britain's traditional allies unsurprisingly put their own trading interests before historical ties. #Brexit  
according to a new Credit Suisse report, Brexit has cost U.K. Households  $1.5 TRILLION so far. Great teamwork from Boris and Cameron there. 
Let's get this straight. Ordinary, decent people vote in a referendum. Then millionaires try to block the result. WTF has happened Britain? 
People who would like a hard Brexit: President-elect Donald Trump, Putin, Thomas Mair, far-right groups & people who can't grasp economics 
TAX DODGING Richard Branson's Virgin to bankroll WAR CRIMINAL Tony Blair's secret campaign to stop Brexit  
One of the guys teaming up with Branson and Blair to STOP Brexit. pic.twitter.com/fWJLKPbDhg 
We are sadly heading towards a damaging hard Tory Brexit. Find out what that means via link. #brexitshambles 
Hard Brexit would leave British people poorer –I am one of the  90 Labour MPs who are against a hard brexit 
Sir Richard Branson funding new campaign group to fight Brexit  
Brexit vote wiped $1.5tn off UK household wealth in 2016, report says  
Dear #Brexit'ersNext time, it might be worth listening to those experts, rather than idiots like #Boris & #Farage. 
The EU is preparing for the UK to have a Hard Brexit, whilst UK is flailing around - outstanding by @CER_Grant:  
They just want snouts in Brussels trough & B.Liar wants to be top PIG (Napoleon in Animal Farm) #OrwellianBritain #Brexit #Blair 
Brexit vote wiped $1.5tn off UK household wealth in 2016, report says  
Outside the EU we will be more free & more in control of our own livesWelcome to #BrexitBritain#Brexit #OpenBritain #GreatBritain #No2EU 
Passengers on Britain's longest train ride agree there's no return ticket from Brexit  
Is this now a parody account? #Farage #May #Trump #Brexit  
Sir Richard Branson funding new campaign group to fight Brexit  
The collapse in the value of the pound since the EU referendum has cost UK households $1.5tn  
Richard Branson has pledged to help fund a campaign to block Brexit  
.@OwenSmith_MP is right: #Brexit, if it happens, will be a total, utter disaster for this country. We need a vote on the negotiated deal.  
"Whitehall can’t cope with legal nightmare of Brexit, say experts"This is spot-on from @thetimes 
A smooth sensible transitional Brexit wld make sense. "May climbs down from a cliff edge at CBI" via @thetimes 
The Bad Boys of Brexit are coming to town  
Canada quashes hopes of quick UK trade deal after Brexit  via @FT 
The Government is out of its depth. #Brexit is a terrible idea and a disaster waiting to happen #stopbrexit 
Brexit concerns are proved to be unfounded...again: Britain's economy is growing faster than the ENTIRE G7  
Brexit was a bus to nowhere, driven by xenophobic bigotry, lacking direction, heralding false promises, now called out for what it misstated  
If you ever need reminding why we voted Brexit, here's today's FT on the European Court. The judges happily ADMIT they defrauded the people  
With growing support for #Brexit and as political consensus fails to build, #UK gets pushed towards #HardBrexit. 
Brexit, Le Pen, Trump: "The whisper of old dark dangers - civilization is more fragile than we care to understand." 
Brexit Secretary David Davis to meet EU negotiator  
"Sir Richard Branson funding new campaign group to fight Brexit"  
There appear to be potentially as many interpretations of Brexit as there are interpreters - one reason why it is unlikely to materialise.  
#Brexit MP's say that Blair back in politics would be a big boost for their cause.LMAO ... Politics is funny ;-) 
The EU expects a harsh version of Brexit, writes @CER_Grant 
IBM invests in UK data centers as tech sector defies Brexit worries  
Brexit vote takes $1.5tn from UK household wealth - report  
Six key principles for building an effective post-Brexit business strategy. @Dlancefield  #Brexit  
.@JosieLong on Brexit: “Like Trump, few people were voting FOR the thing on offer.”  
Facebook is opening up a new London office, despite Brexit uncertainty  
Sad one of my teenage heroes has turned into a troll who forgets Galileo. Per Brexit per the stars: Eppur si Muove.  
Polling suggests British voters want mutually exclusive outcomes from Brexit  
.@AlanCumming: "Trump makes Brexit look positively benign — still a tumor, but one that hasn't metastasized yet."  pic.twitter.com/CffCElI5Jh 
Brexit slashes UK household wealth by $1.5 trillion, according to a new report  
#LOL-& by the way, @CNN -@Nigel_Farage did not "lead" #Brexit campaign.He was  kept out. Even thought #Leave might lose.#nigelfarage-#hoax 
This Friday from 1pm HK time @fcchk will live stream Chris Patten’s talk, A World After @realDonaldTrump and #brexit #askchrispatten 
totally disagree it just means I have no idea what I am doing I have no plan for Brexit & I am in a blind panic .... 
I have column in @guardian tmrw on Mayhem govt's feeble infrastructure dribble as public finances collapse as economy slows due to Brexit 
I think 'wrongle' should be a verb, e.g. 'That election was wrongled!' 'Brexit was a national wrongling' 'Wrongle me would you? Ha!' 
URGENT! BREXIT patriots need our help! VIRGIN'S Richard Branson bankrolling secret campaign to STOP BREXIT! Say NO! 
Here is every UK headline tomorrow: "Trump endorses Brexit leader, Tory rival as ambassador to US." 
What a year, #brexit, Trump and now David Hasselhoff @iemmys wins comedy Hoff the Record. Thanks The Hoff, of course 
you sure? seems like the referendum mr farage championed was pretty popular 
Literally nobody wants that. He quit as soon as Brexit won because he lied to win. Must be why you love him. 
"Sociology has a Trump problem. And a Brexit problem. And a Populism problem." via @LSEsociology  
IBM invests in UK data centers as tech sector defies Brexit worries  
@AngieMeader The biggest lie was "It's your decision" when the referendum was advisory & MP's all knew it was advisory 
Brexit and Trump have exposed the left’s crucial flaw: playing by the rules | Jonathan Freedland  
BREXIT show going to flop 2017.Costs spiraling Farage directing chaos & 52 % pre booked tickets have stalled now +10% now demanding refund   
#TrumpAltRightFilms Brexit through the Gift Shop 
May said that while Brexit creates market uncertainty, there will be opportunities for "dynamic trading agreements"  
Think about this... #UK Gov't has put #Milo on an "extremist" list as a #Gay man who criticizes #Islam.#BRexit  
America's #Brexit… RELEGATE Congress, Supreme Court, Fed Judges 2 advisory role ONLY! -gf #dtmag 
Anti-Trump sentiment boosts #Calexit campaign 4 California to leave union. #Calexit referendum#secession 
Oh - that'll be the hard Brexit cliff that May told Corporate UK she'd save them from  
Lame lame lame lame lame #Brexit  
New definition of Brexit based on the confused messaging of this shambolic Tory government   
We are in a very precarious place as #brexit assumptions fall one by one.  
Remoaners plot to sabotage Brexit - but 70% of BRITONS want to get on with leaving EU 70% for BrexitNow 
The idea that Karjakin will now win the match is right up there with 'Brexit will never happen' and 'Trump will never win'.#carlsenkarjakin 
IBM invests in UK data centers as tech sector defies Brexit worries  
I accept the #EUref result + don't support calls for a second ref but am one of 90 Lab MPs opposed to a Hard Brexit  
Urgent Urgent urgent:Richard Branson's Virgin to bankroll secret Blairite campaign to stop Brexit  
I know that was true of the notorious 350M Bus for Brexit, but Trump's campaign was nothing BUT a tissue of lies, and still a success 
And Brexit will guarantee a second vote is lost too. It will be a referendum on having the euro.  
Steve Bell on the Theresa May's Brexit options – cartoon  
Theresa May says Brexit Britain will be 'cutting edge'. It's time she started telling the truth  
Richard Branson has pledged to help fund a campaign to block Brexit  
As peripheral Eurozone bond yields spike, all eyes now on Italian constitutional referendum. Dec 4th. Possible next big crisis. 
Rickman. Bowie. Prince. Muhammad Ali. Brexit vote. Gene Wilder. Trump's win. Leonard Cohen. And everything else I can't fit in one tweet.  
GUYS THE I <3 N-GONS SHIRT IS BACK!  … (also available in EU) #brexit #polycount @polycount #3d 
Mutlilateral free trade deals died tonight, post Trump remarks. We return to world of bilateral deals. None of this known during referendum. 
Sir Richard Branson funding new campaign group fighting Brexit  
Tariffs, trade barriers, falling investment - Hard Brexit would be a disaster for working people  
The EU institutions expect the UK to go for a very hard Brexit, cutting trade & investment, i write:@CER_London 
When I said Brexit means BrexitWhat I meant was Brexit means a kinda Brexit but not fully Brexit, maybe just over halfway/or not at all!  
.@CarolineLucas says one cause of Brexit was loss of trust in politicians and that was partly due to "way Blair took us to war" #newsnight 
"Brexit happened because ppl dont trust politicians anymore. Why's that? Not least in part because of Tony Blair"- @CarolineLucas #newsnight 
So why is Labour asking, like May, for access to the single market rather than staying in it, that is a hard brexit  
Comment: @BBCScotlandNews @STVNews running the scotrail 'crisis' to the bone? It's not a crisis. Brexit is a crisis.  
Scroll down for my thoughts on how music might bring people together in resistance to a time of Trump & Brexit  
.@DVATW Please can you promote this #BREXIT protest in #London 23 November? Thanks 
#Brexit is pointless if #Britain stays in the #singlemarket, says top #economist!  #BBC #SKY #ITV #UK #EU #NEWS #RT 
Strong Labour rejection of Hard Brexit - which would be a disaster for working people, business & the economy.   
Farran & Olney: we're with you if you drop the adjective 'hard' before '#Brexit.' 'No Brexit' has to be the call. 
There will be money for tax cuts. And to compensate business for Brexit. But there won't be any money for the NHS  
Here's a letter I signed to the guardian on why a hard Brexit will hit working people  
Brexit was merely the 'canary in the coal mine'. The main event is now in progress...  
Branson, Clegg, Geldof and Blair to defy democracy and push for second referendum.Men of the people.  
90 Labour MPs write to condemn Hard Brexit as "the most destructive of settlements", leaving British people poorer.  
To understand how the threat to us over #Brexit is now existential, read Will Hutton  
It's The Internet's Fault We Didn't Learn From Brexit 
Arron Banks: the man who bought Brexit. Arrogant, self-absorbed, insecure: he'll tear the country apart just for fun  
Labour MPs stand up against a hard Brexit which would hit worst off worst of all 
DiEM25’s internal Brexit Process Referendum is on – analysis & open call  
Facebook Likes Post-Brexit UK, Plans Thousands More Jobs  
I'm guessing that if Tony Blair still had an army at his disposal, we'd be at war with the fictional state of Brexit by now.  
PLEASE RT: Just some of the times the Stronger In campaign confirmed: "If we leave the #EU, we leave the #SingleMarket." #Brexit #EURef 
Brexit and Trump have exposed the left’s crucial flaw: playing by the rules | Jonathan Freedland  
56% of the UK now wants to remain in the EU. #Farage and his twisted US ego trip has shown that it was just a game to him #Brexit #NoThanks 
Tomorrow's front page: May backtracks on worker representation on boards ... as legal expert says Brexit puts employee rights at risk  
And what to make of this re Brexit Secretary visit...  
European Commission chief Brexit negotiator trolling the Foreign Secretary, deniably.... #prosecco 
Just pressed the button for a reprint of THE BAD BOYS OF BREXIT. The bad boys will be pleased. Eh @Arron_banks @Nigel_Farage @andywigmore? 
Tuesday's Independent digital front:Branson's Virgin to bankroll Blairites' secret anti-Brexit campaign#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
We're almost 5 months on from #EURef. And we still have no inkling whatsoever how #Brexit will actually work. Extraordinary.  
Hard Brexit would be disaster for working people, say Labour MPs "This is not what they voted for in June.” 
when someone writes a particularly terrible trump/brexit/corbyn hot take  
I will be on @BBCNewsnight tonight to celebrate @tonyblairoffice's intervention in the Brexit debate 
Hard #Brexit would leave British people poorer – 90 Labour MPs write letter to The Guardian  
Richard Branson's Virgin to bankroll a secret Blairite campaign to stop Brexit  
Here's my big Brexit essay/review from the New Statesman. Features Orwell on Brexiteers, kind of   
Blair anti-Brexit campaign funded by Bearded Bullshitter Branson, who bases his business in non-EU Switzerland & himself in non-EU Caribbean pic.twitter.com/dVHjtXXXwe 
The new edition of my book The Limits of Neoliberalism, w/ new post-Brexit (ahem, pre-Trump) intro is out next week  
Hard Brexit would be disaster for working people, say 90 Labour MPs in response to the 60 Tory Brexiteers  
#RichardBranson is as bad for Britain as #brexit will be.   
How a US PR company conned UK voters into voting for Brexit:  pic.twitter.com/ga2NrIogjh 
PM warned transition Brexit deal 'fiendishly difficult' to achieve  
Aren't we reading too much into Theresa May's #Brexit 'hints'? It's increasingly clear she doesn't really know what's happening either.  
Richard Branson's Virgin to bankroll a secret Blairite campaign to stop Brexit  
Brexit, Trump & now Fillon: Surprise result of French center-right primary  
Is there a petition for #Canadians who 'don't' want a referendum?   #erre 
"How to counter charges we have no ideas/direction after insipid campaigning in the referendum?" "I know! The random platitude generator!"  
Every time #DianneAbbot opens her mouth #Labour lose another 1000 supporters - #ToxicTonyBlair & #DohaveanotherSausagerollDianeAbbot #BREXIT  
The great British food price hike is coming soon due to falling Brexit pound: 
Brexit will be a disaster for all but the few.  
Man tipped to be US ambassador to UK gives BRILLIANT swipe at EU in hint of Brexit deal   
Stop PUNISHING Britain: Polish president calls for EU to stop Brexit blackmail  
Mr. Brexit tells it like it is. Perhaps the people in GB should start listening to him. Enlist in the #USFA at . 
#Brexit supporters claim that they want Britain to regain its sovereignty. So why don't they demand independence from Murdoch!#Remain 
Brexit is pointless if Britain stays in single market, says top economist  via @Daily_Express #brexit 
Wasn't Theresa May's choice of words telling today - 'cliff edge'. Reveals what she won't dare admit in public: Brexit is suicidal 
There can be few bigger potential disruptions to the future growth & prosperity of the UK than the Official Opposition accepting any Brexit.  
There is no such thing as an upside to #Brexit - the truth is appearing now and the idiots and their lies are finally being exposed...  
I joined the Lib Dems here after Brexit. Our only centrist-liberal-pro-EU party now. 
Python's French knights on the ramparts took Arthur and his men more seriously than the EU are currently taking the UK Brexit negotiators. 
If the EU breaks up it will give Putin a free hand politically & economically in eastern Europe. #Brexit - Working hard for Putin#Remain 
Britain's economy is growing faster than the ENTIRE G7. But but .... whatever happened to #Brexit apocalypse   
Let's get outside this Customs Union Protection Racket and import cheaper food from N. American & Africa. #Brexit  
DETAILS: #Crimea rejoined #Russia following 2014 referendum  
Sean dyche voted brexit  #georgeintegritywhitebread 
Browne says "Brexit is happening...time for grieving is over...must look to the future, to new markets..." 
Hey @timfarron - more people voted to leave the EU than voted for your political party. Stop trying to block Brexit #RespectTheResult 
According to @Channel4News, 5 tech companies already moved to Germany, more soon. My postdoc already in Berlin. Brexit is commercial suicide 
Here is the (pre-Trump) lecture on Brexit I did for the Manchester Industrial Relations Society 27/10/16 -  
NEW: The Brexit-Trump Syndrome: it’s the economics, stupid  
Likening Trump win to #Brexit, Draghi says "these changes have a long term impact that's very difficult to assess."  
Hard Brexit would be disaster for working people, say Labour MPs  
British support for the EU up 7 per cent since Brexit referendum  
This election was a referendum on decency. #Trumpism 
They are sitting back doing nothing  4 Scotland re BrexitThey are leaving it to London to determine our future Hand wringing two#indyref 
Do you have faith in Theresa May delivering Brexit? 
'The looming Brexit seems to be the best advertisement for the EU so far,' according to a German think-tank  
'Stop Brexit' party 'would beat Labour and Ukip in a general election'.  
There is no cliff edge, hard or soft #BrexitWe voted to leave the EU, single market, customs union, free movementThe whole shooting match 
Positive meeting with First Minister @NicolaSturgeon & Scot Chamber Network discussing #Brexit, Business Growth & International Trade  
Google and Facebook back post-Brexit UK, but tech worries linger  
No. 10 would have trouble running a bath, yet alone Brexit.  
Why brexiters are so keen to avoid 2nd referendum! By August 56% in UK want to stay in EU. Likely to be higher now. 
the #CalExit referendum has been filed !!!!thanks .@YesCalifornia I vote YES!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! 
Brexit POINTLESS if Britain stays in single market, says top economist | City & Business | Finance | Daily Express  
Dear Mr Corbyn. Remove the words "...a mishandled and chaotic..." & you'd be spot on. How about #Labour takes that on board?#Brexit  
Brexit Success: Manufacturing Activity Surges to 25 year high  via @saul42 
There's a only one type of Brexit and that is suicide for the UK.   A 2nd vote is needed before we pull the trigger. 
PLEASE RT: Just some of the times the Stronger In campaign confirmed:"If we leave the EU, we leave the Single Market." #Brexit #EURef 
There can be few bigger potential disruptions to the future growth and prosperity of the UK than a mishandled and chaotic Brexit #CBI2016 
It's almost been 5 months since the EU referendum. Yet, the Tories have *still* failed to lay out any post-EU plan. Shambolic. Tory. Brexit. 
Hand your 'Brexit bonus' to food banks, MEPs told  
Is the timing of Brexit wise given the timing of Trump's voyage into the unknown? See my Snowblog:  
Brexit or Bust:  
As we hurtle into the brick wall of reality & the lies, risks and confused aims of Brexit derail the 'mandate',the zealots just shout louder  
RETWEET: Politicians should get on with it! #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
Labour leader @jeremycorbyn warns of "chaotic #Brexit" in #CBI2016 speech  
I've seen hacks prostitute themselves in the Soviet times but what I am seeing now #MSM doing in Britain is much worse. #Brexit 
Legalising cannabis won’t save us from our Brexit budget black hole, but it will make things much easier  
Labour leader @jeremycorbyn sets out his party's #Brexit plan at #CBI2016 
The British Pound has risen to $1.2511 and €1.1780 as Theresa May reassures business over Brexit.  
Businesses have been plunged into huge uncertainty by a Government that has no plan at all for Brexit, says @jeremycorbyn #CBI2016 
The EU Brexit negotiator. And the Remoaners want the PM to state our negotiating position...#wonderful 
"There can be few bigger potential disruptions to the future growth and prosperity of the UK than a mishandled and chaotic Brexit." #CBI2016 
This is going to be lively tonight. #Brexit #Trump 
Do us all a favour - just call off Brexit?  We all know it'll be a disaster. Go down in history as the one who prevented the trainwreck!  
Enjoy your EU27 while you can. Brexit was the first brick in the wall.  
Oh dear. Referendum press release sent by James McGrory: Vote Leave “plan to pull Britain out of the Single Market”. 
BREXIT BRITAIN BOOM FOR EU SUPPORT!as the Daily Express might say. EU popularity up in many countries. 56% in UK. 
ouch - this from the EU's chief Brexit negotiator  
British support for the EU up 7% since Brexit referendum  
"The British people are sovereign & must have the opportunity to say no to a damaging & irresponsible Hard #Brexit."  
Watch the trailer for #UndercoverMigrant my new film on falling through the cracks in Brexit Britain, directed @avantgrant. 
California will have a referendum in 2018 on whether to have a referendum in 2019 on whether to become independent from the US... #Calexit 
-WE are the Majority!Support for the European Union in Britain has risen to 56% since the EU referendum#Remain 
EU's top Brexit negotiator: "Nice to see you, but come back when you have an offer to make."  
Has @theresa_may betrayed Brexit vote by talking of transition arrangements out of EU?  
After Trump and Brexit, French voting hard to call  
If the referendum were held again, Remain would win, study shows  
Scottish Claim of Right to be used in Brexit case against UK government  
If only there was some visual way I could express how Brexit is going...  
This morning courtesy visit from @daviddavismp at his request. No negotiation without notification. My work is now focused on EU27. #Brexit. 
.@DavidDavisMP met European Commission’s chief Brexit negotiator to discuss preparations for an “orderly” EU exit.  
The pound's sudden jump is the sort of move that could become the norm  
getting bad if Number 10 can't even allow Number 10 to speak on Brexit matters now 
Quitlers who deny our political rights Have no entitlement to our taxes For their #brexit, pensions, benefits or services.#socialcontract 
To judge by the vituperation #Brexit zealots are dishing out on Twitter, they are really worried that reality is having a salutary effect. 
Govt sources say May's 'cliff edge' comment was not an intentional hint at a transitional Brexit deal 
Fabric is reopening. Good news. A decent bit of people power. Now it's time to take this Brexit dream to the promised land. 
_The European Court of Justice is likely to end up ruling on Brexit, its President has predicted#HSIIY Brexiters 
#Luxembourg MEP @CharlesGoerens wants 'associate citizenship' for Brits after #Brexit  
Support for the EU in Britain and across Europe actually grew following the referendum, according to survey data  
'Facebook shrugs off Brexit and announces London recruitment spree' @gerardgrech comments:  
Europe's highest court likely to end up ruling on Brexit  
We've had enough prevarication on #Brexit from #TheresaMay. Out means OUT. Trigger #Article 50 now - end the delay. It only empowers #Remain 
As a true-born Briton, I feel nothing but excitement at the prospect of Brexit fizzling out amid compromise & muddle  
This disgusting rhetoric is the language now seen as openly acceptable as a result of Brexit vote.That, and terrible spelling. #LordyHelpUs 
There is nothing more reassuring to the masses than a Royal Visit abroad to convince them that Britain isn't sinking. #PrinceHarry #brexit 
On my way into the Elysée in Paris to argue that workers should not pay the price for #Brexit  
Alex Salmond's former constituency voted for Brexit  
What are the two worst crashes in VIX history? The US Election and Brexit. THIS: $SPY $GBPUSD $VIX 
Before EU Ref people were very optimistic about UK economy. Now Gov using words like Brexit 'cliff-edge'.   
What Britain has to ask is what would we do if Germany or France had voted for #Brexit-Well we'd be showing them no quarter. #TheresaMay 
Labour 2016: leadership keen on #Brexit, tax cuts for the wealthy, not so keen on NATO. It's not such a great look. 
Hey, alt-right, why are you still acting like angry outsiders. You won Brexit, you've got Trump. You are the establishment. Be content. 
Like the Polish quickly had to learn in the wake of Brexit and hate crimes directed at them as well. 
Brexit's impact prompts BOE proposal to increase deposit guarantee  
Today's column: post 2016, post indyref, post Brexit, Holyrood seems on the cusp of radical political dysfunction.  
Leave campaign and #Brexit effort = a mass of confusions and wishful-thinking, but the real choice is: disaster Brexit, or no Brexit.  
The EU's highest court may potentially play a pivotal role as Brexit unfolds  
Neither London nor Brussels saw fit to announce in advance the first meeting between UK Brexit minister and EC Brexit negotiator today 
In 'Undercover Migrant', we go undercover to unearth the conditions migrants are up against in Brexit Britain. Coming soon to VICE.  
What is a 'transitional' Brexit deal and what would it involve?  
>And So, The Brexodus Begins"Citi becomes first US bank supervised by ECB since Brexit vote" 
Before Brexit! EU migrants pocket MORE tax credits cash and child benefits than BRITISH workers  
Lille advertises for Brexit businesses at Bond St tube. "Stability of EU's regulatory and legal system."  
The PM’s £2bn for science could cancel loss of EU funds post Brexit. But tighter immigration may hold back research.  
You either support the biggest & most extreme right wing project in modern British history, or you oppose it @johnmcdonnellMP#Brexit 
I remember that, after Brexit, I didn’t know how to speak to those who disagreed with me until I had read the newspaper. It was tough. (1) 
#Brexit latest  
Brexit and BrexHRC were powerful statements to global elites. They didn't see it coming. Sovereignty is a good thing. #tcot #ccot #gop #maga 
Scottish constituency of Banff and Buchan ‘voted for Brexit'.  … 
No one in the Leave campaign talked about leaving the Single Market before the referendum. How that has changed.  
Shutting down offshore tax havens would shut down several of #Brexit's main financial and media backers :)#Remain #YesEU 
What does Brexit mean? UK business has no idea  via @Bfly 
The lid on Tory #brexit differences will come off in parliamentary debate and vote - that`s the sole reason why T. May is opposed to it. 
Biggest threat to democracy is wealthy demagogues. Not heard Ukip/Brexit squillionaire insurance salesman Arron Banks back donation caps... 
The great British food price hike is coming soon  
Following a 1992 referendum, Amsterdam decided to fade out cars from its center. 25 years later & still ongoing. 
T.Blair, who opened floodgates to immigration, leading campaign  against Brexit  Disaster for Remain, Landslide for Leave 
Ironic as #Brexit represents the same forces of nationalism and xenophobic populism that culminated in National Socialism#Remain 
Everytime Brexit talks, GBP declines. It went up after Remain funded court case. Who is talking UK down here? 
Time to come clean @RuthDavidsonMSP;Riddle deepens over Ruth Davidson and allegations of referendum election fraud  
"Living outside of the U.S. isn't an escape": @hammock_tussock reflects on the US election from Brexit Britain:  
MAY: "Brexit means Brexit. It means Brexit today. It means Brexit tomorrow. It will mean Brexit in 30yrs when we quietly kill it. Brexit." 
My money - and that of other 'remoaners' - is paying for the #Brexit shambles. So no, we won't just 'get over it'. We'll fight all the way.  
Has your business addressed the implications of Brexit and associated sterling currency risk? #GlobalAmbition 
This by @jacopobarigazzi is a must read on the political economy of the Italian referendum (at home vs. in BXL)   
.@theresa_may paints a positive and open picture of #Brexit in today's CBI speech  
Good news! We will decide if Brexit is legal, says EU court 
Make Britain great again, it already was. Take back control, we already had it. Give NHS £350M instead. The 3 biggest Brexit lies of all. 
Fewer Polish people are interested in emigrating after Brexit, study suggests  
@KateOsamorYou are educated enough to know that  #SelfDetermination is universal law.Recommend a #Referendum or shut up #BiafraExit 
Theresa May signals Brexit could be delayed   
Cancel the appeal and cancel Brexit. It is the right thing to do.  
Those in Westminster may be fighting, but British voters have moved on & want to see the Government make a success of Brexit.  
Make no mistake with #TheresaMay as PM Brexit will be soft for the 1% and Hard for the 99%. 
After Brexit, more Britons would vote remain than Italians or French. Remain sentiment on the rise everywhere but Spain via @BertelsmannSt 
NEW: Britain could stay in EU for longer than expected after Theresa May warns of Brexit 'cliff edge' -  
Where would be the democratic remedy if in a few years time an overwhelming majority wished #Brexit had never happened?#Remain #YesEU 
"Support for the EU on the rise since #Brexit vote"...Maybe by Guardian readers!We do NOT buy "pollsters" fibs! 
Difficulty with a comprehensive Brexit transition deal is UK would have to accept free movement & ECJ during interim  
Theresa May hints at transitional Brexit deal to avoid 'cliff edge' – video  
Tony Blair is back, and Brexit MPs are absolutely ecstatic  
I love my country. If we are to Brexit, I'd like it to be on the basis of the evidence.  
Well…The “Brexit mandate” requires that UK negotiate exit terms pre-A50.Which cannot happen.Ergo - there is no mandate for Article 50.  
Great to catch up with @Scientists4EU earlier. Together we can send a strong message to this government against a damaging hard Brexit  
Green party co-leader @CarolineLucas on Brexit: What The Hell Happens Now?  
Why do we continue to pay huge sums in EU budget contributions when our famous Royal Navy is so underfunded? #Brexit  
#OpenBritain's misleading viral #video ripped apart by @afneil on #dailypolitics. #Brexit  #BBC #SKY #ITV #UK #EU #RT 
Remoaners plot to sabotage Brexit - but 70% of BRITONS want to get on with leaving EU  
#Brexit will probably end up before European Court of Justice: ECJ's Lenaerts  /via @duncanrobinson & @alexebarker 
Does this, or does this not mean PM accepts here has to be a transitional Brexit deal? -  'people don’t want a cliff edge' - Discuss... 
"Many, many ways" Brexit could end up before European Court of Justice, says EU's top judge  
Support for the EU on the rise since Brexit vote … even in the UK - The Guardian  
PlayCanvas interviewed live on BBC News  #startup #brexit  
This week's #Brexit fact:  
UK Government should come clean on US trade deal plans - @LeanneWood  #Brexit  
Good slide pack from @resfoundation on US election, & similarities & diffs to Brexit vote.  
Meeting with FM Santos Silva in Lisbon today. On the cooperation agenda: EU, values and principles, migration, Brexit and more.  
BREXIT: MPs push for 'clean break' from European Union amid fears of Remainer sabotage  
Stocks from the Brexit LowsBrazil: +25%Japan: +22%UK: +17%China: +15%Russia: +14%Europe: +13%US: +10%India: 0%Mexico: -6% 
EU systematically misjudges UK politics, and thus underestimates the UK's willingness to accept hard Brexit.  
Facebook shrugs off Brexit and announces London recruitment spree  
MAY: "We'll extend austerity to pay for Brexit and cut corporation tax. It's what you voted for. It's the will of the people. Psyche." 
Brexit is pointless if Britain stays in the single market, says top economist Professor Patrick Minford.  
North's finance minister calls for united Ireland - "Brexit has put in stark relief, the dangers of partition" 
President Putin on #Brexit: I believe in common sense in EU & London. Hope the reasonable agreement will be reached.  
Intriguing. No10 just floated possibility of extending Article 50 timeline. Presumed Brexit would happen in 2019, but PM has no fixed date. 
New @BertelsmannSt study: #Brexit has raised support for EU membership in Germany, Poland, France, Italy &... the UK  
Paradoxical, perhaps, but Brexit has increased support for the EU, also in UK. Lack of true alternative a factor.  
Like Apple and Google before it, Facebook is the latest tech company to commit to post-Brexit Britain!  
Prime Minister Theresa May on her Brexit strategy - and plans to get workers on boards of firms.  
Support for the EU on the rise since Brexit vote … even in the UK  
Scottish tidal energy defies Brexit to win EU funding for new turbine project  
Join us tomorrow for an event with @axellelemaire: Innovation & Franco-British cooperation in the context of Brexit  
Not at CBI today, but apart from PM reverse on workers on boards, hint on Brexit transition deal: "people don’t want a cliff edge" important 
Brexit is pointless if Britain stays in the single market, says top economistProfessor Patrick Minford.  
If May has something to say about Brexit shouldn't she be saying it to parliament? 
Brexit road signs #RoadSafetyWeek 
There is no 'hard' and 'soft' Brexit. There is only Brexit. And it's very, very hard. 
Brexit boosts EU support across EU to 62%. In UK, support for the EU has grown from 49% pre vote to 57% #YesEU 
Why do we continue to pay huge sums in EU budget contributions when our famous Royal Navy is so underfunded? #Brexit 
Not  true. More nuanced view among the grown ups was that Brexit would prove a slow car crash. Falling £ as "boost"  was silly/shortsighted  
They did everything to keep Scotland in, now doing everything to take Scotland out....... Better Together #brexit  
Any "transitional" Brexit deal has a fair chance of becoming, in practice, the permanent deal.  Content of such a deal will be important. 
Well.Realistic indication on Brexit from the government.  
I'd Brexit from this European mess too > Final polls show Italy’s Renzi heading for referendum defeat – Bloomberg 
RemainersLost self respect by rejecting #Brexit vote.About to lose soul to the devil.#Blair?How low can you go? 
Vote in AFCO on the EU citizenship amendment proposal delayed to the morning of December 8th.#Brexit 
'Moth' swoops on Theresa May during CBI speech on Brexit  
So @sarahjolney1 anti-Brexit but wants Brexit to go ahead, anti-Heathrow expansion but her husband expanded Heathrow  
PM's biggest hint yet she will ask for transition period post Brexit: "People don’t want a cliff edge". But what will the EU27s price be? 
Still baffled by Remainers being attacked for being wrong about economic impact 'since Brexit'. Deep breath: *WE HAVEN'T LEFT YET *  
Anyone who understands supply chains knows #Brexiit is an economic disaster Next CEO warns of perils of hard Brexit  
May hints UK will seek a transitional Brexit deal to cushion impact of leaving EU -  
This is exactly why you can't trust Tories. They 'say' they'll protect workers' rights post #Brexit. They won't @The_TUC @TradeUnionGroup 
.@theresa_may wants post-Brexit UK at "cutting edge"  
Jasmine Whitbread: Save the children 
Theresa May warns business leaders to embrace Brexit or face the wrath of the public  
#Brexit gives us chance to "shape a new future for our nation" - @theresa_may #cbi2016  
#Brexit was never going to be cheap...  
.@theresa_may says she knows #Brexit means uncertainty for businesses, but there are also opportunities #CBI 
But @theresa_may promises to provide more Brexit info without actually giving any #cbi2016 
For first time @theresa_may commits to provide more Brexit info, to business #cbi2016 
Britain's businesses must embrace reform and be ready to change, Theresa May says  #CBI2016 
Never mind Brexit and Trump, this is the most pressing challenge facing the country. Really alarming stats here... 
May repeats her analysis that Brexit vote was symptom of wider call for change for a 'stronger and fairer country' 
With around 31,000 European scientists working in the UK, politicians want assurance they can stay following #Brexit  
Brexit means #Brexit. Surely 'workers on boards' means 'workers on boards'? Is Theresa May backtracking on promises?  
CBI president Drechsler paints nightmare of falling off Brexit cliff edge in 2019. #cbi2016 
President of CBI calls for a plan and more certainty from the PM on Brexit -  'what happens when the clock strikes midnight' and we leave 
If people had known in June what we know now about what #Brexit entails, Remain would have won by ten points. 
Today's Times cartoon  #AutumnStatement #Brexit #philiphammond 
Facebook Likes Post-Brexit UK, Plans Thousands More Jobs  
The people who said it was worth the economic hit of #Brexit to retain some imagined sense of sovereignty were usually rich.... 
Brexit campaigners promised £350m week boost for the NHS. Now we have 'revenue black hole' of about £100bn (some say more) over next 4 years  
The Banff and Buchan constituency voted for Brexit... But the SNP want to drag it into the EU against its will.  
#brexit = uncertainty, years of low growth, lower wages, less money for health & education. Poverty &  homelessness for many. Don't do it. 
If Mrs May says #Brexit means Brexit, surely workers on boards means workers on boards?  
.@Open_Britain's misleading viral video ripped apart by @afneil on @daily_politics. #Brexit  
Herodutus noted that Persians made decisions twice. Once drunk. Once sober - before coming to a decision. The Brexit vote was the drunk one 
I like that 'Brexit UK' is trending rather than just 'Brexit' otherwise I'd be confused as to which Brexit everybody was talking about. 
"and when did you last see the Brexit bulletin?"  
Tax cuts for big business whilst more austerity for the poor. This Brexit rage against the elites is going to plan, isn't it? What a con! 
Soft #brexit is a bit better than hard, but both will be more painful than the Europhobes told us...… 
New study of Article 50 TEU confirms that a notice to leave the EU is reversible.  #Brexit #Article50 
"We haven’t seen an impact on our business since Brexit..Sales growth is actually higher than before vote" @smiggle_ 
Finally it dawns that #brexit is a lunacy that follows from years of austerity when governments bailed out banks and blamed the immigrant. 
The Bad Boys of Brexit – an "excellent account of the #EURef campaign exposing the petty conniving of all involved" 
70% of UK firms to focus on innovation following Brexit vote  
"It's amazing. We both like the Daily Mail. We both drive Lexi. Plural. We both like Brexit. It's like the X-Files.""The Brex-Files."  
'Brexit UK' is trending. Presumably to distinguish from all those foreign Brexits people have been talking about. 
Okay, I'll give it a try. Name me one practical, everyday benefit that we'll have with Brexit that we don't have now.  
I know from conversations that at least one Supreme Court judge isn't exactly neutral in the Brexit debate  
Due to #EU and #Merkel opening the gates to dark age barbarism, police officers have to wear chain mail again.#Brexit #DrainTheSwamp #Nexit 
Brexit Fantasy Island: Mail starts week as it means to go on.Says (wrongly) that gloomy forecast "all wrong".Not  all  
BREXIT: MPs push for 'clean break' from European Union amid fears of Remainer sabotage  
The man tipped to be Trump’s man in London has spoken to us - and it looks like he'd be good for Britain and Brexit  
Nick Ferrari ridicules Hamilton actor: “What next? Matilda’s view on Brexit? Widow Twanky on the migrant crisis?”  
Brexit does not mean Brexit if we remain in the Customs Union; beware of the stealth Remain campaign @TheScepticIsle  pic.twitter.com/aABxUQUMRL 
Crisis list1 NHS2 Social care3 Prisons4 Royal Navy5 Buckingham palace 6 Brexit7 Police serviceGovernment decide to fix the palace. 
Philip Hammond prepares businesses for 2 years of uncertainty, ahead of Autumn Statement  
Tycoon Arron Banks alleges he met DUP figure in Feb who demanded £30K a month for party to back his Brexit campaign 
If Uk leaves EU it abandons a brilliant deal for far more risk & far less opportunity. Mad or stupid or both: that's #Brexit for you. 
The Brexit ship  
Exclusive: Germany least prone to populism among EU countries. But overall worrying picture #brexit #AfD @welt  
PM May pledges £2 bn extra R&D funding but doesn't mention this amount of EU R&D funding will be lost post-BREXIT  
Does it really take courage not to betray one’s own best judgment for a self-serving interest? #Brexit >>  
American companies boosting staff numbers in post-Brexit UK:AdobeAlnylamAppleAvonBoeingFacebookGoogleIHSMallinckrodt 
If we leave prices will rise, jobs be lost, cuts to education NHS etc. Best stay in & keep rights. Rich will benefit from brexit, not you.  
Sobering report from Denmark re Brexit. Even friendly countries will be forced to play competitive hardball @FT  
7 in 10 firms plan to increase or maintain #innovation spending in light of #Brexit  #CBI2016 
People worried about Italian Referendum.It is meant to clip wings of their Rajya Sabha so that things can moveWe need to do same in India 
Trump may be Mr. Brexit. But his election could scramble Britain’s post-E.U. plans.  
This is of course a survey, not an opinion poll...#smiley "Support for EU rises since Brexit vote, survey shows"  
British PM Theresa May to unveil plan to spend billions on science, tech, and research in aftermath of Brexit vote  
So the #Remain claim that there would have to be a #Brexit budget to deal with the resulting economic crisis was true.  
Trump. ISIS, Brexit. Far right Euro parties.I’ve said it before, but nostalgia is the most dangerous of human emotions. 
I don't think every game needs to be a referendum on state of CFL fandom, but Calgary fans were great today. Showed sport is alive and well 
Did globalization cause Brexit (and Trump)? Here's Kate Fox, prescient, in 2004:  
So very very cool the #calexit referendum/plebiscite is being filed on 11.21.16then we get it on ballotthe we vote to leave the US !  
BBC accused of 'sticking two fingers up at British people' with new Brexit show  
Very disappointed by the results of the #Outremont referendum on places of worship. Officials need to find a better solution. 
Bruno Latour's Le Monde essay on Trump and Brexit available in English.  
I spent all of Fantastic Beasts wondering how Eddie Redmayne voted on Brexit 
Things that we can safely attribute to Aaron Rodgers personal life: • Harambe's death• Brexit• 1929 Wall Street Crash• Brussel Sprouts 
BREXIT and TRUMP...Now it looks like France.  French polling indicates Conservative parties will have a majority. Liberals down 60% in votes 
Just 60 MPs calling for quick, hard #Brexit. Less than 10% of the Commons, convinced of their right to wag the dog.  
Remember your confidence that Brexit couldn't happen & Trump couldn't happen & now Le Pen can't happen? GOOD TALK!  
Look at you predicting #brexit years ago @Neil_Druckmann 
Dear Brits, if you are not up in arms about this NOW, you are making a worse decision than Brexit & Trump combined.  
Brexit: continental noise - French and German elections ...     #Brexit.  
Alan Dershowitz: "We should never allow a U.S. presidential election to become a referendum on Israel - because we will lose." 
Trump qua Brexit: Fake Trump scandals: "False equivalence" is dead:  
Me: Just tweet about Welsh football & music.Inner me: Go mental about Brexit and politics  
We need to make sure we don't change who we are. This election wasn't a referendum that was lost as we are behaving.  
How about 'whether or not' rather than 'when.' #Brexit is not a done deal; but its proponents must be held to account for what they said.  
Churchill would have seen Brexit as a dangerous step in the wrong direction  
Support for #EU rises since #Brexit vote, survey shows — even in Britain  
"making the best of Brexit.." is an admission that Brexit is about imposing mitigated failure in place of the EU. 
Liz Truss may have broken law in failing to defend Brexit judges, warns former lord chief justice | The Independent  
Been a bad year for global Liberal elites. Brexit, Trump, now possibly Le Pen in France?!  
I'd laugh at Trump's America if Brexit's GB wasn't so similar. And I'm talking from experience. 
Please stop this piece of human trash.. we are counting on you, Germany!!  #Grexit #DrainTheSwamp #FlyTheFlag #Brexit #MAGA 
UH OH: "anti Heathrow" Zac's support for Brexit would remove the EU air pollution law which could stop new runway:  
If Scotland can and does block Brexit, expect English nationalism to kick into high gear.   
Absolutely Loving how Politics is interesting so many generations again as it should. And yes I voted to leave Europe #brexit 
TIME TO GO: Sinking Sturgeon faces growing calls to RESIGN over shambolic Brexit threats  
It was so obvious that #brexit would be used to cut further public services.Like the recession, it is the Shock doctrine all over again 
A leaked secret document reveals British Government's plans for Brexit.  
Marine Le Penn takes massive lead in French elections & Sarcozy defeated. there won't be an EU to negotiate #Brexit  
“We need to get match fit”, is a pro-EU Tory Chancellor’s way of telling regular folk that Brexit is really going to screw them. 
i FRONT PAGE: 'Osborne austerity continues in Brexit budget' #skypapers 
So far the UK have voted brexit & then America voted Trump. So it's gotta be Honey G to win #Xfactor & Ed Balls to win #Strictly #happy2016 
How would a hard #Brexit UK attract investment? Ultra-low taxes on business & wealth. No wonder they're drooling over Tory Tax Haven #Brexit 
trump brexit and honey g, really sums up 2016 doesn't it 
Italy’s constitutional referendum is giving currency vigilantes their latest chance to pounce  
Translation from RT Putin says Trump told him he wanted to "normalise relations" during phonecall.. bit of Brexit:  
'With regards to #Brexit, a lot will depend on the form of the #UK exit, its speed' - Putin  
A second Brexit vote is a real possibility now – here's why it should happen  via @ConversationUK 
Theresa May matches Donald Trump tax cuts for business so they don't flee after Brexit. This fight back against the establishment is a con  
Italy's Renzi gets backing in referendum from singers, athletes, chef  
Yep.That's why the legal brains/brains amongst the #Tories  are urging #TheresaMay to just get a Bill passed ..and not appeal. #Brexit  
#Italy’s referendum holds the key to the future of the #euro.  (Chart by BBG) 
The thing about the EU is that it's not too bad. To make it worthwhile, Brexit would have to be better. Nobody has told me how it will be. 
MPs who play politics with Brexit will be punished by their constituents  via @Telegraph 
The Tories are worrying (I'd say, rightly) that a reference to the Court of Justice might thwart Brexit  
#Fillon voted against Maastricht, admires Thatcher's legacy and has a Welsh wife - would make interesting context for #Brexit negotiations 
Britain will be a great country once again. Because of Brexit. Each and every one of the people who voted Leave should feel very proud today 
I'd love to know what these Brexit "opportunities" are. N.B. if your answer includes "trade deals" please specify country & products. 
There are people who voted Brexit and there are people voting for Honey G.Don't trust the public. 
Trump win no shock after Brexit vote here, we're fed up of political correctness & politicians who put other people before their own. 
Delighted to learn that people who so brilliantly analysed the UK referendum and the US election are also experts on French politics. 
Coming up on @BBCWestminHour: @Arron_banks on Brexit, Trump & 'tipping the apple cart' in Westminster.OR listen now:  
I just get the impression that Chancellor Hammond is preparing us all for a fall! Doesn't fill me confidence over being committed to BREXIT! 
Very depressing: The view from Warsaw of post-Brexit Britain (from ) 
Also in Fillon Brexit speech he said - UK MEPs should be barred from votes, UK Brussels officials from decisions...  
First Brexit, then Donald Trump and now Honey G is about to win X factor might as well just write 2016 off now   
Brexit. Trump. Honey G.Kill me. 
Let me get this straight. If the SNP succeed in defeating the govt on Brexit, does that mean there is no "material change in circumstances"? 
Fillon's speech on Brexit: Divorce must be quick, no financial passport, tempt back young French from Londres...  
Adam Curtis's new film HyperNormalisation is astounding. On Trump, Brexit, Syria and the retreat to fakeness  
France could be on course to have a British first lady. Mrs Fillon is Welsh. Currently assessing the impact on Brexit negotiations.  
First Brexit then Donald Trump and it's now possible that Honey G might win X factor, white people are making their presence known 
While BBC News only discuss Brexit & immigration, the NHS Is being privatised bit by bit. Won't be much left soon.  
Trump & Brexit show communities must be empowered to take control of their own futures. We've got an action plan  
Canada’s Brexit will be when we massively vote down Trudeau’s electoral reform in the referendum he will be forced to call. 
SHOW this video to anyone calling for a second referendum #RespectTheResult 
Make Brexit as hard as you like, we're British & used to fighting wars and rescuing countries from tyrants.  
Gove admits there will be a downside to Brexit. He needs to admit there is no upside to Brexit. None but a few will survive this disaster. 
Actually I grew up in the 1930s during the Great Depression an economic catastrophe that was exacerbated by #Brexit like isolationism.  
Ed Balls is a parable of Brexit: the will of the people is clear but the elite experts think they know better. 
An Andrew Neil interview devoted to eviscerating "Open Britain" about its misleading post-referendum Brexit video:  
Labour under Corbyn has gone from Remain to wanting the hardest of 'hard brexits' - without understanding the damage Brexit will do. 
There can be no "clean break", to suggest otherwise is foolish and naive. Brexit will be messy, drawn out, painful and disastrous. No Brexit  
We just sent this letter asking MEPs to donate their Brexit bonus to foodbanks. Two rather rude replies so far…  
I'd seriously be more interested in #Labour right now if Jeremy Corbyn could explain to me how Brexit will be better for workers' rights, 
You mean like when the BBC tells us Brexit is going to be immediately bad for the economy? @jongaunt 
Let's hope French luvvies' & slebs' pleading attracts as much derision & so has as much "success" as it did in UK re Brexit & US re Trump  
Your semi-regular reminder that Brexit is a huge mess:  
'Brexit, Trump Presidency... more to come' Merkel's worldview is OVER, Farage vows   #MAGA... by #Angelbowranch 
I keep on asking myself the question is Brexit democracy if the vote was determined by outright unrelenting lies from #Farage& #borisjohnson 
This week's Brexit good news:  Inflation  Unemployment  Retail sales   
The moment she uttered the curse that gave us Brexit and Trump, and took away Prince, Bowie, Cohen, and Jones.  
Says the man who sold the Queen to The Sun to misrepresent her for a Brexit front page. You shameless hypocrite  
Norway. Switzerland. EEA*RepeatKeep repeatingRepeat more*What the Leave campaign kept holding up as the model for Brexit 
You proved in one Tweet you don't understand liberalism, authoritarianism or referendum.Quite a feat. 
I'm afraid 'liberalism' has become authoritarianism if 'liberal' demand is for MPs to block Referendum result on basis of 'we don't like it' 
Retweet if you believe @nick_clegg should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum #Brexit  
Should Tony Blair play a role in Brexit? #cliveonlbc 
Ireland's opposition leader has attacked Britain for "backwards-looking nationalism" in voting for Brexit  
Italy's Renzi gets backing in referendum from singers, athletes, chef  
#Scotland DID NOT vote unanimously to remain in the #EU, the #UK voted as a whole for #Brexit  #BBC #SKY #ITV #NEWS 
Renzi Sees Government Collapse If Loses Referendum: Repubblica 
Ah. So #UKIP was in favour of the "Norway option". But it's a package including freedom of movement. So what's the point of #Brexit?  
Every Sunday we hold a referendum called "worship" to determine what is more important to you than God. [Col 3:16]  
EU Member States Push Britain Toward Hard Brexit  
I said Brexit wasn’t going to happen, I said Trump wasn’t going to happen. So wtf do I know. But I don’t think Le Pen is going to happen.  
In his @guardian article today, Shadow Chancellor @johnmcdonnellMP on the EU Referendum result:  
There is no referendum mandate to remove the right to live & work in the EU. To do so would be a crime against every Briton#Brexit #YesEU 
WATCH: @JoeTidy spent 10 days at sea to learn about the forgotten industry and how trawlermen feel about #Brexit.  
Er.....yes, this has been clear for some time. Ask anybody who voted Brexit but didn't declare it to pollsters for fear of being slurred  
Those of you who had the example of #Brexit & STILL didn't vote Clinton?You gave away the #SCOTUS for your entire adult life.And for ours. 
If it is Blair's road to redemption he's welcome to join cause. If delusional nonsense that is #Brexit is to be stopped, the more the better  
How about we say we can afford to renovate Buckingham Palace IF we cancel Brexit?Be worth it to watch Daily Mail readers' heads explode. 
Whilst are are to hear what judges say about Brexit we should not forget  
How the internet inspired, and fueled, the new nationalism of Donald Trump and Brexit  
So #Labour's now the party of #Brexit and tax cuts for higher earners. Righty-ho. Okay then. 
Opinion:  Italy’s referendum holds key to future of the euro  
A week of Trump - @jonsnowC4 writes on what #DonaldTrump's decisions reveal and what it means for the UK #brexit  
#DearSanta please will u give #UK a govt that looks after us all so I can stop tweeting & get a life? #welfare #brexit #ESA #ChallengeBrexit 
Pls RT & sign @OnnMel petition to protect worker's rights from #Brexit 
Reading @IanDunt book it is quite obvious that #brexit is systemically impossible and that, all along, the EU was Hotel California. 
With one spring Blair has placed himself at the head of counter-revolution. Against Corbyn against Brexit. Let battle commence @TheBlairDoc 
I fear when #brexit turns out to be an economic disaster for working Britain- they will turn their anger on migrants instead of themselves. 
I will never be quiet over #brexit Based on lies & prejudice. What HAS happened to £350m for NHS? Oh yes. Tories just privatised recruitment 
London's gravitational pullBrexit bashers silenced as banks want to stay in 'financial centre' London after Brexit  
Allister Heath: 'The establishment may be deeply worried about Brexit; but vast swathes of the public are either delighted or have moved on' 
There's a very big push to rewrite the Leave referendum campaign as about leaving the single market. Keep calling out this bullshit 
Dave, if you do care about the damage Brexit is causing, you'll pledge the money to those that continue to fight.  
I'm blaiming every MP who knows all Brexit options are worse than Remain but are too cowardly to stand up and say brexit is a mistake  
The Brexit Design Manifesto is one of the most inspiring design documents I've ever read. A visionary response.  
Britain is 'backwards' for Brexit vote, says Irish opposition leader   
Many myths came out from Vote Leave. One was about EU red tape affecting trade. Here is post Brexit reality #Brexit  
Brexit solidifed Corbyn's grip on the Labour Party. Trump's win will solidify Bernie's grip on the Democratic Party  
Thousands of Eastern European migrants have come into Britain since Brexit! We need to get out of the EU now! 
#Brexit supporters have lied about Churchill's attitude to the EU #Remain #YesEU 
Cambridge University's response to Brexit. However successful it is, the damage to science networks is incalculable.  
YOUR COMMENTS: Let’s hear from our most enthusiastic Brexit-supporting reader in Canada…  
We must fight the poisonously mendacious narrative being pushed that, somehow, everyone understood Brexit meant hard Brexit. It's a lie.  
Denmark: UK ally takes hard Brexit line  
Poll from 11/6/2016. Majority support Norway-style soft #Brexit. Including almost half of Leave voters. Dozens of similar pre-EUref polls.  
Lots of positive reaction to @wolmarforlondon in Richmond, voters concerned at Zac's hard Brexit stance / LibDem betrayal in government  
I've watched & re-watched Hammond on #marr today. 1 Poor will be made to pay cost of #Brexit. 2 Wealthy protected to encourage investment 
News the SNP won't tell you.Banff & Buchan and probably a few other constituencies voted for Brexit.  
Italy's most famous chef threatens to leave over referendum vote  
#Brexit means austerity 2.0 turbo, "you voted for it" maxi-strength version.Tax avoidance haven for rich.Goodbye NHS, welfare.Poorer UK. 
Brexit and Trump have exposed the left’s crucial flaw: playing by the rules |  
Academia rejected #Brexit. Yet some self-interested elements are trying to deny their former instincts, says @mgmcquillan 
£370 million to do up Buck Palace! Gangsters in tiaras. Referendum needed. "Royal family:YES or NO?" I will happily lead the NO campaign. 
Thought I'd get through the first bit of @IanDunt Brexit, What The Hell Happens Now w/o seething with rage. Then I read this about Davis...  
Conflicting visions of Brexit ('what does the vote mean?') create a deficit that only Parliament has a democratic mandate to fill. 
True. Which means: 1 People didn't know what they were voting for 2 Parliament must decide what Brexit means.  
Sir Oliver Letwin: media's treatment of judges who made High Court Brexit ruling was "utterly despicable".  
Energized By Brexit and Trump, the Collapse of Global Government Quickens  #TrumpTrain #Trump2016 #TrumpPresident 
I've got a piece in the New European on how the Brexit lot are off their tits and urgently need to sober up. pic.twitter.com/Dws0x7dqdU 
The @BBCNews have given up all pretence of impartiality and balance on Brexit. Axe the tax  Do you agree? 
As part of the government budget the contribution to the EU is minuscule#Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
The Kippers won Brexit. Next it's the north of England. Barnett's demise is already in the post.  
'You're the BIGGEST LIARS' Andrew Neil DESTROYS pro-EU campaign for distorting #Brexiteers.Nicely done.#Brexit ! 
School textbooks in 2046What do you think was the catalyst for World War III?1. Brexit2. Trump3. ISIS4. Putin5. General Mad Dog Mattis  
The corollary of 'Leave' not being a political party is no mandate for anything besides Brexit as such, so details of Brexit open to debate  
BREXIT: Mail readers are ideologically dangerous self-harmers who’d prefer the country burn than be rational.  
Funny how Theresa May campaigned for Remain, then had a private meeting with Rupert Murdoch & now we're heading for hard Brexit. Just saying 
Brexit: whole debacle has become a model of how not to manage such a crucial decision. It is also the subject of international ridicule.  
U.K. economy faces Brexit uncertainty, Treasury chief Philip Hammond says    
#Denmark shifting from friendly to hardline in #Brexit talks. @alexebarker makes case it's the "canary in coal mine" 
#AutumnStatement this wk. How many of your Brexit promises will you deliver on Johnson, Fox, Davis, Patel, Farage? £350 mn / wk for the NHS? 
10 days, 5 reports, 7 blogs: here's the link for all our @SkyNews coverage onboard the 'Brexit Trawler'.  
BBCSP: @JamesMcGrory from @Open_Britain's car crash interview on #Brexit, with @afneil (20Nov16)  #bbcsp 
No one country has all the scientists, money or infrastructure to improve world. #Brexit alienation = loss of £, influence & attraction.  
Actually what didn't make sense #philiphammond was the Tory Party having the Eu Referendum in the 1st place. #brexit 
#tonyblair returning to politics to fight #Brexit is about as useful as an arsonist joining the Fire Brigade.  
The fact is it's not the free movement of Labour that has destroyed your standard of living but corp tax avoidance. #brexit #philiphammond 
#EUref: 150 days on the Tories still haven't set out what #Brexit means - but others have. Here's what they've said.  
For ONCE #Brexiters and European leaders are in agreement.HARD #Brexit is the ONLY #Brexit and what we voted for! 
Mr. Philip #Hammond is a backstabber that needs to either get on-board the #Brexit train or resign as Chancellor ! 
Politicians say #Brexit frees UK to be a global economic powerhouse. Other non-EU countries must feel dumb for not thinking of this first. 
So @PHammondMP says UK needs to continue to trade goods and services in EU "as it does today".So what is the pain of #Brexit for, exactly?  
Still can't get how people can complain about leaving brexit yet they'll vote for honey g 
It's the end of some fascinating reports from @joetidy on the post-Brexit fishing industry - I have a new respect for trawlermen!  
The shock lessons for liberals from Brexit and the Trumpquake | Andrew Rawnsley  
He's wrong, isn't he #Brexit'ers? It's all going to be absolutely fine, isn't it? Unicorns for everyone, right?You bunch of f*ckwits.  
He spent 10 days at sea to learn about #fishing and how trawlermen feel about #Brexit @joetidy 
Who are the most trusted politicians in #UK? #Marr  #BBCSP John McDonnell #SundayMorning Cook Hameed Ward AA Gill #stormangus #Brexit 
Final Polls Show Renzi’s Referendum Heading for Defeat in Italy. And the good news keeps on coming   
Chancellor warns Brexit uncertainty leaves UK facing 'eye-watering' debt  
Richmond LibDem candidate who said on 14Oct: "Britain is leaving EU–OK, I accept that. I don’t think we should re-run referendum." But now:  
North of England loses 310,000 graduates in 10-year brain drain. Brexit makes it worse and this will hit new jobs. 
On my way home after a hard but brilliant 10 days at sea onboard our 'Brexit Trawler', the Aalskere. Thanks for having me Iain and crew!  
Companies have delayed or halted £65 billion of investments since Brexit vote, survey says  
Zac runs scared of live @BBCSPLondon interview Doesn't want to square up to @sarahjolney1 on his hard Brexit offer to #RichmondPark 
Shove it #Hammond#Marr #Tory #TheresaMay #ToryBrexit #Brexit  
We must not forget that the slim #Leave majority was based on a tidal wave of hate propaganda by the #Brexit billionaire press#Remain 
While we wax lyrical about #Trump #Brexit This is happening - hospital bombed, nurses wailing trying to save babies  
#Brexit supporters don't want unelected elites to control them... Unless they're tax-dodging billionaires#Remain #YesEU 
Politicians who say they have to support Brexit because they're democrats are failing the country, their parties and our democracy 
OMG! I just muted all mention of Tr*mp for 24 hours and my twitter feed collapsed by about 50%! Peace and quiet! Now to add Brexit. 
Murdoch and Farage at billionaire heir Lebedev's garden party. Do you think these guys care about 'ordinary people' #Brexit #Remain #YesEU 
"What about the bus?!" Chuka Ummuna asks Dominc Raab MP about the #Brexit £350m promise for the #NHS #Murnaghan 
I am so bored with being told there is freedom of movement in Brexit negotiations. There isn't. If one of the 27 play hard ball that's it. 
WATCH: @JamesMcGrory's car crash interview on #bbcsp as @afneil totally debunks @Open_Britain's disingenuous video. #Brexit  
#Brexit is a political movement that is no longer about leaving EU but about eroding Liberal social values in favour of a right-wing agenda.  
According to @afneil not a single statement can be produced from Brexit's campaign that suggests Norway model. HERE YOU GO BUDDY. #bbcsp 
What part of #Leave ,don’t the #remainiacs get ?Leaving the #EU means leaving the singleMarket#bbcsp #Brexit #BrexitBritain #OpenBritain 
Just seen Sunday Times! I can't stop laughing with derision at the thought of Tony Blair massing his troops to wreck BREXIT! On yer bike! 
Why Europe will drive a hard Brexit  
James McGrory from @Open_Britain having a car crash interview on him attacking #Brexit. @afneil not letting him go on bs. Loving it. #bbcsp 
The #EUflag is not my #flag, The #EU is not my #country & it will NEVER be! #BREXIT #BBC #SKY #ITV #RT #UK #EU #TORY #LABOUR #LIBDEM #UKIP 
.@SuellaFernandes: To get the most out of #Brexit we need to leave the protectionist Customs Union - EU not signing the trade deals we need.  
Pressure group formed because 'we're fed up of negativity around brexit' says @SuellaFernandes #bbcsp 
BREXIT: Nigel Farage abandons pledge to quit frontline politics, vows to become an MP and announces his new slogan “8th time’s the charm.” 
#Brexit is the perfect chance for the UK to rebuild our #manufacturing #industry & reindustrialise the #UK free from #EU control! #BBC #ITV 
We Need to put our own country FIRST 
Not sure which statement is more ridiculous: 'early signs of Brexit are positive' or 'Alexander Armstrong funniest man in Britain'  
Brexit bashers silenced as banks want to stay in 'financial centre' London after Brexit  
Theresa Villiers says good economic stats show early signs of Brexit are positive. WE'RE STILL IN THE EU!!  
It is now accepted among those who should know that May is too weak to lead a government and brexit is entering a stage of peril. 
Really HACKED off with repeated ad nauseum cliche *we'll get the best deal we can for the UK"#BrexitBut won't tell us what that is#marr 
More rampant Brexit bias. And they're already blaming concern over this on the "right wing press".  
Sir Oliver Letwin tells me criticism of Supreme Court judges over Brexit ruling by some sections of the media was "utterly despicable". 
Philip Hammond absolutely explicit on @pestononsunday Brexit is harming the economy by creating uncertainty. Expect Brexiteers to reject 
Liz Truss 'may have broken the law' in failing to defend Brexit judges  
European leaders agree to force Britain into a hard Brexit  
Just when you thought this couldn't possibly get any worse, Tony Blair is looking to use Brexit to mount a Westminster comeback.  
Brexit Boom: Government to Spend 1.3 Billion on Roads   
It would be a tragedy if Lynda Snell isn't recruited to run the Brexit negotiations. #thearchers 
Miss this week's post? De-educate yourself for the #PostTruth world. More info:  #education #politics #Brexit #Trump 
The day we won the referendum. Amazing memories #UKIP 
Tony Blair reportedly wants to lead the campaign against #Brexit. Please, please, please, please Tony. Do it 
Watching #Marr's continued normalisation agenda of #Brexit you'd think #Remain was some tiny fringe element, rather than 48% UK & 62% Scots 
Oh look. Tristam Hunt on  denying that up to 70% of Labour constituencies voted to Brexit! He is in total denial. 
It's the ideology and intransigence of some here in UK that risks hard Brexit, not the EU  
Help me send a message to Theresa May. Keep telling Nicola Sturgeon No you've already had your referendum. 
UK ruling party bigwigs urge May to scrap Brexit appeal  #brexit  
Observer: "Europe's leaders to force UK into hard Brexit".  Thanks guys. That's exactly what we want. 
"The Europeans are being commendably disciplined" about not revealing Brexit negotiating strategy, @PHammondMP #marr 
"I'd like to 'help' Britain get a 'soft' Brexit. I get things done. Like the deaths of thousands Iraqis & British soldiers. I'm lethal"  
McDonnell: "We have to respect the result".We'll hold you to that when your Party starts trying to meddle with Brexit. #Marr 
It feels like the greatest strength the UK has going into Brexit negotiations is Philip Hammond's mesmeric dullness. #GrindThemDown #marr 
Post Brexit the fish with your chips will come down in price from £4.80 to about £2.50. That is not speculation. 
British firms face bill of £12.7Bn a year if Britain leaves the EU customs union after #Brexit  
Re-tweet if #Britain should end the #EU common fisheries policy NOW#WeWantOurFishBack #Brexit #OpenBritain #BrexitBritain @JohnReesEvans 
Clean Brexit =  trade deals No Free Movement No supremacy of EU law No budget contributionsSounds great!  
I'm opting out of news for the next 8 years.  When I return Mrs Obama will be President & Brexit negotiations will almost be underway. 
Almost exactly what I heard in Berlin last week...Why Europe will drive a hard Brexit | Politics | The Guardian  
The BBC keep pushing this "hard Brexit" myth even though it does not exist. If you want FAKE NEWS, tune in to the #MarrShow 
.@JLongworthVL calls for clean Brexit, outside of customs union.@cbicarolyn reveals businesses do see opportunities for new trade deals. 
If the ref. wasn't binding then everything to do with it becomes irrelevant. Brexit is now purely a gov. policy which opposition must oppose 
#marr Anyone speaking so glibly of "benefits of #brexit" & "opportunities to do trade deals" hasn't looked into it: 
No reason to believe judges will overturn Article 50 ruling, campaigner Gina Miller says  
EU leaders threaten UK with 'hard Brexit' over fear of empowering Marine Le Pen  
If EU is so great why is youth unemployment the highest in EU countries?#Brexit  
Europe’s leaders to force Britain into hard Brexit  
staying in the #EU #SingleMarket is NOT #FreeTrade,its a protectionist customs union where you have to abide by #EU rules & regs#Brexit  
Fantastic article on #brexit and  triggering Article 50 from one of clearest and most accurate thinkers on the matter @JolyonMaugham 
Failing to agree free trade with the UK post-Brexit and reverting to WTO rules would cost EU exporters £13 billion  
'A hard Brexit is the elephant in the room at Autumn Statement - the biggest threat to our economy' @StewartHosieSNP 
Weird consequences of Brexit. Tory Right are now the deficit deniers, demanding huge tax cuts and infrastructure spending to mask effects. 
BBC risks bias claim as TV chief who sailed on Bob Geldof's pro-EU boat set to host Brexit show.  
And for those who didn't see it on early release, my OFM column on the impact of Brexit on our lunch  
Michael Gove tells teachers not to teach post-Brexit kids about art. This is because his government doesn't want people to feel strong. 
Scots and Welsh can have say in Brexit court case - BBC News  
#Italy's Renzi sees govt collapse if he loses constitutional referendum in Dec, Repubblica reports.  
#Europe is saying #N02EURe-tweet if you support the French People & #LePen@MLP_officiel #ViveLeFrexit #Frexit #Brexit #Italexit #Nexit 
Don’t teach Brexit schoolkids about Tennyson: teach them maths  
Liz Truss may have broken the law in failing to defend Brexit judges  
This man thinks he can show the way to a soft #Brexit.Methinks he cannot be trusted.@thetimes 
BBC picks Remain *campaigner* Nick Pisani (who was on the notorious Bob Geldof boat) to edit a flagship world news debate about Brexit.  
BREXIT at Tiffany's #NameAPenceMuscial 
The survey found that when it comes to Brexit, Britain likes to have its cake and eat it  
How can the Conscience of a Supreme Judge allow him to sit on this case? Knowing he Supports Remain?Brexit should not be decided by this!  
We need to pass a referendum immediately to change the plural of moose to meese.Goose -> GeeseMoose -> MeeseDo it for the children. 
Shouldn't you be focusing on how Brexit is ruining your country? Sod off.  
Another way Trump's election is like Brexit: the people campaigning for it had no plan for what to do if they won. 
.@afneil not interviewing the only Faragist candidate @JohnReesEvans Another stunning #BBC underestimation  #Brexit#Trump#UKIPLeadership 
Brexit: Scotland DID NOT vote unanimously to remain in the European Union  
#Brexit vs. #Trump: What do Londoners think?  | More @JoyAnnReid live from #London --> Sun. 10AM ET @MSNBC #AMJoy 
Northern Ireland campaigner to challenge #Brexit in supreme court  
Yes, the Remain campaign (with full weight of govt behind them) played it absolutely straight and fair throughout the EU referendum campaign  
EU: migrants can come to Europe but in exchange EU gets empty Africa with all its resources? #MAGA #brexit 
CBI chief: Brexit could be a cliff edge for businesses Now didn't a certain Scottish woman say that? #Sturgeon 
Germany's Merkel expected to announce run for 4th term; widely seen as a stabilizing force in Europe despite Brexit  
The U.K.'s main corporate lobby is urging the government to clarify what happens on the day after Brexit  
People who think a gay dude laughing off a 'backs to the wall lads' joke on live TV in front of millions is cause it was gr8 are very Brexit 
No one thought Brexit would happen. No one thought a reality star would win president. No one thought Kansas football would win. 
ReadStay calm: The Sword of Damocles is not hanging over UK #Fintech post- #Brexit by @lwintermeyer #VC @InnFin 
I'll forgive @tonyblairoffice over Iraq if he can stop #brexit and give me my country back. That is testament to my hatred of Brexit  
As 60 Tory MPs urge the PM to pursue a 'hard Brexit', isn't it time to just get on with respecting the verdict of the majority?  
Looks like Tony's going to mess up May & Corbyn's Brexit plans! 
AC Grayling on why now is the time for MPs to derail a disastrous Brexit deal 
Bruno Latour's Le Monde essay on Trump and Brexit available in English.  
#Brexit has been likened to a divorce... But in reality it's more like separating conjoined twins... With a dispute over who gets the lungs. 
After death of Qila, the beluga whale, Vancouver Park Board chair wants city-wide referendum on whales in captivity:  
Senior Tories demand 'hard Brexit' and a clean break from the EU   via @MailOnline 
Looks like EU believers in "hard Brexit" suffering from illusion rest of EU will hold together during unresolved refugee crisis&econ decline  
Brexit and Trump have exposed the left’s crucial flaw: playing by the rules (While neoliberals rip them up #auspol) 
Bernie Ecclestones has some strong opinions on Trump, Brexit, Brawn, Verstappen, Ferrari & more!AMuS interview:  
This graphic highlights many of the misrepresentations and negative impacts of the 2014 Independence referendum  
Well, given Brexit will cost us billions and hit poor hardest how about opposing that Johnny boy?   
If the UK wants this kind of “hard Brexit” and refuses to compromise, that is what it will get and must have. 
Blair's back: The former PM is reportedly planning to make a "big comeback" to play a major role in Brexit.  
Post Brexit panic over with Jim Murphy, George Osborne & Tony Blair all in it together...  
#skypapers Milo Yiannopoulos  someone on sticking up for Brexit +Trump,instead of all Remoaner bores +doom + gloom merchants on all time. 
This is not my flag. #EU is not my country.And it will NEVER be.Follow #BREXIT: #Nexit #Italexit #Frexit #Swexit #Huxit #Auxit #Grexit 
BREAKING: Senator John McCain says UK could get free trade deal with US before EU does, in boost to Brexit @UKIP 
Liz Truss may have broken the law in failing to defend Brexit judges   
Make the UK great again. Cancel Brexit. Become a compassionate modern country with a commitment to equality, society and the environment. 
Civil servant in Telegraph compares Brexit challenge to WWII. Minor problem: the civil service increased five fold then.  
Summit called over Brexit threat to Scots legal systemFull story in tomorrow's paper 
Was there anything about the Single Market on the ballot paper? No! So what @Change_Britain are saying here is just another #Brexit lie.  
Academics 'must not be used as Brexit pawns'.  Excellent account of timely, incisive report on science and Brexit  
If you thought Brexit was chaotic now, just wait until divorce proceedings actually start: 
If Brexit & Trump are anything to go by Honey G will win the X factor 
Words fail me. Brexit may be Brexit but to compare it to a war where millions died is inappropriate and disrespectful.  
This is not @TheOnion "Second World War victory proves civil service can deliver #Brexit"-@Telepolitics 
Brexit: EU nurses 'suffering racist abuse & heading home' - this after Mail stupidity over EU doctors @HealthierIn 
Trying to arrange Collabs on YouTube is probably more difficult than understanding how we’ve managed Brexit and Trump in the same year. 
17.4m British people in the biggest vote that has ever taken place in our history, instructed Parliament to #Brexit. It is simple and direct 
But sadly he lost the back of the fag pack he wrote his post Brexit plan on during a pub quiz night..  
brexit: n. A potentially catastrophic air biscuit launched in the overly optimistic hope that it will be "better out than in." 
IF we were to stay in the Single Market we would be staying in the EU. No thanks. We want a complete and final #Brexit. 
In the 1975 European Communities referendum, Jeremy Corbyn opposed Britain's membership of the Common Market. Note! 
Heavyweight Brexiteers among 60 Tory MPs to demand clean break from the EU. That is the ONLY Brexit required.  
Observer front page:Europe's leaders to force UK into a 'hard Brexit'#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
No one...not a single person..is writing with such cold, forensic fury as @@NickCohen4 about the epic fuck-up caused by  #Brexit & #Trump. 
If you want to know why ppl voted for Brexit & Trump you only need to observe the behaviour of the morons that voted for remain & Hillary. 
When your battery percentage is the same as the amount of the electorate that voted for Brexit  
This is why we need the target of 3% GDP for science. We have the top talent, but underfunding (pic) and Brexit now jeopardising that...  
Some @yescalifornia charts - already out of date though, post Brexit £ slide, Californian economy leapfrogged UK - possibly France too  
So campaign for Californian independence referendum by 2019 - totally stolen the Scottish Yes campaign branding:  
President of Catalan PSC voting in Indy referendum 9.11.2014. Today his party favour persecution of organizers.  
Yes, 2016's given us Brexit, Trump, the death of so many heroes but also #Strictly Ed Balls so, you know, swings and roundabouts. Sort of. 
Proof that  steady diet of right wing propaganda can make the voter believe effluence is as sweet as treacle  #brexit 
Not 'after #Brexit' - fight Brexit! Why keep selling the pass on this?  
As my dad's noted, MSM & pollsters have missed boat in last 18 months on Bibi reelection, Columbia peace deal, Brexit & Trump->  
Liz Truss may have broken the law in failing to defend Brexit judges  
Superb piece by @SuellaFernandes on open opportunities for Britain after Brexit  
The Leave campaign is being investigated by the CPS. If found guilty Brexit could completely fall apart...  
Govt's Supreme Court case footnotes this Private Members Bill, to hold exit terms referendum - 2nd reading Friday  
Govt's case that Parliament is involved in Brexit process: "open to Parliament ..to pass legislation which inhibited/prevented Article 50" pic.twitter.com/y9clYpgjiy 
"3.5 million jobs depend on membership of the EU" they said. And now they want to lecture us on post-truth politics.#Brexit 
Group of 60 Conservative MPs call on Theresa May to deliver 'hard Brexit'  
Julian Assange gets a mention in Government's Supreme Court Article 50 Brexit case appeal. Unexpected:  
If you thought #Brexit was chaotic now, just wait until divorce proceedings actually start  
'Britain must untie itself from EU shackles by using Brexit to leave the customs union'. @SuellaFernandes @Telegraph  
Hey @timfarron - more people voted to leave the EU than voted for your political party. Stop trying to block Brexit #RespectTheResult 
The legal showdown over #Brexit "looks messy and unwieldy" writes @joncraig 
Exclusive: Machine rental firm Hewden nears collapse, blaming post-referendum trading slump, with 750 jobs at risk.  
#Scotland, #Wales will intervene in legal battle over how #Brexit should be triggered: #British Supreme Court  
'Senior Tories' staging a coup against #Brexit , telling #May not to appeal High Court ruling in Supreme Court. All #GoldmanSachs stooges. 
BROCOLATE: Chocolate Orange shrinks by 10%! Brexit means making things smaller and more expensive! | via @telegraph 
The only good to come from the #Trump #Brexit nightmare is decent rational Americans, Brits & other Europeans are pulling together.  
 Boris Johnson, "one of the founders of post-truth journalism", seeks scapegoat for forthcoming Brexit disaster. 
What #Brexit can teach us about activism in Trump's America — "we will need to be quick or our dreams will be dead."  
Britain may not have the clout when it comes to post-Brexit trade deals  
TIME TO GO: Sinking Sturgeon faces growing calls to RESIGN over shambolic Brexit threats  
What fresh hell is this?Now they want Sup Ct president Lord Neuberger to step down from hearing the Brexit appeal! 
Just as Brexit opened up new opportunities for the British Left, the election of Trump will do the same in the US  
Brexit will release us. People need to recognise that this means we can realise our full potential without being hampered by EU regulations. pic.twitter.com/d2izQ4XzCN 
Missed our AGM? Catch up with the #FabAGM panel 'Facing the Unknown: How to ensure a Brexit that works for all' here  
Your semi-regular reminder that Brexit is a huge mess:  
I used to ask myself why Putin didn't give Assad enough support to win a quick victory. But then refugees can be useful#Farage #Brexit  
B/c of the election of #DonaldTrump & the vote for #brexit each one of us must now act as a lamp to hold the light of civilisation. 
Nationalism is the kind of collectivist idiocy that overrides the principle of treating people as individuals on their own merits.#Brexit 
Mrs Windsor to get £369m. This Better Together #Brexit Britain stinks!  
The retail price of New Zealand, Australian, Chilean and Californian wine will drop as soon as Britain can seal its post-Brexit FTAs. pic.twitter.com/T8CaIHzPED 
If you didn't know what #Brexit would mean when you voted for it, why shouldn't you have a second say?   
Next EU Crisis: Final Polls Show Italian PM Heading for Referendum Defeat  
Join us live at 4:00 PM tomorrow on Muslim Television #Ahmadiyya for our latest Press Point ep.Topic 1: Brexit Topic 2: US President Elect 
YOUR COMMENTS: Brexit, Trump and now… um… Amazon Prime?  
#Brexit vs. #Trump?  Here's what Brits told @JoyAnnReid #AMJoy #Jexit 
UK: "Brexit was the stupidest thing, I've ever done"USA: "Well... President-elect Donald Trump!"Malmö FF: "Hold my beer!"¯\_(ツ)_/¯ 
.@JoyAnnReid asks Brits... what's worse, #Brexit or #Trump? Watch and weigh in! #AMJoy #reiders #jexit 
Hillary Clinton's popular-vote margin is now larger in raw votes than Leave's margin of victory was in Brexit. 
It may be freezing but @Bristol4Europe is getting a warm reception for our campaign against hard Brexit.  
Ppl are quietly voting more right wing. Left wing just screams obscenities when you don't accept their way. That's why Trump&Brexit happened 
#labourdoorstep in Castleford this am CllrWallis @JadeBotterill @AmeliaRoseTighe @JoMHepworth @danward252 talking Brexit, traffic & Strictly  
"Come and chill out here with Putin": A Brexit musical has arrived, @KateBrannelly reports  pic.twitter.com/r1aPF6JByf 
Following breakout sessions on economy, housing, education, environment, health & work we're all gathered 4 full plenary on #brexit #NPF2016 
New poll supports Liberal Democrats second EU referendum pledge:  
I just returned from London spoke to many in Pubs & street all congrats for #Trump win! Bolsters #Brexit & hope 4 reversal of LIBS policies!  
UK politicians demand Brexit guarantee for EU scientists & funding boost - acknowledging Brexit fallout in science. 
- UK consumer spending up says Visa - ONS: unemployment down - Google invests big- Brexit boost for ports 
Senior Tories pen a letter to Theresa May demanding 'hard Brexit'  
'#Brexit to blame' as machinery rental firm Hewden teeters on the brink of collapse  
In the era of Brexit and Trump, France’s presidential front-runner starts to worry  
My story Please be there for democracy to reign supreme. 52% who voted is democracy you to leave the EU.  @willowbrookwolf #Brexit  
Government pretending Brexit will be straightforward is a hostage to fortune. Good piece.   
Brexit & Trump have exposed the left’s crucial flaw: playing by the rules -  Farage would never have accepted "stay" 
Reassuring we have a national treasure of such gravitas and worldwide respect, just like his forebears, to promote #Brexit #Boris #BennyHill 
Goldman Sachs, JP Morgan, Morgan Stanley and Citigroup have plotted their exit from the City of London post Brexit 
Sturgeon must not be allowed to stop Brexit  
Liz Truss may have broken the law in failing to defend Brexit judges  
Telegraph: 137 Labour MPs including Ed Miliband saw their seats back Brexit in the referendum – more than half of the parliamentary party. 
This is why Brexit is wrong. This is why I will never give up.  
Instead of calling for a second referendum, why don't MPs such as Tim Farron have a conversation with the British electorate and LISTEN? 
'Britain must untie itself from EU shackles by using Brexit to leave the customs union'  via @telegraphnews 
Nobody seems to care which makes it all the scarier. IDK if it's post brexit apathy but this needs more attention  
#Brexit and #Trump have exposed the left’s crucial flaw: playing by the rules | Jonathan Freedland #epf16 #NPF2016 
What's your (new) target date for all those disasters that were supposed to happen if we voted for Brexit? The ones that never happened?  
#Italy #referendum poll [GPF]:No 32%Yes 26%Won't vote 28.7%Undecided 4.6%Undecided but tend to No 5.3%Undecided but tend to Yes 4.3%  
William Waldegrave's memoir on his refusal to join the "In" campaign in the 1975 referendum, despite his mentor Ted Heath's leadership  
There's now a musical about Brexit (featuring a rapping Vladimir Putin)  pic.twitter.com/6rPYjxbFdK 
We should not be discussing 'what kind of #Brexit.' We should be opposing any Brexit. 
Heavyweight Tory MP Brexitere  supporters push May for clean break from EU. About time!  #Brexit @willowbrookwolf  
The legal showdown over #Brexit "looks messy and unwieldy" writes @joncraig 
Brexiteer MPs are iterating the false claim 'the country’s referendum  call' - their 'country' = 1/4 of pop. -Repeating a lie makes it true? 
'Brexit to blame' as machinery rental firm Hewden nears collapse  
The things David Davis doesn't know or understand never ceases to amaze me. From Brexit by @IanDunt 
Tories urge Theresa May to cancel her appeal against Brexit High Court judgment  
Christ alive. Even the Brexit lot have sussed out May's tricks.  
Theresa May changes legal case for right to start Brexit without Parliamentary vote.  
Young Londoners are too busy crying to notice the exciting possibilities of #Brexit, says @LyonsIzzy 
Anti #brexit opportunities are out there #grabyourwallet. Let's use consumer power to hurt the profits of those peddling bigotry & hate. 
Halfway through @IanDunt's book "Brexit: What The Hell Happens Now?" and oh god I hope there's a plot twist at the end. 
Unsure why the EU customs union is significant around Brexit? Read our guide  
The Government has a democratic mandate to take Britain out of the EU #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
"Not revealing our hand" is really just hiding costs of a Brexit deal from the British people until it's too late to oppose. 
This is why politicians should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum  
#AMJoy is coming up live this morning from #LONDON! She has scoop on how Brits see #Election2016 post-#Brexit & much more! 10 AM ET @MSNBC 
Every single guest on #bbcdateline today seemed to be anti-Brexit. So typical of biased @BBCNews. 
Nicky Morgan adds her voice to chorus of Tories calling on May to drop court challenge to parliament vote on Brexit.  
Senior Supreme Court Judge urged to stand down fm Article 50 hearing after wife’s anti-Brexit tweets. >Quite rightly 
£390m to be spent on Buckingham Palace .... at least we have got our country back #brexit  
Brexit, what Brexit? Many Londoners are focusing on the bright side, @MohammedAbbas79 reports  pic.twitter.com/YxQU4ZUgvK 
Tired of the unchallenged narrative that the gov't is being forced to "show its hand" during #Brexit negotiations. It's utter nonsense.  
The Big #Brexit Lie - recession, austerity, growing inequality, tax-dodging rich, jobs hit by Chinese imports - blame the EU#Remain #YesEU 
Salmond mocks Brexit Tories caught "telling the truth" about their contempt for Scotland:  
Brexit and Trump have exposed the left’s crucial flaw: playing by the rules | Jonathan Freedland  
Sociologists should be at the forefront of explaining Trump and Brexit but we aren’t   
European researchers need assurances that they can stay in the UK after #Brexit, say key politicians  
Millions rally in #SouthKorea's #Seoul demanding #Crimea-style referendum to join #Russia 
.@jeremycorbyn "On #Brexit we'll ensure jobs & living standards come 1st & fight ALL attempts to undermine workers rights & env protections" 
NEW - Poll supports Liberal Democrats second EU referendum pledge - could they overtake Labour?  
May: Brexit 'on track'  
Putin does not fear NATO tanks rolling into Russia, but he does fear the EU helping democracy grow on Russia's borders#Remain #Brexit 
Farage exploiting the tragedy created by Putin & Assad's crimes in Syria without which #Leave might have lost #EURef. #Brexit #Remain 
When @KernChri opened his talk comparing #mazzukern to #brangelina I thought, OK at least Brexit and Trump haven't killed our humour!  
Whatever your traditional politics, get over it, I did and abandoned a lifetime voting Conservative. Fight Brexit.  
Scotland and Wales can intervene in Brexit: UK Supreme Court  #Brexit  
Delighted to meet with representatives of Border Communities against #Brexit after y'day's North South Ministerial Council Armagh meeting.  
I have a video on the Italian Referendum  coming which will soon be released by @RealVisionTV @RaoulGMI @ttmygh @FT @business @WSJmarkets 
Brexit data reveal: Areas harder hit  by austerity more likely to vote Leave. Useful analysis  @voxeu @BaldwinRE 
NEW - Anna Soubry: I only backed EU referendum vote because Remain was supposed to win  
Thousands of students and lecturers expected at London demo to protest cuts and post-Brexit plight of EU peers  
The difference between #brexit and Trump seems to be that many of the brexit voters regretted their choice. 
In a 2 hour programme #bbcgms devoted no time to analysis of today's stories re Supreme Court #Article50 #Brexit case or did I dose off? 
Calling Trump and Brexit voters post-truth fascists won't win the Left any elections - @timothy_stanley #premium 
#epf16 Labour should keep options open on blocking a bad #brexit say LabourList readers  via @LabourList 
Politicians should get on with it! #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
Boris Johnson needs to get real about Brexit, says former Tory minister  
German businesses in UK worry about Brexit's impact on their market  
"Why the plummeting pound is actually good news for post-Brexit Britain" - my latest article for the @Independent: 
UKGov urged to drop #Brexit appeal to avoid "Supreme Court deciding to accord devolved administrations some rights". 
Sturgeon wants to use courts to stop Brexit. Courts might equally block Scottish independence. Just say No Theresa 
Is your Brexit the same as their Trump? Yes (on education and economy) and no (on migration, race and turnout)  
As far as I can tell, #brexit means : A Royal YachtA New PalaceGold ElevatorsBusts of Churchill 
Final polls show Renzi's referendum heading for defaet in #Italy BUT polls in Italy very unreliable.  
Sir Olly wants to prevent the Holyrood discovering the Brexit powers it actually has. Are MSPs happy with this?    
Brexit and Trump have exposed the left’s crucial flaw: playing by the rules | Jonathan Freedland  
"Nicola Sturgeon could halt #Brexit through ruling in European court, claims barrister behind High Court case"  
Nigel Farage responds after Ukip 'misspend almost £400,000 in EU funds' on Brexit  
We're losing academics already because of Brexit. The government should not overlook science.  
.@mediacrooks Why's @ArvindKejriwal not testing Right-to-Recall & mid-term Referendum on his Govt's horrible performance in Delhi? @BBCHindi 
While #brexit arguments are focusing on process, it's the substance we should all be really worried about:.…. 
A pro-peace, pro-free-trade, pro-nation-state, anti-elitist democratic revolution is underway. Stay tuned. #Farage #Brexit #Trump #LePen 
Financial Times: 'the UK faces a £100bn bill for Brexit within five years':  
The best result of Brexit & Trump is that, apart from setting the establishment plans back, it has devastated the ragged left. 
WTO boss: Brexit will not cause UK trade 'disruption'  
MP on 'Today' usual rubbish: 'huge vote for #Brexit in ref' - 'huge'! 1/3 of electorate, 1/4 of population - Humpty Dumpty view of language. 
Banks leaving London over Brexit could give the EU a much-needed boost, ECB official says  
JUNCKER THREATENS TO RESIGN !AT FRICKING LAST ! TAKE THE DEAL !#Brexit #LeaveEU #VoteLeave #Article50 
This is brilliant take down of @UKLabour's volte farce after the EU referendum & their negation of duty to remainers  
1. The ref. was not legally binding.2.  Brexit is a governmental choice.3. You can't fight a government if the opposition doesn't oppose. 
There's a way to break the deadlock on Catalonia's independence question that official polls show: it's called referendum and it's harmless!  
Don't they get it? #Art50 case is not just about #Brexit, but not allowing Parliament to block the common will  
If Brexit is overturned the notion we live in a free country will be proven 100% wrong. More repressive laws will follow inc more censorship 
Morning @LiamFoxMP Can you ask Adam why you voted to cut ESA? We can't trust you with Brexit negotiations.  
Whether it's Brexit or Trump, the right has shown it can be utterly ruthless. Time their opponents did the same  
With all the fuss from the far right you'd think there was a problem. #RefugeesWelcome #StopTheHate #Ukip #Brexit  
ICYMIEmpircal evidence on why they voted LeaveFundamental factors behind Brexit vote @voxeu 
Lib Dems 'could force Theresa May to reveal her Brexit plans before triggering Article 50'  
Theresa May tells Merkel: Our Brexit plan is on track.Plan? What plan??? 
Nigel Farage responds after Ukip accused of misspending almost £400,000 in EU funds on Brexit  
Thousands of students and lecturers expected at London demo to protest cuts and post-Brexit plight of EU peers  
Supreme Court's most senior judge urged to stand down from Article 50 legal hearing over wife's anti-Brexit posts  
Anyone for a horticultural Brexit?  
No to #EU #FreeMovement of people,Time for Britain to get strong & use it's own resources  #BrexitBritain #OpenBritain #No2EU #brexit  
Brexit and Trump have exposed the left’s crucial flaw: playing by the rules | Jonathan Freedland  
Your semi-regular reminder that Brexit is a huge mess:  
After #Brexit now #Trexit as Erdogan threatens to take #EU membership to referendum, as if it were immediately or seriously on offer #Turkey 
Truss may have broken law in failing to defend Brexit judges  
First Brexit. Then Trump. @pegobry asks, could France be the next domino to fall?  
HOW WOULD YOU DESCRIBE YOUR CURRENT POLITICAL MOOD ?#Brexit #LeaveEU #Article50 #VoteLeave #leave 
In case you're wondering what Latour think of Brexit and Trump.  
What will be the impact & the repercussions of Brexit for the pharma industry in the UK, Europe & beyond? #FTPharma  
Academics 'must not be used as Brexit pawns'  
Is Italy next? A rejection of the prime minister's reform plans in a referendum could topple the government  
C'mon Wales! C'mon Scotland! Put a stop to Brexit!  
Theresa May is being warned not to use scientists and academics as pawns in negotiations over Brexit.  
Scientists in Britain were left more shaken than most after the EU referendum on June 23rd  
Merkel tells May she won't hold in-depth talks on Brexit for now  
#Obama & #Merkel are in denial; their worldview has taken a beating in 2016. 1st #Brexit2nd #USexitAnd MORE #Exists to come! 
"They will soon be calling me MR. BREXIT!" Trump said when Bannon took over. Meaning: the polls will say I'm out,but I'll win. #AuditTheVote 
In saying this, Labour condones the lies and egomania rampant in politics that helped fuel the Brexit vote.New kind of politics my behind.  
'Brexit, Trump Presidency... more to come' Merkel's worldview is OVER, Farage vows   #MAGA... by #DivineMoments 
Bruno Latour's Le Monde essay on Trump and Brexit available in English.  
Brexit boost for tourism falls short of forecasts  via @FT 
This is not about being elected to parliament ... we forced Cameron to give the referendum, demonised by the media - he stands alone  
If Trump people want to turn #Starbucks into a referendum on the presidential election, then so be it. Give your name as Hillary. 
Bruno Latour's Le Monde essay on Trump (and Brexit) available in English via @lareviewofbooks 
Churchill would have seen Brexit as a dangerous step in the wrong direction  
Farage is repeatedly telling his followers that violence & its threat are legitimate political tactics. That is incitement.#Brexit #Remain 
How Britain's anti-EU campaigners no longer want to be metric martyrs in the post-Brexit era  
Italian minister sums up Brexit stupidity in prosecco row with Johnson: "Difference is I'm going to lose exports to one country, you to 27". 
#NicolaSturgeon branded a 'yapping dog' for demanding a role in #Brexit court case   #BBC 
Well @UKLabour because of #Corbyn and stance on #Brexit it looks like I will be voting for another party for first time in my life. 
US Bond Market Liquidity Collapses: "It's Worse Than Brexit"  
I hope you told him your government gave us a referendum on marriage equality. Also, I hope it choked the creepy sex-obsessed wanker #marref 
If Brexit and Trump is the reaction of an angry white working class surely they'll be rioting for months about £369m?  #BuckinghamPalace 
>Told people not to vote for Trump, they did>Told people not to vote for Brexit, they did>Company that made "Drumpf" hats went bankrupt 
Now the eu are instructing British newspapers not to report Islamic terrorism. We are not going to make it to brexit. Ffs - go now - please. 
Shameful and disgusting. Brexit really has brought out the worst in some people.  
Now the Supreme Court will have the power to stop any future Independence Referendum. Precedent now set. Massive og by @theSNP @STVNews 
70 something ex naval officer ''Is yours the leader offering a second referendum on Brexit?' Me: 'Yes.' Him: 'Good. #LibDems get my vote' 
'Democracy has been overruled by MOB RULE' Angry tirade by Brexit and Trump fan goes viral  
Lots of people saying Trump and Brexit one and the same. @resfoundation analysis gets to the bottom of the matter  
Brilliant! Reminds me of intvw of northants woman who sd voted Brexit cos immigrat'n. R there lots of immigrants here?No but they're coming  
James O’Brien on how the media’s lies got Trump into the White House - and might have swung Brexit too  
Brexit At Tiffany's #MakeAFilmFeelUncertain 
Here's full Trump vs Brexit similarities and differences check list - economics, education and age are issues that cross the Atlantic  
A good assessment of where Better Together #Brexit Britain is headed!  
Brexit - It's certainly no fairy tale...  
That's not surprising. He also thinks Trump's win is about the economy;  he thought the same thing about Brexit. He's wrong a lot.  
First Brexit then Trump and now the Yellow Team are winning?! 2016 is a joke #ImACeleb 
They say "Brexit isn't going well". Well, Brexit was a referendum. Trump will have actual power.  
Brexit is "on track", according to Theresa May.On track for what? Massive failure? 
Let's fund Buckingham Palace instead, or the NHS maybe? #Brexit #BrexitShambles #RedBus #Ukip #2ndthoughts? 
Nicola Sturgeon could halt Brexit through ruling in European court, claims barrister behind High Court case  
Supreme Court's most senior judge urged to stand down from Article 50 legal hearing over wife's anti-Brexit Twitter…  
Brexit is akin to a religion.  No factual basis, but they have faith. believe in it regardles of evidence to contrary. The flock follows  
WTF....! 77% Wanted a referendum! ! Liberals Monsef lying again!! Tsk tsk!! Your losing support Maryann!! Nobody likes to be deceived!!  
Lib Dems 'could force Theresa May to reveal her Brexit plans before triggering Article 50'  
Tomorrow's Daily Telegraph front page: Sturgeon's chance to veto Brexit #TomorrowsPapersToday 
Not happy with Scots ref. Not happy with Brexit.Not happy with Trump. Not happy with B Palace.Pack ur bags for NKorea,democracy ain't for u 
.@JoyAnnReid is coming up LIVE from #London #reiders! She'll have Brits' perspective on #Brexit vs. #Election2016. See you soon for #AMJoy! 
Two superheroes joined together to overthrow the corrupt establishment. #Trump & @Nigel_Farage Mr #Brexit UK & Mr Brexit USA. Go Trump.  
Overheard a Civil Servant bragging on train "the whole planning for #Brexit thing has just been a joke and a huge waste of money." Brave. 
Britain just got perhaps the most intrusive spying powers ever seen.Brexit's "Take Back Control" scary twist: 
Why the UK can and should hold a second referendum on EU membership   
Those in Westminster may be fighting, but British voters have moved on & want to see the Government make a success of Brexit.  
More like OPERATION FOR CHRIST'S SAKE DON'T BLAME BREXIT FOR ANYTHING BECAUSE PEOPLE MIGHT REALISE IT'S ALL A RIGHT-WING CON  
Theresa May assures Angela Merkel #Brexit remains 'on track'  
How many times does Farage think it's appropriate to keep threatening the MPs with "the people's anger" over Brexit? #bbcaq 
Anna Soubry says "We've lost the plot" bc of Brexit, but she will not act/vote to restore the plot. Isn't that dereliction of an MPs duty? 
Martin Rowson on Brexit – cartoon  
No, it's really pissed me off.Just outrageous, elitist crap when a) Britain's in post-Brexit turmoil & b) It's #ChildrenInNeed day.  
Angela Merkel made clear today her top priority in Europe was the future of the EU and not the details of Brexit  
'May’s govt is turning Marx on his head ..in its handling of Brexit, it is starting with the farce. Only later will we get to the tragedy'  
He's wrong. #Brexit is a disaster based on mega-lies that conned millions of good people.  
On #bbcaq just now @Nigel_Farage said the EU vote was clear to leave the Single Market. Really? Watch Nigel:  #brexit 
Scots and Welsh can have a say in the Supreme Court battle over how #Brexit should be triggered  
Can we have a referendum to vote to leave @FIFAcom please. Thank you  #FIXIT 
The General Election.The EU Referendum.The US Election.Alf Garnett vs Al MurrayIt's gettin' boring how I win every bleedin' time, innit?  
When entire basis of UKIP is to force UK to leave EU but in its 23 years of existence no post-brexit plan is created you know they're a sham 
UK Prime Minister Says Brexit Is ‘On Track,’ Despite Opposition Backlash  
With Brexit looming, now seems like a perfectly suitable time to refurbish Buckingham Palace to the sum of £369m  
"Does Prospect Theory explain Trump and Brexit votes?" - from International Cognition and Culture Institute  
Vicar Angers Veterans after Preaching on Trump and Brexit at Remembrance Service  
#Ukip has been around since 1993-you would think that in 23 yrs someone in their organisation would have made a post #brexit plan. #farage 
Merkel tells May she won't hold in-depth talks on Brexit for now  
Anna Soubry had been in favour of holding a referendum – “Only because I thought we would win."  
Forget #Brexit #annasoubry-too many bairns & teens are hungry & poor in your constituency of #broxtowe b/c of you.  
'Brexit, Trump Presidency... more to come' Merkel's worldview is OVER, Farage vows   
#annasoubry instead of being angry at #Brexit you should be angry at  your Tory induced austerity that caused it.  
Parliament made a major mistake when it passed an EU Referendum Act that was not fit for purpose. MP's should admit this! 
European Union Orders British Press NOT to Report when Terrorists are Muslims #FridayFeeling#Brexit#MAGA 
Fascinating week in the Netherlands and Brussels. Returning even more concerned for future of EU but slightly more reassured on Brexit. 
Some people have truly stood up and been counted over Brexit: @Anna_Soubry is one of them. Good on her.  
The Brexit complexities pile on. We are more than one nation.  
Remember the #Leave campaign said #brexit would cost nothing and that warnings about the price to pay were "project fear"....  
Can May & Corbyn be stopped by Nicola?Brexit "could plunge UK into full-blown constitutional crisis"#RemainINEU 
Govt/CS failure to prepare for Brexit is no fault of Brexit or of any of Leave campaigns, but of Govt/CS who arrogantly assumed a Remain win  
.@RSPCA_official shows need to talk to everyone to get a good #Brexit for animal welfare @ALAWAnimalLaw conference + @WCL_News 
The British Government has no idea what it is doing over Brexit  – Joint First Minister Martin McGuinness MLA  
When Arts & Humanities funding was eliminated, researchers were told to seek #EU funds. Will @theresa_may restore A&H funding after #Brexit?  
Even the Chancellor is turning on Theresa May, as her party implodes over Brexit  #Brexit 
BBC UK: Scotland won right to take part in #Brexit decisionBBC Scotland: Scotland is allowed to "intervene" Interesting choice of verbs. 
Having recovered from their shock at the defeat of #HillaryClinton the UK Left now revert to the "but what does Brexit mean" mantra? 
Anyone wanting to have a sleepless night should read "Brexit. What the Hell Happens Now?" By @IanDunt 
4. You absolute idiots. This is why we had Brexit. 
Brexiteers in a nutshell:Brexit: "HURR! HOMELESS SOLDIERS ON THE STREETS!IMMIGRANTS HURR!"£360m for The Queen: *Absolute Silence* 
#Brexit, #WASPI and fighting against UK Govt cuts to social security: The SNP's Week In Westminster.  
Thanks to Brexit, we can now afford a Buckingham Palace refurbishment every week. 
l think we should have a referendum on whether that £369M should be spent on Buckingham Palace, or on other things. Like housing & the NHS. 
EU Referendum: How the University will meet the challenges of Brexit | University of Cambridge  
UK Prime Minister Says Brexit Is ‘On Track,’ Despite Opposition Backlash  via @dailycaller 
We will live in very dangerous times If those MPs Refuse to carry out the people's wishes BREXIT MEANS BREXIT 
So much for being at the 'back of the queue',Congratulations President Donald J Trump#Brexit  
RETWEET: Politicians should get on with it! #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
Brexit has a narrow view of the past & of the future; the EU has helped build friendship & understanding across Europe to prevent dark days.  
The end of a splendid Social Enterprise City Festival. Circular economy, tech, social impact, community shares, Brexit and more! #socent 
#Brexit means... shambles. Share the #Remain love with a #leave voting friend  #didyouvoteforthat 
May & Corbyn - YOUR Brexit is great news!"N Ireland deputy leader says post-Brexit border could lead to violence" 
Farage 100% correct so far. 'Brexit, Trump Presidency... more to come' Merkel's worldview is OVER, Farage vows   
#Labour wake up! Why are you letting down #Britain by not properly challenging #Brexit? Share our guest article:  
It’s likely the UK will have to make post-#Brexit payments. How much and when will be down to negotiations. 
It's clear, no #Brexit, however 'soft' would be as good economically as remaining in the EU. Most MPs know this, they should say so! 
Northern Ireland campaigner to challenge Brexit in supreme court  
Merkel: Brexit talks off table until May triggers Article 50 – video  
YouGov (#Brexit was):RIGHT 46 (+1)WRONG 43 (-1)(With Remainers 5-87, Leavers 92-4)14th-15th NovN=1,717Tabs  
I wonder how many #Brexit voters would have still voted the way they did if they knew the economic consequences. Although they were warned!  
EU must choose whether to "harm" or cherish London as a financial hub, British official says  
'Brexit, Trump Presidency... more to come' Merkel's worldview is OVER, Farage vows   #MAGA #AmericaFirst #Dobbs 
 Brexit The NHS Syria@ZaltzCricket has one minute to save the world! Catch @BBCNowShow - Tonight, 6:30pm @BBCRadio4 
Latest @YouGov poll on #Brexit: Right to Leave 46 (+1): Wrong to Leave 43 (-1). Fwork 14-15.11.16.  
This leaked Brexit memo is all of the truth 
Why #TheresaMay 's  claim to be on course for a smooth #brexit needs to be taken with a pinch of salt: 
Give investment a chance: British firms make Brexit plea to Hammond  
Despite the fact that the "blame Russia" project totally backfired in both Brexit & US elections, seems mistake will be repeated in Germany  
Why would Robert Mercer and his Hedge Fund Renaissance Technologies be so eager to back both UKIP/Brexit and Trump? What POSSIBLE motive.. 
why are we relying on the public to vote on video games. those morons voted for brexit 
What that #Brexit Bus should have said. @ThePoke Buckingham Palace 
Everyone moaning about The Queen getting £350M+ to tart up Buckingham Palace, but the NHS is getting that EVERY WEEK after Brexit, right? 
Scotland and Wales win the right to participate in the Brexit legal battle  
May says Tories are "on track" for triggering #Brexit in March as she met Chancellor Merkel in Berlin  
Theresa May: Britain on track to start Brexit talks  via @POLITICOEurope | Getty 
Eric Kaufmann is proving a key figure in the post-Brexit/Trump debate  
The comments here are uncompromising: Brexit’s roots run deeper than immigration  via @FT 
If you're looking for a good guide to Brexit and what come's next, I can recommend @IanDunt's what the hell will happen now? 
>A second Brexit vote is a real possibility now – here's why it should happen#EURef2 
World’s biggest accountancy firm issues a stark warning to May on Brexit—move out of UK if immigration is restricted 
BREXIT the class divideBy 52% to 37% ABC1s say it was wrong to LEAVEBy 57% to 30% C2DEs say it was was right to LEAVE 
The @scotgov will intervene in the #Brexit court case to ensure Scotland's voice is heard. Here are the facts.  
#Italy - Latest batch of referendum polls shows NO ahead by anything between 1% and 11%. Ban to kick in, so no more polls until December 4. 
Must read: I’ve been wondering how to explain to my offspring-how we let Brexit and Trump happen...  
'Brexit, Trump Presidency... more to come' Merkel's worldview is OVER, Farage vows   
Your semi-regular reminder that Brexit is a huge mess:  
NO. NOW THE MALTESERS ARE SHRINKING TOO.I HOPE YOU'RE HAPPY, BREXIT-VOTERS. 
While we saved America with Trump...& UK with Brexit...entire rest of Europe is done. 
Economist Who Predicted Brexit & Trump Brilliantly Explains Capitalism's Collapse  
My Grandfather used to say "Second thoughts are always best, Michael." Britain should have #2ndthoughts about #Brexit #RemainandReform 
Sweden: #Swexit emerges on #Brexit lines. After #TrumpWonPopularVote like-minded @Sdriks party emerges 2nd largest 
Hmm. Should just be time, before we Hard Brexit, to get a second quote from some low-cost Eastern European builders.  
BBC implying Scots & Welsh people will have another say on Brexit. Wrong. Their gov'ts will try to stop Article 50>  
UK Supreme Court allows Scottish & Welsh Governments to intervene in court over how Brexit should be triggered, by gov't or by Parliament. pic.twitter.com/gokVadt9gV 
Theresa May assures Angela Merkel Brexit remains 'on track'  
Germany: UK Will Fund EU For A Decade After Brexit  
High court allows Scotland, Wales to join Brexit case   
Forget Toblerone triangles #brexit strikes again! Maltesers were 121g now they're down to 103g!  
Richard Corbett on the Brexit nightmare we will soon be unable to ignore  
What do we want?THENWhen do we want it?NOW#Brexit #Trump 
Positive North-South ministerial meeting in Armagh. As British confusion over Brexit worsens, case for special status for North strengthens. 
It's like explaining Newton's First Law to an amoeba. Brexit means a complete and absolute L-E-A-V-I-N-G of the EU! Got that Remoaners? 
Scottish #Brexit minister Mike Russell @Feorlean welcomes @uksupremecourt letting #@scotgov into Article 50 case 
The one hero that can save us from Brexit disaster!  
>May & Corbyn face another Brexit challenge!Supreme Court to decide if UK needs N Ireland's consent to leave EU 
Nigel Farage reduced to telling Fox news that Brexit has been a success. If he said it on British TV they'd hear the laughter on Pluto.  
Scottish and Welsh governments can intervene on Brexit, Supreme Court rules  
Huge amount of expertise at @ALAWAnimalLaw / @WCL_News #Brexit & #AnimalWelfare workshop today: many challenges and opportunities! 
really, really Brexit to spend £369m on making the Queen's house nice, isn't it 
Let’s lie that we’ll spend the £369m on the NHS instead of Buckingham palace, write it on a bus and hold a referendum to leave the Queen 
Despite being met with evidence and statistics, the UK's last Brexit voter still begins every sentence with "Here we go! A Remoaner!" 2017.  
The Italian MIB looks like it is forming a large top pattern into the referendum... let's see.  
BREAKING: Scotland and Wales can intervene on triggering Article 50, rules Supreme Court #Brexit  
Plaid supports Supreme Court decision to give Welsh Government a voice on Brexit @steffanlewis  #Brexit #Plaid16 
“What has science policy ever done for Barnsley?” - blogpost on making the case for science post-Brexit, post-Trump 
MP Peter Bone says he was sent a picture of his youngest son "being executed by ISIS" following the EU referendum  
Life ambition achieved - I'll be on @BBCMoreOrLess this afternoon 4.30pm talking about immigration attitudes & their role in the Brexit vote 
They've subverted a democratic exercise into a referendum on authoritarianism and tacit approval of impunity.This. Is. Wrong. 
Theresa May: 'Preparations for Brexit are on track' 
In case you missed the chance to RT; lots of #Leave campaigners saying #Brexit doesm't mean leaving single market  
According to the BBCScotland having a say in the United Kingdom's Brexit is "a spanner in the works"@nickeardleybbc 
Breaking- Michael Gove to take over as government council in the Brexit case saying he is 'sick and tired of experts' 
Merkel: can't discuss Brexit in detail as Article 50 not yet invoked  
Former U.K. foreign secretary David Miliband talks to Newsweek about Trump, Brexit and life in New York  
Brexit: Belfast victims campaigner Raymond McCord can take legal challenge to Supreme Court:  
The latest Holy Smoke podcast: Brexit, Trump and the pious rage of the liberal clergy  
Supreme court rules Scottish Government can join Brexit legal battle  
Paying into EU after Brexit could be v tricky to sell to public -- less popular than even keeping free movement.  
Who will be the first Democrat to endorse a #CalExit Referendum? History will give them a profile in courage. @BW @YesCalifornia @Vote_CNP 
Finally some reaction to racist Brexit press. City University students vote for campus ban on Sun, Mail and Express  
Scottish and Welsh governments can intervene on Brexit, Supreme Court rules  
Angel Merkel: Theresa May has said she will trigger Article 50 by the end of March and we accept that. No formal #Brexit talks today. 
No brexit plan, no mandate for anything in Scotland, £369m taxpayer refurb for Buckingham palace, Scot MP cuts..  
Brexit: Fresh blow for Theresa May as Supreme Court rules Scotland and Wales can intervene in Article 50 triggering  
Bank bosses are no longer warning of an imminent exodus of staff from London  
British PM's changing vocabulary signals shift from 'hard Brexit'  
Scottish and Welsh governments will be allowed to intervene in the court battle over how Brexit should be triggered  
Post Brexit and Trump, Is Italy the Next Country to Go Populist?  
Hard #brexit and limiting freedom of movement isn't just bad for the economy, it's unpatriotic and violates Magna Carta  
Min @CharlieFlanagan at the NSMC plenary in Armagh, where he briefed on his work in advancing Ireland's interests in Brexit discussions  
Scottish and Welsh governments can intervene on Brexit, Supreme Court rules  
Seriously, UK, you still have a chance to say, "Whoops, referendum is invalid because Scotland and Northern Ireland. Sorry!" Do it. 
Brexit challenge will go to Supreme Court - contribute to this crowdfunder & make sure NI's voice is heard!  
-May & Corbyn's Brexit BlowSupreme Court Brexit - Scotland & Wales as nations win bid to fight their corner 
TIME TO GO: Sinking Sturgeon faces growing calls to RESIGN over shambolic Brexit threats  
Looking forward to seeing @RussShaw1 and @tadeyoola on @BBCLondonNews today talking #tech post-Brexit #LondonIsOpen @TechLondonAdv @Metail 
A falling Brexit pound means food price rises are on the way.#Brexit - working hard to make Britain poorer#Remain 
Friday's top stories: Abe meets Trump, Schäuble talks tough over Brexit and Hong Kong's crab worries. For more go to  
The political establishment are getting rattled and it all started with #Brexit 
View how #Boston and #Brixton #Lambeth are coming together in the wake of #Brexit divisions – a @thomhaig film in aid of #MoreInCommon 
Supreme court rules Scottish Government can intervene in #Brexit battle 
Do people not realise that the economic disaster of #Brexit is just excuse the Tories need to remove the last of your hospitals? #STP #NHS 
The unfortunate misspelling on the Brexit battle bus has finally been corrected.  
Good that Scotland's Lord Advocate will address the UK Supreme Court to represent Scotland's interests on #Brexit.  
Instead of calling for a second referendum, why don't MPs such as Tim Farron have a conversation with the British electorate and LISTEN? 
Picture caption: You know, Matteo, a referendum is what we Americans call a hail Mary  
Situation radically changed with #Trump European Security needs very strong and united EU. Dump #Brexit 
YES. Now is the time to boost UK science funding.Let's call on the Gov put us back on the front foot to counteract the impact of Brexit.  
“The US election has been decided - and arguably a referendum has been decided here - based on absolute lies."  
Welsh gov. will be allowed to intervene in Supreme Court Brexit case. They must remember that Wales voted to Leave! 
Next wild card for markets: Italy’s constitutional referendum   
Final polls suggest PM Matteo Renzi is likely to lose out in Italy's referendum  
Brexit set to cost UK £100billion as half of voters think economy will get worse over next 12 months -  #bbcdp 
BREAKING: Scotland & Wales will get to fight their corner in the Supreme Court Brexit case  
BREAKING: @UKSupremeCourt will allow @WelshGovernment to intervene in the UK government's appeal over #Brexit ruling  
Scottish and Welsh Governments to be allowed to intervene in Supreme Court battle over how Brexit is triggered  
Four interveners in Art 50 #Brexit case confirmed by Supreme Court including the Lord Advocate on behalf of @scotgov #ScotlandinEurope 
Scottish and Welsh governments can intervene in Brexit case  
The Scottish and Welsh Governments are to be allowed to intervene in a court battle over how #Brexit is formally triggered  
BREAKING: Scottish Government to be allowed to intervene in court battle over #Brexit, Supreme Court announces 
Great to see @CommonsSTC report on future of UK science post Brexit. My view on how research can keep saving lives:  
The UK should be making precisely ZERO contributions to the failed #EU from the minute we #Brexit. 
Here's @UKSupremeCourt confirmation @scotgov and others allowed to intervene in article 50 #Brexit appeal  
More to learn from #Brexit.  
Article 50 #Brexit case: update on interveners, inc from Scotland, Wales and NI  
After US election and Brexit sharing global economic perspective with investors in Barcelona #MSTMT 
"We will vote against Article 50 unless it allows the people a vote on the deal." - @LibDems #Brexit  
Lords warned over Brexit block: 'It would be the unelected against the people'  
A workable #Brexit:1 Create new European entity2 Call it anything but ‘EU’3 Make treaty to move all EU MS to new entity at onceSorted! 
READ: Theresa May will meet one on one with Merkel at EU summit, Brexit is sure to be the main talking point. 
Chinese plan new £1.7 billion financial district in London as cash pours in after Brexit vote  
Am I alone in thinking the collective Tory gov haven't a clue what to do about Brexit?Noisy, headless chickens as usual.EU just waiting.  
Watch @tomhanks give his views on Donald Trump and Brexit  
Beyond Brexit: SNP dominance could grow  
The @neilslorance Sketch: Kezia Dugdale takes a stand on #Brexit  
A nuanced and powerful point by Yasmin Baruchi about what was so depressing about the Brexit and Trump votes:  
I've got a big piece in this week's @NewStatesman abt Brexit: essay on 4 books inc. All Out War by @ShippersUnbound 
What do the changing attitudes of Remainers @Ed_Miliband and @nick_clegg tell us about #Brexit? @oflynnmep explains:  
Bridget Christie writes a Brexit sitcom: Script in development for Channel 4  
No reason to believe judges will overturn Article 50 ruling, campaigner Gina Miller says  
Powerful post on an inter-racial / inter-faith couple confronting their differences after Brexit and Trump  
Recreate Brexit by having a family vote on whether to move house, and if it's evenly split, smash everything in your house with hammers 
This is the most commented-on story on : Wolfgang Schäuble sets out tough line on Brexit  
Europe could die, French PM Manuel Valls warns in Berlin  #Brexit  
Post-Brexit and post-Trump people still think it's a good idea to tell the disaffected working class they're too stupid to spend own money  
Beyond Brexit: Those promoting a socially progressive Brexit are fooling themselves. Me in today's @heraldscotland 
Have had a brilliant idea to help Govt with its Brexit strategy: why don't we, you know, leave the EU? You're welcome. 
Calling academic types, students, @ucu members: am doing a debate on Brexit & HE Weds. Please email over any thoughts  
Beauty and the #Brexit Beast #TheresaMay #cartoon 
I keep hearing from Unionists that Scottish independence is waning. So much so they are confident of another referendum in order to prove it  
Magical stories from @Wintersonworld. Recipes from me. @jayrayner1 on Brexit and a Christmas sugar-fest. All in this weekend's @ObsFood. 
The Brexit nightmare we will soon be unable to ignore - enormous costs & complexity for *decades*  
Give the British people a real choice on Brexit deal. No more false choices & pipe dreams. #brexitshambles  
'Brexit and Trump' sound like the standard fat one / thin one pair of witless henchman antagonists you'd get in a kids show about goblins 
Important point from @ENBrown -- these were also the type of "hate crime" incidents excessively played up post-Brexit  
At London Business School last night. All depressed by Brexit and our Govts handling of it. Still what would they know - they're experts. 
Grassroots kipper lunacy against metrification. Village idiots are driving the Brexit bus #nobrexit #brexitshambles 
All the people calling me an idiot/prick/etc over Brexit prices might want to look again at what's happened to the pound since June 23  
Ukip violated EU spending rules to fund its Brexit and general election campaigns  
I won't go to EU court if government wins Article 50 appeal, campaigner Gina Miller says  
Politicians should've defended judges over Article 50 ruling, campaigner Gina Miller says  
Recession, austerity, growing inequality, tax-dodging rich, jobs hit by Chinese imports. Don't worry - blame the EU #Brexit #Remain #YesEU 
Great conference about #Brexit yesterday in Mersch! Special thanks to my British friends for coming and joining the discussion!  
Staggering: 94% drop in non-EU college students applying to extend studies in run up to Brexit vote  
The Labour Party Believes in Minority rule By Challenging the Brexit vote This will be your downfall along with whats left of those Liberals 
Just read All Out War by @ShippersUnbound. Great on politics, and really good on underlying policy/law tensions. Recommended Brexit reading. 
We're keeping a rolling list of all the things that have got more expensive since the Brexit vote  via @jamesrbuk 
Germany warns that Britain faces decades of EU contributions after Brexit ahead of Berlin summit. Not a penny  
MESSAGE TO ALL THOSE MPs WHO ARE TRYING TO SABOTAGE THEBREXIT VOTE IF YOU DON'T WANT TO REPRESENT THE MAJORITY WHO VOTED BREXIT THEN RESIGN 
Shadow Brexit secretary Keir Starmer is "absolutely furious” about McDonnell’s pro-Brexit speech earlier this week.  
#BREXIT "PROGRESS" POLLAre @theresa_may & co looking competent re #brexit?Please RT to increase the sampleEnds late Sunday evening. 
At @SMFthinktank's #movingon launch, @ChukaUmunna says Brexit should end view Tories are economically competent. Related: @timesredbox today 
British MPs call for immigration guarantees for scientists  (me on @CommonsSTC #Brexit report) cc @Metcalfe_SBET 
@ChukaUmunna right to say that the fallout from the Brexit vote should end the myth that the Tories are the party of business @SMFthinktank 
Let's #Spain learn from UK about #democracy.- Letters @FT from one of our members#Gibraltar #Catalonia #Brexit 
...and bring some Marmite. This about sums up UK's post-Brexit importance these days.  
What with the Brexit policy shambles, the Scotrail fiasco, & now MPs' expenses, it's not been the best of weeks for the SNP 
The really key fact about the EU referendum is that three-quarters of the UK population did not vote to leave the EU. Compute that. 
"That's not a Brexit, that's two halves of the Conservatives you're banging together" 
On second thoughts let's not go to brexit, it is a silly place.. 
The UK needs to either scale or break through the walls of Brexit reality. The UK currently is looking up at Monty Python knights above. 
Morning London. This is the most read story in the last hour: Wolfgang Schäuble sets out tough line on Brexit  
Shamboli! Brexit IS British politics. And this is where Labour are.  
EU researchers must be allowed to stay in UK after Brexit, MPs tell government  
Whether the Article 50 notification requires an Act of Parliament or not is one of the easiest Brexit problems to resolve. 
British PM's changing vocabulary signals shift from 'hard Brexit'  
How May can break free from Brexit muddle via @thetimes 
Nissan's post-Brexit deal could lead to 'colossal' bills for taxpayer -  
Ukip ‘misspent £385,000 of EU cash on Brexit’ via @thetimes 
There's a lot of talk about the EU customs union and what it means. Here's a guide  
Your semi-regular reminder that Brexit is a huge mess  
Row over McDonnell's Brexit comments threatens Labour truce  
DT letter: "The Brexit formula is simple: stop obeying and stop paying".  Amen to that. 
Brexit Could Herald End To British Doorbell Sales, Leonardo DiCaprio Warns #LeonardoDiCaprio 
Reassure EU scientists they can stay in UK after Brexit, Govt urged - otherwise we will suffer brain drain:  
Trump advisor and Brexit leader Nígel  Farage refused service at big cafe near European Parliament in Brussels by multicultural staff. 
News item: "Post-Brexit UK will REDUCE the aid money it sends to the EU".  Reduce? Reduce? Why send it at all? 
YES! MPs call for science to escape Brexit migration rules & to boost UK science funding.  via @FT 
Germans warn May-no special Brexit deal-you'll pay until 2030-you'll lose finance firms  
We're calling for an immediate commitment to exempt EU researchers in the UK from any wider potential immigration controls following #Brexit  
'You have NO OPINION' Pro-EU panellist blasts Brexit and then admits she DIDN'T VOTE! Typical Remoaner!  
Pro-Kremlin disinformation on Italy's upcoming referendum on constitutional reform. Latest Digest:  #DisinfoReview 
Have a read of The Herald today...a series of articles, opinion and case studies of how Brexit will affect the arts in Scotland.  
Brexit uncertainties threaten to undermine scientific collaboration in Britain  
Keep saying, keep showing, keep reminding. The only way to deal with shifting ground called "post-truth". What referendum "mandate"?  
UK will have to keep on paying after Brexit, says German finance minister  
In aftermath of Brexit, "everyone was terrified, except Farage, riding the motorbike of his own delusion" - @IanDunt 
The UK as we know it can’t survive Brexit and Trump | Gerry Hassan  
The Govt needs to set out an ambitious new vision for science post Brexit - beyond 'open for business'. New report  
DExEU needs a Chief Scientific Adviser urgently. Read our full report on science and #Brexit  
One common thread in GG, Ghostbusters 2016, Brexit & the electionIf you dictate how people should criticize the status quo, you will lose. 
The German finance minister wants us to keep paying into the EU after Brexit.Pay attention, Wolfgang: NO THANKS! 
Thanks for kind words, Kaki. Much negativity came at me today after Brexit-backing Daily Mail covered #GrabYourWallet, so esp. appreciated! 
.@afneil @daily_politics Here's a counter to your film claiming Brexit means hard Brexit & leaving the single market. Show this next time?  
Government blackmails House of Lords over Brexit vote  
We've got the biggest National Debt ever, 6 years of austerity, no growth & now £100bn Brexit black hole.Tory economic failure!#Corbyn4PM 
There's no more reason for the post-Brexit UK to be subject to EU rules and budgets than for Canada or S Korea to be subject to EU rules.  
BluehandNEWS #PresidentElectTrump  #DonaldTrumpWins #brexit #Hexit #hillaryforprison @AnitaDWhite @SEC_SAM @bluehand007 
Brexit at Tiffany's 
Economist Who Predicted Brexit & Trump Brilliantly Explains Capitalism's Collapse  via @jimmy_dore / @MkBlyth 
Great talk by Mark Blythe on failure of financial capital & #Brexit, #Trump & follow up in France & Italy  
'You have NO OPINION' Pro-EU panellist blasts Brexit and then admits she DIDN'T VOTE #bbcqt  
Schäuble: "UK will be subject to EU rules & budget contributions for many years after Brexit".  They still don't get it, do they? 
Brilliant by @anandMenon1 every Briton should listen - or better should have listened before they voted on Brexit  
my extended NRI & PIO family is super thrilled about demonetisation. I told them i am super thrilled about Trump and Brexit.#HappyFamily 
Trump election is new wild card for Brexit   
Here's why a second Brexit vote matters —via @ConversationUK  
Trump, Brexit & the failure of social science to describe and predict  
What the hell?Hey, America, see what Brexit can do?Guess who's next. Do you love itDo you hate itHere it isThe way you made it...Wow  
More evidence that the temperament referendum was pointless.  
Your semi-regular reminder that Brexit is a huge mess  
“Post-truth” picked as "Word of 2016" by Oxford Dictionary after usage spiked amid #Brexit vote & US election. What's your word of 2016?  
In Wake of Brexit, Trump, European Union May Break Apart  #Trending via @pjmedia_com 
Reassure EU scientists they can stay in UK after Brexit, Govt urged  
Economist Who Predicted Brexit & Trump Brilliantly Explains Capitalism's CollapseThe Jimmy Dore Show#Demexit 
Britain deserves an EU Exit Package Referendum & Labour will fall behind Lib Dems if they don't support it says YouGov @DavidLammy 
SHIFTING PARADIGM: You’ll Only Understand #Trump and #Brexit If You Understand the Failure of #Globalization 
Britain. Unemployment at 11-year low means that 95% of new workers are all foreign born. Remarkable, especially despite Brexit fears 
"Theresa May, what is your plan for Brexit?"Theresa May: 
Well, it is a regrettable example.Can we send him back? He sms more popular w the #Brexit crowd.  
The British government's indecision over Brexit reflects divided public opinion  
Air passenger duty should be halved in the Autumn Statement to boost post-Brexit trade, MPs say.  
The Brexit-backing UK Independence party misspent €450,000 of EU funding, partially on its campaign to leave the EU  
Brexit: countering the scaremongering - information is key ... . 
Cat Boyd's credibility on Question Time was undermined by her statement that she didn't vote in EU referendum. #bbcqt 
New poll shows Lib Dems could overtake Labour, Ukip if politics polarises over Brexit  
Texit? #Trump & #Brexit reignite #Texas secession movement [VIDEO]  @TrinityfChavez @TheTexianDM @NewswithEd 
Read our new report on the impact of #Brexit on science and research (pdf)  
Friday's FT:Berlin dashes Downing St hopes of easy path to Brexit#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Very embarrassed but Merryn Somerset Webb should be invited to speak on Scotland and Brexit at every opportunity! 
One way or another, Donald Trump’s election could change Brexit   
#bbcqt's Captain Orange won all his referendums: #Brexit, #indyref1 and the big tax case. What a guy! 
Must listen radio documentary by @anandMenon1  BBC Radio 4 - Analysis, Brexit: What Europe Wants  
John Nicholson called BREXIT a crisis and mouthy Cat Boyd couldn't be arsed to vote but still supports remain.  
Tory MP Kwasi Karteng on #bbcqt 'They said there'd be a recession'.#Brexit hasn't happened yet! jeez how many times??! 
Pro-EU Tory rebels reveal their plan to fight Theresa May's 'harsh Brexit'  
William Waldegrave's memoir on his refusal to join the "In" campaign in the 1975 referendum, despite his mentor Ted Heath's leadership  
I'm waiting to be accused of misogyny for criticising @kittycatboyd for saying she didn't vote in EU referendum. Women died for the vote! 
Except Cat has admitted she didn't care enough to vote in EU referendum. Quite bizarre from an activist.  
Great response frm @MrJohnNicolson to @KwasiKwartengMP moans re #Brexit scaremongering we dont recall Tories sunny predictions re ScotIndy 
Germany warns UK faces decades of EU contributions  so 350m/week is actually extra Uk has to pay eu for Brexit 
I've spoken to numerous businesses and an awful lot of them are now for indyref2 thx to Brexit. #bbcqt 
'What has changed since the indyref except Brexit?", says some goon. Yeah, nothing major, then. 
Everyone forgets that Scotland voted twice between Indyref and EUref. They gave mandate for another referendum both times. #bbcqt 
UK should let itself be subsumed by US and be ruled by Trump. He'll make Brexit work. Dump Mayhem. 
It's been a tough year for the regressive Left.They lost Brexit.They lost the US election.They lost their minds.Result. 
Cat Boyd believes that the independence referendum was 'a great thing' which engaged people in politics #bbcqt  
Ordinary People are fighting back#bbcqt #SNP #Trump #Brexit #EUSpring 
What is your view of the 2014 Scottish Independence Referendum?#bbcqt #indyref #2014 
"You can't just keep having a referendum until you get the answer you want."  #bbcqt 
The #Brexit vote for 18-25 was largely similar.If 2016 has taught us anything, it's that our best hope is the younger generations.  
The Scottish people said NO to Independence two years ago. The #SNP fanatics seek to deny this, just as they deny #Brexit #bbcqt 
Merryn Somerset Webb #bbcqt got it spot on about Nicola Sturgeon -says she won't call another Referendum because she knows she won't win it 
Merryn Somerset Webb, board member of Scotland in Union, giving her entirely unbiased view on a 2nd independence referendum there #bbcqt 
Cat Boyd was lecturing people about a referendum she didn't even in vote in. Suffice to say it all got a bit awkward. #bbcqt 
Watch Cat Boyd answer the question "how did you vote in the Brexit referendum?" #bbcqt 
Activist Cat Boyd #bbcqt talking about Brexit.Says it's a major event  but didn't even bother to vote.Who needs her opinion on anything? 
Oh dear. Cat Boyd didn't vote in the EU referendum. What on earth? #bbcqt 
#bbcqt Boasting that things are OK when Brexit hasn't yet happened is like crowing that childbirth's a doddle when you've just conceived. 
OYE. Leave @kittycatboyd alone.She is SPOT ON about the EU referendum. Rock and a hard place - we were fucked either way.#bbcqt 
If you want to see whats wrong with the left just look at Cat Boyd lecturing on Brexit then admit she didnt even vote.  #bbcqt 
Merryn Somerset Webb #bbcqt says history will see Brexit as a minor change to its trading arrangements with its neighbour's. Spot on 
#bbcqt The #brexit talks haven't started yet because Govt hasn't a clue what it wants to secure: via @leftfootfwd 
There's no embargo - it's just a rundown of the latest Government plans for Brexit. #tomorrowspaperstoday 
If Chris Bryant #bbcqt is having a crisis of conscience about his anti Brexit views - he should resign.Esp as his constituency voted Leave 
Statement from #UKIP chairman of £400K of #EU Money spent on #Brexit campaign  
#IMF U-turns on #Brexit warning as #UK poised to be fastest growing #G7 #economy this year  #BBC #SKY #ITV #EU #NEWS 
Please remind the political spawn on #bbcqt that the PEOPLE of the UK have voted to BREXIT. You are our servants, not our masters. 
I'm glad @KwasiKwartengMP thinks there's been no #Brexit impact. Could he tell my local Post Office where €100 currently costs £92? #bbcqt 
The Brexit "plan" is simple. We leave the bloody EU and its every institution. Got that, you thick sore loser Remainers? #bbcqt 
"Brexit" might as well be known as "fubberdubber". Neither term has any meaning. #bbcqt 
.@MrJohnNicolson "The UK government are not giving a running commentary on Brexit because they don't have a plan." #bbcqt 
The House of Lords will seal its own demise if it thwarts the will of the people on Brexit. Pomposity we can bear. Anti-democracy we cannot! 
#BBCQT This guy is absolutely spot-on. What the Hell are the audience booing him down on?Democracy?A lawful Referendum vote?  
Love how Stockwell Day cautions Liberals not to go ahead on electoral reform without a referendum! Is he kidding? Tories did omnibus bills! 
@WeAreOneEU I'm German, have lived in UK for 21 yrs. UK holds referendum, am not allowed to vote. Now right to remain in question 
More Brexit bad news ....  
Looks like Daily Mirror has grabbed an exclusive, listing all of the government's plans for #Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcqt 
Let's play #bbcqt bingo. Trump = racist. Housing Crisis = nothing to do with Open Borders. Brexit? No plan. Scotland = socialist paradise. 
Need all MPs who believe in the principles that underpin the EU to shake off the shackles of political dogma & work together to dump Brexit.  
We'll get a sense of the LD "2nd referendum" policy is resonating with voters in the Richmond Park by election 2 wks today 
How EURef  REMAIN voters would split if LDs only party promising 2nd referendum at a GECON 24LAB 23LD 42UKIP 1YouGov polling 
YouGov finds that the LDs would be ahead of LAB if they went into a GE as only party promising 2nd referendum 
Theresa May is weakShe is a control freak who has lost controlHer moral code is dictated by Paul DacreHas not a clue about how to Brexit 
Brexit: EU nurses are 'suffering racist abuse and heading home'  
German finance minister hardens Brexit stance  
Obama in Berlin: "I make it a rule not to meddle in other people's politics." In UK, If you vote for Brexit you'll be "at back of the bus." pic.twitter.com/oiWpsLHglP 
#UKIP spend £400K of #EU money on #Brexit campain - UPROARUK GOV spend 9M on #EUPropaganda leaflet & thats OK..#BrexitBritain #hypocrites 
#SupremeCourt #judge #LadyHale says #Brexit vote not legally binding. SHE SHOULD START HIDING THEN!  #BBC #SKY #ITV 
Brexit campaigners created dangerously toxic EU debate where 'facts didn't matter', inquiry says to MPs 
Brexit Britain's manufacturing hits 10-month HIGH as May vows 'UK is open for business'  
Rahhhhh the Asian and the African got fired I blame brexit and Donald Trump. #TheApprentice 
Among human rights finalists, Pat Anderson AO, @LowitjaInstitut Chair, Referendum Council Co-Chair, Mum, Nan, Sister, Aunty, Friend.  
Basically all of this also applies to Brexit voters, UKIP voters, immigration secptics and how parts of left talk about them  
HEY GUYS IT HASN'T EVEN BEEN A YEAR SINCE BREXIT HAHAHA WHERE ARE YOUR PREDICTIONS OF DOOM NOW HAHA we haven't even left EU yet idiots 
And why is the Labour Party leadership now backing Brexit and seemingly happy to leave the Single Market?  Betrayal of Labour Remainers.  
My speech tonight at the @YouGov conference on Trump, Brexit and globalisation  
Brexit, Trump and...  
New poll shows Lib Dems could overtake Labour, Ukip if politics polarises over Brexit  
FINANCIAL TIMES FRONT PAGE: 'Berlin dashes Downing St hopes of easy path to Brexit' #skypapers 
The Labour Party supports Brexit.I'm out. 
Tough words from Wolfgang Schäuble on #Brexit, who's not known for "cheap talk"  
#NigelFarage talks #Obama, #Merkel and #DonaldTrump on #VarneyCo. Take a look! #Brexit #Trump  #BBC #SKY #ITV #UK #EU 
In handling Brexit, Theresa May is "starting with the farce – only later will we get to the tragedy" @martinkettle 
Its a great age of social mobility to join the liberal elite ypu just have to disagree with trump and brexit 
Reading what feels like roughly my 13th book on Brexit for a Christmas roundup of political books. Not feeling all that festive. 
Might be harsh & direct to state the obvious, but Brexit 'stinks', it's unpleasant and based on misinformation and supposition, it's a sham.  
Main lesson of both US election and Brexit is prosaic enough: media narrative is not reality but often a 'progressive' delusion. 
If threats of violence are affecting or being seen to affect political decisions then our democracy is in grave danger#Farage #Brexit 
Sounds reasonable. Petition: Pay £350m per week to NHS or re-run EU Referendum  
Perhaps they're just not telling you? Why would they tell someone actively undermining Brexit what the plan is?  
Unlike the US elections #brexit can be reversed. It is not binding. The 48% plus can restore commonsense to UK politics. Never surrender. 
For all those who may be cowed by #brexit and #trump claims that we ought to accept and tolerate their bigotry. 
Here's the thing: Brexit is emerging as a really shit idea. I always hated it, but now it's also just obviously bollocks.  
Remember folksASLEF were official supporters of the NO Campaign in the Independence ReferendumI smell orange  
@Sargon_of_Akkad oh wait, I though #brexit would bring DOOOOOOM. Looks like you continue to hit the nail on the head Sargon  
I am not going to name names, but newspapers and magazines which once had a much broader view of the world are  now blinkered by Brexit 
Tweeted by Kevin Lindsay, Scottish Secretary of ASLEF during the independence referendum.  
TIME TO GO: Sinking Sturgeon faces growing calls to RESIGN over shambolic Brexit threats...NICOLA Sturgeon is...  
Brexit vote is hurting UK talent hire, reputation & collabs already. We need investment & commit to work with EU to get back on front foot.  
Is this proof Brexit will have a ripple effect across Europe? French PM admits the EU is at risk of breaking up:  
This week's Brexit good news:  Inflation  Unemployment  Retail sales   
Government say they haven't got the money when it comes to care in the community But can find £60 Billion for HS2 People still vote for them 
Brexit campaigners created dangerously toxic EU debate where 'facts didn't matter', MPs told   
Ian Botham calls on the government to trigger #Brexit NOW: 'We voted #Leave - lets get on with it' 
Look away now if you are easily offended #BrexitShambles #Brexit #Farage #Unicorn 
This stance confirms the obvious. The UK holds weak cards until #Article50. After that the EU decides everything. Well done #Brexit fans!  
More Brexit bad news....  
The Brexit-backing UK Independence party misspent €450,000 of EU funding, partially on its campaign to leave the EU  
Instead of calling for a second referendum, why don't MPs such as Tim Farron have a conversation with the British electorate and LISTEN? 
MPs can now see off hard Brexit. The ball is in their court | Martin Kettle  
If we don't leave the Single Market, we will still have to send money to Brussels. That's not what the British people voted for. #Brexit  
Bad stuff that happened in 2016.4. Celebrity deaths.3. Brexit.2. President-Elect Trump.1. Chewbacca Mom. 
What the hell is going on? First, Brexit -- now Vexit.Today, after eight fab years, @VanessaOHanlon leaves @BreakfastNews . Wish her well. 
The new #Nationalism#DonaldTrump #Putin #NigelFarage #Brexit #MakeAmericaGreatAgain #Economist 
Your semi-regular reminder that Brexit is a huge mess  
Accountancy firm Deloitte says it'll move work out of the UK if Brexit restricts immigration. How important is migration to UK plc?  
Sheer hypocritical narcissism of an Obama who says he doesn’t believe in interfering in other countries’ politics is breathtaking.Brexit? 
In issue 20:  @timfarron on why Hard #Brexit will be a disaster for Britain, as he states his determination to push for a further referendum 
Can someone commission a shrink to explain why people who voted Brexit and Trump and won are so ANGRY. 
Man United's debts go up 18% since Brexit vote. They're now £338m in debt.FFP anyone?  
Cortoonmokken morgen te bestellen via @dealdumpert: Neverendum, Cortés Avatar, I'll Be Black, Sunset Piggy Bank, Brexit The Plan of Brexit.  
Between austerity and #brexit sits ordinary Britan like wheat between a millstone.   
AK Press have made @HarshaWalia's Undoing Border Imperialism ebook (+ others) free - vital read after Brexit/Trump  
Remember President Obama's intervention in our referendum campaign? Today he said he doesn't "meddle in other people's politics". Really.  
Thanks to @LeedsUniUnion executive members for coming to @HouseofCommons today to discuss the damaging HE Bill and Brexit threat to Erasmus.  
Arguments for 2nd referendum: •voters changing their minds•increasing uncertainty since the referendum•fairy tale deal impossible to reach 
A new parliamentary report sums up how clueless everybody is about #Brexit! RT!  
Yes. And in Turkey, the Philippines, Brexit in Europe, etc. It's what Pres Obama called "the rise of crude nationalism." All Interconnected.  
YES PLEASELib Dems 'could force Theresa May to reveal Brexit plans before article 50'  
New poll shows Lib Dems could overtake Labour, Ukip if politics polarises over Brexit  
Illegal? UKIP group 'misspent' EU funding on Brexit campaign, says leaked audit  
Theresa May and Brexit by Christain Adams - political cartoon gallery  
German stance: "no acceptance of 4 freedoms means no passporting, no free trade in financial services or access for financiers" #Brexit @FT 
Always good to remind ourselves what we are fighting for. #brexit #remain #brexitshambles 
Beefy calls for the government to get on with Brexit  
WILL YE GO LASSIE GO: Sinking Sturgeon faces growing calls to RESIGN over shambolic Brexit threats/ Scotgov failure  
Ukip ‘misspent’ EU funding on #Brexit campaign: I am surprised this is even considered news since no surprise 
Nigel Farage responds after Ukip accused of misspending almost £400,000 in EU funds on Brexit  
Germany's finance minister sets out a tough line on Brexit talks on issues ranging from tax breaks to exit costs  
Prediction: If #Brexit ever happens, people will feel no more in control than they do now. But they will feel a lot poorer! 
Really good afternoon canvassing session in Richmond Park for @sarahjolney1 People really angry about Brexit  
Skynews should be concentrating on the 200k who are Homeless in UK Millions who are living n poverty Climate Change isn't important to these 
EU nurses are 'suffering racist abuse and heading home because of Brexit'  
Former CBI Chair @Digbylj: Germany sells a million cars a year in Britain – we'll be able to secure zero tariffs after #Brexit  
NeoLiberals can hog the BBC airwaves as much as they want UKIP achieved BREXIT and Trump will be next President of USA 
#Wholefoods Largestsystem in #London!! #THANKSGIVING IN #UK w/all the trimmings! #BREXIT & #AMERICA much 2 be #THANKFUL 4 #THANKSGIVING  pic.twitter.com/MhmGEDkgUy 
Hey @timfarron - more people voted to leave the EU than voted for your political party. Stop trying to block Brexit #RespectTheResult 
Britain as we know it can’t survive Brexit and Trump | Gerry Hassan  
Those who led us down this path will not suffer because of Brexit. It is those who are "just getting by" who will suffer and pay the price.  
RETWEET: Politicians should get on with it! #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
Nationalism, xenophobia, scapegoating, anti-intellectualism, 'the will of the people'. Fascist themes peddled by the #Brexit press#YesEU 
I am a #Tory member. If an election now I will vote #UKIPOnly way to guarantee #brexit@Number10gov pull your finger out. 
Great to see @IPPR launch this important commission today: in a year that has seen Brexit & Trump, it's never been more needed @TomKibasi 
>May & Corbyn's Brexit:"The rich, once all-powerful tradition of unionism in these isles is on its knees" 
Will "the rebellious Celtic nations will ultimately acquiesce in Brexit"?"It just isn’t going to happen" 
"Brexit Britain and Trump's America can have a special relationship"  
The defender of the 'little people' shares a gold lift with a billionaire who ruins subcontractors he fails to pay in court.#Brexit  
The House of Lords will seal its own demise if it thwarts the will of the people on Brexit. Pomposity we can bear. Anti-democracy we cannot! 
Britain as we know it can’t survive Brexit and Trump | Gerry Hassan  
Obama to the Brits on Brexit: "If you vote to leave, you will be at the back of the line when", but he doesn't meddle in other country's pol  
And they were the ones who tried to bring us Project Fear :) Proud to have voted OUT! #brexit  
"Rushing into Brexit would be a disaster" | my piece in today's @DailyMirror - take the time to do it properly  
The liberal elite are trying to block Brexit. What part of democracy don't the understand? We voted leave! #RespectTheResult 
BrexitScotland votes for Indy to ensure of EU membershipUK agrees trade with EUWhich means trade with Scotland 
Yet another threat of violence from Farage. It is a scandal that this man is not behind bars. #Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
WATCH: @Nigel_Farage talks Obama, Merkel and @RealDonaldTrump on @VarneyCo. Take a look! #Brexit #Trump #VarneyCo 
Obama in Berlin: "I make it a rule not to meddle in other people's politics." In UK, If you vote for Brexit you'll be "at back of the bus." 
Obama just said "I try to make it a rule not to meddle in other people's politics".Apart from Brexit. And Russia. And Ukraine... etc etc 
#Obama hopes UK exit from EU will happen in an "orderly" and "transparent" fashion. Not two words which I've seen linked to #Brexit so far! 
City A.M: The IMF says it expects the UK to be the fastest growing G7 economy this year, backtracking on its post-Brexit recession warning. pic.twitter.com/fZ9FUV9wZn 
But didn't the Leave campaign say Commonwealth were queuing up to sign deals with Britain. Not another Brexit lie?  
Not even soccer is safe: Brexit hits Manchester United's debt  via @POLITICOEurope | Getty 
New Democrats back referendum to pressure Liberals into agreeing to proportional representation: @thespec  #NDP #ERRE 
The Oxford Dictionary has chosen the official word of 2016: “post-truth.” Other top contenders: “Brexit” and “alt-right.” I spy a pattern. 
Italy’s Renzi Vows to Quit if He Loses Referendum  
Why Brexit has seen Manchester United's debt rise - and how they could be further hit by leaving the EU #MUFC 
My Bristol Stool Chart of Brexit  
Indy: "despite the Brexit vote"BBC: "in face of Brexit uncertainty"Bloomberg: "unexpectedly strong growth following decision to leave"  
BREXIT MEANS BREXIT T-Shirts... get some... 3 days left....  
Don’t be divided by Trump and Brexit: minorities are part of the working class | @OwenJones84 The Guardian 
Tories tell House of Lords if it delays Brexit powers will be permanently taken away  
Australia says there will not be a Brexit trade deal with UK for years | The Independent  
Brexit could create 'real problem' of ' two classes of Irish citizen' @CAJNi tells @GCraughwell @rtenews 
The UK is facing a £100bn Brexit hole in its budget  
Interesting from @anthonyjwells: If Lab backs Brexit/LDs back Euref2, result is 1983 on steroids (but 2 big caveats)  
Manchester United’s debt rises to £338m partly because of Brexit  
UKIP misspent £400,000 of EU cash on #Brexit & election campaigns - leaked audit  
Remoaners were WRONG: @Nigel_Farage hails Brexit SUCCESS as unemployment falls to 11-year low  
Some thoughts on where we go from here.'Brexit Britain and Trump's America can have a special relationship'  
THE EU ARMY WANTS NUCLEAR CAPABILITY TO DEFEND ITSELF AGAINST STRAIGHT BANANAS & POWERFUL VACUUM CLEANERS !#Brexit #Article50 #LeaveEU 
Government tells the House of Lords: They won't curb their powers if they behave on #Brexit  
EU migration UP since Brexit vote.. Let's get out NOW! Pod one #FreeSpeech 
Government ditches plans to curb Lords as it prepares for Brexit bill - the guardian  
You know it's going to be a good presentation when #Brexit is being compared to the escapee Gorilla Kumbuka #CCFilterBubble 
The Brex Pistols? The Bad Boys of Brexit? Read our EU Referendum story - buy our book today!  pic.twitter.com/6wNYDDEYip 
This is very good in the current Brexit-Trump context: France and UK forge greater co-operation at MBDA  via @FT 
Man United's debt rises to 338m thanks to Brexit , so we'll never have the gimps off our backs  
Academies urge UK government to invest in research after #Brexit vote @britac_news @RAEngNews @royalsociety  
I want your thoughts on what #Brexit means for architects - help me form new @RIBA policy by completing this survey  
Absolutely devastating. The referendum mandate is for *the very opposite* of what Brexiteers now demand we do.  
Majority of charity sector voted remain, while majority of its beneficiaries votes leave #Brexit @charitycomms #2016IsWeird ##CCfilterbubble 
Interesting and a little bit frightening to hear how concerned @WWTLondon are about Brexit and implications for conservation  
Majority of charity staff voted to remain in the EU, majority of charity beneficiaries voted to leave #brexit #CCfilterbubble 
EU nurses are going home because of Brexit - and British hospitals can't replace them  
Post-truth means lying to stay in power at any cost and sod the poor, the NHS and humanity. #Brexit #Tories 
Brexit briefing from @anthonyjwells: Labour could suffer if they went into a general election backing Brexit  
Great speaking to @LouDobbs last night. The doom-mongers on Brexit have been proven wrong!  
Speaking on #Brexit at the @LegatumInst & @ManhattanInst .... 
The wheels are coming off Brexit. Trump is comically incompetent. Whisper it quietly but we need that nasty liberal elite again... 
Does #Brexit provide city regions more opportunities than it does risks? #heseltinebrexit @livuniheseltine 
Brexit contagion: French Prime Minister, Manuel Valls, has warned that the EU is in danger of 'falling apart'.  
Should @BorisJohnson be given a big project to run alongside #Brexit negotiations, @BBCJLandale asks  
Sarkozy suggests a 2nd Brexit referendum after EU reforms  
This constant, relentless delaying and foot-dragging by HM Government on the majority vote of The British People is getting old. BREXIT NOW! 
Hard Brexit is their only option as the complexity of a negotiated deal is far beyond the capabilities of these deeply average politicians.  
#brexit complete lie #TheresaMay & #MichaelFallon driving UK military integration but telling public we’re coming out EU treasury is endgame 
#Gove says he's 'ready to take the economic of #Brexit' WHO THE HELL DOES HE THINK HE IS? He will take no hit AT ALL! Ignore! #NoBrexit 
"The #Brexit nightmare we will soon be unable to ignore"  (my article for New Stateman):  
Manchester United suffer from Brexit as debt rises by 18% to £338m  
Manchester United’s debt rises to £338m partly because of Brexit  via @guardian_sport 
I'm just hoping my parents, in their 90s and raging against Brexit, Trump, Tories, bigotry, get an extension for good behaviour 
I used to feel sorry for folk who didn't read papers and got news from a social media echo chamber. After Trump/Brexit pity changes to anger 
"Absolutely nobody is talking about threatening our place in the single market" said @DanielJHannan. And Farage. No mandate for hard Brexit.  
My latest @barrheadnews column: Brexit, Universities and Colleges, and the importance of supporting young people with disabilities. #EastRen 
70 year olds are taking over the government. The underappreciated dynamic of this election - and Brexit - is that boomers won't let go. 
Tonight at the @frontlineclub we will be launching our policy booklet: #Brexit A #Youth Perspective. Are you coming along? RT #BrexitBritain 
UKIP 'misspent' almost half a million euros of EU funding on its #Brexit campaign, according to a leaked audit  
 editor @IanDunt tells @juliaHB1 'If UK negotiates Brexit with rookies the EU will hammer us'  
Speaking to the @LegatumInst & @ManhattanInst on #brexit  
Great news for today:House of lords wanna block brexitLego opened a big store in London#Remain 
Stewart Lee review – Brexit, Trump and a history of bondage  
Ukip 'misspent almost £400,000 of the EU's money' on its Brexit and election campaigns  
Thatcherite Group Says U.K. Should Keep Free Movement of People  #brexitshambles #Brexit #Ukip 
Be bold, commit to greater investment in research and innovation in post-Brexit Britain, say National Academies.  
Brits are going back to the 1970s as Brexit revives the package holiday  
COULD #FRANCE GO THE WAY OF #BREXIT & #TrumpWIN  FOR  #LIBERTE  UNITED WE STAND  THE PPL  via @MailOnline 
The Brexit nightmare we will soon be unable to ignore  VERY GOOD PIECE - WELL WORTH A READ ! 
New book UNDERSTANDING BREXIT OPTIONS published on Monday 21 November http://bit.ly2g03kLJ #BrexitVote #brexitshambles #European #Britain 
Cost of #brexit continues to rise. The so-called #projectfear was in face #projectreality 
Oh dear. The UKIPs broke rules and ’misspent almost £400,000 of EU money on Brexit campaign and general election'  
Man United announce they have added £51.5m to their debt due to the impact of Brexit and the failure to qualify for the Champions League.  
READ: Nicola Sturgeon's approach to Brexit has been described as an "embarassing mess". We couldn't agree more.  
Matteo Renzi repeats vow to quit as Italian PM if he loses referendum  
"The Westminster policy geeks just don't get it." Our response to the @iealondon Freedom of Movement report. #Brexit 
72% of British bankers think London will still be the financial centre of Europe in five years’ time- another #Brexit myth quashed 
#brexit has assured that Housing, Education & Health will be on the political back burner for years & how is that getting your country back? 
British pollsters didn't think Brexit could win. American pollsters didn't think Trump could win...  
The UK is facing a £100bn black hole in its finances over the next five years due to Brexit  
Lords warned they will have powers cut if they stop Theresa May's Brexit  
UK facing £100 billion black hole in finances over 5 years, because of Brexit. Media will report the 8.4% share of that as SNP black hole! 
#FREXIT #BREXIT #ITALEX #AUSEX #NEXIT The people of the world are awake to the false song of globalism! #Trump #MAGA 
Calling all #Architects! Be represented Share your views on #Brexit and help to form our ongoing policy work  
SNP accused of being in "embarrassing mess" over conflicting Brexit positions  
My cartoon - FT reports Chancellor will admit UK is facing a £100bn black hole in its finances over the next 5 years due to #Brexit#wato 
>Despite May & Corbyn supporting Brexit"A second Brexit vote is a real possibility now"#EURef2 
Brexit causes Manchester United's debt to skyrocket  
Here are the slides from the CEPR-REITI event on Brexit held in Tokyo last week 
A second #Brexit vote is a real possibility now – here's why it should happen  
Ukip have been caught spending EU money campaigning for Brexit  
Man United's debt climbs 18% to £338m due to Brexit vote  #mufc 
The Marmite row is the first sign of the true cost of Brexit for food producers  
What part of democracy don't they understand? #Brexit  
Government ditches plans to curb Lords as it prepares for Brexit bill  
my priorities are standing up against the Govt's Brexit plans, fighting the 3rd runway and protecting local NHS services 
WATCH: The UK retail sector is outperforming all predictions. It seems consumer confidence has not been impacted by Brexit. @daily_politics 
Equality looks further away than ever in a Brexit, Donald Trump world | Polly Toynbee  
A failure of left-centrist and moderate right politicians to unite against the politics of hate will never be forgiven #Brexit #Remain 
Farage to lead 100,000-strong march on Supreme Court on day of historic #Brexit court hearing  #BBC #SKY #ITV #RT #UK 
#MUFC reports a £51.5m addition to its debt pile, partly due to the pound's Brexit collapse versus the dollar & lack of CL football. 
"Absolutely no sign in these figures of any dent to consumer confidence from the referendum result" @andrewwalker167 
BREAKING: Ukip 'misspent almost £500,000 of EU money on Brexit campaign.'In other news, I wish to announce my resignation from satire... 
Beefy: "'We voted Leave - lets get on with it!" #Brexit 
So called Intellectuals & Politicians are failing to read mood of Common public again like 2014, Brexit & Trump win.  
Let's drain the swamp of this cabal of #Brexit billionaire press barons and their pet politicians. #Remain #YesEU #StopFundingHate 
Friends! Good news!My new, impartial opinion poll shows that well over 110% of Trump voters now regret having voted for Hard-Right Brexit. 
Who knows what Nissan were told? Well the French govt does, but not Parliament & not the British people#Brexit - Taking away control#YesEU 
Post Brexit @ManUtd debt up 18% to £337.7m. Pound fallen against dollar. 
Pound rises as spending shows U.K. still thriving after Brexit  via @charlie_ryan1 
Laugh all you like you libtwat, but you have lost and #Brexit is coming!Ho Ho HoMerry BreXmas!RT! 
#Brexit: We know more than we think My article for @prospect_uk report on opportunities & challenges #BrexitTrade 
Cant be said enough:,Don’t be divided by Trump and Brexit: minorities are part of the working class  
Man United debt climbs 18% to £338m due to post-Brexit vote foreign exchange rate movements 
UK faces £100bn Brexit hole in budget = £5k per household."We want our country back" what for? via @FT 
My OFM Column early: Brexit comes with many costs; and you'll feel it first at the dinner table.  
The costs, dilemmas, complexities of the Brexit process are growing steadily more obvious and damaging—gov't chaos 
By passing a deeply flawed and politically biased judgement on #Brexit the High Court has discredited the whole of British judiciary. 
90% of voters want Britain to stay in the European single market after Brexit |   
The Brexit nightmare we will soon be unable to ignore, by @RCorbettMEP  
Brexit: Ukip 'misspent almost £500,000 of EU money'  
BREXIT: Fury as LORD who wrote Article 50 claims to know MORE about it than the WILL of the PEOPLE and your PATRIOTIC nan who is NOT racist. 
One change you won't see after #Brexit:  #EU flags coming off Government buildings.We never fly them. 
500 complex Brexit problems for Westminster to resolve.Easy solution. Call Elsie. She has the answer to everything.  
Rushing into #Brexit would be a disaster - @ChukaUmunna is absolutely right on the complexities of #Brexit  
Yes Brexit did win, but I still get to write to my MP. It wasn't the grand final of Democracy & now all the Democracy has to stop. 
The world's biggest accountancy firm has issued a stark warning to Theresa May over Brexit  
Brexit panic was bad news for #fintech start-ups. Got to remember story of Chicken Little; the sky isn't falling in! 
Hard to see any policy or economic cohesion in the alt-right #Trump and #Brexit movements. Just a hodgepodge of alternating hatreds. 
I will continue to work hard for Wales and ensure that #Brexit is a success. I am the only Welsh MEP representing the Leave majority!  
UKIP accused of spending EU money on Brexit campaign. You couldn't make it up...  
REPORT: Leaked document claims UKIP misspent almost £500,000 of EU funds on Brexit campaign  
If there's a single person left who believes the UK government would allow #Brexit to be implemented, can he make himself known to doctors. 
NEWS! Santa could be barred from delivering in the UK after Brexit  
Brexit lack of direction testing Whitehall, says former top officialSenior civil servants prepared to quit via @FT 
Remoaners were WRONG: Farage hails Brexit SUCCESS as unemployment falls to 11-year low   
This #Brexit nonsense is getting silly now. Time to acknowledge that it is destructive and without any merit whatsoever.  
UK civil servants consider/think/contemplate quitting over #Brexit IS NOT NEWS.No offense but WHO WILL TAKE THEM? 
Some people "now have a licence to be xenophobic" after #Brexit, say some foreign workers in the UK   
Every time I tweet in support of Trump or Brexit, as a lesbian, I feel I'm in alignment with the marginalised, the overlooked, the ignored. 
FULL STORY: @UKIP 'misspent' EU funding on Brexit campaign, says leaked audit:  
BREAK: UKIP misspent almost half a million of EU funding on electioneering, and to boost their Brexit campaign - EU audit @SkyNews NEXT. 
Prof Dame Anna Dominiczak writes in @heraldscotland on the impact of #Brexit to biomedical science & research  
The island of Jersey could be used as a model for post-Brexit migration  
House of Lords will retain powers over blocking statutory instruments - which will be crucial when govt wants to amend ex-EU law post-Brexit  
Leave campaigners during the referendum promised that we wouldn’t leave the Single Market. So why are they saying there's a mandate now?  
"People in this room might be the first ones to realise what #Brexit really means," @jacq0108 at #EUMockCouncil in London 
On my way to Berlin to speak on panel  considering #Brexit at Suddeutesche Zeitung Economic Summit @ScotGovEurope 
Folks, this is how Liam Fox's int trade department is flogging Brexit Britain abroad... #GreenIsGreat #COP22 
IMF U-turns on Brexit warning as UK poised to be fastest growing G7 economy this year  
"What did you vote, Dad?""#Brexit: to take back control and give £350m a week to #NHS""We're £100bn worse off now. You're an idiot, Dad" 
Retail sales up.Inflation down.Employment at a high.Brexit around the corner.The UK does NOT need #Labour 
Commit to greater investment in research and innovation in post-Brexit Britain, say National Academies.  
British retail sales surged in October lifting annual sales growth to its highest in more than 14 years. Another #Brexit myth quashed 
. @UKlabour should be attacking Tory #Brexit, instead Corbyn is aiding the most extreme right wing project in Britain in modern times 
Italy's Renzi rules out government role if he loses referendum  
The Chancellor is about to reveal the terrifying cost of Brexit  
#Brexit, #Trump, The People & Their Judges - Bar Chairman, Chantal-Aimée Doerries QC guest blogs for @HuffPostUK  
#Brexit talks are very complex & will take 'a lot longer' than two years, Eurogroup head says  
'To sell your birthright for a mess of pottage' - #Brexit. 
Lib Dems believe voters should get a say on final Brexit deal. We will try to amend bill to ensure proper scrutiny  
More than two thirds of British bankers are confident London will retain its status as a financial hub after Brexit.  
The executive director of @ILGAEurope addresses questions on Brexit and queer rights, LGBTIQ sex worker rights & trans asylum at #QueerUnite pic.twitter.com/6GkO3pdD0G 
Pound jumps above $1.25 after the weather helps retail sales to rise by more than expected  
Another worrying sign that Brexit has undone the government's deficit plan  
Kerr: Brexit voters were not wrong but "they were misled. A lot of lies were told." @ifgevents #ifgbrexit 
BREAKING: British retail sales surge more than expected as clothing jumps by most since 2014  
Heard the same thing about Brexit v Greek summer 2015. Then Trump v Brexit. And look where we are now.  
"Brexit is already causing a staffing crisis in our hospitals"- Birmingham Post #NHS 
And yet few MPs have the balls to say #Brexit is a stupid thing to do.  
UK faces a £100bn #Brexit budget black hole (£)  
Brexit campaigners created dangerously toxic EU debate where 'facts didn't matter', inquiry hears  
Can't believe Wayne Rooney had a few beers after a football game! First Brexit, Trump now this. I can't cope  
When is Graham Chapman due to appear to stop Brexit 'cos it's getting far too silly?  
Today's piece of Tory Brexit cluelessness comes courtesy of the Chancellor 
Harry Potter and Brexit by Matt - political cartoon gallery  
This is more info on state of brexit negotiations than govt prepared to give MPs in parliament..now I see why they are so coy.. #brexithaos 
Daily Express article about Jo Cox's murder, by #Brexit supporting Right-Wing'er, fails to acknowledge THEIR ROLE in whipping up THIS hate.  
My cartoon - FT reports Chancellor will admit UK is facing a £100bn black hole in its finances over the next 5 years due to #Brexit  
BREAKING: Theresa May's #Brexit plans leaked  
Humiliation for EU as socialist MEP jailed for changing Brussels laws in exchange for cash 
Brexit vote driving anti-LGBT hate crime as victims told: ‘You’re next’  
Philip Hammond predicts £100bn deficit due to Brexit. And who do we think the Tories will make pay for this? The rich, or the already poor? 
Usual Waffle B@ll@x from Daily Express deliberately confusing EU Referendum result by pretending it's a mandate for a Hard #Brexit  
UK faces £100billion black hole because of Brexit = £5k per household."We want our country back" - to recession. 
MPs should insist that the Art 50 talks schedule leaves enough time for them  to vet the final #Brexit deal :   
Next time you have a conversation about #Brexit with your older Leave voting family members... Might be worth mentioning the below....  
I think I've found a Brexit strategy.1) Insist on having everything your way. 2) Ignore all logic.3) Always insult the other party.  
How thick would a Brexiter have to be to believe there would be more money to spend on the NHS after Brexit?LIKE - veryRT - as pigshit.  
Morning London. This is our most read story in the last hour: UK faces £100bn Brexit hole in budget  
Defined as a time when truth has become irrelevant, the word spiked after #Brexit and Trump's GOP nomination  
Somehow Labour has managed to get into position where Leave voters think it want to stop Brexit, and Remain voters think it's pro Brexit  
Alan Cochrane: The SNP is at a loss over how to deal with Brexit  
Don’t be divided by Trump and Brexit: minorities are part of the working class | Owen Jones  @owenjones84 
I asked the woman in Yangtze why the Box As have gone up to a fiver and she literally replied w "Brexit"... naw sorry haul on a minute 
Hands-up (or RT) if you suspect Theresa May will used the '£100bn Brexit' hole as an excuse to run down a free NHS/introduce charges slowly. 
Every single morning there is "Brexit is a dreadful idea" news to retweet. 
Will Brexit supporting MPs ensure that £350m extra per week for the NHS is added to parliamentary EU exit legislation - as they promised? 
Everyone who voted in the referendum, whichever way, should read this - and worry about lawyers-in-wigs subverting our say  
We've made a list of 100 UK creative industries successes in the 100 days since Brexit. Have a peek:  #Create100 
The complete opposite of what the SNP Brexit minister Mike Russell said last week.Just shows that we can trust the SNP with nothing.  
After Brexit and Donald Trump, will Italy be next?  
Slow clap to all #brexiteer #quitlings #brexit blamed for UK's budget black  
Some people "now have a licence to be xenophobic" after #Brexit, say some foreign workers in the UK  
Sterling hammered again after Brexit memo leak. This will fuel price increases over winter.  via @ReutersUK 
The House of Lords has a choice.  Facilitate Brexit or facilitate your demise. 
Presumably those who believe we'll save £40 on premiums are the same ones who thought Brexit would mean £350m a week for the NHS. #whiplash 
Derivatives traders forced to provide $27bn collateral post-Brexit  
In the Trump:Brexit world, even Amazon can be subversive. One for all those who will not bow the knee to hate.   
Polls were off by 4% on Brexit; 2% on US election. Would have to be off by +15% for Le Pen to win. Let's not over-blow her chances 
Hey Remoansters!How's #ProjectFear coming along for you this month?JobsGrowth Unemployment Inflation Vive le #Brexit! 
If it's £18bn or £27bn we get excited, public finance hole this time is £100bn. Thanks #Brexit  via @FT 
"Let's take £350m a week from the NHS and spend it on the post-Brexit budget deficit instead"  
'UK faces £100bn #Brexit hole in budget'  to be added to €40-60bn exit bill & 30k civil servants likely to be needed 
The referendum was not about the EU or even immigration - it was about foreigners  
what will 2017 bring for #Europeis this the #EUspring ?#Brexit #Dexit #Nexit #Frexit #Italexit #No2EU #LoveEuropeLeaveEU @arturballester2 
Financial Times: UK faces £100bn budget hole after Brexit vote hits growth forecasts!  
UK faces £100bn Brexit hole in budget  works out at c £5k per household 
Labour and Brexit. Against having your cake. Against eating it too.  
Like Trump couldn't and Brexit wasn't going to happen...  
Don’t be divided by Trump and Brexit: minorities are part of the working class | Owen Jones | Opinion | The Guardian  
The UK is facing a £100bn black hole in its finances over the next five years due to Brexit  
Bargain hunters beware: Problems in the London property market run deeper than Brexit  
Don’t be divided by Trump and Brexit: minorities are part of the working class | Owen Jones  
Anyone else ? 
Getting Boris Johnson to piss off European ministers. Is this your plan for #Brexit? @Number10gov #Mayhem  
Far from giving the NHS £350m per week, Brexit will cost the equivalent of nearly the entire NHS budget  
Warwick rowers strip off in amazing naked calendar to fight LGBTQ hate crime after Brexit vote  
Oxford Dictionaries has declared ‘post-truth’ to be its international word of d yearcontext Brexit & d US election.  
this is like a repeat of the Brexit fiasco, too. Right down to the blaming of the center-left pol who bucked establishment. 
London Offices: Brexit Isn’t the Only Problem   
tRuthLess Davidson's wee Tory group Are demanding the Scottish Gov reveal their plan for Brexit!You just could not make it up could you!  
Exactly Ken, Cameron, Osborne & Carney made it perfectly clear what #Brexit meant ... we leave the EU & go on our own in the world.  
At #PMQs May was asked for her Brexit plans. What she offered were not plans but aims. Plans are what you need in order to achieve such aims 
Google's expanding in London ...despite Brexit  
Central Banks, #Brexit & #Trump are to blame for our economic problems? Turns out our they're caused by economists 
Making the entire election about a referendum on Trump's temperament was a colossal waste of time. 
Voters can deliver accountability to election liars. Referendum liars unaccountably change the country forever.  
Brexit? Trump? The grimmest event of 2016 is undoubtedly Australia's 85-all-out in Hobart, writes @gradecricketer  
Christmasis alive & well in #UK#London #Harrods #PaddingtonBear #ChristmasMusic #NoPC #BREXIT#BoxingDay@realDonaldTrump @RedRising11 
Brexit blamed for UK's £100bn budget black hole   
Pleased on how we traded thru Brexit/election. Rather have clients call and ask, "why aren't I making money?"  than "why am I down 10%?" :-) 
#ndp back electoral reform referendum in bid to forge united opp front on PR, force #lpc hand:  #erre #cndpoli 
KD just performed a #BREXIT step. I don't know if this makes sense but he stumbled and traveled. #topical 
I have yet to be aware of one Brexit politician who is actually pleasant 
Brussels bureaucrats are now directly blaming Vladimir Putin for the results of the EU referendum  
UK faces £100bn Brexit hole in budget  
Brexit: complications multiply as time runs out ...  #Brexit.  
Brexit. Not one positive thing will come out of it. Not one damn thing. 
Which is reassuring because as we learned from Brexit, Colombia and now Trump, pollsters are always right.  
Brexit. In a nutshell  
»Hurray for May & Corbyn's Brexit!"Nursing staff shortages in care homes could get worse in Brexit wake"#Remain 
Interestingly different from John McDonnell 'Not Block' hard brexit position .... If JM is wrong why is he not being told this by colleagues  
Even leavers now get the destruction that a hard Brexit would bring  
Theresa May does have a plan for Brexit – the question is whether Europe is big enough to embrace it 
This sells the pass. Don't think 'post-Brexit': think Stop Brexit.  
Gorka: Brexit and the ‘Trump Train’ Mark ‘The End of Political Correctness and Insanity’  
Secret video reveals the British cabinet's reaction when they discover what Brexit really means.  
Ain't that the truth? #Brexit without a plan is like torching your house when you've neglected to pay the insurance premiums.  
New Democrats say they are open to referendum on electoral reform:  #cdnpoli 
Hands off OUR Brexit! Voters warn scheming Remoaner MPs not to reverse referendum result  
"My plan is to open this door, step out of this plane and then the details will get worked out." David Davies MP#TheWalesReport #Brexit  
Lower growth, higher deficit - bleak Brexit outlook in Autumn Statement   
Exactly. Inexplicable that @UKLabour is just caving in to the Tories' disastrous hard Brexit.  
A post-Brexit roadmap for Clinton voters  
Boris the #brexit moron gets owned.  
Theresa May faces international and domestic pressure to bring order to her Brexit strategy  
Theresa May, the public DEMANDS hard Brexit: 70 per cent want UK to take back control of borders when it quits EU  
YIKES UK faces £100bn Brexit hole in budget  via @FT 
@CloughOlive Strange how Blair's "New Labour" were condemned as Tory-lite. Yet Corbyn's support of Brexit is Tory-deluxe 
Gove says he is prepared to take the 'economic hit' of Brexit. Trouble is, he won't. Others will bear the brunt.   
Thursday's FT:"UK faces £100bn budget hole after Brexit vote"#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers(via @suttonnick) 
Federal NDPs say they're open to referendum on election reform... or anything else that involves them in government for that matter. 
It's reassuring to see so much genuine scorn for Norman Bettison. But it'll be back to Trump, Putin & Brexit in the morning.  #newsnight 
We must remain responsive to will of the people & keep all options open as we struggle to get clarity from the government on a Brexit mess.  
Labour should be attacking Tory Tax Haven #Brexit. Instead Corbyn and McDowell are making it as easy as possible for the Tories#Remain 
. @Nigel_Farage sponging off our taxes while he wrecks our country. #Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
The UK government repeats that Brexit means Brexit. Yes, we have heard that, but what then...  
Amid all the Brexit & Trump chaos, UK parliament has approved sweeping new surveillance powers:  #ipbill 
Forecast of £100bn deficit for UK post-Brexit w/i 5 yrs. Long-term economic consequences must be admitted & faced squarely by Govt & Labour.  
The government must trigger Article 50 and Brexit NOW says @BeefyBotham 
Brexit is an omnishambles, Trump's transition is a clusterfuck. Come back Laurel & Hardy, we need your unruffled competence and gravitas. 
#Brexit - giving the inhabitants of 27 countries a chance to laugh at Brits with their 2nd class passports#Remain 
There really is no end to this man's idiocy.#Brexit #borisjohnson #Boris #bollocks #Prosecco 
Buildings are pulling down their Trump signs. No one wants to live there. #Brexit  
Labour mustn't checkmate itself on  #brexit  says @JolyonMaugham in an interesting piece: 
If Brexit does not happen 'far right' will become very popular in disillusioned UK! Nigel is prophet!  
Fox, Farage, Johnson and Davis now representing the 10% - strengthens case for 2nd referendum on leave Deal v Remain 
Ewan McGregor: Boris Johnson is 'talking out of his a**e' about Brexit 
Totally at odds with a working-class Remain city like Liverpool. Brexit is a petty bourgeois fantasy. It ought to be anathema to Labour.  
Remain SHOCK: Even those who voted to stay in the EU want an END to freedom of movement #Brexit  
#ThisTimeNextYear we will either have resisted austerity and a hard Brexit or been steam rolled over by it. 
The BBC has abandoned even any pretence of impartiality or objectivity in its continual sniping against Brexit and Trump 
If a majority of people wanted to self harm through either compunction or suggestion, I would still argue against it. #brexit  
Management of Brexit undemocratic: 48% = ignoredParliament = marginalised16&17 yr.olds = excludedHigh Court = vilifiedSupreme Court = ? 
That's £100 with nine zeroes Brexit chums. "and we will make a success of it" is increasingly sounding bonkers eh? 
'You wanted Scotland OUT' May blasts back at Robertson over SNP's Brexit double standards  
Theresa May, the public DEMANDS hard Brexit: 70 per cent want UK to take back control of borders when it quits EU  
The UK is facing a £100bn Brexit hole in its budget  
Jaguar boss admits Brexit could be a threat to its future  
Trump said he'd be the Brexit president & the man who delivered Brexit joins me Tonight! @Nigel_Farage on #FoxLDT 7pm 
Labour MPs who are against Brexit need to find a way to remove Corbyn and McDonnell or need to leave Labour. Voters have left already. 
The financial "elites" have learnt ZERO from Brexit & Trump disasters. Still calling for tax cuts for big biz and an even wider wealth gap! 
the NDP are willing to support a referendum on electoral reform if it means achieving consensus on electoral reform committee #cannoli #ERRE 
The British government's Brexit strategy is chaotic, Italian minister @CarloCalenda says  
Great to be working with @GlenisWillmott & @unitetheunion to ensure economy & jobs are Brexit priority.  
.@KTHopkins visited @FoxBusiness today & delivered some great news about what #Brexit & Trump's VICTORY means for the Right in Europe.  
Always voted @Conservatives but disgusted at #Brexit madness, so have joined @LibDems and will vote for @SarahOlney not @ZacGoldsmith 
I've written for @CityAM on why voters in #RichmondPark should give me a personal mandate to fight against Brexit  
"This time the female-targeted vitriol happens to be #Brexit-related, but that’s not always the case."  
Great to meet @Scientists4EU earlier to discuss Brexit and why our place in Europe is vital for UK science. 
Prisons in chaos, immigration targets missed every year for 6 years, police moral at all time low, disarray on Brexit. 1 common factor TMay 
Today Corbyn used Labour's social media to give Ken Loach free advertising while Loach's party condemned Corbyn/McDonnell on Brexit stance.  
Interesting essay by @AgataGostynska on Brexit deal hopes and fears in Central Europe  
It seems that Brexit & Trump's election have 1 relevant thing in common: they didn't think it could happen & have no clue of what to do next 
Oh well done May & Jeremy Corbyn!"Head of 1 Britain's biggest hospitals says Brexit is already driving staff away" 
Theresa May, the public DEMANDS hard Brexit: 70 per cent want UK to take back control of borders when it quits EU  
9/ Clinton’s path to victory was to make this a referendum on Trump. For much of campaign they did so brilliantly. Till the final 10 days. 
8/ Comey letters were just horribly timed for Clinton. Voters were bombarded with the news, and in referendum election, that’s the ballgame. 
UK could owe EU up to €65 billion after Brexit  via @POLITICOEurope | Getty 
all this talk of making #NigelFarage a Lord Re-tweet ..if you think it should be SIR Nigel Farage#LordFarge #Brexit #UKIP 
Twitter in questo periodo- Bob Dylan- Nobel- Donald Trump- XFactor- Shawn Mendes- Referendum SI/No- Droghiere#XF10 #XF10NowTV #Nobel 
Jon Snow making clear that @michaelgove's promise for the £100m/week NHS money post-Brexit was a bare faced lie told by a liar. #C4news 
This is just one of the many reasons why #Brexit is a shambles.  
Michael Gove "I wouldn't have voted for Trump if I was American" @jonsnowC4 : "he'd have voted for Brexit though"  
#Trump & #Brexit were two important battles that we won. But we've only begun to fight back against decades of propaganda - can't stop now.  
A plan for Brexit? Hilary Benn's gameshow draws a blankety blank  
UK could owe EU up to €65 billion after Brexit to cover existing budgetary obligations while it was member pic.twitter.com/HutSRCiJvf 
Unemployment Falls in Three Months After Brexit Vote to 11 Year-Low #Brexit #TruePundit 
#Brexit is like one of those banks – “too big to fail”. But fail it will. Admit it, Mrs May, you’re gambling the country away. @theresa_may 
Gove: To hell with people's jobs, plans, ability to pay bills - Brexit now, whatever the cost! (Gove's a millionaire)  
Farage and Trump know that immigration controls are for ordinary people, not the rich and powerful like them.#Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
Britons may need to apply for online clearance to visit Europe post-Brexit 
Word of Year? 'Post-Truth' it is.Used to discuss Brexit & US Election. (Means belonging to a time in which Truth has become irrelevant) #BBC 
Brexit Could Face Long Delay, Supreme Court Judge Warns  
One former perm sec tells me figure of up to 30k new state jobs post-Brexit isn't unreasonable: "The operational needs would be pretty big." 
FFS-WHEN WE VOTED FOR BREXIT, WE VOTED FOR A COMPLETE CLEAN & FINAL BREAK FROM THE NAZI EU! NO DEALS, NO SPECIAL RELATIONSHIP, JUST BREXIT!! 
Fascinating and revealing piece on the low morale of senior civil servants over "unrealistic" Brexit plans:  
The emperor's new clothes: @rafaelbehr on the Government's absence of a plan for Brexit  
"The case for withdrawing from the Brexit fiasco seems ever stronger and may only be a matter of time before":  
Theresa May took years to deport Qatada. She cannot negotiate a good Brexit deal in two years and replace thousands of laws. #PMQs 
The Government has a democratic mandate to take Britain out of the EU #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
Uh oh. More #Brexit woes years more to come! European ministers ridicule Boris Johnson after prosecco claim  
There is a high probability that May's government is planning to lose the appeal on the High Court judgement on #Brexit in Supreme Court. 
Speaking at “Hate crime in a post-Brexit Britain: what next for Government, police and communities?” led by @DavidLammy 
Think we should have a referendum to vote on whether MPs should have this pension increase  
This makes me, lifetime Lab voter, despair. Didn't 70% of Lab voters oppose Brexit? What is McDonnell doing?!  
#brexit: Can't this clueless government even sort out the simple things?   
Referendum was advisory. Bad advice. Our elected representatives have a duty to do what is right for their electorate. Brexit is not right.  
We Won! Hands off OUR Brexit! Voters warn scheming Remoaner MPs not to reverse referendum result  
What part of democracy don't they understand? #Brexit #RespectTheResult 
J.K. Rowling's Fantastic Brexit and Where to Find It - tomorrow's Matt cartoon  
Labour Leader said Brexit talks are in shambles He needs to take a look at his own party before making such a comment 
Brexit Britain needs to know: is Emperor May naked?  
Successive UK govs have laid out approaches to Parliament in advance of EU treaty negotiations, why not for #Brexit?  
The EU has just revealed plans to charge you if you to travel in Europe after Brexit  
We had it with polls!If MPs need a reminder what the referendum meant, we dare them to try and block our #Brexit. 
SNP all over the shop on Brexit vote in House of Commons. Mike Russell November 7th vs Alex Salmond November 16th.  
Theresa May, the public DEMANDS hard Brexit: 70 per cent want UK to take back control of borders when it quits EU  
Farage;- Got his party mainstream from nothing- Got a Referendum- Got Brexit- Befriended the President Elect.Not bad for a "joke"...  
Brexit means Brexit. And...that's it so far.  
Social media strategy of @theSNP for convincing world @scotlibdems are against single market in a handy sandwich metaphor #Brexit #indyref2 
If we don't leave the Single Market, we will still have to send money to Brussels. That's not what the British people voted for. #Brexit  
This is profoundly disappointing. Labour turns its back on the 74% of the population who didn't vote for the folly of #Brexit.  
Today at #PMQs @jeremycorbyn held Theresa May to account over Brexit. Watch and share this now ↓  
Theresa May faces international and domestic pressure to bring order to her Brexit strategy  
That #brexit is in the hands of such self serving politicians that it makes Gollum seem altruistic-should give everyone pause for thought. 
Theresa May does have a plan for #Brexit  and it's written on the back Nigel Farage's fag packet.No leadership, no plan, and no idea. 
From the @FT comment pages, the Brexit debate so far. Scarily accurate!  
Majority of Britons DON'T want Parliament to meddle over Brexit, new poll finds  
"Brexit need not mean Brexit for the North of Ireland's citizens, who have a RIGHT to EU citizenship" 
Prosecco wars...Italy accuses Boris Johnson of 'insulting' them by warning they'll lose prosecco exports if they don't do a Brexit deal 
'This Government is absolutely united in its determination to deliver on the will of the British people and to deliver Brexit.'  
Excessive tweeting/posting about a subject plays in its favor at the end of the day. #SocialMedia #Marketing #Brexit #Trump 
Watch my full #PMQs exchange with @theresa_may today. She clearly has no plan and is presiding over a chaotic Brexit  
Current state Brexit negotiations, via Italy minister who met Foreign Sec. Like much global politics, this is beyond any plausible parody:  
How much did Brexit and Trump voters have in common? Read more:  
'Post-truth' named word of the year by Oxford Dictionaries after usage spiked around the Brexit vote and US election  
Useful clarification of exactly what Merkel said about free movement of people and BrexitHint: it's not what the Daily Express reported...  
Post-Brexit, many academics have tweeted about economic inequalityTime to get our own houses in order? @GdnHigherEd 
If only Theresa May put equal effort into a Brexit strategy as she does into her sexual innuendo audition game for Carry on Tory. #PMQs 
My new interview with Zadie Smith: male critics, Trump, Brexit, and more.  
Brexit means we will all have to work longer. Without migration, we will not be able to adjust the ageing demographic of the UK. 
Theresa May and Jeremy Corbyn clash over Brexit plans  
Jeremy Corbyn brought the house down at PMQs, as he skewered the Tories over Brexit  via @thecanarysays 
Sadly, it seems @UKLabour has let us all down. I've resigned and joined the @LibDems - the real opposition to #Brexit. Why not do the same?  
Pundits said Brexit an impossibility, but if happens, Global Markets will tank. They said same for Trump. Markets took both events as blips 
"West is just 3 elections away from self-destruction: brexit, US&French elections" Rudi Fücks @boell_us quotes @anneapplebaum @BrookingsInst 
Eastern Europeans flock to UK after Brexit vote with 50,000 arriving between July and September.  
Theresa May, the public DEMANDS hard Brexit: 70 per cent want UK to take back control of borders when it quits EU  
"GIVE MORE POWERS TO EU" says BlairScares people with tales of ISIS. People should be more scared of him.#Brexit 
After Brexit & US elections I am not making political predictions . PC to @sardesairajdeep Brilliant interview!#PCSpeaks 
Best they hold back on Repairs to Parliament Building Because If they Stop  BREXIT.WE the people Will Tear the Building DOWN with them in IT  
After Brexit and the US election, Oxford Dictionaries declares “post-truth” word of the year  
Theresa May's top secret Post Article 50 plan is finally revealed #PMQs #Brexit  
…UK citizens living in EU more than 15 years not allowed a vote. Let’s face it: the referendum was gerrymandered.  
What does Merkel's reported decision to run for a 4th term mean in context of Brexit/Trump? I spoke w @fpleitgenCNN: 
Boris Johnson under fire over Brexit prosecco threat  
An MP was shot and stabbed. The suspect shouted Britain First. Had an EU referendum leaflet. And there is talk of Farage going to the Lords? 
.@SKinnock warns Labour not to hold the Government to ransom over Article 50 with threats of a second referendum  
Oh no, that'd be a massive shame. Like Juncker having to resign as PM of Luxembourg over a spying scandal. Perfect role models for Brexit.  
David Cameron left no stone unturned in explaining the 'Possible' ramifications of #Brexit including, in this case, World War 3!#Article50 
Can't wait to see all the op-eds condemning Obama for not blaming Trump and Brexit on racism alone.  
Trump’s win, Brexit vote stem from mishandling of globalization, Obama says   
Brexit is, probably, biggest project for govt since WW2May was responsible for another project - very important but not as big #CSAinquiry 
Boris Johnson, Liam Fox & Priti Patel promised #Brexit would mean more money for the NHS #ShowUsTheMoney 
People who voted to quit the EU are losing confidence in Theresa May’s ability to successfully negotiate #Brexit >>  
.@UriLF @TheAtlantic Life after Brexit does not include agents of the Banking Cartel as Pres. of US.  The future is Global Currency Reset  
'Grasping at straws!' Andrew Neil RAGES at Tory Remainer over fear-mongering Brexit report  
Public DEMANDS hard Brexit: 70 per cent want UK to END immigration when it quits EU  @MikeHookemMEP @ukip 
Number of east Europeans with jobs in Britain leaps by 50,000 since Brexit vote  
First #Labour MP I've heard speaking up against the sell-out of Labour #Brexit policy by McDonnell & Corbyn. Well done to @MikeGapes ... 
CAN YOU BELIEVE THE BBC HAVE THE BALLS TO SAY "People "almost universally support" the UK staying in the EU single market after Brexit" ?  
Lessons from Britain about life after Brexit  
Britain's Brexit strategy is chaotic and unacceptable, says Italian minister  via @business 
Boris Johnson promising Brexit deal that is “intellectually impossible” and “politically unavailable”, big surprise 
Italy humiliates Boris Johnson after he threatens the nation's Prosecco trade #Brexit 
We need town hall meetings all across the country to inform people what a Tory #brexit means for their communities-more ruin for the 99%. 
Boris calling Trump a NY liberal & John McDonnell saying Brexit is a great opportunity.Opportunists, both of them.Playing a dangerous game. 
.@Anna_Soubry tells @EmmaBarnett that Rolls Royce bosses fear a Brexit deal involving leaving the EU customs union would damage business  
New blog and analysis paper on 'What do voters want from Brexit?' using @NatCen panel. 
Oxford English Dictionary names "post-truth" as its word of the year, after usage spiked around Brexit & US election  
SNP politician claims Toblerone redesign 'emblematic' of 'devastating' consequences of Brexit  
How is Boris Johnson negotiating Brexit with European Ministers? This is how his negotiations went with the Italian Minister. God help us!  
European Medicines Agency feels Brexit effect - people resigning, hiring problems and relocation...   (via @scibus) 
Just imagine how Labour might be doing now if they had concentrated on attacking Tories after Brexit vote instead of pointless distraction  
Fantasist Boris's intellectually impossible Brexit vision + PM lost 4 words @ #PMQsWelcome to #PostTruth Britain 
Tories have a health secretary who is destroying the NHS, and a Brexit govt who don't have a plan for Brexit. Strong from Corbyn at #PMQs. 
Great article "Winter's coming and the Brexit emperor still has got no clothes" by Charles Freeman:  
ARMAGEDDON: Google to invest £1bn, creating 3000 jobs. Kodak relocates to UK from Europe and unemployment down, AGAIN. #Brexit  
Retweet if you believe @nick_clegg should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum #Brexit  
Fascinating view of Clinton archapeligo election result  U.K. brexit vote would show similar island landscape 
"Brexit Britain: Come for the bargains resulting from devalued currency, stay for the dislike of foreigners"...stop...where are you going?  
British travellers face five-euro fee to visit EU after Brexit. @AFP story 
So this happened #brexit #Trump #LePen #Imwithher 
British travellers could face €5 fee to visit Europe after Brexit  
‘It’s bollocks!’ says Boris Johnson as Brexit unravels, threatening to derail Theresa May  #brexit 
Poll: Who is coming across as more trustworthy in #PMQs? @theresa_may v @jeremycorbyn #May #Corbyn #Tories #Labour #Brexit via @DKMatai #RT 
Post Brexit, the location of border between Northern Ireland and Republic is fraught and important  
#Unemployment Falls in Three Months After Brexit Vote to 11 Year-Low   #BBC #SKY #ITV #UK #EU 
Jeremy Corbyn pressurises the PM on Brexit while May got defensive and resorted to personal attacks #PMQs 
Trade negotiations seem unlikely to be completed by the formal date at which Brexit may occur  
Boris Johnson reveals vision of post-Brexit Britain.  
Warwick rowers strip off in amazing naked calendar to fight LGBTQ hate crime after Brexit vote  
British travellers could face €5 fee to visit Europe after Brexit  
On what Britons want from Brexit: free trade to continue and limits on immigration. Prof. John Curtice's report:  
May might as well stay at home for PMQs. Repeating Brexit means Brexit isn't fooling us into thinking you have a plan. #PMQs 
Voters 'split on UK #Brexit priorities' 
Brexit 3.0  
Reading that Donald Trump's transition plans are in chaos and yesterday we were told BrExit plans were in chaos.  Orchestrated common theme? 
"...overseas tourists unenthusiastic about visiting UK because they infer Brexit means foreigners not welcome"  
Referendum loser @David_Cameron now raking in £120k an hour for speeches on Brexit. Feel bad for the suckers paying 
Is there a viable post-Brexit plan beneath all the Union Jacks? No. 
Someone buy Corbyn and McDonnell brown shirts for Xmas. It would be fitting for these stooges of Putin and the far right.#Brexit #Remain 
“Individual EU associate citizenship could provide a practical solution for UK citizens aggrieved by Brexit.” 
Corbyn goes hard on May over #Brexit even bringing up Italian minister's quote "someone needs to tell us something that makes sense" #PMQs 
A bit infantile there Alex. Tories in Scotland occupy Trump/Brexit territory. SNP offer opposite of Tory xenophobic nonsense. 
John McDonnell backs #Brexit as 'enormous opportunity' for Britain Does he not mean for the tax-dodging rich#YesEU 
Me on Facebook's role in Trump and Brexit and the rest: This Is How Facebook Is Radicalizing You  @buzzfeednews 
'Post-truth' named word of the year by Oxford Dictionaries after usage spiked around the Brexit vote and US election  
Eire REFUSE to speak to Sturgeon over her plans to thwart Brexit  They're all ganging up on Nicola-good! Rightly so! 
Italy is unimpressed by Theresa May's "chaotic" Brexit strategy  
Theresa May, the public DEMANDS hard Brexit: 70 per cent want UK to take back control of borders when it quits EU  
Tories' approach to Brexit is a complete shambles: they have no plan on how to protect jobs and growth. RT. #PMQs 
Immigration from EU hits new record high since the referendum, which won't go down well with everyone  
Brexit is "real & present risk" to economy, Nicola Sturgeon says - "politicians who put us in this position should be ashamed of themselves" 
Investors have pulled funding from dozens of UK financial technology start-ups in the wake of the Brexit vote  
Funny since the #Brexit #vote the #UK economy is doing great & #EU nations are struggling.  #BBC #SKY #ITV #RT #UK 
The number of people just outright divorced from reality here is astounding. Reminds me of brexit in so many ways.  
Scot Labour are spinning so hard on bailing on their pro-single market position today - but doesn't look like anyone is buying it. #Brexit 
Finally had enough of Labour Party re. Brexit. Have cancelled membership and joined @LibDems Brexit is not inevitable 
A post-Brexit roadmap for Clinton voters  
I asked PM what her Brexit plan is. She didn't give the answers we need to ensure it works for jobs, living standards & the economy #PMQs 
Yes, like the 'overwhelming' #Brexit victory - such a massive majority of the UK population the Gov must repeat must Brexit, plan or no.  
Am I disappointed by the current @UKLabour approach to #Brexit? No. Disappointment is far too mild. I’m bloody appalled. 
Instead of calling for a second referendum, why don't MPs such as Tim Farron have a conversation with the British electorate and LISTEN? 
Thought @AngelaRayner was brilliant on @bbc5live taking Ukip to task over  referendum lies and impact Brexit will have on her constituents 
Supreme court judge hints at legal hitch that could seriously delay Brexit  
"Order, order, order, order, order" says Speaker Bercow at a noisy #PMQs after SNP questions on Brexit  
The moment after Tory MP Alberto Costa asks his PM to guarantee his Italian parents' right to remain in UK post Brexit and she refuses #PMQs 
I think that Labour has a duty to oppose #Brexit if there is no plan or the plan indicates the British people will be ruined by it. #PMQs 
Labour couldn't vote with the SNP yesterday over Brexit. Here's why  
.@AngusRobertson challenges the UK Govt's secretive Brexit approach which is causing chaos in Government. #PMQs 
Removing rights from large numbers of EU citizens now here is simply an inevitable consequence of Brexit. No way around it.  
May won't guarantee Tory MP, Alberta Costa, that his Italian parents who have lived in UK for 50 years, won't lose rights post-Brexit 
BREXIT: You will be hit with one of the various scenarios of Brexit in #FMM17 
"Will the PM confirm.... whether UK is likely to leave the EU Customs Union post-Brexit, yes or no?" @AngusRobertson 
.@theresa_may not discriminating between her own party, Labour and SNP in saying SFA about the implications of Brexit. Impressive in its way 
The simple fact that #DonaldTrump endorses Brexit should make anyone worry by its prospect. 
Unsustainable that PM May can't even answer basic questions about Brexit such as: whether she wants UK to remain in customs union? #PMQs 
Where to find news about Brexit and Trump.  
.@jeremycorbyn exposes the Govt's shambolic Brexit: a divided cabinet, no strategy & departments in need of 30,000 new civil servants #PMQs 
Little fresh information on Brexit from @theresa_may at #PMQs despite @jeremycorbyn pushing hard. 
Read my 4th #Brexit Challenge paper about the challenges facing the Government on Freedom of Movement  
The UK will definitely get the worse deal in Europe with these 3 incompetent buffoons  in charge of brexit. #bbcdp 
Watching PM May avoiding questions on what Brexit means in UK Parliament. What a mess. They obviously can't agree on what they want. 
Jeremy Corbyn wins again. If you didn't know about Tory divisions on Brexit, you do now. May has no answers, no plan and no idea. #PMQs 
.@JeremyCorbyn: "we have a Chancellor with no fiscal strategy," and "a Brexit team with no plan for Brexit" #PMQs 
Corbyn: "We have a Prime Minister who is not prepared to answer questions on what the actual Brexit strategy is" #PMQs 
PM gives the same old platitudes on her #Brexit plan, no content and no details... Take back control blah blah.... #PMQs #brexitshambles 
Almost five months after the referendum, the Tories have still not outlined the basic deal they will seek to negotiate on Brexit #PMQs 
Really strong #PMQs from @jeremycorbyn / the Prime Minister and Brexit fantasyland can only be insulated by media for so long 
I have a Brexit plan. You don't know her. She goes to another school 
"We do have a plan" for #Brexit - @theresa_may tells @jeremycorbyn #PMQs 
Corbyn absolutely showing the government up. The Tories have no plan for Brexit - it simply is a shambolic Tory Brexit.#PMQs 
All PMQs from now until the end of time, digested: Corbyn: Will you tell us your plan for Brexit? PM: No. (Loud chuntering follows) 
.@JeremyCorbyn says the government is making a "total shambles" out of Brexit #PMQs 
Jeremy Corbyn so far on sharp form by sticking to the one topic - Brexit and reminds Boris    He said it would be a 'titanic' success #pmqs 
We are not asking for every detail of the Brexit plan. Just a snippet will do. Corbyn owning Theresa May at #PMQs yet again. 
Theresa May doesn't have a Brexit plan. End of #pmqs 
"Of course we have a plan for Brexit - it's a great plan, a beautiful plan, the best plan you've ever seen" - Theresa May, soon, probably 
Well done Corbyn. The Tory cabinet is incredibly split on Brexit. They have no plan and the sooner Britain realises this the better. #PMQs 
That's not a plan for Brexit, that's a list of ideal outcomes for the PM! #PMQs 
Tories' approach to Brexit is a complete shambles: they have no plan on how to protect jobs and growth. #PMQs 
The Euro and the European Central Bank (ECB) Are 'Murdering Europe'. How Globalization Destroys Nations  #EU #Brexit  
Early morning is the time of day in which my Twitter feed is equal parts disgust with Brexit and disgust with Trump. 
Theresa May needs to get on with Brexit. The British people voted for proper border controls & want to see net migration at sensible levels. 
5 things for Wednesday:- Presidential transition- Brexit- Technology- Terror attacks- Angela Merkel 
'McDonnell's gutless u-turn and support for hard Brexit.' - Jeff from Newcastle upon Tyne, ex Labour supporter on why he joined #LibDems 
Italian economy minister @CarloCalenda on Tory's Brexit approach: “There’s lots of chaos and we don’t understand what the position is.” 
This is hilarious - what's Labour's plan? Lab now back Brexit as an 'enormous opportunity' but what else? Only LibDems are pro-European now  
Brussels set to demand £50BILLION Brexit 'settlement' to cover pensions and debts  
The Tories' approach to Brexit is a complete shambles and we fully support it. 
Post-#Brexit: Google confirms £1bn UK investment plan  
UK economy expanded by 0.5% in the quarter after the Brexit vote performing better than the Bank of England expected  
Do any Vote Leave types out there fear that the Brexit narrative has been subsequently hijacked by Leave.EU? 
Unemployment down, wages up 2.3%. #Brexit #NoRegrexit 
Labour has checkmated itself on Brexit says @JolyonMaugham 
I can't believe there's an antipsychotic called brexpiprazole  #brexit  
UK labour market holding up well after #Brexit vote. Unemployment rate 4.8%, lowest since 2005.  
Eurogroup president attacks Boris for claiming #UK  could leave customs union & keep free trade with #EU  #Brexit 
Scotland will hold another independence referendum within 2 years, Alex Salmond says  
Brexit? I've no idea what's going on either, says Mark Carney | Business | The Guardian  
Theresa May dealt fresh blow as Supreme Court judge signals major delay on starting Brexit  
Who'd have thought the Mannequin challenge was actually the Government's policy on Brexit! 
Meeting with British Minister @DavidJonesMP about #Brexit: crucial that trade Flanders-UK continues to flourish.  
Our Director @viviennestern, on staying international in a post-#Brexit UK  via @student #WeAreInternational 
Unemployment falls to 10-year low post-Brexit despite Treasury’s ‘Project Fear’ warning quitting EU would cost 500…  
Brexit Means Who Knows@douglasrasbash @MarkRyden @StreetArtEyes1 @revolutional_BW @TheEconomist pic.twitter.com/SGMPHrOQQN 
What is Labour policy on #Brexit 
Angela Merkel hints EU may offer UK a compromise on free movement and benefits in Brexit deal  
Even when making a joke the people with Brexit in their search box who chip in on everything can't resist. Hi guys! Brexit Brexit 
Big rise in anti LGBT hate crimes with perpetrators *specifically mentioning brexit*  
Brexit, rise of Donald Trump make 'post-truth' Oxford Dictionaries' word of the year  
#Brexit is a lose-lose situation, which we must manage as well as possible. #ubseuroconf 
The bad news just keeps coming... When will it end? #Brexit #Google  #BBC #SKY #ITV #RT #LABOUR #LIBDEM #TORY #UK #EU 
Once Brexit negotiations begin—gov't, MPs, devolved legislatures, House of Lords, Judiciary—multilateral tugs-of-war  
To be fair they can't put Brexit in the dictionary until someone works out what it means. You can't just put  Brexit (see Brexit) 
take that Brexit  
Is the message getting through? #Brexit  
UK must finally decide what trade-offs it is willing to accept when Brexit—no cake to have & eat it too in sight 
Labour waves the white flag in fight over a hard Brexit as John McDonnell says party won't oppose Article 50  
The lack of a government Brexit strategy creates issues for the economy, Alex Salmond says  
Brexit will create constitutional rifts and ambiguities for which no clear precedent exists  
Whoops! Britain's unemployment rate fell in the first three months after the #Brexit vote to its lowest level in 11 years. 
ONS: referendum outcome and subsequent devaluation of sterling has had little impact so far on number of EU workers in the UK labour force. 
On the day @OxfordWords says "post-truth" is word of year (due 2 Brexit & Trump) the SNP again lie about Labour parly votes. #similarities 
Italy is unimpressed by Theresa May's "chaotic" Brexit strategy  
In almost all aspects of foreign policy including #Brexit Corbyn & McDonnell are aligned with #Putin and the far right. Socialists? 
Fellow Brexiteers, this will brighten your morning!From Brexit with Love  via @YouTube 
Boris Johnson is offering the British people Brexit options which aren’t available, Dutch finance minister tell us:  
Worrying analysis of the government's Brexit process  
Bloody Tories. Bloody Brexit. Bloody Trump. 
Contrary to some murmurs during referendum, Chairman Axel Weber of Swiss bank giant UBS says there are no plans to leave London. 
Brexit will create constitutional rifts and ambiguities for which no clear precedent exists  
37% of a gerrymandered electorate voted for a ragbag of incompatible & unrealistic proposals.#YesEU #Remain #Brexit 
Boris Johnson's Brexit vision 'intellectually impossible' – EU minister  
A leading thinktank has warned government that its Brexit preparations appear "chaotic and dysfunctional"  
Ahead of @EU2017MT it was a pleasure meeting #Malta PM @JosephMuscat_JM to discuss Presidency preparations, #Brexit and #MFF 
£50bn cost for #Brexit - easy, levy an extra tax on the areas that voted leave to pay for it. They won't mind, they're patriots after all 
BREAKING: Britain's unemployment rate falls to lowest in 11 years  
If the economy tanks and it's Labour that kept the door ajar to a Second Referendum it gets to play saviour.  
‘Why didn’t the complacent left see this coming!‘ = Trump didn’t think Trump would win. Leave didn’t think we’d Brexit. Shock is legitimate. 
Thought inflation meant to be going UP thanks to Brexit devaluation etc No it has just gone DOWN: from 1% to 0.9%. Another Project Fear myth 
Is it possible that the reason the government has no coherent plan for #Brexit is that no coherent plan for Brexit is possible? ;) 
This is currently our most commented on story: UK faces Brexit bill of up to €60bn as Brussels toughens stance  
"Real parliamentary powers over ministers" required says er....Theresa May(via @PrivateEyeNews) #Brexit #Article50 
Two Brexit doom-mongering @thetimes splashes in two days fall apart – this ‘fake news’ problem is getting worse… 
The only thing Trump is making great again is Britain. We were the laughing stock of the world after Brexit.  
***Stop press*** @NicolaSturgeon Has just told PM EXACTLY what to do with Brexit. Seeing as @Conservatives have no plans whatsoever. 
We’ve got a Brexit plan for you called ‘F**k Off’, suggests Europe  
Final call for tonight's London talk re book, Brexit, Trump, politics past present future.  
I'm surprised the Oxford Dictionaries word of the year wasn't 'Brexit - def. means Brexit.' 
S5M-02488 Single Market and Trade (European Union Referendum):  via @YouTube 
Boris Johnson: the master diplomat — Italian minister on their #Brexit discussions  
Mainstream opinion sneers at 'post-truth politics' & voters who fall for Trump/Brexit but ignores evidence on drugs:  
Delighted Labour will not block or delay Article 50 trigger and will become more positive about Brexit  
Boris Johnson's Brexit vision is "intellectually impossible", Dutch Finance Minister Jeroen Dijsselbloem tells us  
YOUR COUNTRY NEEDS YOU 
If you missed Ian Hislop's #Orwell lecture yesterday, you can listen to it on UCLTV (YouTube). Fantastic! #FreedomofSpeech #Trump #Brexit  
Michael Dougan & Steph Reynolds of @livuni_EULaw giving evidence to  @CommonsNIAC this morning on Brexit & Irish border- will be fascinating  
In the era of Trump and Brexit, Oxford Dictionaries declared “post-truth” to be its international word of the year. 
Theresa May is under growing pressure to sort her strategy - plus the other Brexit headlines  
Ha ha. #Merkel is the new leader of the “free world” from whose clutches #Brexit and #Trump helped us escape. Enjoy your “freedom”, #Europe. 
Falling pound = less consumer power to purchase more expensive imports = less attractive to do trade deal with. So Brexit makes deals harder  
Can someone clarify this for me - it's Deloitte and the BBC who are to blame for this Govt not having a clue about Brexit? 
Thanks @mattbuck_hack: looking forward to Brexit meetings in Brussels with @GlenisWillmott @FrancesOGrady MEPs & others to discuss strategy. 
"Take back control" and ...hand it over to a racist, egomaniac with contempt for the Rule of Law.In a nutshell that's May's Brexit policy 
My cartoon - fake news? What fake news?#Brexit#r4Today 
2/3 of Labour voters surprised to find out they're on side of corporate elites. Especially as McDonnell said opposite during the referendum.  
Mark Carney isn't willing to take the blame for the state of the global economy any longer  
Labour has checkmated itself on Brexit, says @JolyonMaugham  
Boris Johnson continues to talk out of his arse, offering 'impossible' Brexit vision  
If confused what Labour plans to do about Brexit this by @JolyonMaugham explains why you might be right to be.  
Extraordinary letter from FT. #Brexit  
'Post-truth' named Oxford Dictionaries UK and US Word of the Year in the wake of Donald Trump's victory and Brexit 
If the child abuse enquiry set up by Theresa May provides a foretaste of her approach to Brexit, then I fear it does not bode well... 
Sky:Brexit memo: Govt 'does not recognise' leaked Deloitte document. Deloitte has confirmed the memo was written without Government input. 
BBC News - Boris Johnson offering 'impossible' #Brexit vision:  
Brexit likely to cost same as 31 years of EU membership, even without the "please stay" bribes to Nissan etc.Remind me why we did this?  
UK needs extra 30K civil servents to deal with Brexit. By comparison European Commission has 32K staff 
Great piece on Labour's cowardice and confusion over Brexit  
I want to remain in the EU and the UK. But the SNP motion had more to do with gaining Independence. SNP using Brexit for 2nd indyref. 
Boris Johnson is offering the British people Brexit options which aren’t available @J_Dijsselbloem tells #Newsnight 
EU Telling us we have to except free movement No longer applies to us British voters no longer vote like sheep BREXIT Means BREXIT 
Boris Johnson's vision of Britain outside EU is "intellectually impossible" says Dutch finance minister. Is Brexit in chaos?  
Supreme court judge hints at legal hitch that could seriously delay Brexit process  
This was one of the most capable interviewees @BBCNewsnight on #Brexit in a long time. Clear, sharp and eloquent explanations.  
Column: Empress May's Brexit tailors spinning a plan from magical cloth. Only the discerning customer can see it.  
You will achieve a higher level of consciousness when you unchain yourself from boring, predictable actions. #wisdom #Trump #Brexit #CubsWin 
Singapore wants to steal London's fintech crown after Brexit  
Possibly the best thing I've read on Labour in a while. Brexit the new Austerity, and Labour just as fool to support it  
Genuinely interested in what those who voted Brexit think about Trump & his ties with Farage. Does it unsettle you? 
Labour's Brexit tactics. New blog post.  
@instituteforgov has spoken to Whitehall insiders and fears the Brexit strategy is 'chaotic and dysfunctional'  
Now take off for London and annual meeting of the @IISS_org council. Strategic consequences of Brexit and Trump.  
Institute for Govt warns Brexit poses "existential threat” to some Whitehall ops,criticises May "secretive approach". 
Brexit Britain needs to know: is Emperor May naked?  
#Brexit: Leaked memo suggests #UK government has no strategy  
EU Exit plan IS going to work: May blasts new plot to sabotage Brexit  
Britain post-Brexit may not have the clout for new trade deals  
The Times isn't backing down on the Brexit memo. It's accurate and written by a Cabinet Office Consultant (). 
confused as to which of her three brightly coloured wheelie bins she had to put out, Pam understood why Brexit won #NewAlanBennettMonologues 
Cheer up Mayor Khan!  Brexit need not be sack cloth & ashes! Google doesn't think so! London a great place to do business - always will be! 
By bolstering Parliament's powers, the judges may have nudged Britain towards a better Brexit  
Google to build 1 million square foot building in post-Brexit London  
Will 2016 Go Down in History as the YEAR of the SORE LOSER ?#LeaveEU #VoteLeave #Article50 #Brexit #leave 
Theresa May you clown, we want Brexit! This memo proves your government doesn't have a clue! Pod one  
On Monday Weatherill said he wanted a nuclear referendum. Today he doesn't know how it will work! #saparli #LaborChaos 
Will the People ever forgive the BBC for siding against Brexit by airing Crackpot Negativity & Elitist Fear Stories?#Article50 #HardBrexit 
Also, a week ago Mpls voters overwhelmingly approved our referendum renewal. We're grateful for the support and commitment to our students. 
Boris Johnson offering 'impossible' Brexit vision  
Seen on Facebook...#Brexit #BBC 
Merkel "concession" on free movement? She just doesn't get it. After Brexit, WE decide who enters Britain. Not Frau Merkel. 
Brexit boosts Germany’s booming housing sector  
UK government has no overall plan for Brexit, leaked memo says  
Duterte, Brexit, Trump won and now Ahok named a criminal suspect. Cut me some slack 2016!!!! 
After Trump, Brits impart their own post-Brexit wisdom.  
#Brexit & #Trump aren't just warnings for political parties, they represent a real threat to democracy #auspol 
“Theresa May condemns ‘global elite’ while dining with men in white tie, ermine & two guys on gold thrones.”  #Brexit 
Remember #Brexit where 24h later the Leave-Figureheads admitted everything was a lie? You can't trust the right #Trump 
Democrats, Trump, and the Ongoing, Dangerous Refusal to Learn the Lesson of Brexit  
So many principled politicians who value EU membership and what it means for us; frustrating that they can't ditch the dogma and dump Brexit 
PEI's premier is trying to ignore the results of referendum that showed PEIslanders want MMP. Unacceptable. #erre #cdnpoli 
Ideology aside 2016 was referendum on needless complexity.Why I thought Sanders was stronger:"free college" the antidote to "build the wall" 
Brexit should not be delayed it should be cancelled.  
Economic frustrations cause risk seeking preferences, which contribute to motivating votes for Trump and Brexit:  
Trump and Brexit: why it’s again NOT the economy, stupid  via @LSEpoliticsblog 
"There is no win-win situation.It is going to be a lose-lose situation"#Brexit 
Current govt priority is not making a success of #Brexit, but ensuring #Tory survival #brexitshambles #BrWRECKSit 
Talking @realDonaldTrump with Mr Brexit @Nigel_Farage on @seanhannity tonight @FoxNews @FoxNewsInsider 
Labour waves white flag in fight over a hard Brexit as John McDonnell says party won't oppose Article 50#LabourRIP 
to people asking me advice on going to Wrestlemania: I'm going for the first time next year and I waited until Brexit so I'm no expert. 
Scandal over Brexit memo: @Deloitte author works in @cabinetofficeuk team. Firm pressured to issue its statement: 
Nigel Farage And Boris Johnson Attacked For Post-Brexit Hate Crime  
@Keir_Starmer I am still waiting to find out what the actual benefits would be of brexit.  It's all been lies so far. Stinks. 
The Gov's Brexit narrative is reminding me of Martinez, overly positive words whilst the evidence before us says something very different 
Angela Merkel hints Brexit talks could include wriggle room on free movement  
Dear Liberals,This Is What Democracy Looks Like.#PresidentTrump #Brexit  
Deloitte should be sacked from government work as they leak a damning report to BBC of #Brexit without talking to ministers May hits back  
Dutch finance minister @J_Dijsselbloem on Brexit: "It’s in economic & political terms going to be a lose-lose situation.” 
In case u missed...Eurogroup president and Dutch finance min @J_Dijsselbloem excoriating Boris over Brexit promises  
'The Vow' of protecting Scotland's rights comes to pass? Labour abstain against even contesting a hard tory brexit.  
Wow BoJo and UK getting telt over fantasy Brexit positions on internal market and freedom of movement on @BBCNewsnight 
Brexit will be lose-lose. Brexit means disaster. Brexit? No Brexit!  
Theresa May's lack of Brexit plan branded 'dereliction of duty' 
Tories want clarity from SNP on #Brexit. We're staying in the EU. That clear enough for you? 
Murdo Fraser talking Brexit:- UK gov shouldn't reveal plan- SNP Gov must reveal full plans now- Rant about independence- Done#ScotNight 
Dutch finance minister on #newsnight: "Johnson ought to be honest with British people & tell them Brexit will be lose-lose". Boris, honest? 
Eurozone president @J_Dijsselbloem on Brexit: "It’s going to be a lose, lose situation and in best case we can minimise damages" #newsnight 
Something happened somewhere and it's all the fault of #Brexit. Or #DonaldTrump .... 
Boris Johnson is offering the British people Brexit options which aren’t available @J_Dijsselbloem tells #Newsnight 
But it's still going ahead "despite Brexit".  
WOW we scooped @bsmeinfo's cover of the year (business) award for our post-Brexit issue!  #BSMEawards cc @robertjeffery1 @christhebarker 
Wednesday's Times"'Chaos' and confusion over plans for Brexit"#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers(via @suttonnick) 
U.K. judge says Theresa May might need “comprehensive” legislation to start Brexit  
PwC now getting in on Deloitte act. Claims Britain will have to borrow £100bn more by 2020 thanks to Brexit. 
Agreed. The obsession about Brexit has led to the sell-off of the NHS being ignored by both the Remain-Cult and Leave-Cult!  
Wednesday's Telegraph"Merkel signals key concession on Brexit"#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers(via @suttonnick) 
Labour not standing in the way of Brexit: "We want to move on and put it in the rear view mirror."  
Tomorrow's front page: Labour's Brexit betrayal. Has there ever been a more craven pathetic bunch of chancers  
Pro Remain think tank complains about Brexit - SHOCK. In pro Remain paper. DOUBLE SHOCK  
THE TIMES FRONT PAGE: 'Chaos and confusion over plans for Brexit' #skypapers 
What we know-#Brexit is UK's biggest decoupling of trade ties in history worth billions if not trillions & there is no plan moving forward. 
supreme court judge says Mayhem has to comprehensively replace existing EU legislation before can even begin Brexit  
If the Tories want the SNP to provide clarity on brexit I think we should give it to them & just tell the EU we've decided to stay after all 
Leaving the customs union, eh? Is that what Nissan was told? Brexit is breaking under the weight of its own many contradictory promises.  
Our best ally is,will always be the US.Trump is the president to reignite the special relationship,to empower brexit.Wake up Downing Street! 
You're a funny guy. Deloitte "independent" on Brexit. Hilarious.  
Labour is going to have to do a whole lot better than meek acceptance of Brexit means Brexit if party is to survive and Britain to prosper 
British MEPs could be excluded from key EU meetings before Brexit happens. If you want our money, we have a Voice!  
Labour should actually block.There are at least 16M anti-Brexit voters to pick up for a party with a spine 
Steve Bell on plans for Brexit – cartoon  
Angela Merkel suggests she is willing to compromise on free movement in the wake of Brexit  
Wednesday's Telegraph front page:Merkel signals key concession on Brexit#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
BREXIT RALLY 23RD NOVEMBER 2016PLEASE SHARE  
why does brexit have to sound so much like breakfast? now i can't eat fruit loops without thinking of the british pound falling in value 
BBC News - Article 50 author Lord Kerr confirms that #Brexit is not inevitable, even after negotiations of terms :  
Brussels seeks €60bn upfront payment from UK upon #Brexit  
So Kezia, UKgov wanting a hard Brexit with NO guarantees over single market, you want Scots to *pay* for access out of their cut budget  
Umunna constantly tweeting £350m story - he's bereft of anything constructive about #Brexit which 17.4 million people voted for #OutOfTouch 
Several hundred years of political cartoons featuring Englishmen making fun of Irishmen. Then there was Brexit  
Deloitte admits anti-Brexit report not done at behest of ministers, nothing to with gov and merely own view. Other than that, great story. 
Tomorrow's front page: Labour's Brexit betrayal ... UK party won't oppose hard Brexit and Scottish branch abstains on the single market  
Steve Bell on plans for Brexit – political cartoon gallery  
The UK government could push a bill through parliament authorising Brexit if it loses an appeal at the Supreme Court  
Matt on #brexit you might like this @Law_and_policy 
Wrong, wrong wrong BBC presenter describes Brexit as a 'protest vote' and claims Brits REGRET voting to leave  
A response to some reactions to Lady Hale's lecture on constitutional law (which included an explanation of the Article 50 #Brexit case)  
This really is Brexit all over again.  
British government hasn't got a clue on Brexit - @JohnODowdSF 
Those in Westminster may be fighting, but British voters have moved on & want to see the Government make a success of Brexit.  
Boris Johnson, the Foreign Secretary, earlier said the Cabinet was "totally united" on its #brexit strategy  
On how undemocratic and deeply rotten the #EU is.We must follow #Brexit: #Nexit #Frexit #Italexit#AfD #FN #PVV #FPÖ#DrainTheSwamp #Trump 
Barack Obama has blamed the rise of Trump and Brexit on globalisation, technological change and suspicion of elites  
Brexit could be delayed by up to two years, a Supreme Court Judge says  
Breaking: Google announces major £1bn UK investment. Up to 3,000 jobs and new HQ. CEO Sundar Pichai tells the BBC Brexit "no effect yet"  
Doing #CBC hit tonight on explosion of hate - organized & not - in Canada & the US. Short take on causation: @realDonaldTrump & #Brexit. 
Barack Obama attacks Brexit & Donald Trump voters for trying to 'shake things up' OBAMA CAN'T UNDERSTAND NATIONALISM 
What annoys the lefties the most isn't that Trump won or Brexit won ....its that they both might be proved great choices and succesful 
I'll be talking fake Whitehall "Brexit" reports with .@iancollinsuk on @LBC tonight at 10.30pm. Do tune in for the lolz. 
British & American Jews confront ghastly irony of using German citizenship laws to plan for post Trump/Brexit future  
Great, Guy. Please do. Read it to him. And Boris will reply "That's why the British people voted for Brexit". Face it, Guy. We're outta here  
How can a Justice give her verdict on Brexit before hearing the government's case? Surely she should recuse herself?  
RT if you agree the political elite should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum  
.@google has confirmed its plans for a new UK site - and the Government says it's a post-Brexit vote of confidence  
How the #Calexit independence referendum initiative works  
From Brexit to #Clexit: Marc Morano’s #MAGA hat sends message at #COP22 UN climate change meeting @SheilaGunnReid  
Turns out @BorisJohnson isn't just nakedly self-interest / a bumbling buffoon, he's also a danger to his country as chief Brexit negotiator  
#noBrexitConfidence #NobrexitPlan #brexit =when a ref is worded so ppl vote for removal of their own rights,but don't realise it #NOBREXIT 
I have honoured the charity Brexit bet. Unfortunately didn't realise you could gift aid CGT when I did CLIC. Fixed for Gt Ormnd St gift.  
Next EU crisis: The 'No' campaign is ahead in Italy's upcoming constitutional referendum.No: 53%Yes: 47%(EMG)  
EXCLUSIVE: Theresa May responds to leaked Brexit memo  
Tory version of Parliamentary sovereignty in all its glory: BBC News - Government 'prepares three-line Brexit bill'  
Latest campaign leaflet from LDs in Richmond Park - strong BREXIT theme  
.@OxfordWords names "post-truth" its word of the year, attributing the spike in usage to the EU referendum and U.S. election.  
Nothing. Not a sausage.via @TheCanaryOTPBrexit leak #2 reveals there are no plans to even start planning a plan 
Speaking in Greece, Pres Obama warns against divisive forces following Brexit and the election of Donald Trump.  
The lone Lib Dem voted with UKIP, Tories & Labour in the #Senedd (@AssemblyWales) for hard Brexit, against @Plaid_Cymru recently too.  
When you're rich, have nothing to do, don't know much and want to know even less, listen to David Cameron for £120,000 an hour on Brexit. pic.twitter.com/isgc0SGLbF 
Some coffee needs to be inhaled by many of the so-called "left".#Brexit 
Despite a day of spin, No.10 cannot get away from the fact that there is no plan on #Brexit after nearly 5 months.  
There's a certain European cafe on Leith Walk where Dugdale takes news crews for any pieces on Brexit. Guess what - owner says no more.  
Brexit: with all that's happening this is an epic mistake that simply won't get off the ground...but perhaps there's a motion picture in it?  
The depressing thought is that this account should now be sub-titled "A running commentary on Brexit". 
And the 'bollocks' of free movement was still proudly supported in his Telegraph column *after* the referendum. 
Why aren't you opposing #Brexit, Labour?  
Just when No.10 insists it 'didn't recognise' comments in leaked memo on Brexit disarray Johnson comes to the rescue  
Govt won't give Parliament a running commentary on Brexit, but it will to the Czech press  
what a year this has been#NigelFarage & #DonaldTrump are now the mainstream#BrexitBritain #BrexitUSA #Trump2016 #Brexit  
Deloitte/Brexit. Theresa May is giving a whole new world of meaning to the expression "having nothing to hide".  @JohnJCrace @UKIPNFKN 
Me... after reading what McDonnell said on Brexit today. Misleading; extremely irresponsible; limiting the future of millions.  
So Trump has no idea how to be a president and the UK has no idea how to Brexit. Almost like these were just intended to be tantrums. Huh.  
Brexit could be delayed for two years, Supreme Court judge warns  
#skynews #bbcnews #itvnews #cnn  after events of UK referendum vote & the Trump victory this is what public think on your biased reporting  
If Labour were any sort of opposition, they'd be over this leaked memo like a tramp on chips. Instead McDonnell is welcoming Brexit #C4News 
Google to open new HQ building in London, more jobs. #BBC concedes #Brexit Britain a great place to invest in.   
A leaked Brexit memo says the U.K. is unsure of how to proceed  
Why Brexit has to be done in an open and collaborative way,Theresa May has made a false start.  
Just because government did not commission Deloitte Brexit report does not make it untrue  
A pressure group is urging the PM to let UK nationals remain EU citizens after Brexit. If it was an option, would you take up the offer?  
Brexit cabinet committee is in Mickey Mouse land, says Ken Clarke. Goodness, I wish he had more influence in policy.  
Here's how a small South African data company predicted both Trump’s win and Brexit.  cc: @brandseye 
Remain elements of the media are already reporting this is “despite Brexit"  
.@GerryAdamsSF criticises Kenny over scrapping of referendum on the Presidential franchise  
Today has shown, in case anyone had any doubt, that Scottish Labour exist only for the British Union. Nothing else matters. #indyref #brexit 
Nigel Farage and Arron Banks caused increase in violent hate crime after Brexit vote, MPs told 
Angela Merkel suggests EU could change one of its fundamental rules in response to Brexit  
REAL TALK: Election was a referendum on Obama's failures, but he won't admit it.I'll discuss w/ @TeamCavuto on @FoxNews at 4:30p ET! 
As everyone knows the Gov doesn't have a clue about #Brexit so a 3-line bill is an insult to Parliament and country - blank cheque, a con. 
Memo about Whitehall Brexit problems was for 'internal audience', says Deloitte  
No shocks in this afternoon's Holyrood Brexit vote.Dance Patrick, Dance.  
A '3-line Brexit bill' would be a cheap & mendacious piece of trickery aimed at subverting parliamentary process & forcing #Brexit through. 
Unionist Parties join together to vote down Scotland's attempt to remain in the EUThey are backing WM BrexitHowever SNP + Green won over 
@instituteforgov has spoken to Whitehall insiders and fears the Brexit strategy is 'chaotic and dysfunctional'  
So we may need 30 thousand civil servants to deal with brexit pity we can't find more prison officers doctors nurses firemen and police 
Google commits to Brexit Britain as it plans to build new London HQ  
.@JunckerEU #EUdialogues #Brexit "You cannot tell ppl from Monday to Saturday to vote against #Europe and on #Sunday you say the opposite." 
Mark Carney urges financial-services firms not to make any rash decisions around Brexit  
Tories admitting they have no clue re: Brexit, really highlights how selfish & irresponsible the EU referendum was. 
#Scotland could face £1.3b #Brexit budget bombshell  
Sounds a lot like #Brexit - campaign on wildly irresponsible promises and then have no plan for how to make them happen.  
Brexit? I've no idea what's going on either, says Mark Carney  
So Downing St says it won't give running commentary on Brexit to British media & politicians. But Boris happy to do that with Czech hacks.  
Today @johnmcdonnellMP showed clearly that @UKLabour is going to do nothing to stop a Hard #Brexit. Only national hope rests with @LibDems 
Elsie's own advisors have just driven a giant nail into her Brexit/Separation coffin. 
Can't wait to negotiate with @BorisJohnson, so that I can read him Article 3 of the Treaty of Rome  #Brexit  
Joined @stellacreasy & @wesstreeting to support @ChukaUmunna calling for Ministers to #ShowUsTheMoney - the £350m brexit promised for NHS. 
Brexit means...a lot of complex trade decisions  
A reminder that Corbyn was not responsible for Brexit: Two thirds of Labour supporters voted Remain, the corporate elite loving BASTARDS. 
So now Labour has declared itself for a hard Brexit in all three countries.  Some Opposition.   
Scottish Lab gone along w Corbyn, so Lab brexit position now hard to distinguish from tories  
Tories demanding SNP plan for Brexit is like a dog owner who lets their pet shit in your living room then criticises you for a dirty house 
Which sides were the the racists, xenophobes and bigots on during the indyref, Brexit and Trump campaigns?  
Brexiteers gloating at 'Google backs UK with £1bn investment plan': 1) Google avoids tax 2) Brexit is years away 3) Key jobs to Americans 
The plot gets thicker and thickerer - but not in  bad waySupreme Court judge signals major delay on starting Brexit  
Maybe You Should be asking whether it's safe here 
Agreed. Stupid. But then so is saying you will vote for A50 regardless of the current disarray and fact denial on Brexit. Think again Ed.  
Blow for PM as Supreme Court judge hearing Government appeal says EU referendum vote was 'not legally binding'  
The presidential election was a referendum on gender, and women lost.  
Lady Hale one of the Supreme Court judges hearing the appeal against the legal challenge to #Brexit says vote was 'not legally binding' 
Most British students want a second Brexit referendum  
40 of us have written 2 chancellor asking autumn statement to set out how to make good pledge for £350m for NHS brexit made #ShowUsTheMoney 
Govt can't do two things at once - shrinking Whitehall & delivering #Brexit are not compatible. Me for @channel5_tv  
Now in chamber supporting @ChukaUmunna call for those in vote leave campaign to #ShowUsTheMoney where the £350m brexit promised is for NHS. 
Great article "Winter's coming and the Brexit emperor still has got no clothes" by Charles Freeman:  
#Labour to back Brexit, open UK to trade deal with right-wing US, undercutting UK protections, standards and workers. Yup, irony *is* dead.  
A day of infamy for the Scottish Liberal Democrats as the formerly pro-European party votes against membership of the single market. #Brexit 
The day I follow @johnmcdonnellMP and get 'positive' about #Brexit and its effects is the day hell freezes over. 
BBC headline 'surprise' fall in inflationfollows prev. post-brexit headlines'surprise' increase in GDP'surprise' consumer confidence 
Absolutely; in addition Brexit disregards the huge sacrifices made across Europe by so many to ensure a safe & egalitarian future for us all  
So #Labour have totally messed up #Brexit line. Must be close to the last straw. They hardly exist now as a party.  
Supreme Court judge criticised after warning Theresa May could be forced to replace EU laws before triggering Brexit  
Productive meeting with the Chancellor @PHammondMP this afternoon. Discussed devolution, Brexit & support for growing London's economy 
What is Labour's official Brexit policy? By @georgeeaton  
Brexit boost. BBC News - 3,000 new jobs as Google backs UK with £1bn investment plan  
So the big Brexit memo is little more than an opinion from an accountant who had access to Cameron, but no access to May's govt?Bollox then 
Angela Merkel suggests EU could change one of its fundamental rules in response to Brexit  
#Brexit people had 30 years to come up with a plan & they didn't, so maybe it's time we took the keys away from them  
Cabinet divided by Brexit by Christian Adams - political cartoon gallery  
2016 has been a bad year for NATO - Brexit and Trump could be the final nails in the coffin, says Andrew Dorman:  
The bad news just keeps coming... When will it end? #Brexit #Google 
Breaking: Google announces major £1bn UK investment. Up to 3,000 jobs and new HQ. CEO Sundar Pichai tells the BBC Brexit "no effect yet" 
Get a load o'this. What would an Irish Brexit be called ? 'Feckit'?     Ireland must plan for possible EU breakup... 
Mike Russell urges Tories: "wake up from the dream of empire, wake up from the delusion of control, wake up from the isolationism of Brexit" 
Tim the plank Farron still giving air time talking 2 referendum and staying in the single market,can the men in white coats take him away. 
With impeccable timing, Boris Johnson now says UK "probably" leaving customs union, thereby proving the Brexit chaos that No.10 is denying. 
Government may need 30,000 new civil servants to devise an EU exit plan. To say Brexit is a disaster is not elitism. It's the truth. 
A week after Jo Cox was shot & murdered by a white nationalist, Faraga said a single bullet hadn't been fired during EU Referendum.  
Nigel Farage and Boris Johnson attacked for post-Brexit hate crime   spike  
Brexit vote driving anti-LGBT hate crime as victims told: ‘You’re next’  
No it wasn't. It was a referendum against Hillary Clinton. When will you people figured that out?  
Labour's re-articulated Brexit view is profoundly illogical, dogma-driven & gives a free pass to a floundering govt.  
Those who call participation in exams as referendum didn't even report when MP resigned 2 months ago saying Kashmiris are facing genocide 
The more you read this sneering bourgeois drivel, the worse it gets. "We must be allowed to overturn the referendum, because we're nicer"  
most of us in Europe are fed up. E.U was a big Mistake. I have witness THE DOWNFALL of Italy. Brexit was a smart move. 
Sit down, @TimFarron. Everyone was clear that a vote to leave meant leaving the Single Market. #DrainTheSwamp #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
Within a few months of the Brexit vote we have seen a total contradiction of the Treasury’s forecasts  
Britain may not have the clout when it comes to post-Brexit trade deals  
What with 'we're both for and against #Brexit', and 'we're really a lot like #Trump, you know', #Labour are actively trying to get sub-25%. 
#Leave or #Remain? Anti or pro-#Brexit?Can't be both.So-where does #Labour stand?text-via @MichaelPDeacon 
So 16 million UK voters (+ some wobbly Leavers) are lost, as Tory & Labour party discard them for Brexit.Huge GE opportunity for someone? 
Supreme Court judge signals major delay on starting Brexit  
MORE: British PM May's spokeswoman says there is #Brexit timetable, disagrees with leaked memo saying no plan.  
The disgraced Liam Fox MP is trying to prove to his civil servants that Brexit is a good idea by making them read his book.  
New report shows that British ports would be liberated by quitting the customs union:  #Brexit #ChangeBritain 
Well it truly does appear that only the SNP will oppose Brexit.  
Leaked memo suggests the UK government has no plan for Brexit and needs to hire 30,000 people to figure it out  
Theresa May is CORRECT in assuming liberal supreme court will piss on voters just as well.#Brexit 
Obama says Brexit and Trump were both powered by globalization fears  
Worth noting that Brexit adviser said before starting that cost of leaving would be £25bn a year.  
President Obama: Donald Trump’s election and Brexit both reflect people’s economic fears  
Speaking in Greece, @POTUS says Trump, Brexit part of a global wave of anxiety  | AP Photo 
She should be sacked BBC presenter describes Brexit as a 'protest vote' and claims Brits REGRET voting to leave  
People who think Brexit is an "enormous opportunity" for the UK: Boris, Fox, Farage, May, Davis, Corbyn, McDonnell, Galloway. 
EXCLUSIVE: Theresa May responds to leaked Brexit memo  
The Bank of England's governor has told MPs the pound's fall since the Brexit vote was 'necessary’ but not welcome  
Britain’s Brexit plan? Leaked memo says there is no plan  
As each day grows closer to #brexit I am more convinced that it will be the greatest preventable disaster to befall Britain since Iraq. 
Labour policy makers spinning around faster than ever in their hunt for votes as #JohnMcDonnell now backs #Brexit. 
The Labour approach to Brexit is to grumble about Brexit, demand changes to Brexit...but then wave Brexit through anyway. Brilliant.   
A leaked memo claims the U.K. government has no plan for Brexit:  
After members did their pans in for Remain while JC/JM barely engaged, now we are to embrace "enormous opportunities" of #Brexit? Just no. 
Theresa May’s Brexit strategy revealed – the Easter Island approach  
Ppl saying this is a big Labour change. No. They have been supporting Tory Brexit policy from the start. Beginning on day after the vote. 
Our modern economies are rigged to keep wages suppressed with or without migrants b/c hedgefunds just won't take less profit #brexit, #Trump 
Theresa May responds to accusation government has no Brexit strategy.(done for @huffpostukcom) 
Britain GLOBALISTS don't plan to exit EU - DEFY BREXIT VOTERS not acceptable  TRUMP win was critical, battle not over 
Reason former politicians make so much money giving speeches is b/c it's vulgar for big business to pay them back with cash in a bag.#brexit 
When I saw Brexit Bill trending, I was worried they'd got a humorous little mascot. 
What Brexit? The UK just joined the new Europol intelligence-sharing programme  
We've lost if we allow #brexit or #Trump to focus on free movement of Labour as cause of lower standards of living rather than tax avoidance 
Ken Clarke: Brexit Cabinet in ‘Mickey Mouse’ land, too preoccupied with headlines  
Murdo Fraser wades into the #Brexit debate, without a hint of self-awareness...  
.@johnmcdonnellMP There are plenty of people out there who think #Brexit is a disaster but are not working for corporate elites  
Little illuminated red dress #theresamay briefs banksters #brexit not real & way ahead is good old fashioned fascism- govt + corporations.  
Number 10 in no position to complain. No comms agenda and six months after the EU ref we know almost nothing more about its Brexit strategy  
John McDonnell has just pledged Labour support for Tories on Brexit and Corbynistas are with him The REAL red Tories. 
 warned #brexit was psyop puppet show. Tories continue 2 lock us into EU via privatising UK by EU companies & banks  
No.10 slams Deloitte for 'touting for business' over its leaked Brexit memo. 
EXCLUSIVE: Theresa May responds to leaked Brexit memo  
Obama responds to a question about U.S. parallels to Brexit at a news conference with the Greece PM  
Based on the information that the U.K. Government has provided you, what does Brexit mean? 
So those of us who fear Brexit will be bad for jobs, wages and security are simply 'supporting corporate interests'?  
Upshot of Brexit: Whenever someone links to a piece on it in French, Russian etc you learn how to say 'they're fucked' in another language. 
John McDonnell wants Labour to be more positive about Brexit. A shame he lost his spine in June and backed Remain. 
Opposition parties must choose: Scotland in the single market or a damaging hard Brexit. Here's why it's important.  
Tory @murdo_fraser complains about a lack of clarity from the SNP on what Brexit means. Emm... 
Tory MSP Murdo Fraser asks for a plan to deal with the Brexit vote - from the Scottish Government. "Absolutely no clarity," he says. 
Murdo Fraser points out this is Holyrood's 11th debate about Brexit; is ScotGov aim to deflect attention from its "failing domestic agenda"? 
.@KeithBrownSNP: Right-wing Tory Brexit a threat to Scotland's companies & exports - due to impact of European Single Market exit. 
EU referendum 'not legally binding' says Supreme Court judge hearing Brexit legal challenge  
Probably the greatest fallacy is when a racist thinks he has culture b/c it's like a dog thinking it has table manners.  #brexit #trump 
German third-quarter growth halves post-Brexit, economists see better fourth quarter  
This year we lost Leonard Cohen, Bowie, and Prince, and were given Trump, Brexit, and Steve Bannon.2016 can FUCK right off! 
What would a 'Reverse Greenland' mean for Scotland? @NicolaSturgeon responds to Q from @GreenlandDFA Minister Qujaukitsoq re #Brexit  
Get the facts on the leaked #Brexit memo - and the chaos at the heart of the UK government.  
Says Arron Banks as he drools over the thought of #Brexit Britain being turned into the world's biggest tax haven @Anna_Soubry#Remain #Yes 
Surprise? TARULLO: BREXIT DID NOT TURN OUT TO BE 'HIGH-RISK' EVENT 
John, you hit the nail on the head there. The first thing the Brexit leaders did was hide! 
This is not news. It's a basic fact of law that has been known since the referendum legislation was drafted.  
#Brexit Britain will tie up landlords, businesses & colleges in immigration control red tape.#Remain 
Those who would deny Britons a public debate on Brexit are the real "enemies of the people" 
It’s official: Theresa May has absolutely no plan for Brexit, despite what she says  #Brexit 
Good. Govt needs to get on with Brexit now and stop faffing about   
.@David_Cameron was paid £120,000 for a 60-minute speech (£2,000 per minute!) on Brexit to Wall Street financiers  
EU referendum was 'not legally binding' says Supreme Court judge hearing Brexit legal challenge appeal  
@Law_and_policy  Bombproof three line Brexit Bill  
Downing Street just launched an unprecedented attack on the firm that 'revealed they had no Brexit plan'  
Oi, @theresa_may stop stalling on Brexit, you're cheating the British public!Pod one #FreeSpeech 
Wrong, Mr McDonnell. No one knew or knows the benefits, costs and risks of #brexit. Making a massive change with zero information is insane.  
So, anyway, we've had Jeremy's "I'm a bit like Trump, me" line, John's "Cheer up, Brexit may be fun" and Clive's "yeah, about immigration". 
More #brexit delusion. Apparently Tories think Britain has long-lost Middle-Eastern lovers. No mention of Balfour, Aden, Suez, Sykes–Picot  
Kodak moving their headquarters from Switzerland to United Kingdom next year bringing money and jobs to the United Kingdom.I blame #Brexit. 
Brexit: civil service facing its largest task since WWII, says union  
I wonder if the result of Brexit would have been the same had we known the devastating impact on our tobloron bars #toolate 
Trump bringing back Winston to the Oval. #Brexit  
Look, Trump and Brexit are potentially good developments.All #CRx is saying is that neither is an endgame to globalism or cultural poz. 
Our 8 year national nightmare/embarrassment is almost at an end.Obama praises Merkel - slams Brexit 
Extraordinary letter from FT. #Brexit  
Farage complains that May has "no plan for Brexit." But Farage has been campaigning for Brexit for 25 years without a clue what to do next 
On day we find out Tories really have no #Brexit plan, we'll find out if Scottish Tories and Scottish Labour *still* back single market. 
Italy polls get worse for Renzi as referendum nears  
Another embarrassing cabinet Brexit memo leak  
This is the Border fence Mexico Built 
Announcement of @UKandEU Brexit Priority Grants:  #esrcfunding 
Scottish Labour on why Brexit is so super  
.@TimFarron: Leaked Brexit memo reveals shambles at the heart of this Conservative government  
From this week's Private Eye #brexit  
Although I do remember headlines claiming that Brexit would never succeed or that Trump would never be  President...so  
Britain has no Brexit plan, leaked memo claims...  
John McDonnell backs Brexit. Says those trying to block or delay it are "on the side of certain corporate elites"  
Two-thirds of British voters oppose a ‘blind-date Brexit’. Full article at  
Looks like concerns Tories will frame Brexit Bill to make it unamendable were justified. Denying democratic scrutiny  
9. Without that threat, Parliament cannot deliver a 'good' Brexit. (See this extract, predicated on the Executive negotiating a 'bad' deal).  
How a small South African company correctly predicted both Trump and Brexit  
Professor Michael Dougan's damning indictement of the #Leave campaign’s “industrial dishonesty” #Brexit #Remain 
A leaked memo says the government could hire 30,000 extra civil servants to deal with Brexit. When should Theresa May trigger article 50?  
Last week, Theresa's Shambolic Tories declared High Court decision irrelevant over Brexit.But use High Court today to smash prison strike. 
Brexit is akin to smashing a box of eggs on the floor and then handing it to government while demanding they turn it into 6 healthy chickens 
good piece holding the Brexit/Trump mirror up to Better Together  
Nation "must be consulted on terms of Brexit deal," says @timfarron. "To do otherwise is to snub the British people" 
Worcester I'm at Huntingdon hall tonight. Last few tickets to go. Trump, Brexit, immigration, dancing. Can't say fairer than that  
It is estimated that it took 5,000 to 10,000 workers to build the pyramids. Yet it will take 30,000 to Brexit? 
How will we manage our borders - security and revenues following Brexit and beyond? Great meeting with ports, operators & hauliers.  
Brexit critics: This 'majority of public didn't vote for it' bit doesn't work. That's not how votes operate. Winners are ppl who turn up. 
Both substance & govt reaction to leaked Brexit memo painfully predictable. Transparency,openness & competence are in our national interest. 
Number 10 on Brexit "no plan" memo: "It's an unsolicited document that has nothing to do with the government, not produced by government" 
There are already a number of ways for Parliament to scrutinise Brexit - Article 50 should not be one of them says @isaby #bbcdp 
Although the government has no 'Brexit plan' it is apparently, Labour policy, to support Brexit wholeheartedly.  
This isn't what we voted for, how about you? #Brexit  
This is economically illiterate.Why is Scottish Labour arguing how super Farage/English Tory-led Brexit is?  
Scottish Tories are fairly panicking about this vote on Brexit aren't they? Show & tell time. 
From @thetimes journalist who broke leaked Brexit memo (seen & aided by senior civil servants) - source felt public should know content.  
But surely much of it then flows from England into the EU. That would be stymied by Brexit, rather than going directly from Scot to EU, no?  
Useful infographic illustrating government's plan for Brexit  
The Brexit referendum passed in the age of Obama. Brexit will happen in the age of Trump. When circumstances change, so do people's minds.  
Headed to London for meeting organised by @MaternityAction to discuss maternity rights in context of Brexit. Seems vital in current climate. 
Not at all convinced that will be enough. Government must not have unconditional parliamentary support for a hard #Brexit.  
Leaked memo #May & #Brexit! #Inflation to rise 2.8 in 2017 anything can happen with #Brexit affect & #Trump election ! #MAGA #MBGA 
The Government has a democratic mandate to take Britain out of the EU #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
Does the Brexit memo matter?   
A leaked memo confirms what we all thought - Theresa May has no plan at all for Brexit:  
Brexit & Trump victory have proved that globalisation & liberal theories were good only as long as these consolidated Anglo-Saxon power? 
Brexit memo was aided by senior civil servants says @thetimes journalist who broke the story 
A leaked memo suggests Tories have no plan for Brexit. As @Keir_Starmer says we need certainty, stability & plan to put jobs & economy first 
Good talks in EP incl w EP-pres @MartinSchulz. Working for Denmarks interests on Europol, Brexit, free trade etc #dkpol #eudk #workingforDK 
UK government has no overall plan for Brexit, leaked memo cited by BBC says  
Leaked internal memo: Britain has no coherent plan for Brexit  
Government hit back with photographic evidence of Brexit plan so far.  
LATEST: Drop in the pound was a "necessary" adjustment, Bank of England's Mark Carney says  
SNP now contradicting themselves on Brexit. Briefing that they want EEA membership when this would breach one of FM's '5 tests' from June. 
The UK is facing a hefty Brexit bill as EU negotiators take a tough stance  
Obama's parting insult to UK: Outgoing leader calls Merkel 'closest ally' and slams Brexit  Anglo Saxon united future 
The presidential election was a referendum on gender—and women lost  
Ex-PM Cameron ‘Paid £120,000’ For One Hour Speech On #Brexit  
Unsurprising that civil service is struggling with Brexit after being cut to its smallest size since 1945.  
Can we finally admit that there's no plan for Brexit, because Brexit in any meaningful or profitable sense is *impossible*? 
It's now clear that Brexit means bigger government - @georgeeaton on the leaked memo:  
Lady Hale will be hearing that case - she states rather unequivocally "that referendum was not legally binding on Parliament"  
That feeling when you receive an unsolicited memo from Deloitte highlighting the failures in your Brexit plan  
From Putin's personal notebook: Brexit ✓ USA ✓ Bulgaria ✓ Moldova ✓ Netherlands Italy France GermanyLOL  
Leaked Brexit memo reveals Tories 'have no plan and are struggling to cope' oh what a surprise Brexiters clueless  
LATEST: Unexpected drop in inflation won't alter Bank of England's outlook, Mark Carney says  
Trump has no coherent policies. The British government has no Brexit plan. To be fair, though, the asteroid has no clear agenda either. 
Theresa May's strategy for Brexit is basically the underpants gnomes' business plan from South Park.  
McDonnell is finally brave enough to come out as a Brexit supporter. 
The government's plan for Brexit:Step 1 - BrexitStep 2 - ?????Step 3 - ????????Step 4 - Everything good now 
John McDonnell: "It's time we were more positive about Brexit." 
The mother of all #Brexit Déjà vu!>50% of anti-#Trump rioters DID NOT BOTHER TO VOTE.Every other young Briton made the same "mistake".LOL 
Reports of anonymous "leaked memos" on #Brexit, little more than idle mischief-making.  
Lady Hale trails the Brexit case she’ll be hearing next month.  Says government no longer claims it’s non-justiciable 
Why does it matter that the Government have literally no plan for Brexit, it's only the most important event in post-war British history!  
The pound's drop is having an effect on some investment plans, Mark Carney says  
This small South African data company predicted both Trump’s win and Brexit.  cc: @brandseye 
It worked! Live from the North Sea talking about fishing and Brexit. Getting ready for a Facebook live on @SkyNews in a min. 
A leaked government memo claims that the Government has no Brexit plan and will not have a strategy for six months  
The Brexit memo leaked  
One small company that tracks social media sentiment for brands correctly predicted both Trump and Brexit  
"Time you want a plan is when we trigger Article 50" - Iain Duncan Smith on #Brexit memo  
Talking to employees at @minesoftnews with @nick_clegg about effects of Brexit cost and uncertainty on businesses  
Brexit memo was circulated in Whitehall & a source unofficially shared as they thought public should know content 
The euphoria of Brexit has given way to horror and panic. Will we see the same with Trump? 
The country must understand that the Prime Minster is committed to Brexit.If she were to fail, it would not be lack of effort but sabotage.  
Leaked Brexit memo reveals May's Government has no Brexit plan and poor understanding of what leaving the EU means 
.@Nigel_Farage: "We're about to take back control over every sector of our lives. What a fantastic opportunity to do things better!" #Brexit  
5,200 John McDonnell speech on Brexit and the economy lands. Not a single mention of the word "immigration".  
So, apparently the Tories have no Brexit plan at all. Who knew?  
With Trump's preference for Farage and the obvious Tory Brexit shambles, should be a 6-0 hammering of the PM at #pmqs tomorrow. Easily. 
In Praise of "Foreign Workers" by Sir Martin Sorrell  Founder and CEO of WPP #Brexit #Remain #YesEU 
via @StatKommune #jobbBBC: Britene har ingen #Brexit-plan  
Why on earth did the Tories ban civil servants from Brexit planning in advance of the vote? Explains current chaos.  
Plan #BWe lobby the #EU to change their name to #UK, thus rendering the #brexit referendum null and void and the #Scottish one valid 
Here's how to retain your EU citizenship after Brexit  
Almost...#Brexit has been a wake up call to #EU.#Trump win is more an icy water bucket while snoozing.GOT UP YET? 
Anyone else think that the BIG "Theresa's got no plan" story was posted to hide the fact that Inflation has fallen ?#Brexit #Article50 
John McDonnell. Brexit will help corporate elites (June). Remaining will help corporate elites (November). What a disgrace.  
.@LibDems @timfarron blasts 'shambles at the heart of govt...heading for reckless, destructive Brexit'  
The Brexit plan is there is no Brexit plan, says leaked memo  
Text from Theresa May: "Sorry I haven't had time to do a Brexit plan, Ma'am. I've been too engrossed in your book!"  
As @theresa_may claims "#brexit means brexit"A leak reveals "brexit means Oh look a squirrel" 
Excellent analysis of current political delusions re #Trump and #brexit  from Aditya @chakrabortty via @guardian  
After a week watching America's grimness there’s something almost comforting about returning to our own cosy home-grown catastrofuck #Brexit 
Leaked Brexit memo: no single plan and Whitehall is struggling to cope  
So, the Tories will be able to fund 30,000 civil servants to see through #Brexit but won't be able to find promised cash for the #NHS? 
Every detail of Brexit memo was raised by critics after the Leave vote. They were ignored as 'talking Britain down'  
Today, in Brexit irony: UK needs a bureaucracy the size of the entire EU Commission to manage leaving the EU  
Excellent by @davidwearing on Trump, Brexit and "economic anxiety":   
Britons lose freedom of movement in 27 countriesEU citizens lose the same in one country#Brexit - taking control from Britons#Remain 
Irony overload from the @ScotTories and Murdo Fraser this morning. Again. #Brexit  
Exclusive: extracts from the leaked Brexit memo...  
The leaked Brexit memo is more evidence that Theresa May & Brexit Bunglers are the ones responsible for this mess.   
Am not opposed to Brexit in principle, but it ain't going to work the way May is going about it. 
The entire Brexit process needs to rebooted, and started again on an open and collaborative basis.  May has made a false start. 
In March Osborne forecast a 2019-20 budget surplus of £10.4 billion. The IFS now forecasts a £14.9bn deficit#Brexit 
On BREXIT research showed 80% of coverage went to the Conservatives and UKIP  
Most attempts to discredit the leaked "No Clue About Brexit" memorandum appear to be by reference to its provenance, and not to its content. 
A leaked memo obtained by media allegedly says that the British govt. has no plan for #Brexit.  
Brexit windfall! @theresa_may's first India trade mission results in GBP 1 bn. for India-UK businesses. #MakeInIndia 
At Hansel & Pretzel in Ham making some pretzels with @nick_clegg and finding out about more local businesses suffering already from Brexit  
The debate on Brexit in Holyrood will set clear which parties want the best deal for Scots and which will just tow the line for WM 
.@StephenGethins on leaked memo - ScotGov setting out realistic vision to protect jobs/economy, UKGov beset with infighting #Brexit  
Surprise! The government has no plan!#Brexit was always about blaming the EU, not about taking responsibility & control#Remain #YesEU 
Britain has no Brexit plan, leaked memo claims  
. @CommonsForeign criticised Cameron lack of post referendum preparation.  Dithering Theresa and the three Wrexiteers are compounding that 
Hard to believe this sentence was written before Trump, Brexit, etc (from Ali Aslam's "Ordinary Democracy")  
video of Tim Lang's Food Thinkers seminar talk on Oct 26 on the implications of Brexit for UK food is now online:  
Great to hear Brexit means we'll need 30k more civil servants. I'm done with unelected Brussels bureaucrats. Bring back British unelected bu 
Obama going round reassuring allies post-election sounds exactly like Sadiq Khan doing the same post-Brexit  
No plan, no negotiating strategy & splits in the Cabinet#Brexit - working hard to ruin Britain.#Remain #YesEU 
This is interesting: EU Brexit counterparts split over whether to concentrate on divorce or future relationship  
Barack Obama - US President praises Angela Merkel, slams Brexit in parting insult to UK. He won’t be missed.  
Leaked memo says UK government has no plan for Brexit  
Betrayal of "single most visible promise” of the Leave campaign & spend £350 million more a week on the NHS.#brexit  
Extra UK civil servants needed for Brexit: 30,000Total civil servants working in European Commission: 24,000#BrexitShambles 
The government "Doesn't recognise" the leaked Brexit document. Maybe it should pay more attention to its work then. 
Brexit memo was seen and aided by senior civil servants. @Number10gov should stop shooting the messenger and start addressing the challenges 
What is this leaked memo?! No author, no one on Brexit knows about it & wants 30k more officials; why?! Is it real?!  
Now, about that post-Brexit house-price crash...  
Breaking news: the government's detailed #brexit plans are finally released following Whitehall's leaked brexit memo  
Transport Secretary Chris Grayling says government "doesn't recognise" Brexit memo  
Despite the Prime Minister's favourite saying, the government is struggling with what "Brexit" means  
Maybe I am unfair please can anyone point to anything sensible Fox Davies Boris and Mayhem have said on the economy or Brexit? 
#BlackMirror director on Trump's win, Brexit: "We’ve got to open our eyes"  
i dunno about you guys but i'm starting to think that this whole brexit thing was a bit of a bad idea? 
Only 1/3 of voters back Brexit unconditionally, without knowing what kind of deal is on offer  
The time is now, Germany. We The People are winning! Remove #Merkel #abmerkeln #merkelmusswegLet us #DrainTheSwamp & follow #Brexit  
Here's the deal: UK in Customs Union, Scotland/NI in EEA. No hard borders. England gets hard Brexit. Everyone happy.  
Updated story: Government 'doesn't recognise' Brexit memo and sources say it was unsolicited:  
Mr Rees-Mogg? About that Hard Brexit you ordered. May we tender our bill, please? A modest £40-60bn.  
Not sure leaking your pitch is a great way to get work from govt ... but Times' memo description of govt on Brexit rings true in many ways 
BREAKING: Britain's inflation unexpectedly slows  
A leaked government memo claims that the Government has no Brexit plan and will not have a strategy for six months  
Sturgeon is doing exactly what she said she would re brexit. If UKG say no to her options then she has tried her best-indyref2 becomes real. 
Brexit message from Theresa May:Follow the crowd.Lies can work.Ignore facts & experts.Blame foreigners for your issues.#sadtimes 
Russia Today staff concerned about post-Brexit post-Trump shift to the right by offering Katie Hopkins a show.  
May Govt no Brexit planNo reason to change my view Mayhem govt totally clueless & incompetent via @telegraphnews 
Leaked memo confirms government has no plan for #Brexit. Time for them to establish a clear plan that protects British jobs and livelihoods 
The Assembly #EUExit Working Group meets @ScotParl @SP_European at City Hall this morning to discuss #Brexit  
Conservatives lack of preparation for the practicalities of Brexit betrays the fact that for many of them this was always a political act. 
 There is no plan for Brexit, there is no plan for Brexit   
Americans who equate Brexit with the Trump win may discover the difference between an on-going major cock-up and a pending global disaster. 
Europe could have done more to prevent Brexit, Jose Manuel Barroso tells Bloomberg  
.@TimFarron responds to leaked Brexit memo showing Theresa May's government has no plan  
Brexit leaving strategy  
I know we live in a democracy and all that but the Brexit really has turned out the wankers choice eh?Absolute Shambollocks. 
Leaked Brexit memo: no single plan and Whitehall struggling to cope  
Labour's Shadow Chancellor doesn't want consideration given to Scotland. Labours Shadow Brexit Sec does. Chaos in HM Gov and HM Opposition.  
Brexit damps London office construction   
The road to Brexit  
The U.K. has no plan for Brexit, according to a leaked government memo  
Farage is now about the most influential politician in the UK. Winning Brexit on his terms has given him that accolade. #cliffedge 
Brexit-deniers continue their campaign to pretend Brexit isn't responsible for any bad news.  
Morning London. Most read story right now is: UK faces hefty Brexit bill as EU negotiators take tough stance  
Leaked memo: Govt has no clear plan for Brexit, PM micro-managing, Whitehall struggling to cope #brexitshambles  
So there was another leaked Brexit memo too, and all it said was:"Uh oh"  
Hundreds of extra projects, thousands of staff needed and no common exit strategy - leaked Brexit memo latest  
They don't even have a cunning plan. #Brexit  
The PM must not betray voters over her Cabinet's post-Brexit NHS funding promises  
Two unrelated things: 1/ Millionaire Brexit donor plans "Drain the Swamp Party". 2/ Brexit may mean 30,000 more civil servants. 
It's the Brexit vote that makes it vulnerable?! How about Scottish Gov't-owned white elephant unable to attract traffic?  
It's going to take 30K civil servants, £40 billion, and fifty million billion trillion days to Brexit. According to people who don't want it 
Ratings agency Moody's showing that independence protects Ireland from the full destructive #Brexit ! Time for #indyref2 
Bad news for leavers – the EU has bigger priorities than Brexit | Anand Menon  
No no no shrieks Theresa May, that bit of blank paper isn't our leaked Brexit plan. Ours had some doodles on 
The leaked Brexit memo reflects exactly what I've been told by civil servants & businesses  
Within a few months of the Brexit vote we have seen a total contradiction of the Treasury’s forecasts  
Plans are being discussed to protect European rights for people in Scotland. Hope UK Govt is listening. #Brexit  
Those who would deny Britons a public debate on Brexit are the real "enemies of the people"  
Laughable, Trump supporters comparing this to Brexit given Clinton handily won popular voteBesides @GlennF 
So @jeremycorbyn was right. Leaked memo confirms there is no plan for Brexit. 
Big news this morning: British Govt.has no plan for #Brexit !!! Surprise,surprise !!! 
so how much evidence do those who voted for #brexit need before they realise their colossal, self-harming mistake?  
The leaked Brexit memo has highlighted the Government's Brexit plan. This is what it looks like:-  
#BrexitClueless means clueless, with May & the 3 Brexiteers doing sterling service in pursuit of the unfathomable 
What do we need?More Brexit bureaucrats. When do we need them?Now.How do we pay for them?Er.  
"This memo says we need 30k civil servants,500 projects & 6 months""Yes, Minister""But Brexit means Brexit""Of course, Minister"#r4today 
Never say never - but the problems have not gone away because May shouted "Brexit means Brexit" at Tory conference to cheers.  
Nonsense; an outrageous smear. The plan is to go around saying "Brexit means Brexit" and "believing in Britain" until an election.  
No wonder Govt won't tell us what #Brexit plans are - they don't know what they're doing, are split & overwhelmed  
Trump is only one of Boris's rapid U-turns.After all scaremongering re Turkey in referendum,see what he's now saying  
Leaked memo shows Government's lack of Brexit plans  
Brexit memo says PM putting her Party's interests before the national interest: this isn't the leadership Britain needs at this crucial time  
TBH (& I'm not criticizing) a lot of Germans felt the same. For a long time. Then, they didn't. Propaganda works (see Brexit) 
England: Nothing can be more embarrassing than Brexit. America: Hold my beer.England: No, Hold MY beer.  
Leaked document reveals Tories have no plan for Brexit and a divided Cabinet  
No government plan for Brexit, memo reveals  
Italian spreads keep rising. Trump and referendum are triggers, not causes. The next eurozone crisis beckons. -  
Familiar. #Brexit all over again. How to hold tabloids and other liars accountable.  
Each deal takes on average 2 years to negotiate. Irony ofc is Gvt has to hire foreign workers to help manage complexity & challenges #Brexit 
BBC should stick to telling us the news not making itBBC Presenter Tells America Britons Regret Brexit  
Dodgy Dave the only man responsible for why GB gov has no plan for #Brexit - he never thought he'd lose!  
Leaked memo reveals government chaos and rising costs of #Brexit :  
When a memo leaked to the BBC reveals there is no plan for Brexit. Private Eye was way ahead of you of this guys.  
@BBCNews Brexit means one of those projects with no scope defined, no clear roles and no governance. They don't end well. 
'There is no plan' for Brexit, leaked memo says. Disaster. Disaster.   
Why the chuffing hell is @Nigel_Farage on the BBC again? Can they please stop giving him a platform? #Ukip #Brexit 
The leaked Brexit note was published in full in @thetimes The final paragraph is a killer 
If you read the actual Referendum Bill, the result is 'advisory, NOT mandatory! This whole thing is a farce! esp post Trump 
and when he said the referendum result was a victory for 'decent people'. Making his view of the rest of us very clear. 
Leaked Brexit memo: no single plan and Whitehall struggling to cope "Leaked" by pro EU civil service! Utter garbage   
Theresa May describes a need for global leaders to "make sense of the changing world"  
Cabinet Office memo confirms what we knew all along. Government has no plans for Brexit #shambolicbrexit  
Times: UK may need to hire 30,000 extra civil servants to achieve Brexit.  The European Commission employs 24,000  
May's Brexit strategy puts party interest above national interest, according to leaked memo. Just like Cameron...  
In Parliament tonight @ChukaUmunna will be holding the Leave campaign to account and demanding £350 mn extra per wk for the NHS, post Brexit 
The latest anti-Brexit leak in The Times, simply demonstrates that Sir Humphrey Appleby is alive and well & obstructing change in Whitehall. 
Leaked Cabinet Office memo seen by me - "There is no plan" for Brexit, 500+ projects, ministers divided, 30,000 extra civil servants needed. 
Leaked Whitehall memo confirms the government is rudderless and entirely motivated by self-interest on Brexit.  
Leaked memo reveals UK's worst-kept secret: divided government has no idea how to "make a success" of Brexit  
So HS2 will take about another 20 years and the government needs 50,000 more civil servants to even make a draft Brexit deal. 
Top Politics Tip: When a government says 'We're not telling you our plan, we're keeping it a secret', it's because IT HAS NO PLAN #Brexit 
Still hard to believe Tories could call a referendum with huge implications for UK with NO PLAN IF THEY LOST. Criminal irresponsibility. 
Leaked document reveals what we all suspected about Theresa May and Brexit  
Britain has 'no plan for Brexit' according to leaked memo  
Each morning the .@BBCr4today pushes an anti Trump anti May anti Brexit partisan narrative masquerading as "news". Toxic to listen to 
Brexit means...delay, confusion, costs, staff, disputes, turf wars, splits, argument, delays, oh, and Brexit  
Leaked Brexit memo: no single plan and Whitehall struggling to cope  
Tory austerity looks set to continue well into next decade - Stormont budgets will be hit hard once again #EndAusterity #BREXIT  
Tories struggling to stop Brexit from turning into Fuxit. 
For all the media nonsense about 'Brussels bureaucrats' note that we now need an 30k UK civil servants to deal with #Brexit  
To be completely fair, I have no plan for Brexit either aside from sitting in the corner gibbering quietly, so I have some empathy here. 
Brexit: cabinet has no single plan and Whitehall struggling to cope – memo  Confirmation of what we all knew. 
Studying foreign languages gains importance post-Brexit, survey suggests  
Two most damaging UK political acts of 21st centuryInvasion of IraqBrexit *with no plan whatsoever in place*Have brought UK to its knees 
Theresa May’s vision for post Brexit Britain is to be found in the 12th century  via @richardjmurphy 
#brexit There never was a plan, months after the ref there still is no plan, the Gov is simply focussed on its own survival #clownfest 
We're going to look pretty stupid over here with President Trump if Britain figures out a way to get out of Brexit. 
"Take back control" and ...hand it over to a racist, egomaniac with contempt for the Rule of Law.In a nutshell that's May's Brexit policy 
They saidBrexit would loseCorbyn would lose l'shipTrump would loseWHY believe when they saySanders would have lostCorbyn will lose GE? 
So, to recap:1There is still no plan. 2 Everyone is still making their own plans. 3 There is still no-one to implement the plan. #brexit  
2016 in a nutshell1) Du302) Brexit3) Marcos Burial4) Trump5) and now we have a new UP President that is an eUP apologist/PAEP crony 
"Californians to vote on secession; secessionist group qualifies #Calexit independence referendum for 2018 ballot" #Headlinesfor2017 
We in SNP knew no plan for #Brexit -now we have confirmation. I reckon #Brexit has at least 7 options, hence the cluster issue for UK Gov.  
UKIP doesn't make us right wing nor left wing We have supporters from a cross the spectrum It's just a name given by those who fear change 
'There is no plan' for Brexit, leaked memo says  
Look to China after Brexit, CBI advises UK universities:  
SNP challenged over 'meaningless' Brexit single market demand  
Crazy week for the @Brandseye team after predicting Brexit, now Trump. Featured on CNN this morning. Well done Team!!  
Brexit. Should it serve your country or the Conservative Party? Here's a leaked Cabinet Office memo (). 
FULL STEAM AHEAD FOR BREXIT: Blow for Remoaners as Labour to SNUB plot to thwart EU exit  
French "far-right" leaderLe Pen hails #Trump win#brexit#Trump2016#draintheswamp#MAGA #tiot#PJNET 
Ask around, it's because even perceived fascist countries are ugly:British tourism suffers post-Brexit slump  
With Trump, US Follows Brexit, Russia & China in Moving Away from “Urban-driven Globalism.” Gregor...  via @audioBoom 
.@NoceraNYT @NormOrnstein @neeratanden He didn't even know what Crimea was. Or Brexit. He didn't understand NATO. Those were the stories. 
It's Letting People With Uteruses Make Their Own Fucking Life Choices's Fault We Didn't Learn From Brexit 
Still no answer to why gov gave 50 million to corrupt Clinton foundation, gov need to be exposed, drain the uk swamp, May out, Get BREXIT 
U.K.’s bridge to Trump? Nigel Farage, who pushed ‘Brexit,’ posits himself  
"Responsible Nationalism" of NationStates reclaiming Europe from those who wish to erase her culture, way of life.#V4 #Austria #Brexit #CEE  
Is Brexit good for reform? Ex Offender "Shortz" from London Fields E8 Hackney decides to change his sexuality after coming out of prison. 
Trump should make overtures to Britain to dislodge any resistance to #Brexit; the NY Times says he already is ;) 
Theresa May addresses Trump and Brexit in Lord Mayor's banquet speech (but some guests couldn't stay awake)  
British PM: Brexit leader won't be 'third person' in U.S., UK relationship  
'Nazi controlled zone': Swastika graffiti & Nazi stickers appear across Britain in wake of #Brexit & #Trump victory  
Absolutely boycott all Pepsi productsIf you are Trumper or Brexit you have to see that these people are your enemy!  
TRUMP is right Climate Change is a Hoax Just another tax slapped on us mugs 
Obama’s FINAL INSULT to UK: Calls Merkel ‘closest ally’ and slams Brexit  
Lib Dem leader Tim Farron: What does Brexit mean? Once we know, the people must have a vote on it  
Britain may borrow an extra $125 billion as Brexit hits the economy, PwC says  
Govt to invest £15bn to 'future proof' economy over Brexit  
Whitehall 'struggling to cope with scale of work arising from Brexit vote'  
Home of 70 yr old 'Remain-Campaigner' Priest in NI is vandalised in sectarian attack on Remembrance Sunday#Brexit 
Political immaturity of the electorate – thoughtlessness in the use of a vote – this, more than anything, explains Brexit & Trump. 
Elton John is concerned about rising "hatred" in post-Brexit Britain:  
parallels to Brexit those who stayed home because they thought it wud not happen now regret it 
Former British PM Tony Blair cautions Canada not to follow anti-immigration path of Trump and Brexit:  
Brexit: the Lady's not for planning - Mrs May's government doesn't have a plan ...  #Brexit.  
Brexit plan is 'months away' as civil service needs 30,000 extra staff to cope with workload, according to leaked…  
Marine Le Pen calls Brexit and Trump's win a "global revolution" in controversial interview  
Post-truth #Brexit.  
Forget Trump & Brexit. Go see a feel good show about stickin' it to the man. #SchoolOfRock. An instant classic #dear 
Panto has started early! Baron Hard up, Boris Brexit,Theresa Might, Donald Trumped. You can't make this up. Comedy is a tragedy interrupted.  
Like Brexit wasn't bad enough!"UK gov decision to scrap the Human Rights Act could jeopardise peace in N Ireland" 
Trial of man accused of the dreadful murder of MP Jo Cox opens. The murder that was exploited by Project Fear to try & win the EU Referendum 
U.K. swap rates, which banks use to price their home loans, are the highest since Brexit  
I'd suggest people revisiting a post I sent in June re post-Brexit racist incidents suggests there are some uneasy consciences out there 
you know most Brits & most Christians hate your racism.  Most Brexit voters I know reject this racist abuse too 
Art Cashin On Trump Presidency, New World Order, Gold Brexit, Depression And Why We Will See Panic @KingWorldNews 
america after brexit: wow that's embarrassing... britain u goofed.... thank god WE would never be like that..... yikesamerica now:  
After Brexit, most searched term was, "what is the EU?"After Trump's win, one of the most searched terms? "Fascism" 
Evan Davis on @BBCNewsnight: Brexit, Trump, "the lunatics have taken over the asylum".  No, the wardens are now regaining control. 
We can't fix #Trump nor #Brexit,all we can do is fix the half arsed greedy amateurs that run Ireland for their own benefit#vinb #cblive 
like living on a council estate in Sunderland watching your Brexit vote subverted by millionaire Lefties in London  
BREXIT happened, Trump happened. Canada is not immune + apathy is not the answer. Please please please stay vocal + stand your ground.  
#TheresaMayhemAndTheTories #Brexit "plans" would have been rejected as too ridiculous even for a "Monty Python "skit 
Oh my. Leaked UK government memo: not enough time or staff to agree Brexit. Confirms there's no plan & economy is threatened. via @TheTimes. 
Tuesday's Independent:"Exclusive - British tourism suffers post-Brexit slump"#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Tuesday's Times:"Cabinet split threatens to derail May's Brexit talks"#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Trump needs to hire 4,000 for his new administration. UK government apparently needs 30,000 for Brexit  
Times report indicates the the UK machinery of government is close to grinding to a halt as Brexit overwhelms all else  
UK government has no idea how to implement Brexit. Will need to hire 30,000 extra civil servants to cope with it.  
This is why i voted to #LeaveEUlook at their faces ?#BrexitBritain #Juncker #Merkel #hollande #No2EU #EUspring #Brexit  
Weak Sterling does nothing to help tourism which slumps in wake of Brexit vote. Visitors shunning Brexit Britain.  
30,000 more civil servants needed to deliver #Brexit. 500 projects. Tough, grinding, grim stuff.  
Brexit means chaos. We are "considerably short" of a plan for Brexit - "no prioritisation and no link to the overall negotiation strategy".  
The people who drove Brexit & advised Trump on his campaign ( Brexit plus ) - Nigel campaigned for him on the US media fo months. That's who  
In Whitehall Brexit means... "well over 500 projects, which are beyond the capacity and ability of the Government to execute quickly".  
As each older leave voters dies, and as each young remainer has 18th birthday, Brexit becomes yesterday's choice. Tell that to your MP 
Ireland’s jobs minister likened UK’s Brexit stance to someone causing a divorce & seeking to keep all the assets.   
Key sentence of Times leak of Govt Brexit fiasco document. Even top civil servants cannot agree on what to ask for  
Who could've predicted that our super efficient civil service would struggle with a minor trifle like Brexit?  
Cameron not chillaxed over referendum, says former aid  
What Brexit? The UK just joined the new Europol intelligence-sharing programme  
.@AdamShawNY: How President Trump could save Brexit 
Tuesday's Times front page:Cabinet split threatens to derail May's Brexit talks#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Just like when not-so-bright British people googled "What is the European Union?" after voting for #Brexit.  
Good to see my arguments on #Article50 considered in latest UK Commons Law Library report #Brexit litigation @commonslibrary @bristolunilaw 
Trudeau, in French, just listed Brexit, the rise of right-wing nationalism, and the election of Trump in one breath... 
Dear #Brexit fans. Your ( & my ffs ) visa charges for travel to the EU are soon to be considered. Happy holidays!  
Think again, Jeremy. Support the majority who did not vote for brexit.  
Tomorrow's front page: Scotland's budget faces £3.3bn cut by 2020 unless UK Govt ditches austerity ... with Brexit set to make it even worse  
The presidential election was a referendum on gender—and women lost  
.@theresa_may says "change is in the air" after #Brexit and #Trump and politicians must respond 
Papers @SkyNews 1030 with @Kevin_Maguire in denial over Trump just as he is over Brexit & the failures of Comrade Corbyn 
Britain has to stay in the EU to stop Trump interfering in a vulnerable #Brexit Britain's domestic politics.#Remain #YesEU 
After the Eurocrisis, Ukraine crisis, refugee crisis, & Brexit, EU now cld face a US admin that is actively promoting disintegration. 
Obama's parting insult to UK: Outgoing leader calls Merkel 'closest ally' and slams Brexit  
And between these two interviews he lied all the way through the EU referendum. His reward?: made Foreign Secretary. #TheShameOfBritain 
The Prime Minister is here at @GuildhallLondon speaking about how business can advance society and better communities & her views on #Brexit 
EU Parliament to discuss @CharlesGoerens "European associate citizenship" idea for post Brexit Brits, who want it...  
No confidence vote called to stop @theresa_may and her #brexit plans. If opposition unites jneed 9 tory MPs to agree this is wrong for UK  
Latest Italy referendum poll from EMG: No +4.3%; So Yes is guarranteed 
'BBC reporter tells America Britons regret Brexit'.No, we regret the #BBC & its..bias..pandering to anything anti-UK..enforced #tvtax 
Please remember: POC in America are presently living in a country that has held a referendum on their basic humanity, and voted against it. 
UK minister Liam Fox threat—if UK hasn't full access to EU market after Brexit, EU will be sued by...South Korea! pic.twitter.com/zt61Hk19Mm 
"UK’s Brexit stance - causing a divorce and then seeking to keep the marital home and all the assets"  
'Nazi controlled zone': Swastika graffiti & Nazi stickers appear across Britain in wake of #Brexit & #Trump victory  
Read and retweet- a small article highlighting a huge risk for the EU in denying UK free trade #brexit  
Tuesday's Independent digital front page:Exclusive - British tourism suffers post-Brexit slump#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Brexit voters were not motivated by xenophobia. 77% of them think EU nationals living here must be allowed to stay.  
Some basic data on Brexit: pic.twitter.com/Ny2gOCsOXv 
Just finished Bad Boys of Brexit. A very funny read that brings back all the memories. @LeaveEUOfficial 
As in #Brexit Britain, narrow-minded old people doing their worst to wreck the lives of the young.  
'More than 80 MPs' call for second Brexit referendum-this won't be enough so lobby your MPs and get them on board  
relentless rubbishing of #uselection #eu referendum outcomes by media shows how out of touch they are with the mood of ppl.  
Frankfurt woos the biggest U.S. banks to give them a post-Brexit home away from London to remain in EU single market 
France will 'definitely' close UK border at Calais after Brexit, politician claims  
Plan under which Britons will face a £10 charge to travel to EU after Brexit is to be discussed by interior ministers. Thanks, Brexit morons 
Our struggle is no longer just against #Brexit, it is a struggle to defend democracy itself.  #Remain #YesEU #StopFundingHate 
Do not allow the normalisation of #Brexit talk. Brexit is a lunacy, a deeply damaging, divisive & absurd idea. We are in the EU & must stay. 
Between Brexit and Trump, I may never have to take responsibility for anything again. 
You’ll Only Understand Trump & Brexit If You Understand the Failure of Globalization  @WashingtonsBlog #Trump #Brexit  
Important UK decision to opt-in to Europol Regulation - following earlier post-referendum opt-in to cross-border family law proposal  
Deporting illegal criminals is the essence of a responsible Government The EU has made sure we CAN'T do this in the UK. #Brexit changes this 
If #brexit deal turns out 2be disaster 4UK,many ppl will demand right to reconsider. @UKLabour shldn't rule it out! 
Brexit: Liam Fox 'acting like a husband who wants to divorce his wife but keep all the assets', says Irish minister  
Brits could pay to enter Europe after Brexit  
…increasingly feel (post-Brexit & post-Trump) that scis need to think more abt the social change bit—i.e. consequences & impact 3/n #case30 
BBC Presenter Tells America Britons Regret Brexit  
The only #EUrefstats that matter are 17,410,742 voted to #LeaveEU#Brexit #BrexitBritain #OpenBritain #No2EU #VoteLeave 
#Italy and #Portugal are indeed in deep economic s**t.UK better #Brexit before we drown together with the #EU. 
President Erdogan signals referendum in 2017 on EU accession process 
Left-wing parties across Europe are telling Jeremy Corbyn to block Brexit  via @BIUK_Politics 
Response of #Merkel, EU bureaucracy to outcomes of     plebiscites in great democracies is lamentable #Brexit #USA 
In his speech today, Erdogan accused the EU of supporting terrorism and signaled a referendum to end membership negotiations in 2017.  
EU countries' own interests—curbing far-right populists & ensuring EU stability—take precedence dealing over Brexit 
Brexit: Irish minister says UK trying to 'divorce and keep all the assets'Brexiteers won't have & eat EU cake 
#Erdogan announced today #Turkey's version of Brexit, opting out without opting in, called for a referendum on EU accession by the year end  
"A lesson from London for New York" @mjrharris on Brexit and Trump  
Brexit: Irish minister says UK trying to 'divorce and keep all the assets'  
After Brexit and Trump, here are the next 5 dominoes at risk in Europe  
'The Bad Boys of Brexit' may be the most homoerotically-charged book I've ever read. And that's a high bar tbh.  
So much for taking control + exerting more global influence, UK foreign policy since #Brexit vote is direction-less.  
LISTEN: @Nigel_Farage talks to LBC about his Trump meeting, May's snub, LePen, Stephen Bannon & Post Brexit racism  
The single most important difference between Brexit and Trump:  
The audacity of it! Ex-PM Cameron ‘paid £120,000’ for 1hr speech on Brexit  
Norway in close dialogue w/EU on #Brexit. - Important to consult #EEA partners, says Minister Vik Aspaker to chief negotiator @MichelBarnier 
See what happened when change Britain put leavers and remainers together to talk about the referendum...  
ALT-RIGHT: ‘Trump and Brexit victories the fault of leftwingers calling racists racist and tweeting Daily Mash articles’ say blameless media 
Bad news for leavers – the EU has bigger priorities than Brexit | Anand Menon  
Scottish chef Gordon Ramsay switches Brexit stance to now support EU departure  
"Brexit probably won't happen""Trump probably won't be elected"  
Reading " The bad boys of Brexit " and LOVING it what comes across more than anything is the passion and dedication to get the leave vote :)  
Brexit: Liam Fox 'acting like a husband who wants to divorce his wife but keep all the assets', says Irish minister  
Brexit and the EU Court - our latest briefing  
Leavers should have to obtain work permits to live and work in other counties.(not a typo). #Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
Brexit Towers? Once Davis, Fox and Johnson are inside we should throw away the key. 
Brexit and Trump invite comparisons to a phenomenon that defined the early 1930s: deglobalization.  
Thank you. Rubbish about the North responsible for  this. The shires sealed the deal.#Brexit  
We were warned about this, but it was dismissed as scare-mongering.  #Brexit #Ukip 
We've got a full house for our event on the use of statistics in the EU referendum - follow the debate with #EURefStats 
Calais border will DEFINITELY move to England & it's a "consequence" of #Brexit - French president hopeful  
#Brexit could trigger a big jobs and trade boost for UK ports - a new report suggests  
Many Brexiters don't give a damn that Britons will loose the right to live & work in the EU. Hardly loyal or patriotic.#Remain #Brexit 
Cool, my twitter account is worth $26k! In post-Brexit prices, that's a cool £4.60. Might buy myself a trifle from the Co-Op  
BREXIT: Right, so, some of this IS happening but if you acknowledge it you’re a doom-monger? Is that right?  
Brexit takes a hard right to fascism   
This one graph, from @davidautor's data on change in middle skill jobs employment, explains Trump, Brexit and more. 
Pick and mix gathers pace: Government opts to stay in Europol (EU law enforcement agency) where are the BREXIT squeals of protest?! 
Nigel Farage says reports of hate crimes in UK post-Brexit have been "exaggerated by a group of people who can’t accept the result" 
Brexit may have cost Britain $82 billion in lost company spending  
Cameron was apparently paid £120k for 1 hour speech on #Brexit -  that's about £33 a second  
So it's out of the EU and now into Europol - the government don't know if they are coming or going on #Brexit 
Farage tells LBC: “The Trump team saw Brexit as their inspiration, as the message to put out to ordinary Americans"  
It might be Brexit, it might be Trump ... they are both evidence of the "left behind" the "disconnected" wanting big change 
Nigel Farage confirms the PAID #TrumpRioters are THE SAME rioters they had in England for #Brexit#Trump2016 #MAGA 
Dear #Brexit fans. So it goes on. You're playing a blinder in encouraging business migration. Outwards.  
Scotland/Poland relationship long + strong - pleasure meeting @ArkadyRzegocki @PolishEmbassyUK discussing links + Scottish view on #brexit  
Britain FM @BorisJohnson who furiously campaigned #Brexit on dangers of Turkey's EU membership now advocates Turkey EU membership? #vile @FT 
Good news. But the Government must aim for continued operational co-ordination with Europe post-#brexit  
Brexit disaster continues.  
Looking fwd to hosting post-Brexit hate crime event on Weds with @HackneyAbbott @NickCohen4 @Steven_Woolfe @DavidTCDavies @DawnButlerBrent 
Investment Update: @thenutmegteam have raised £30m, the largest fintech raise since Brexit. Congratulations to the team!  
'Opt-in' means UK will remain full member of @Europol after revised regs take effect May 2017 and until Brexit. Important decision 
Give us a break. The world's going to shit: Brexit, Trump and all the deaths. At least let us drink affordably. pic.twitter.com/lIqxTmc00j 
Whole thing gets more Brexit-like every day.  
#Brexit will deprive ordinary Britons of their right to live & work in 27 countries, but doubtless the rich & powerful will be unaffected. 
Irish views on Brexit Ministers leaked, including Liam Fox threats.  
Funny how youth are blamed for so much when we're the ones trying to promote pluralism, staying together, & progress.#Brexit#Election2016 
Yes I did Slam the Mansplaining "Downton Abbey" Lord Baron Brexit :)- VIDEO - The Reykjavik Grapevine  
Bought cupcakes that expired a month ago. Fucking Brexit 
Companies have delayed or halted £65 billion of investments since Brexit vote:Via @business pic.twitter.com/VPKqD7dgWA 
Aaron Banks, billionaire #Brexit paymaster, wants to 'drain the swamp' of Parliament- of those whose views he doesn't like? 
EU to discuss plan to charge Britons to visit Europe after Brexit—to apply online and pay to travel#BrexitMeansOut 
12 medical colleges + @TheBMA ask gov. to take adv. of #Brexit in fight against microbial resistance in agriculture 
Brexit—decisions to be made by a PM pretending somehow to channel the will of the people by intuition alone. pic.twitter.com/FVDNyasY0F 
Here's your long take: #Trump, #Brexit and #Milosevic as the specter haunting us all. Entertain the unthinkable. 
Times today p 18 (p 18 note!) - 'Brexit drives firms to ditch £65billion of investment.' These are British firms: &what about overseas ones? 
So, Govt to remain in EU crime-fighting body for next 2 years - gives UK time to work out shape of law-enforcement landscape post-Brexit 
Frankfurt is stepping up efforts to win financial jobs from London after Brexit  
Times today:p2: 'Britons would have to pay a fee to visit Europe after Brexit' - 
Techno DJ plays tune with a DNB section in it, purists up in arms #brexit 
From new @commonslibrary paper on Brexit. Will the Supreme Court really proceed on a premise many think is bunkum ()? 
Pleasure to host Scottish Cabinet Secretary for External Affairs @FionaHyslop. Great discussion on #PolesinUK and Scottish views on #Brexit.  
What do Brexit and @realDonaldTrump's victory have in common? Countries that do little to help workers find new jobs  
THE EU IS A STATE OF MIND & I'VE ALREADY LEFT.#UKIP #Brexit #Article50 #LeaveEU #VoteLeave 
'What part of LEAVE don't you understand?' Farage DESTROYS Brexit court ruling campaigner  
This thought makes me happy. We could just stay in the EU. All it needs is @rupertmurdoch to tell @theresa_may to forget about #Brexit.  
MAY IS NOT FOR TURNING: Furious PM orders MPs and peers to accept will of British people 
So, now Djokovic is also an arsehole for the British press. Brexit apparently bringing out a lot of frustrations.  
After a brief spell during which wages have been rising faster than prices, #Brexit is going to start making Britons poorer again.#Remain 
Nearly half of Londoners under-18 depressed about post-Brexit futures  
Free Ports would fill the sails of the post-Brexit economy  via @telegraphnews 
Now this is a neat suggestion for Brits who value European citizenship. From @CharlesGoerens  #Brexit 
Confidential memo reveals Irish view of UK Brexit ministers #brexit via @IrishTimes 
everyone I know who voted leave here in Blackpool is delighted with Brexit and I know a number of remainers who have switched. 
BBC presenter @KattyKayBBC gets caught spreading Remoaner lies about Brexit to the American media. Naughty Katty! 
Losing euro-denominated clearing would cost London 83,000 jobs #Brexit - working hard to make Britain poorer#Remain 
View from top of Gherkin building appropriately cloudy as I talk on the murky implications of #brexit for the Finance sector & its workers  
Even if they bring the most destructive Brexit, we can still stay EU citizens. Individual choice. Pay-to-play. YES! 
The presidential election was a referendum on gender, and women lost.  
Using Nigel Farage as a 'go between' will not only help the US / UK relationship but also send out a strong message, #Brexit means Brexit 
Christoph Waltz was asked about Brexit and Donald Trump, and he nailed it both times               
Referendum Voting is now open! Learn more about what you’re voting on with the attached info graphics. Vote here:  
Renzi to engage in brinkmanship: #Italy's PM suggests he may not stay on if Dec referendum fails. Mkts not amused.  
Young, British & living in Europe – Brexit has turned our lives upside down #Brexit - Stealing our Freedom#YesEU 
Turkey could put EU talks to a referendum next year: Erdogan  
Sadiq Khan and David Davis to hold monthly meetings on Brexit negotiations. 
'I don't like it here at the moment' - Elton John is concerned about rising hatred in post-Brexit Britain:  
Interesting: We knew that UK had decided to skip the EU anti-Trump meeting, but so has France !#Brexit #Article50 
MPs who campaigned to remain should work together now to make Brexit a success:  #Brexit #ChangeBritain 
Just a third of voters tell ICM that they’re happy with “unconditional BREXIT” with the young most opposed  
New report shows that British ports would be liberated by quitting the customs union:  #Brexit #ChangeBritain 
Frankfurt is wooing the biggest U.S. banks to try to lure jobs from London  
#EUmembership must matter: Oped by our Director Brigid Laffan today on @EurActiv #Brexit @EuropeanUni @anandMenon1 
Latest poll on Catalan independence ahead of September 2017 referendum:In favour 46,6%Against   33,8%Wouldn't vote 14,4%  
Turkey could put EU talks to a referendum next year: Erdogan  
We the plebs are fighting back! Politics will never be the same after Trump & BrexitPod one  
Economic frustration has spawned Trump and Brexit, warns UN labour chief  
Two-thirds of British voters oppose a ‘blind-date Brexit’.  
A Trump/Brexit reading list compiled by anthropologists/ethnographers  
The Government has a democratic mandate to take Britain out of the EU #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
UK borrowing costs hit highest since Brexit vote  
BREAKING: Turkish leader Erdogan suggests referendum on future of Turkey's European Union bid as ties worsen. 
Today's Morning Call: no, Trump is not an opportunity for Britain after Brexit. He's a disaster:   
No more of this No postal votes for #indyref2Scottish referendum: Police assess postal vote allegations - BBC News  
WATCH: Rishi Sunak's great response to @ChukaUmunna , where he explains how British free trade could benefit from Brexit. @Daily_politics 
RETWEET: Politicians should get on with it! #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
#Brexit was never going to be cheap...  
#Leave was a vote for a bunch for completely incompatible alternatives, none of which have majority support. #Brexit #Remain #YesEU 
NYC- I saw this show in London. It's excellent. It's about Brexit but somehow I feel like the themes might translate.  
Brexit, Erdogan, Putin and now Trump. Something is rotten in the state of democracy.  
You forgot 'despite Brexit'.  
'UK businesses have delayed or abandoned £65 billion of investment since the Brexit vote'  
Fixing the UK was always going to have more than one phase.Phase 1 was BrexitPhase 2 is draining the swamp in Westminster! 
2016 was the year that the BBC interviewed this man about Brexit without mentioning his swastika tattoo.  
#Brexit democracy: the people can speak once, and once only, to express “their will.”Further speaking undermines the will of the people 
God help us. Now even those who supported Leave saying government approach to Brexit is dysfunctional...  
If their is any money saved from brexit in future it will go to millionaires in tax cuts. tories always looks after their own first.  #bbcdp 
Goldman: "we reiterate our view that the fall-out from Brexit will be extensive and maintain year-end target for GBP/$ of 1.20" 
So we should just lie back and think of Brexit?  
Miles Jacobson goes through the planning that went into Brexit being a part of #FM17:  
#bbcdp These Labour politicians stopped listening to the people years ago. Is it any wonder the people now no longer listen to them? #Brexit 
Those of us who support the Beeb need to criticise where it's getting it wrong. It was so timid in Brexit campaign it didn't call out lies. 
Think the left has the smarts to unite post Brexit/Trump? Look at Richmond byelection. Goldsmith will win cos Lab running against Libs. Dumb 
Trump useful to Brexit narrative. Quick deal with US would be at best worthless, at worst detrimental to UK interests, but vital PR boost.  
Business investments worth £65.5bn abandoned after Brexit vote  
Brexit Britain means huge global opportunities. One of the first places the UK should start is in the US with @realDonaldTrump. 
Christoph Waltz was asked about Brexit and Donald Trump, and he nailed it both times              
Now the #brexit Tories want cities to end European Capital of Culture bids. What a petty minded idea. We must stop this UK isolationism  
Brexit. Trump. Dab.  
Just 28% of Trump voters say immigration was one of three best reasons to vote for him according to @DemCorps. V different to brexit.  
Looks like that Brexit £350m will have to go towards a new server...#nhsmail 
BBC now resort to just outright lies as this woman says we regret voting brexit - what utter bollocks - BBC - B ollocks B y C***  
Happy Brexmas! The impact of #Brexit on the UK's Christmas markets  
Moscow is funding Europe's extreme right #Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
Even now after a democratic referendum the hardened remainers still refuse to accept #Brexit result, as Nick Clegg calls for an EU army.  
Sir Elton John claims Brexit has led to 'meanness' and 'hatred' surfacing in the UK  
. @DavidDavisMP is visiting @LondonCityAir today to discuss #brexit with industry leaders  
Only 33% of British voters support Brexit unconditionally. 32% said it depends on the terms, ICM poll found  
I have spoken to many local business owners in #RichmondPark with concerns about their future, it is clear Brexit makes investment risky  
Christoph Waltz was asked about Brexit and Donald Trump, and he nailed it both times           
2016 so far...Leicester win Premier LeagueBrexit Trump becomes PresidentIago Aspas named La Liga player of the month for October  
WATCH: BBC Presenter @KattyKayBBC Tells US TV That Britons Regret Brexit [VIDEO]  
Should Nicola Sturgeon call another Scottish Independence Referendum within the next two years? 
The first faltering steps towards a Brexit pizza. The plan, eventually, is to replace the base with mash.  
'Our patience has its limits! Let's see what the people will say' - Erdogan on possible 'joining EU' referendum  
The reality of hard Brexit in the shops  
MS recommends shorting #Italy's govt bonds (BTPs) as probability of Yes victory at Dec referendum has dropped to 35%, but risk not priced in  
British citizens could get to opt in to keep their EU citizenship after Brexit 
UK urged to follow Trumps vow to deport illegal immigrants!#Trump2016 #UK #Brexit #TrumpPresident #BuildTheWall 
Brexit. Leicester. Trump.  
SPECTATOR MONEY: We’re in a post-Brexit building boom  
#Brexit could trigger a big jobs and trade boost for UK ports - a new report suggests  
I think we can all agree, just like Brexit, the worst thing about Trump's victory is all the extra Jonathan Pie videos we'll be getting. 
What a clever way to dodge the question, Senator. If you were to vote in the referendum, what would you vote for?  
Just look at Trump and realise that that's what the Farage #AltRight want to do to the United Kingdom post Brexit. Be scared. Be very scared 
What will Brexit mean for Britain’s world-class universities?  
Christoph Waltz was asked about Brexit and Donald Trump, and he nailed it both times           
Brexit Britain should lead the way by banning mass #antibiotic use in farming, say top doctors  
A video games company spent more time planning for Brexit than the leave campaign. Outstanding.  
We planned for Brexit at Football Manager. So why did no one else? | Miles Jacobson  
Post Brexit, should Britain be hammering at Trump's door asking for great trade deals with the US? Former trade minister @Digbylj thinks so! 
#Migration #Brexit #YouthUnemployment #Turkey #Enlargement featured highly in discussion with #COSAC delegates on #EU2016SK 
The Brexit and Trump vote are victories for stupidity and gullibility. 
Companies have delayed or halted £65 billion of investments since Brexit vote, survey says  
It's looking like the majority of promises that were made to get the far-right to vote for Brexit and Trump will be broken. 
We have what the US doesn't have - the chance to say No & turn things round re #Brexit. Many in US would love to do the same re Trump - 
Brexit Leader @Nigel_Farage: 2016 Is the Year of Political Revolution @ffweekend  
Good piece. At Euro 2016 Cesc Fabregas spoke intelligently about Brexit while English players refused to discuss their darts tournament.  
Bond markets bracing for #Italy's referendum, Italian spread at the highest level in over two years.  
Mirky and mucky on the North Sea today. Watch  @skynews at 10 for my latest report from the 'Brexit Trawler'  
I'm going to take the Brexit and Trump approach to my job from now. I'll just say that I'm great and when asked for proof I'll just laugh. 
Struggling with fact that some on the left answer Trump/Brexit by embracing nationalism. Nationalism is the poison that enables Trump/Brexit 
3. Trump/Brexit voters - don't try to justify what you've done by blaming it on someone else. Take responsibility for your own actions. 
2. "The liberal elite made me vote for Trump/Brexit" - the excuse of someone who knows they are wrong & shifts the blame onto the victim. 
The vast majority of voters don't want the government to have a free rein on hard Brexit 
1. Those who disagree with Trump & Brexit are not to blame for their success. Those who vote for them are. 
Brexit could trigger big jobs and trade boost for UK ports - Sky News  
Theresa May says Brexit gives Britain an 'historic chance' to give leadership to world 
Can #Renzi survive amidst the right &  left's referendum pincer movement? 6 mos ago u didn't see graffitti like this in #Bologna. 
The hysterical reaction to Brexit and Trump’s win mark 2016 as the year of the Great Triggering. Revealing and humiliating. #IVoteAgainstYou 
Busy day planned meeting with #Brexit committee of French Assemblee Nationale & @ScotParl EU committee to raise issues re #ScotlandInEurope 
Theresa May says Britain will be 'unashamedly pro-business' after Brexit  
Christoph Waltz was asked about Brexit and Donald Trump, and nailed it both times         
£65bn divided by 52 equals £1.25bn lost per week since Brexit vote. That's 3 and a half times more than the £350m a week membership fee.  
This morning 's news full of dire consequences of #brexit vote:  
#Brexit vote drives firms to ditch £65bn of investment.Living standards to fall sharply in 2017#Remain #YesEU 
Brexit will allow for of a wave of new job-creating “Free Ports” - @CPSThinkTank Director @TimkCPS on @BrexitCentral 
Last night @Nigel_Farage talked with Judge Jeanine Pirro about Brexit and Trump. She's much smarter than our anti-Brexit judges!  
Since this seems to be the shitty new excuse for why people voted Brexit/Trump pic.twitter.com/S4Wq1oKSd4 
I had a fiver on leicester, brexit & trump to win, but put it with pigs to go up last season. Best £12.5 million ive ever lost!!!! 
Like it or not (and most don’t), we are heading for a hard Brexit  
British businesses have abandoned investment plans worth over £65bn since Brexit vote  
"Brexit meets Trumpism: the malign new force spanning the Atlantic". It's very good to have @MatthewdAncona back 
Why Britain's strong economy could be bad news for Brexit  via @BV 
As Bulgaria & Moldova choose proRussian presidents, now eyes on Italy referendum & elections in Austria, France & the Netherlands. @akhbar 
What is the future for farm subsidies post Brexit?Extremely balance Editorial in @thetimes 12.11.16 
Will President Trump be a problem or an opportunity - plus Monday's other Brexit news   
Some people in my TL have from Brexit supporters, to Trump excusers, to Le Pen excusers with breakneck speed. Genuinely scary. 
£120,000 for one hour talking about Brexit.  That equals one woman's state pension for 14 years  @David_Cameron  You & George have no idea. 
Exclusive inside story of Farage's Trump coup, drawing from the book I edited for @Arron_banks "Bad Boys of Brexit"   
Brexit could trigger big jobs and trade boost for UK ports  
Tim Knox: Brexit will allow for the creation of a wave of job-creating British “Free Ports”  
Brexit meets Trumpism: the malign new force spanning the Atlantic | Matthew d’Ancona  
They promised £350m extra per week for the NHS from Brexit, now they must #ShowUsTheMoney 
This election is a referendum on hate  
Someone out there's sitting on the third stage of a. BREXIT-TRUMP-BALLS accumulator aren't they? 
Brexit Britain should lead the way by banning mass antibiotic use in agriculture, says top doctors 
'A historic opportunity' Brexit Britain will step up to new global role, says Theresa May  
Thanks to Brexit, the UK now has a voice in the world. How refreshing that @theresa_may is making it a voice for free trade & free markets. 
Most Politicians here are trying dismiss Nigel Farage influence and popularity in politics and would wish they are half as popular as he is 
Can we stop history from repeating? One of best articles I've read yet re Trump Brexit and perils of new world order  
After Brexit, tolerant Britons adopted a simple symbol of solidarity. We should, too.  #safetypin 
“History tells us what may happen next with Brexit & Trump” by Tobias Stone  
Hard Brexit ‘will open up bigger disability rights gap’ than a softer EU exit, says disabled law expert...  
Every Hurriyat leader wants lasting peace in occupied #Kashmir that could be possible after fair referendum with Justice #FreeKashmir 
Marine Le Pen, Geert Wilders surf the anti-globalist wave after Brexit, Trump victory  
Theresa May urged to create 'free ports' across Brexit Britain to create nearly 90,000 jobs & boost trade - @TheSun 
Brexit blamed for rise in student ‘no-shows’ at business schools  
Toblerone swears this perfect metaphor for Brexit has nothing to do with Brexit  
Losing #euro clearing would cost London 83,000 jobs: EY report  #Brexit 
Labour's strategy makes no sense. Without a second Referendum Parliament can't enforce controls on the Government (). 
Brexit, Erdogan, Putin and now Trump. Something is rotten in the state of democracy.  
Brexit 2.0  
Early wheels up for London. @bbcworldservice townhall debate on #Brexit tonight. Surely a lively debate. 
This is America's Brexit. Only much worse:  
21st Century so far:-Bush via SCOTUS-9/11-Iraq War-Great Recession-Obama-Arab Spring, Brexit-Rise of tech, income inequality-Trump 
Skynews just called Nigel Farage a Far right leader I'd like to know when That happened 
U.K. satirist goes on passionate rant blaming the left for Trump victory, Brexit in viral video  
Brexit may have cost Britain $82 billion in lost company spending  
As my son observed: "same as Brexit, my generation got screwed  by yours."  
This is the one parallel with Brexit.  
A $17 billion investment bank pulled every penny out of Britain because of Brexit vote  
This has to be one of my favorite pictures EVER! @realDonaldTrump @Nigel_Farage #Brexit #brexit #60Minutes #Trumplandslide #ImWithHim 
In post-Brexit Britain our elected MPs are painted as the enemy literally for trying to find out what the government is doing. Heads up, US. 
NEW REPORT: Brexit provides a new trade opportunity for Britain: the creation of Free Ports, writes Rishi Sunak MP  
Marketing's Brexit "survivors" say Trump win shows people are sick of being told how to think  
With what is happening here & w/ #Brexit, my favorite new couple is UK's Prince Harry & his American girlfriend Meghan Markle. #FURacists 
What a year of impossibilities. Brexit. Cubs. Trump. I get first buck at almost 42.  
when vampire weekend says that 2016 is the year of new music and trump gets elected, bowie dies, and brexit happens n theres nothin new out  
Every time I type breitbart it wants to autocorrect it to brexit art  
Brexit: the limits of similarity - differences between the referendum and the US election ...  #Brexit.  
After #Trump and #Brexit, is Asia next on the anti-establishment hitlist? #ThisWeekInAsia  
A Sunday #Justice w @JasonMillerinDC as well as Nigel Farage, the man behind Brexit, on his mtg w @realDonaldTrump Join me @ 9PM EST!! 
Brexit Leader @Nigel_Farage: U.S. & U.K. Relations Can Improve Under President Trump @TeamCavuto @realDonaldTrump  
To those who voted #Brexit: It's your fault this dickhead is now considered a hero in #Trump's US. Thanks a f*cking lot.#USElections2016 
Ahhh "Brexit Part Deux" "We didn't think it would pass, we just wanted to send a message"  
UK construction churned out its weakest performance for four years in the first three months after the Brexit vote.  
Brexit vote drives firms to ditch £65bn of investment  
A message to the citizens of Earth:We must continue our fight against globalism so we the people can reclaim our great planet #MAGA #Brexit  
Only 8% of LGBT teens feel schools are safe despite marriage referendum result  
The Brexit Effect - Happy New Year!"Wages look set to fall next year" 
Re-tweet ...if you think its Game Over for the #EuropeanUnion#No2EU #Brexit #EUspring #Juncker #LeaveEU #EUCrisis #LoveEuropeLeaveEU 
Brexit Britain should lead the way by banning mass antibiotic use in agriculture, says top doctors  
Brexit vote had negligible impact on advertising, says WPP  
Brexit. It's still a mystery, an enigma, a flakey, confused vision of a future imperfect  
Historical trends warn us to be wary of the rise of Trump and Brexit  
Just like Brexit. Let's hope the young have their day again soon and reverse the tide. 
The EU may see Brexit's impact on its bottom line when officials tackle the budget this week  
#ImACeleb With a much more British lineup than usual and Iceland no longer sponsoring the show #brexit has hit it hard. 
Parliament is debating Brexit all the time, says @johnredwood. Gov will repeal the 1972 Act; it's nothing to do with the Supreme Court 
With Brexit, Trump, Le Pen and the overall rise of right wing populism - the left need to adapt, fast.  
Nigel Farage was probably the only British politician who expected Mr Trump to win & brexit to happen. UK's most forward thinking politician 
. @BBCNews needs its remit changed from 'balance' to the relentless and unflinching pursuit of the truth.#Brexit #Remain #StopFundingHate 
Italy, Constitutional Referendum, Index poll:Yes: 48% (nc)No: 52% (nc)#ReferendumCostituzionale 
A free press would express a diversity of opinions. Most of Britain's press speaks with one monotonous far right voice.#Remain #Brexit 
British Election Study asked do you regret Brexit vote?1% of Remain yes - 6% of Leave said yes.  via @anthonyjwells 
Britisher mulls over UK's decline after Brexit. Wakes up in America.  
Hitler sent thugs to break up opposition meetings. The British right wing simply uses the press to drown out opposition.#Remain #Brexit 
#skypapers Another Remoaner on Susie Boniface ,slagging off Brexit Trump Farage all she ever talks about get some proper paper reviewers on 
After Trump and Brexit, will populist uprisings now be repeated across Europe? 
#ImACeleb is to the US election, what @LoveIsland was to Brexit. Fun times! 
iPhone just autocorrected Breitbart to Brexit Art 
#Brexit & #Trump provide a strong rebuke to major parties that cling to the trickle-down agenda #auspol  
Sunday night fear anyone? - History Tells Us What Will Happen Next With Brexit And Trump  # via @HuffPostPol 
Trump’s election reinforces the need for Britain to turn against Brexit  
YOU'RE HIRED! YOU WILL FLIP WHEN YOU SEE THE JOB TRUMP JUST GAVE MR BREXIT  
But a 'Pro-EU Alliance' can give UK a better future within the EU. Two-thirds of voters oppose a ‘blind-date Brexit’  
Brexit and the Trump campaign were seemingly conjoined from the moment the UK voted to leave the European Union.  
Naughty, naughty @KattyKayBBC told @MeetThePress that Brits regret voting for #Brexit. No evidence for that  
NEXT UP: the end of the #EU.Dec referendum Italy, Elections 2017 France & Holland.Free Europe! #Brexit & #DrainTheSwamp#Frexit #Nexit 
Brexit by values.  Very interesting read 
biggest let downs to this year -  - hiddleswift - tom hiddleston shaved his beard- brexit - tom shaved - donald trump- tOM SHAVED HI 
BREXIT FROM THE USA. Join us in the UK this December as we enjoy some American pastimes  All tickets available at  
"We export more to Belgium at the moment than we do to India, Russia Brazil and South Africa combined" … #Brexit FFS 
Wow. Brilliant. The left& Hillary lost it & Brexit. He's spot on. Spend 6 minutes of your life and listen. Stop labelling people.   
Italy, Constitutional Referendum, Winpoll poll:Yes: 48% (+1)No: 53% (nc)#ReferendumCostituzionale 
Elton John talks homophobia, Brexit Britain and how #photography became his second greatest passion: 
1) PM says MPs should make up own minds over Brexit. 2) 70% of public  may not want Brexit.   
For the record, at the Battle of Ideas event in London a few weeks ago, John Waters predicted a Trump win. He also predicted Brexit. 
AFTER BREXIT AND TRUMP, IF HONEY G WINS #XFactor. 2016 NEEDS TO BE FORGOTTEN ABOUT IN EVERY HISTORY BOOK 
Super conversation with a #Tory in Richmond, who is voting for @sarahjolney1 @LibDems because he is worried by damage from #Brexit 
if people can vote for brexit and trump then I wont be surprised if they voted for honey g and she ends up winning #XFactor 
#XFACTOR: “First you ignore them, then you ridicule them, then they win” - Honey G fans say she’s following in the path of Trump and Brexit. 
The Economist is right....Why Parliament must shape Brexit.  
Christoph Waltz was asked about Brexit and Donald Trump, and nailed it both times       
If Brexit & the Presidential Election are anything to judge people's voting skills by, then Honey G has got XFactor in the bag. 
The only thing #borisjohnson will ever vigorously defend are his perks that come from being part of the 1%   #brexit 
Even the FT finally gets the message. The UK Climate Change Act has been a complete disaster & #Brexit opens the door to ditching it:-  
The more I ponder it, the more convinced I am @theresa_may now has a phenomenally strong hand to play over Brexit deal making 
"It's time the British Government announced its intention to hold a Unity Referendum."- Megan Fearon MLA #UnityRef  
Just like #Brexit the vote for #Trump was a great big F..k Off! to all #celebs who think they can meddle … #politics  
Parliament must save us from #brexit , said Polly Toynbee, even before #Trump made matters worse: 
On this #RemembranceSunday we should make the point that all those sacrifices were made so that people of today could choose #Brexit 
Oh look @Telegraph the Brexit you pushed threatens UK airlines in exactly the way we said it would. #brexitshambles 
At yesterday's #LonLab16 conference,the biggest applause I got was for saying 'Brexit is bad for Britain'.Can anyone disagree with that? 
Thank goodness. After Brexit and Trump don't think I could have taken Ballsxit. #faithindemocracy #strictly 
Brexit. Trump. Globalism is on the run. We must make this spread to Canada.  
Trump’s election reinforces the need for Britain to turn against Brexit  
Back from the pub crawl in West End. Me and my mates toasted the brave men and women who died in wars and made #Brexit possible. 
Sensible response to Trump/Brexit obv another round of illiberal liberal "you can't say that" + boycotts of newspapers + BBC over le Pen. 
MPs vow to try and BLOCK Brexit  They are a disgrace & should resign. They have no respect for democracy. @timfarron 
In trying to understand my culture of WWClass who voted Brexit/Trump don't patronise & excuse them for their stupidity. Challenge them. 
Great reflections on "Failures of Political Science: Trump, Brexit and Beyond" by @drjennings & @MartinLodge /  
This is America's Brexit. Only much worse:  
Obviously, just as with Brexit, Trump casts spike in acts of hate as a fabrication, nothing to do with his hateful campaign 
Brexit meets Trumpism: the malign new force spanning the Atlantic | Matthew d’Ancona  
South Asian countries want post-Brexit free trade agreements with the UKIndiaPakistanSri LankaThe whole world is knocking on our door! 
My @guardian column: The new myth of 'hard' versus 'soft Trumpism' mirrors the Brexit debate  
Content of this paragraph from @FT article resonates well beyond #Brexit . With US elections behind us, focus shifts to #Italian referendum.  
EXCLUSIVE-Accurate Brexit, Trump Pollster: Polling Industry at a Crossroads 'Beltway Bubble' & the 'Painful Truth'  
The #AdmiraltyPub at #TrafalgarSquare in #U.K. On#VeteransDay having a w/ some great Heroes who love #Trump#BREXIT ALIVE & Well in London  
Everybody should do their part. Well done LEGO. #LEGO #DailyMail #uk #hatespeech #brexit #eu #business #Advertising 
The Brexit vote wasn't democracy in action. It was populist ignorance on a grand scale.  via @wordpressdotcom 
More mince pies for all as price of Christmas food drops despite Brexit fears  
Lib Dems will vote against invoking Article 50 unless referendum held on outcome of negotiations  
Farage - Trump, Brexit, US, UK Relationship Going Forward As Sovereigns  
Christoph Waltz was asked about Brexit and Donald Trump, and nailed it both times    
Brexit vote has not sparked a tech exodus - @jamestitcomb #premium 
Marine Le Pen says she will become French President after Brexit and Trump victory. Will France be next to elect a radical populist leader?  
Brexit meets Trumpism: the malign new force spanning the Atlantic | Matthew d’Ancona  
Brexit Leader @Nigel_Farage: 2016 Is the Year of Political Revolution @ffweekend  
The president of Catalonia promised to call a referendum on whether to secede from Spain in September 2017.  #9News 
Yeah, they said that about Trump.  And Brexit...  
Good news for Dublin, need more of this to negate against #brexit & #TrumpPresident downturn 
Brexit Bad Boys visited @realDonaldTrump at Trump Tower! Read @Arron_banks' new book for more from the campaign. pic.twitter.com/IF6LetVF5Z 
BBC News - Nigel Farage: Narrow Remain win may lead to second referendum  
Brexit can be great for Africa. So far just one African country, Ghana, has sought a free trade agreement with the UK. Come on the rest!! 
Brexit already causing problems in Northern Ireland - & this is BEFORE the inevitable Border Controls 
You might have noticed that Leave won the Referendum. Leave MPs are not attempting to block or thwart Brexit. Some Remain MPs are.  
Perfect logic by @RCorbettMEP unlike the ludicrous official Labour position - Give people final say on Brexit terms  
When you feel down about #Trump #Brexit #Farage & #LePen, remember THIS guy is the #MayorofLondon with a stonking great mandate! #SadiqKhan 
Like Brexit.  
Farage on Fox: "People moaning (about Brexit) are full-time professional protestors, like here. None voted as they can’t get out of bed."  
And @JohnReesEvans should be voted to lead UKIP to do his best to achieve the goals that Nigel aimed to achieve when he lead UKIP and Brexit  
they just DON'T GET IT do they ??> #BREXIT #TRUMP for a reason :))) 
A very clear demonstration of why the #Leave vote does not give a mandate for any real, implementable #Brexit.#Remain #YesEU 
Any watering down, dilution, moving of goalposts, gerrymandering or other seditious acts attempting to derail Brexit will not be tolerated. 
The longer the Westminster Establishment kicks Brexit into the long grass and peddle sedition, the sooner all their ilk will be booted out. 
wrong. I would. Now you tell me if vote was for hard or soft Brexit?  
Superb. I'm sure plagiarism would be welcomed? Remain voters need to be giving same message to their own MP in coming weeks. #brexit #remain 
Video of Wole Soyinka at Ertegun House, discussing Brexit, Trump, Bob Dylan pan-Africanism & Nigerian politics  
whether 2014 India/Brexit UK/Hillary USA-problem with left lib-they spin & create stories & begin to believe their own spin--Sad: RT 
We also need to remember today on Remembrance Day Sgt Blackman Still in jail for doing his duty 
Brexit leader on Trump meeting: "We can do business"  | AP Photo 
Replace coloured man with immigrant - Understanding Brexit supporters? Very painful, but an element of truth?  
"If there are 2 choices, hard destructive Brexit or reversing the result, hard Brexit’s going to win" EdM transcript  
.@mfearonsf calls for referendum on Irish unity to be held during Edentubber commemoration speech  
The anti-Trump, anti-Brexit, 'whinge-o-rama' needs to end if the progressive left is to get its act together  
.@mfearonsf speaking at today's Edentubber commemoration and calling for a referendum on Irish unity  
Almost whipped us out of Brexit.  
Tony Blair has called for a second referendum. We think he should #RespectTheResult 
Christoph Waltz was asked about Brexit and Donald Trump, and nailed it both times      
.@Ed_Miliband has rejected calls for another referendum on Britain's EU membership. 
LEGENDS BOTH OF THEM, THE ELITES ARE COLLAPSING THANKS TO THESE TWO.Britain is behind Trumps America. AMERICAS BREXIT BEAT CORRUPTION  
UKIP leader @Nigel_Farage spoke on Fox News earlier where he explained the Trump victory and Brexit. Have a watch.  
Only a third of British votersnow unconditionally support Brexit, poll finds  
Plot to arrange second Brexit referendum gaining traction among MPs  
It's tricky to see how a "hard" Brexit can be avoided, global ratings giant says  
HATED AND REVILED BY #BRITAIN #GinaMiller #ENEMY OF THE PEOPLE!  #BBC #SKY #ITV #UK #EU #ARTICAL50 #NEWS #LABOUR #LIBDEM #TORY #UKIP #BREXIT  
Two-thirds of voters oppose a ‘blind-date Brexit’  
History Tells Us What Will Happen Next With Brexit And Trump 
Brexit's Farage wants Trump to put back the bust of Churchill that Obama moved out of the Oval Office  pic.twitter.com/AvfLxEQ30Y 
Christoph Waltz was asked about Brexit and Donald Trump, and nailed it both times      
With Trump, Brexit and Le Pen, are we seeing the birth of a new world order? Join @StigAbell to discuss from 3 -  
"Remember the Brexit show- no, wait, the Brixton show, shit!" 
Interesting talk this morn from @Nigel_Farage @PeteHegseth @HuntsmanAbby @ClaytonMorris re Trump, Brexit, EU... "You're not laughing now."  
Only a third of British voters now unconditionally support Brexit, poll finds  
The Brexit Effect - Happy New Year!"Brexit curse strikes again as pub firms warn a pint could cost an extra 30p" 
So, therefore, you are saying majority #of Americans are moronicNICEYou got your #Brexit WE GOT OUR #TRUMP BOOM 
The UK media and pollsters never saw the Conservative victory in '15They never saw the Brexit victoryThey never saw the Trump winUseless! 
Brexit: yet still so many forget why the European Union has been such an important bond for friendship, tolerance and peace...  
"A vote for #Brexit is a vote for complex systems" - @nntaleb #kilkenomics 
David Seymour, former Group Political Editor of the @DailyMirror says its time to fight fire with fire when it comes to #Brexit lies  
You laughed at us & now we are laughing at you ..#DonaldTrump #NigelFarage #Brexit #Amexit #PreidentTrump #UKIP 
Greater transparency over Brexit will strengthen, not weaken May's negotiating hand—if only she knew what she wants 
After Brexit, tolerant Britons adopted a simple symbol of solidarity. We should, too.  #safetypin 
For Trump read Brexit. Tom Friedman NYT captured our times:  
'A man we can do business with' Farage says Trump is backing 'very strong' British ties 
Cover up! The Muslim enemy mutilated our people at Bataclan:testicles cut off & put in mouth.#EU #Brexit #Nexit 
REVEALED: How Trump and Brexit victories mean YOU can finally call it ‘the Paki shop’ without being arrested by a transgender police officer 
Re-tweet if you voted to #LeaveEU because you know & trust your country can do better#Brexit #No2EU #BrexitBritain #OpenBritain #FreeTrade 
GodBless our fellow Patriots across the Pond on #RemembranceDay  who inspired Americans with #Brexit to #MAGA 
Because of Brexit, the markets were able to bounce back after Trump's surprising win  
Interesting piece on how Brexit may have worsened UK-India relations:  
RETWEET: Politicians should get on with it! #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
READ: The Prime Minister on why she will not allow the British people's vote for Brexit to be sabotaged:  
Don't understand the #Brexit argument about sovereignty. Thatcher and Blair seemed to be able to do anything they wanted incl going to war? 
May considers the Referendum as binding regarding Brexit and cutting immigration but not on funding the NHS a clear promise. Strange that. 
#TRUMP won the popular vote & electoral vote.That is a clear mandate to Make America Great Again and #DrainTheSwamp. #Maga#Brexit #Nexit 
The wonder of #Brexit is that it put the spotlight on all the treacherous lowlifes who were hiding in the cracks of the world of celebrity. 
If you think stopping Le Pen appearing on #Marr because of her views is the way to win, then you've learnt nothing from Brexit or Trump. 
After #Brexit the #UK could join the #US, #Canada & #Mexico in a new #NorthAtlantic #trade area.  #BBC #SKY #ITV #EU 
The election of Trump & Brexit risk weakening the two pillars of Britain’s security. My article for @thesundaytimes 
But his referendum record: 2016 wonMeasure of the times that the UK's most successful politician isn't an MP...  
Parliament gives us a referendum, the court takes it away from us. Who do we get rid of - parliament or a bent legal system ??? 
This is true. The right were famously accepting of the first European referendum result and Obama's presidency.  
Meanwhile, in the alternate timeline, @jk_rowling meets with Prime Minister @Ed_Miliband and talks about outlandish dystopian novel 'Brexit'  
French far-right leader says she will become president after Brexit and Donald Trump's victory  
One of Britain's biggest banks is warning of a post-Brexit exodus  
Former ball pushers like #GaryLineker should never be allowed to have high profile jobs. Catering is the best they should hope for. #Brexit 
#LONDON PAPER THIS MORNING TAMING #TRUMP To ENGLANDSTAY OUT OF OUR POLITICS YOU HAVE YOUR OWN PROBLEMS#Brexit due 2LIBERAL POLICIES  
with Brexit and Trump I'm contemplating sticking a tenner on Ched Evans to win sports personality 
Look who's laughing now?@JunckerEU#Brexit#TrumpPresident 
Brexit walks into a bar. "Why the long farce?"The acrimony is intensifying  
BREXIT: We totally misrepresent Tim Farron’s referendum plans in order to goad readers into an overreaction.  
Dear @RozieBreen I said @JPonpolitics @bbc5live the media has a profund responsability for#Brexit and #Trump for not challenging their lies  
Now is the time for MPs to do their duty to derail a disastrous #Brexit deal, says @acgrayling 
#Brexit, @realDonaldTrump, request to impeach @fhollande: part of new 'shocking global trend'?  
This post-brexit piece on science by @alicebell is even more important post-Trump 
Tory MajorityBrexitTrumpRemember: we owe it all to the SJW's and the regressive left who fortunately will never learn. 
.@JGForsyth argues that with Trump supporting #Brexit, Britain is now in a stronger position than before  
Not sure how many Brexit-voting Poppy fanatics can see the connection between the formation of the EU and decades of peace within Europe. 
Britain's Brexit firebrand Farage meets Trump in New York  
@michaelwhite I'm not sure that Cameron's plan to use a referendum to make Farage irrelevant is working  
I'm particularly enjoying the horrified pro EU, pro Clinton journalists now reeling at Trump and Brexit. Showing their true nasty colours. 
Brexit at Tiffany's 
Brexit has taken a lot of things from me, it doesn't get to take #ThePoppy too. Today means one thing, and one thing only to me: Loss. 
BREXIT: This is what we’re dealing with, people.  
Brexit Presidency Humiliate media/political class #Golden 
If we had a strong PM like Mr Farage he would have stopped paying £billions of our money to the EU the day after the referendum. Sad we dont  
Does @Ed_Miliband agree with @timfarron and @nick_clegg on the need for a second referendum on the terms of Brexit?  
.@Open_Britain supporter @nick_clegg accuses Liam Fox of 'misleading Parliament' over trade deals after #Brexit 
Colombian govt, rebels reach new peace deal after referendum rejection  
No. Normalising fascist views on main stream television the best way to spread them. BBC also did this with Ukip. Led to Brexit. #Marr 
The Brexit court case is a huge distraction – what matters is talks with EU leaders. My Sunday article @IndyVoices  
35.Added to the #misogyny was #racism. This election was a referendum on Obama as well as Clinton. It was also a referendum on whiteness.  
This is the impact of Brexit on 16 Londoners  
Well done, @Nigel_Farage, well done.  You are a friend to @realDonaldTrump & to us.  We will never forget. #Brexit 
Trump, Brexit, UkipUK, May and next Le Pen. What a time. 
For this who know their New York geography this is, literally, "Brexit at Tiffany's"  
Le Pen has learned from the Brexit playbook - lots of talk of elites & globalisation. Little talk of the real right wing agenda. #Marr 
Yet he delivered a referendum & majority of your own constituents voted the same way as Nigel!  
Nicola Sturgeon adviser warns of 'severe' constitutional crisis over Brexit 
Brexit should be a matter for public debate. Parliament is designed for just that purpose  
260,000 Austrians sign EU exit petition, forcing referendum debate in parliament #NEXIT #nederland #amsterdam #PVV 
Greater transparency over Brexit will strengthen, not weaken Theresa May's negotiating hand  
.@leicesterliz: Labour should be making mincemeat out of the Tories’ infighting and Brexit disarray  
One of our top posts this week | The end of Eldorado: Brexit Britain is likely to get a very bad deal from Spain  
After Trump and Brexit shocks, UK finance minister hopes to ease voters' frustrations  
Peace and security will be the greatest casualty from the #Brexit folly. Forget markets & customs unions. WAKE UP BRITAIN! #NoBrexit 
If Brexit & Trump don't serve as a wakeup call to the mainstream media then nothing will.  
Farage didn't "win" Brexit. He was disavowed by the mainstream "leave" campaign for being an embarrassment. Failed 7 times to become an MP.  
Trump's President-elect, Farage won Brexit.Love or loathe them, two of the most successful politicians in modern times.  
Donald Trump's win leaves London's "citizens of nowhere" stunned for the 2nd time this year  
This is great by @jamesallworth explaining both Brexit and Trump: humans demand fair division of spoils  
£12Billion a year of Taxpayers money is spent on Foreign Aid Whilst We the people are suffering from Cuts It's time we put Britain first 
Brexit will boost Britain. ALL of the top non-EU economies (with the exception of Japan) want post-Brexit free trade agreements with the UK. 
4/4 If Paris/ Berlin/ Brussels think DC or London sympathetic to  idea of "EU disintegration" - that totally changes Brexit negotiation 
3/4 pic will go down like bucket of cold sick in European capitals -new US Pres with someone not just pro Brexit but pro "EU disintegration" 
Clegg ‘calls for Britain to JOIN EU army’ despite Brexit vote. The same Clegg who dismissed the idea of an EU army.   
Brexit Leader @Nigel_Farage: U.S. & U.K. Relations Can Improve Under President Trump @TeamCavuto @realDonaldTrump  
Good news that @realDonaldTrump is looking to ditch the Paris agreement and bust open the climate change #myth #maga #stepforwardforhumanity 
Brexit and Trade ministers have not mastered their brief and Johnson's humour does not travel, says think tank  
Earlier this year, UK Brexit supporters & US Trump supporters were both appalled when I said it was part of the same movement.  
Brexit leader on Trump meeting: 'We can do business'  | AP Photo 
Americans put us to shame, we should be marching in our thousands against Brexit and in defence of our liberal values.  
Sad & ashamed #ArmisticeDay 2016, that we're leaving the greatest effort ever made in Europe to live and work together in peace. #brexit 
Trump’s election reinforces the need for Britain to turn against Brexit  
Two-thirds of voters oppose a ‘blind-date #Brexit’ most believe we should have open debate about terms of EU exit 
I know literally no family "broken" by referendum & most I know we're yes & no. If you're different, maybe problem is with you? 
This is America's Brexit. Only much worse:  
The 'bad boys of Brexit' and Trump. They fucked up the UK. Hope they stay in the USA. #Brexit #Ukip pic.twitter.com/lgxraaHWhd 
Memo to the mainstream media: stop adding the word 'despite' after every bit of good news you report through gritted teeth. #Brexit. 
& the rest of the campaign . We spent 4 hours chatting with our friends there. Brexit was the first wave , Trump the tidal wave !  
Remain MPs representing Leave seats who try to thwart Brexit by whatever means will be ejected by their electorates at the next election. 
Conclusion to Matthew Parris's column yesterday on campaigns for Brexit & Trump. I recommend & follow his advice.  
McConnell finally admits ending ‘war on coal’ might not bring back jobs… Brexit anyone?  
Another referendum is on the way that could topple a PM and shake the EU  
Brexit leader Nigel Farage spotted at Trump Tower  
After Brexit and Trump, here are the next 5 dominoes at risk in Europe  
Britain's Brexit firebrand Farage meets Trump in New York  
This election was the ultimate referendum on the belief in a meritocracy. Let's literally find the least qualified man we can and run him.  
I'm sure Trump Presidency will be at least as successful as Brexit. Good on you, Nigel.   
As I warned in August, Putin is on a winning-streak. After Brexit and Trump, France and Germany next. Planted seeds:  
Constitutional Amendment at federal level is just one option. We intend to hold #Calexit referendum and then invoke @UN Charter, UDHR. 
I sense even many Republicans have buyers' regret, and even Russians are somewhat surprised.  ...You Brexit, you buy it.  
HH @YounusAlGohar on #DonaldTrump, #Brexit and curbing #terrorism in the #USA:  #UK #UnitedStatesofAmerica #America 
#UKIP may get ignored by those in #Westminster but not by the most powerful man in #America#NigelFarage #DonaldTrump #Brexit #BrexitUSA 
Its called a referendum, thats what we want. That what Canadians deserve  @JustinTrudeau @MaryamMonsef #cdnpoli 
It doesn't get better than this.  Thanks for your support @Nigel_Farage.#TwoWinners #MakeAmericaGreatAgain #Brexit  
#Brexit #UK #USAMAGA Make All Great Again! 
History tells us what may happen next with Brexit & Trump –  
After Brexit, tolerant Britons adopted a simple symbol of solidarity. We should, too:  #safetypin 
Britain's Brexit firebrand Farage meets Trump in New York  
Brexit was about ordinary people (us) being given a choice without the full facts; in effect a complete gamble on a journey into the unknown  
Brexit Leader @Nigel_Farage: U.S. & U.K. Relations Can Improve Under President Trump @TeamCavuto @realDonaldTrump  
UK Brexit campaigner meets Trump, says he’s ‘full of good ideas’  
The dudes that shocked the world #Brexit #TrumpTrain 
We've had enough of these pathetic EU threats. Brexit represents sovereignty and freedom.    
Can't imagine there are many people who voted against Brexit that now think, well, I fucked that right up pic.twitter.com/n5uvCteVWY 
Meanwhile, a photo from the timeline we're actually in: The President-elect with Nigel Farage, one of the architects of Brexit.  
Nigel Farage, the architect of lie-filled Brexit campaign, said that out of all world leaders he admires Putin most:  
Brexit leader on Trump meeting: 'We can do business'  | AP Photo 
Like the £350 million a week the NHS was to benefit from after Brexit? Say it ain't so.  
Keep on the pressure. Petition: Public inquiry into misleading claims and pledges made during the EU referendum.  
The Lib Dems are after a referendum to decide Brexit's terms, but does anyone really want another one? What DO you want Brexit to look like?  
I said this after Brexit and feel the need to say it again: Fuck your safety pin pic.twitter.com/nyQhknNRMr 
Donald Trump & Nigel Farage (architect of Brexit). Keeping it real, representing commoners, in a gold-plated, marble-walled elevator.  
The Bad Boys of Brexit congratulating the next President of the United States.  #MrBrexit @Arron_banks @Nigel_Farage @realDonaldTrump 
Italy referendum could send shockwaves...VOTE NO! #4DICEMBRE #referendumcostituzionale#IoVotoNO #Italexit 
Dear #Trump America and #Brexit UK. Look: Is this the image of leaders who were on your side? Or have you been conned?#USElection2016 pic.twitter.com/xgpbODMdjn 
The two men that started a new movement in the world! #brexit #MAGA 
BEST. PICTURE. EVER.#Brexit#Trumpexit@realDonaldTrump @Nigel_Farage 
Campaigned in #RichmondPark for #libdem this afternoon. Lots of anger over #Brexit. .@ZacGoldsmith voted #leave he needs to go #Remain 
After Brexit the BBC must be purged of the superficial children who run it #BBC #Brexit  
#BREAKING Colombian gov't, FARC announce revised peace deal in Havana, after previous one rejected in referendum  
This is yet the most epic picture of this election! The Brexit men   
Brexit leader Nigel Farage spotted at Trump Tower  
What will Brexit mean for Britain’s world-class universities?  
BREAKING: Colombia, FARC rebels agree to new peace deal; original one was narrowly rejected in October referendum:  
It'll be funny when @theresa_may meets Trump and he responds to something she says with "But Nigel's already told me that..."  #UKIP #Brexit  
#UPDATE FARC and Colombian government strike new peace deal after referendum rejection  
Theresa May could try to overturn Brexit ruling  
Referendum for #Catalonia. #perLaDemocraciaWhat do we want, we want to vote! When do we want it, NOW! #Freedom#Piccadilly #London 
The picture that proves the "Bad Boys of Brexit" are rather better connected with America's next President than anyone in the UK government  
Somehow @omid9 managed to fit the refugee crisis, terrorism, brexit and trump all into his amazing show this evening. Still laughing now  
Colombia and Farc rebels announce new peace agreement, six weeks after original deal was rejected in referendum  
UK is in store for a hard Brexit that will hit economy & lay bare deep divisions in society due to brexit S&P says  
#BREAKING FARC, Colombian govt strike new peace deal after referendum rejection 
With Donald Trump winning the US election and the UK poised for Brexit, BBC News looks at the outlook for a new...  
Absolutely. UK needs the good will of the 27 to get a good Brexit deal, and snubbing them doesn't help @CER_London 
Don't buy Lego, Walkers Crisps or CDs by the left wing remainers. We already decided #brexit #trump #eu 
Brexit: Channel or the Atlantic? - Booker on Trump ...  #Brexit.  
It's true that #DonaldTrump is a threat to both democracy and stability worldwide but so is #TheresaMay & Brexit So Britain must be vigilant 
2017 Diary- Article 50 triggered #Brexit- Marie Le Penn becomes French President- BBC TV Tax scrapped- UK/US Trade deal- EU Collapses 
Irish govt won't be having talks with Sturgeon over Brexit.   We are sick of her whining. 
The end of the year "2016 in review" shows are all going to be Brexit, Trump, a dozen celebrity deaths and... Ed Balls dancing. 
Vote for me in #richmondparkbyelection and I'll oppose brexit. Sarah is pro EU.  
#Italy #referendum result sends a message to the #EU & that its time is up #Italexit #No2Eu #Brexit #EUSpring 
This is directly parallel to what happened here in UK after Brexit (far right elements emboldened by a populist vote) this is #Fascism 
His name was Balls. Ed Balls. He's single gangham-handedly smeared the biggest smile on all our trumped-out-brexit faces. Bravo! #Strictly 
Never give up; Brexit is symptomatic of a deep malaise, now to be challenged by a 'Pro-EU Alliance' leading to a better future within the EU  
President Erdoğan says Turkey may hold Brexit-style referendum to decide on fate of EU membership  
ICYMI: European Politicians Terrified By "Horror Scenario" After Brexit, Trump  
Labour MPs know they'll be sacked for blocking BrexitLib Dems happy to sacrifice all of their MPs - all 8 of them 
Are we better than the 1930's? I believe so, let us prove it by not letting hate win. Brexit started it, don't let Donald Trump finish it 
“History tells us what may happen next with Brexit & Trump”  
I had missed PA's referendum, which likely gave Dems the state's Supreme Court for at least six more years.  
#Brexit shocked the world, but not quite so much as the election of Donald Trump.  
Brexit Leader To Meet With Donald Trump Saturday To Talk Trade  
#brexitalive & well in #London as they illuminate the City w/lights signaling the beginning of The Christmas Season!! Store packed! #UK 
Putin's Russia, post-Brexit UK, Trump's USA allied together versus Merkel's Germany. Sort of like WWII but with the roles reversed. 
In the wake of #Brexit and now #Trump, liberal democracy is quickly becoming a resistance movement | @GuyVerhofstadt 
Chinese minister calls for ‘mutually beneficial’ trade deal after Brexit.  pic.twitter.com/zCLeKum1Ue 
65% of voters back Brexit (33% unconditionally), says ICM poll  
Conway called Trump's meeting with Brexit's Nigel Farage "productive" and added "I think they enjoy each other's company." 
'Orwell despised the ‘Europeanised’ British Left because...' - worth revisiting post-Brexit via @spikedonline 
Wearing a safety pin is a small way to show solidarity after Trump’s presidential win & is inspired by #Brexit.  
New ICM poll on BREXIT 33% support unconditionally23% oppose32% "depends on terms"12% DK 
Forget Trump, forget Brexit, the biggest shock of 2016 could be Honey G winning the X-Factor #XFactor 
If #HoneyG does win #XFactor it will be more shocking that #Brexit and #Trump combined 
Latest type of Brexit.  
"Brexit leader"  
Two-thirds of voters oppose a ‘blind-date Brexit’  
Brexit leader Nigel Farage spotted at Trump Tower  
SHOW this video to anyone calling for a second referendum #RespectTheResult 
After a colossal 72K votes, looks like most people think we need a vote on Brexit terms. Add your voice to the poll: 
Plague Inc: Evolved's latest update adds Brexit and vampires to the pandemic. Yes, really:   
Should there be a second referendum on the terms of Brexit? Yes. What do you think?  
If this article is true, Nigel Farage of Brexit fame is in Trump Tower right now. Holy shit. I mean ... holy shit ...  
FoI request reveals Vote Leave campaign was repeatedly told not to use NHS logo on #brexit battle bus   
2016 is a crazy year. Brexit, Trump President..now I want HoneyG to win X factor to top off this memorable year. #XFactor 
Yes. The key is to lie to people who might vote and play on their prejudices. That's how Trump & Brexit win  
Forget Toblerone, look how small Cadburys Bastard bar is nowadays! #brexit#RuinAChocolateBar pic.twitter.com/aQMVdBFn1V 
Lib Dem plot to sabotage Brexit has been dashed by Labour who will NOT back second vote.  
VIDEO : Brexit Superstar Nigel Farage, "Ordinary People Are Rising Up Against The Establishment"  #TrumpTrain 
It would obviously be blindingly convenient for Trumpism and Brexit to be all about my degree subject and solvable by my favoured politics 
Maybe if we all play the video of Ed Balls doing Gangnam Style enough times, it will reverse Trump and Brexit. #Strictly 
The Brexit EffectHappy New Year!No January bargains as electrical stores plan new year price hikes 
Our book, The Bad Boys of Brexit makes headline news! Buy your copy today:  pic.twitter.com/PxOFqGVcTt 
READ: After Brexit the UK could join the US, Canada and Mexico in a new North Atlantic trade area. 
Does Brexit + Trump = A new economic special relationship?  
Dominic Raab: 'What you're allowing is die hard remainers to try and frustrate the referendum.' #ChangeBritain 
To those worried that this hate-crime wave will last 4 years, hate-crime levels after Brexit normalized within weeks  
The year is 2016. Donald Trump has been elected president, Brexit is underway and Ed Balls is dancing to Gangnam Style on Strictly. 
The Economist argues forcefully that keeping Brexit negotiating process secret misunderstands what UK trying to do  
This is America's Brexit. Only much worse:  
.@GreatDismal Brexit felt *exactly* the same way as Trump winning US election. (Only more local for me.) Waking in a nightmare. 
"What did you do when you became an MP?""I wasn't one""OK. What did you doafter the referendum?""I resigned""We'll be in touch"  
Discussing why people voted for Trump is pointless. Same reason why people voted for Brexit. Simple. They're thick:  
Eirexit: Could Ireland be next to leave the EU? After Brexit, EU will push for more powers. What's not to like? 
If you despair about things like #brexit & #Trump and feel like like you can't change anything, then you need to follow @StopFundingHate 
Similar with Brexit- the media totally failed to hold the Leavers to account no questioning of unrealistic claims 
Michael Moore honed in on the Electoral College and what he called "Our Rust Belt Brexit"  
We got plaice that we have roasted in £86 worth of butter* *4 knobs in post brexit terms  
Brexit Leader @Nigel_Farage: U.S. & U.K. Relations Can Improve Under President Donald Trump   
Whistling for racists with alt-right code words is racism. It's exactly what Trump did in US and what Brexit did in the UK. #cdnpoli 
.@JoeTidy is in the North Sea with trawlermen to learn how Brexit affects them. He sent this update from on board.  
ICYMI My oped in the @guardian. What does Brexit mean? Once we know, the people must have a vote on it  
Brexit, Trump, and this... now I've seen it all.  
I get it, u like political mob rule. Read up on Direct Democracy in Switzerland. Brexit was another example of people deciding their future  
The #Brexit effect came to America because we Reject Liberalism and Globalization #AmericaFirst #TrumpEffect #MAGA 
VIDEO : Brexit Superstar Nigel Farage, “Ordinary People Are Rising Up Against The Establishment” – TruthFeed  
Fantastic meeting today in Birmingham. A national meeting of pro EU groups talking and discussing the fightback against brexit  
remember last NYE nd everyone said this year is gonna be amazing then trump, brexit, bowie, prince, alan rickman, zika and orlando happened 
ICYMI: It'll be 'Brexit times 100,' disaster for Texas, if Trump makes good on trade promises |  @JillCowan 
European Parliament's Constitutional Committee will consider giving Brits voluntary dual EU citizenship after Brexit  
America will soon adapt to a UK outside an EU, just like a UK will adapt just fine with America's new administration #Brexit  
British public split down middle on Brexit deal, immigration 43% vs single market 42% ComRes for @Independent @TheSundayMirror 
RETWEET If you agree that Politicians should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum and get on with it! #Brexit 
Remember goodies Brexit promised? Nope. Add to policy changes already on wall, trade, China, mideast, Obamacare repeal. #SaturdayMorning 
Worried about the effect of Brexit on the pound?Fear not, the Scotcoin is here and they are nearly giving them away!  
2016 has been a really bad year. Brexit, Trump, selling Gnabry & loaning Campbell while keeping Chamberlain. Expecting WW3 before Christmas. 
Some behind the scenes shots of @Nigel_Farage on @FoxNews  earlier. Brexit has gone global.  
What the careerist political wonks that infest Westminster appear to fail to realise is that the referendum was as much about them as the EU 
If #Brexit falls short of what was promised,sinks the economy &removes rights we were told were safe,then oppose it! 
Teenage members of the Youth Parliament debate racism, Islamophobia and Brexit in the House of Commons.  
Always required after 'tolerant, civilised, peace loving & caring' sufferers of Leftism lose a democratic referendum or election.  
"There is no other solution than a referendum despite any threats and coertion tone from Spain" @AnnaGaSabate @ANCEngland #London 
I was heartbroken at Brexit and I felt this coming for you. Overwhelming sadness and a fight is needed. 
"We won’t ‘take back control’ unless we take on the corporate vested interests." #TrumpPresident #Brexit  
-Let's remember all these MP's who are trying their best to delay/halt BREXIT and vote them out at the next GE. Traitors! 
For years we were lectured on the rights of majority. Majority in north voted in Brexit to remain. Must b respected  
Lego ends Daily Mail links amid campaign to boycott papers with 'divisive' Brexit headlines  
No MP has the right to overrule the Brexit will of their constituents it's called the "Will of the people" @YvetteCooperMP  
BREXITTRUMPMILLWALL BEATING A TEAM WITH 10 MEN2016 is fucking nuts. 
The key people who brought you Brexit:#1 @DanielJHannan  via. @ft 
"We export more to Belgium at the moment than we do to India, Russia Brazil and South Africa combined"  #Brexit 
Brexit was a sign that American voters, given the opportunity, might give their elites a hard kick. They did.  
Which part of democracy do they not understand. #Brexit  
Some MPs 'ready to vote against triggering #Brexit' 
.@MMFlint on what he calls the #Brexit Rust Belt states that helped deliver #DonaldTrump victory #AMJoy 
When solidarity safety pins were a thing in the UK post Brexit, I wrote about why they're not enough to fight racism  
Brexit was about ordinary people rising up to defeat the establishment and we've now seen the same happen in the US.  
silencing those who have a different view to you is why we have a Tory government, Brexit and Trump. Well done. 
Post-election hate speech and harassment in the US being monitored by @ushahidi. Brexit all over again.  
We've had Brexit and Trump. Now here are 5 more dominoes that could fall in Europe  
I thought we could beat Brexit and Trump with our comical tweets but I was wrong and now I'm all out of ideas. 
Cameron’s EU referendum wasn’t a mistake – & Brexit wasn't won by a campaign of lies either: my NYU talk @IndyVoices 
WATCH: A few minutes ago @Nigel_Farage appeared on @FoxNews to discuss Brexit, Trump and where the UK and US go now. Watch it all here.  
#BREXIT....NOW HASH TAG  #DEMEXIT    LEFTIST ARE HATERS OF SANITY 
The Brexit Bad Boys on tour!  
WATCH: @Nigel_Farage on Fox says Brexit was the start of a global uprising which has now spread to the USA with Trump's success.  
A 'soft Brexit' is not the clean break we need  
Poll for students/PhD/postdocs: did the recent events (#brexit, #TrumpPresident) changed your opinion on going to UK/USA for a PhD/postdoc ? 
when you hear of all the filibustering in parliament why wouldn't we use any means to stop brexit 
At least after Brexit and Trump, the old debate of who is smarter - Britons or Americans - is finally settled. And the answer is Canadians. 
Brexit fear mongering repeated and failing hilariously again :)  
City of London's tallest tower to be built despite Brexit fears  
How mainstream psychology may have contributed to creating the conditions for #Brexit & #Trump.By @Shrink_at_Large 
For the DUP to compare the struggle of Bloody Sunday families to the response to Brexit is abominable @columeastwood  
'It isn't safe for me to go outside', Gina Miller reveals safety fears amid anger at Brexit ruling  
In other words, the government could just invent a crisis to stop Brexit. No. The British people voted. You are betraying democracy.  
The Brexit court case is a huge distraction – what matters is talks with EU leaders. My Sunday article @IndyVoices 
Dear #Liberals & Remoaners, No amount of Legal Cases, Lies, Tantrums or Filming yourself crying is gonna change the #BREXIT RESULT! #BBC #UK 
Just like the ignorant ppl in England w/ the Brexit vote, the ignorant ppl of America will soon learn to thoroughly regret their Trump vote!  
Brexit: A good opportunity for Italy? A point of view on Financial Times     
Like with Brexit, Trump's win isn't just about the "left behind". The "left behind" include people of colour who largely voted for neither 
Families were broken by the independence referendum. Now we should unite the county not divide it #SLDconf 
The UK is seeing a 50% drop in students from India since Brexit. US universities are about to lose a lot of $ too.  
When Trump raises duty on UK goods, and Europe does the same post-Brexit, who will we sell to? If you know phone @BorisJohnson @BrexitWatch 
.@GaryLineker appointed leader of the opposition by default, as nobody else seems to be doing anything  #Brexit 
This is the scariest thing so far: History Tells Us What Will Happen Next With Brexit And Trump  # via @HuffPostPol 
Post-Brexit, Post-Trump victory, a German led EU as foreign policy force is in the cards.  
The pound has plunged since Brexit — and U.K. consumers' wallets are being hit  pic.twitter.com/mYUIrkujrR 
BREXIT BOOST: Britain ‘to form free trade deal with the US, Canada AND Mexico’  
I'm #timfarron I INSIST on a 2nd #EU referendum. I'm an idiot who hates #democracy and BRITAIN!  #BBC #SKY #ITV #UK 
#MakeInIndia: Post-Brexit UK looks to strengthen trade ties with India, says @nsitharaman. 
It's impossible to tweet this too many times: British Comedian Jonathan Pie on the reasons for Trump and Brexit:  
"first we had brexit, then we had donald trump and now we have this queue""each thing worst than the last" 
Loyal Brexit fangirls, or "Farageers" use mirrors to catch a glimpse of Nigel Farage's official canonisation. Vatican City, 2017.  
She's had death threats for challenging the legality of Brexit. Grim.  
Volatility Index: 22.5 to 14.2 this week, 3rd largest weekly decline in history. Largest: week after Brexit. $VIX 
Police warn millionaire businesswoman who challenged Brexit in court it's 'not safe to go outside'  
UK Government refuses to meet 27 other EU Foreign Ministers to discuss Trump's election: thereby presumably hoping to improve BREXIT talks? 
The Daily Mail wrote a 'positive' story about Brexit. James O'Brien destroyed it in less than two minutes  
80 SCUM #Traitor #MPs join #LibDems plot to force Government to hold a second referendum! #TREASON  #BBC #SKY #UK #RT 
Farron's referendum on the conclusions of brexit negotiations is a recipe to ensure that the EU offers the worst deal imaginable.  
Tories, who have led this country into this mess, have learnt nothing from #Brexit. It's victory for the UK establishment at *any* cost. 
Lorraine is absolutely right @MaajidNawaz & spot on about Trump/Brexit: All this hatred is being stirred up by the media and the left. #lbc 
Theresa May now has some Trumps in her Brexit negotiating hand says James Forsyth  
What happened when the Bad Boys of Brexit went stateside? Find out here:   @BitebackPub  pic.twitter.com/5iYUZv1FjV 
Our obsession with therapy and mental health has fuelled the politics of Donald Trump and Brexit 
So. Trump.I realise I've felt this sickly feeling even before brexit occurred.And it was when Umbridge became headmistress of Hogwarts. 
Could Irish gov refer A50 reversibility to ECJ given importance of #Brexit for Ireland...  
Say no to hard #Brexit! Join the @Open_Britain #DayofAction on Jubilee Street Brighton now :) 
The continuing parallels bw Trump victory & Brexit, for real  
Brexit & Trump's victory sent a message across the West that globalism's policy of ethnically cleansing Europeans across the world ends now. 
This man speaks for many, many people across the world.#Trump #Clinton #Brexit  
Immigration haters think immigrants take jobs. #Brexit will show that when immigrants go the jobs will go with them. #Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
With Brexit and Trump comes the bonfire of the liberal elite   via  
Philip Hammond faces £25 billion hole in public finances after Brexit vote, @TheIFS says  
FF leader Micheál Martin calls on Irish gov to seek legal advice on implications of Brexit for Good Friday Agrmnt  
Other countries are rubbing their hands with glee as immigration hysteria drives international students away from Britain#Remain #Brexit  
my next prediction is #MarineLePen to be next #President of #France#Frexit @MLP_officiel #ViveLaFrance #EUspring #Brexit #Trump 
If we don't leave the Single Market, we will still have to send money to Brussels. That's not what the British people voted for. #Brexit  
Brexit appears shipwrecked, a derelict concept without real direction; lost, sinking fast, surrounded by swirling flotsam, jetsam, and lagan  
Books essay: Four contrasting accounts of the Brexit campaign seek to explain Britain’s decision to reject Europe  
The Government has a democratic mandate to take Britain out of the EU #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
Nick Clegg tells @mattfrei that Trump's isolationism means we need to cooperate militarily with EU after Brexit.  
I've been reading things about why people voted for Trump and for Brexit, and how to treat those people, whether to approach or shun them... 
Rainy but in Duke of York Sq people not happy w Brexit-Trump @Open_Britain @SarahMacshane @Hugodixon 
Is the idea of Ireland leaving the EU gaining ground? Good piece by @harrymcgee  #brexit 
The Brexit files: my essay in weekend @FT on books by @ShippersUnbound @owenjbennett @Arron_banks @GaryGibbonBlog  
There's no Donald Trump or Brexit in Tamriel 
Election is coming: EU braces for political upheaval in wake of Trump and Brexit shocks  #Brexit  
The difference is people actually voted for Trump, unlike you. #Brexit #MakeAmericaGreatAgain 
_What Brexit & Trump mean for multinational auto industry•by Head & Mayer• 
After Brexit, tolerant Britons adopted a simple symbol of solidarity. We should, too.  #safetypin 
Thread on lessons from Brexit and other nationalist populist victories.  
Over 80 MPs prepared to use A50 vote to force 2nd referendum. Labour predictably useless on this  via @telegraphnews 
Don't know why Brexiteers are spitting dummy out at 80 MPs calling for a 2nd referendum. Maybe they're worried they'll lose this time. 
Will MPs block Brexit? Backbenchers plot against May’s Article 50 law. They must accept 17.4M vote of the People!  
Explosion of racist threats post-election, as after #Brexit in UK, needs to be disowned by #Trump. This is his first test of leadership. 
#recap According to a new book on Brexit, Michael Gove had to be stopped “unblocking a loo with a hoover” pic.twitter.com/t42oaPgU2M 
I wonder when people will start to get the huge constitutional difference between an election & a referendum.  
Holding a Referendum was the express will of Parliament.Leaving EU is the express will of Britain. Any MP who can't support both must resign 
Everything about Brexit is negative, inward looking & flakey. Of course the EU has faults but its many strengths greatly outweigh them all. 
Brexit/Trump have changed things and not for the better. It seems ok 2B nasty to others now. We must fight for values we believe in 
Tim Farron's plan to have a referendum  to either accept the final Brexit deal or remain in the EU is absurd unless Art 50 is revocable.  
Any further vote on #Brexit MUST have remaining in the EU as the alternative on the ballot. - But best is just stop now the lunacy now. 
More #brexit fallout: Gina Miller receives threats and abuse, advised to stay indoors  
Visa-free access to Schengen states for 90 days in any 180 day period, in GREEN. Why would they insist on Brits needing visas post-Brexit? pic.twitter.com/Y4DwJ7quAP 
Clearly some 'common ground' on Brexit between @RCorbettMEP and @timfarron   @Hugodixon 
The woman who derailed Brexit warned to stay inside by police  
Well, as we saw re both Brexit & Trump, the days of rigorous, fact-checked, politically-balanced media & journalism are certainly behind us.  
Good to see @AlynSmithMEP pursuing every opportunity to ensure the interests of those who live in Scotland are protected #brexit  
#Brexit fans: if, when asked why you voted Leave your answer is "doesn't matter" or "you lost", I'm going to think you don't know why. 
Tim Farron is working against the national interest - a second referendum will incentivise the EU to give us a bad deal #LibDems #brexit  
Plot to arrange second Brexit referendum gaining traction among MPs  
SIGN our petition to urge politicians to #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum:  #ChangeBritain 
Precisely, Brexit a deficit model. EU was working for UK, had faults but these don't compare to xenophobia, prejudice, & racism now evident.  
Lib Dems 'will vote against article 50 if there is no new referendum'  
This is what got us Brexit and Trump. Incessant and uncritical TV+press coverage. Think about the cycle here with Farage and Orange One 
this weeks winner & loser awards go to #DonaldTrump & #TimFaron#PresidentTrump #Libdems #80MPs #Brexit #BrexitUSA 
It's also on page 73 of the Conservative Party manifesto 2015 @Change_Britain @DavidJo52951945#Brexit #EURefResults 
BREXIT: Boris Johnson tells Remain campaigners to “stop the collective pointing-out-that-I-lied-through-my-teeth-for-personal-gain-o-rama.” 
80 MPs want a 2nd referendum. People voted based on lies. Those lies have now been revealedIsn't it more democratic to allow them a choice?  
Yeah. Funny how this stuff randomly happened in the UK after Brexit too & hate crimes increased by 16%.  
With Brexit and Trump comes the bonfire of the liberal elite��  via @MailOnline 
It's clear that a vote for the #LibDems is a vote to oppose the will of the people. .@timfarron pirouettes against democracy. #brexit 
It's Pumpkin Spice Coffee's Fault We Didn't Learn From Brexit 
The pollsters did NOT "get it wrong" - they were partisan advocates for Clinton, just as they were with #Brexit. Most of them are fraudsters 
The Independent has more readers than the Sun.. and some interesting Brexit comments from @johnrentoul 
Its very important we identify exactly who are protesting against Brexit & they are named and remembered so they are voted out next election 
If the 80 MPs get their way & there's a 2nd referendum then the voting age should be lowered to 16 as its their future we're messing with. 
#UKIP leader #NigelFarage warns of riots in UK if utter disregard is shown to popular opinion on #Brexit.  
Another opportunity to explore |UK could become member of Nafta after Brexit  
#brexit means simple solutions to complex problems that won't solve anything 
People have found an ingenious new use for the Brexit Toblerone  
When the true cost of #Brexit is revealed, the secret deals with #Nissan & others & long term economic harm becomes obvious they will all go 
As Brexit was so close we should get info on who voted how inc the 80 MPs so we can decide who to elect & unelect  
LDs leading  #fightback to common sense. +80 MPs join Lib Dem to force Government to hold a 2nd ref on Brexit terms  
56% of Telegraph readers who have so far taken their online poll think there should be referendum on Brexit terms  
'More than 80 MPs' plotting second Brexit referendum  
More than 80 MPs are plotting to stage a Parliamentary vote calling for a second Brexit referendum 
What kind of government allows our Parliamentary representatives to debate and vote on #Brexit only when forced to do so by the High Court? 
Article 50 could be reversed, government may argue in Brexit case | Politics | The Guardian  
The Lib Dems' parliamentary party could fit into the back of two black cabs. They can't stop #Brexit.  
Superb piece -- History Tells Us What Will Happen Next With Brexit And Trump  # via HuffPostPol 
And get pilloried for suggesting that it is democratic for UK to pre-ratify any Brexit deal. Why so scared Brexiters? Can't you convince us?  
Brexit basket.  
France..... You're next.#Frexit #Brexit #Trump 
This week's #Brexit fact  
The full potential nightmare of UK's #Brexit brain drain laid bare  #WeAreInternational 
If the voters of Richmond Park and North Kingston elect me - I'll take that as a personal mandate to oppose Brexit:  
"After Brexit and Trump there's been a horrible, elitist turn against democracy by the chattering class" - Brendan O'Neill on @talkRADIO 
Tony Benn on what he thought of Heath and Parliament's activities in 1972 taking us into the EEC......#Brexit  
A small way to show solidarity after Donald Trump’s presidential win, inspired by Brexit  
Telegraph reporting that 80 MPs plan to force a second referendum, email yours to find out how they intend to vote  
This is the brexiteers' deepest fear as public opinion is turning against Brexit. Good work by @timfarron @LibDems 
When will the Liberal left understand that the people have spoken and we do not want them interfering! #Brexit 
After Brexit and Trump, here are the next 5 dominoes at risk in Europe  
Britain still hasn't learned it can no longer win deals on its own terms, @mihirssharma says  
Dear @afneilNo mistaking that look on your face, Trump result just made #Brexit incredibly risky for the UK 
84 MPs 'ready to vote against triggering Brexit' unless they are promised a second referendum on UK Brexit deal.  
MPs voted 6 to 1 in favour of having an #EU Referendum, now 80 MPs want a 2nd Referendum because they didn't like the result #Brexit #idiots 
Ireland REFUSE to speak to Nicola Sturgeon over her plans to thwart Brexit. Is she a Vexatious Loser?  
Dangerously out of touch quislings like @timfarron @nick_clegg @Ed_Miliband will face the people's vengeance#Brexit 
More than 80 MP's join the LibDems in 'plot' (democracy' to vote against gov't on Brexit.  we say, join the LD's 
The people must decide on whether the eventual Brexit deal is good enough. We can't leave it to a gang of Tory hard-Brexit right wingers.  
he did look shocked when he went to meet Obama. Reminded me of Boris & Gove after Brexit. 
THIS IS WHY @UKLabour are UNELECTABLE  Group of Labour MPs rebel against triggering Brexit  via @FT 
Brexit & US election is finally showing what REAL people think. People have had enough of liberal elites looking down at us and our values.  
@NickCohen450 hour week trucking, renting in a Midlands sink town & detesting #Brexit & #Trump.Apparently I'm part of #liberalelite. 
Personally, I prefer direct democracy as they have in Switzerland where the people vote on major issues. Same as what happened with Brexit  
Instead of barking through press conference why doesn't Delhi CM Arvind Kejriwal demand referendum on the issue? Or does he have a fear  
The incomperable @thandienewton gets real about fear in the US and the UK.   #Westworld #brexit #Election2016 
'History tells us what will happen next with Brexit and Trump' - Tobias Stone blogs  
Thank you @boingboing: Trump and Brexit are retaliation for neoliberalism and corruption  
Harambe was killedBrexit happenedTrump won US electionsNOW Virat Kohli Hit wicket himselfYear 2016 has got no chill!#IndvsEng 
Why the media got it so wrong on Trump and Brexit  
Brexit negotiations will trigger tugs-of-war between the arms of the British state  
Ireland REFUSE to speak to Nicola Sturgeon over her plans to thwart Brexit  
Brexit WILL happen: 'Arrogant' Remoaners told nothing will derail Article 50  
From Brexit to Trump, Europe reels from year of crisis  
.@ptbrennan11 As a reminder, hate crimes increased significantly in the UK following the Brexit vote.  
Frexit referendum beginning. Populist candidate Marine Le Pen seeking French presidency.  
AS BRITS WOULD SAY LET RIGHT BE DONE #UK #BREXIT  
Every sane human should have that. And I thought 'brexit' was scary, this is something else. (I live in UK) 
Le Pen vows to organize Frexit referendum & ban burkini if elected president   
Prob the best explanation I've read on the rise of populist nationalism (Trump, Brexit). Francis Fukuyama got it. 
Blind mystic Baba Vanga who predicted 9/11, Brexit and birth of ISIS warns Obama will be ‘the last US president’  :/ 
Lib Dems 'will vote against article 50 if there is no new referendum'  
There have been a wave of really outlandish political outcomes in far flung parts of the world over the past year. Trump, Brexit, Duterte... 
How Leave won: behind the scenes in the battle for Brexit  
Britain could join USA, Canada and Mexico in new free trade area after Brexit  
How the internet inspired, and fueled, the new nationalism of Donald Trump and Brexit  
Nothing personal, but if I hear the Brexit comparison one more time, I'll lose it. The FBI & Russia worked to elect her opponent, FFS.  
The markets recovered quickly after Trump's surprise win because of the lesson we learned from #Brexit  
If US uses military during our progress Referendum, it just shows how desperate they need us, to keep feeding them our tax money!#Calexit! 
This is so similar to the Brexit situation it's unreal, and so far all we've had to complain about is the size of a fucking Toblerone. 
First Brexit, then Trump: can Australia be spared the voter backlash? | Lenore Taylor (Let's hope so #auspol)  
Brexit/Trump...isn't it time to recognise what this is REALLY all about? To quote from Pink Floyd's Dark Side of the Moon over 40 years ago:  
Brexit leaves London-based banks facing 'nightmarish' choices  Repent at leisure, Fool Britannia. 
Trump calls himself Mr Brexit. Does he not know the day after, there was a lot of buyer's remorse from voters who weren't educated? 
Demonstrates utter contempt for the will of the people. Brexit means Brexit.   via @telegraphnews 
Das Trumpen-Furher Delivers: Homophobic attacks rose 147% per cent after Brexit vote…and Now Coming to America  
YepScotland gets utterly shafted by their mediaTwisting REAL 'Brexit is bad' story into an anti IndyRef headline 
Opportunity tomorrow AM to hear a new and revolutionary perspective about #God and the #2016election #brexit #climatechange on FB Live. @RNS 
This is America's Brexit. Only much worse.  
Residents in one Florida county cast conflicting votes on a referendum to allow the release of GM mosquitoes.  
17,410,742 ordinary people  V  80 Tratoirous MP's#No2EU #Brexit #BrexitBritain #OpenBritain #Article50 #EURef 
After Brexit, tolerant Britons adopted a simple symbol of solidarity. We should, too.  #safetypin 
"I hadn't seen a country do something as stupid like UK voting #Brexit"USA: Here hold my beerMéxico 2018: Uy deténme el tequila mano 
It's like Brexit all over again. Remember the fake hate crime rise? We rumbled it. Was a rise in reporting orchestrated by Remainers.  
#Brexit plus #Trump#BBC puts a POSITIVE news piece??Must be Friday night and senior editors are out on the drink! 
Name & shame these traitors to our Great Country#BrexitBritain #Brexit #WeWantOurCountryBack #No2EU #DemocracyNOTDictatorship 
#Europe needs #democracy not #dictatorship#EuropeanUnion RIP 2016#Eurozone #EUCrisis #EUspring #No2EU #Brexit #Frexit #Nexit 
Politicians shouldn't be allowed to blatantly lie during campaigns, Brexit prime example. People voted based on LIES. Mass anger imminent 
.@sarahjolney1 "If you elect me on 1st December - I'll oppose Brexit."  
First Brexit, then Trump: can Australia be spared the voter backlash? | Lenore Taylor  
No plot: just an honest, legal, democratic endeavour to prevent unthinkable Brexit; UK political system based on Parliamentary sovereignty.  
Worldwide people are fighting the establishment:After Brexit (UK), Trump (US) ...  crucial election in Bulgaria ─►  
Brexit supporters say Donald Trump's presidency could lead to closer US-UK ties  
Brexit - "supporters are racist" Gamergate - "supporters are misogynist" Trump - "supporters are racist and sexist" End this nonsense. 
about time! More than 80 MPs join Lib Dem plot to force Government to hold a second referendum on Brexit terms  
Nicola 1st head of Government to address Irish Seanad, Herald headline "Blow for Sturgeon as Irish reject plea for direct talks over Brexit" 
Ruth Davidson is untrustworthy.First she votes remain then backs Brexit.She's against Chinese investment then backs it.Just no principles. 
Brexit- "Broken politics, treacherous & delusional behaviour, represented by CHEAP PATRIOTS such as Gove, Fox, IDS" 
The real elite of tax-dodging billionaire press barons & their pet politicians running #Brexit Britain #Remain #YesEU 
A MUST READ..History Tells Us What Will Happen Next With Brexit And Trump | The Huffington Post  
May's clampdown on Indian student numbers looses Britain money and the influence & trade that come from human contacts. #Remain #Brexit 
"The election was a referendum on globalization and demographics; it was not a referendum on neoliberalism."  
How the pollsters got the US election wrong - just like Brexit  
What does Brexit mean? Once we know, the people must have a vote..| Tim Farron  via @rightrelevance thanks @guardian 
Should there be a second referendum on the terms of Brexit? 
More than 80 MPs join Lib Dem plot to force Government to hold a second referendum on Brexit terms 
Leaving the EU will only serve to expose the UK more directly to competition from lower paid Asian workforces. #Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
Brexit WILL happen: 'Arrogant' Remoaners told nothing will derail Article 50  
Britain could join USA, Canada and Mexico in new free trade area after Brexit  via @telegraphnews 
Well, we'll, if that ain't the pot calling the kettle Brexit.  
90 - Number of minutes it took England to knock Scotland out of Europe for the second time this year. Brexit. 
After #Brexit, retail sales in #UK have increased 2.4% YoY: proving the Brexit doom & gloom crowd wrong, again.  
READ: The liberal elite's refusal to learn from Brexit is why they did not see Trump's victory coming, while we did.  
These Brexit and Anti-Trump folks couldn't have picked a dumber item for their movement. The #SafetyPin holds the diaper on crybabies! Lol 
#Brexit's #SafetyPin Movement has reached the U.S. following #DonaldTrump's presidential win  
Volatility Index dropped 37% this week, 3rd largest decline in its history. #1? Week after Brexit. $VIX $VXX 
Favourite Footie chant of the night, "We're gaunny deep fry yer Brexit!" #ILoveScotland #WinningOnBanter #EnglandVsScotland 
"..and we won't vote for Article 50 unless we get a second referendum"."Piss off you useless ponce"  
Irish government refuse to speak to Sturgeon on Brexit, as they rightly recognise that it's an issue for UK gov. 
Trump played on the same white nativist sentiments that allowed Brexit to be widely supported-this fear of the other encroaching our borders 
Haha. Just like Nigel Farage the day after Brexit admitting that their promise all the money saved would go to the NHS was bullshit.  
That it takes Political Armageddon in America to raise Stirling after #brexit shouldn't be taken as an encouraging sign. 
#hignfy Trump / Brexit fans don't watch HIGNFY if it upsets you. It's the hilarious sane highlight of the week for quite a few of us 
Every year and every tournament is a Brexit for us 
3-0?1) Voted Tories.2) Got Brexit.3) Won Theresa May.#EnglandvScotland 
Most disappointing Sterling performance since Brexit 
Scotland might be pish at football but at least we never voted Brexit. 
NEXT UP: the end of the #EU.Dec referendum Italy, Elections 2017 France & Holland.Free Europe! #Brexit & #DrainTheSwamp#Frexit #Nexit 
#Corbyn will trounce the #Tories if  PLP get 100% behind him. that ain't going to happen they are too up their own ar**.Brexit #Toryukip uk 
England dragging us out of the World Cup against our will. Brexit all over again. #EnglandvScotland 
Britain could join USA, Canada and Mexico in new free trade area after Brexit.   
Westworld‘s Thandie Newton Dissects How She Sees Fear Working Now and During Brexit  
LOOK AT THE GAP! #Toblerone #brexit HEARTBROKEN   
Ireland REFUSE to speak to Nicola Sturgeon over her plans to thwart Brexit. Ignore her, she might go away!   
Le Pen on the #marrshow? Isn't this EXACTLY why we voted #Brexit? Surely we've got our own fascist idiot rather than importing a foreigner?  
and so it's starts #Brexit retreat all over again 
This is what PL looks like post Brexit when all the foreigners are gone... 
Brexit leader: Stop whining over Trump win  
Well done those anti-brexit Labour MPs - you now have a chance of being taken seriously and it's a great help ! 
#Brexit this guy knows what he’s talking about - LISTEN.  
The safety-pin movement started in the U.K. after Brexit and it’s coming to the U.S.  
Possession so farEngland 55%Scotland 45%ffs don't tell sturgeon or she'll want another referendum 
@CameronMcNeish Scots are singing "we're going to deep-fry your brexit!" 
It's like Brexit, if a minority of English people dragged the whole country along for the ride. 
LibDem MPs all 8 of them are demanding a second referendum on EU. Who gave them a mandate. Tune in now to @LBC 
Been a year of real statement election results.TrumpBrexitScottish independence.....oh#OneVoteAndYouFookedItUp#EnglandvScotland 
Brexit? Won't happen.Trump for President? Won't happen.Break up of EU? Won't happen...I think I see a pattern emerging#Trump #Brexit #EU 
Election is coming: EU braces for political upheaval in wake of #Trump, #Brexit shocks  
When you've lied your arse off, made promises you could never keep, accidentally won, and reality hits.#USElection2016 #Brexit #oops 
READ: Turkey pushes for free trade deal with post-Brexit Britain.   
Britain could join USA, Canada and Mexico in new free trade area after Brexit  
Well didn't @WingsScotland  on the day after the Referendum get that one right in spades!  
This is America's Brexit. Only much worse.  
Tony Benn ~ Diary entry (18 June 1974), quoted from Against the Tide. #Brexit  
If you had bet £5 at the beginning of this year on Leicester winning the league, Brexit and Trump, you would now have £15 million (Artemis) 
After Brexit, tolerant Britons adopted a simple symbol of solidarity. We should, too.  #safetypin 
all thebad thingstwentysixteenTrump wonBrexitrest inpiece Princesay it ain't so / Bowie don't goHarambe was shot / exploding phones 
Article 50 could be reversed, government may argue in Brexit case@The3Million @Scientists4EU @NewEuropeans  
Brexit & Trump—at the time people don’t realise they’re embarking on a route that will lead to a destruction period 
Astonishing that pro #Brexit & #Trump voters think they are in a revolution against 'the elite' when both votes consolidate elite's power! 
A growing number of Labour MPs are threatening to vote against the government over triggering Brexit: 
Workers' Rights granted by the European Union in jeopardy by Brexit: pic.twitter.com/mrCJn7wmhs 
I was in London when Brexit happened. I was in America when USexit happened. What will happen if I came home? 
If Brexit means anything, it means a Britain in which policemen wear proper helmets. They should also have whistles.  
"Brexit will never happen""Trump will never be President""Scotland will never qualify for the World Cup"#ENGSCO 
Brexit leader Nigel Farage calls Obama a loathsome creature - CNN- What an utter embarrassment Farage is...shame  
Some of the press are beneath contempt. From this prejudice a new movement will rise, based on equality & honesty; and a new EU, not Brexit.  
Just like Brexit: anti-immigrant feeling strongest where there are fewest immigrants  
@GreatDismal Children Of Men was on TV the other night. Watched it again with dread. Like watching V For Vendetta b4 brexit 
Ireland will only hold formal talks with Westminster and not the Scottish Government over Brexit negotiations  
Is Real Labour beginning to emerge from Corbyn's Brexit 'Eyrie'?Welcome back, one and all!#Remain 
 History Tells Us What Will Happen Next With Brexit And TrumpTHIS  SHIT  IS  IMPORTANT  READSPREAD 
Retweet if you believe @nick_clegg should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum #Brexit  
Hey @jamestaranto was right, this really is like the Brexit campaign.  
At a London coffee shop. Odd, coming from the land that voted Brexit. But London hadn't. (And majority of Americans didn't vote for Trump).  
"Fences: A Brexit Diary"  (Zadie Smith, @NYBooks July 2016) 
The Trump-Brexit voter revolt  
Riot all you want.  2016 has been the year of the White Man.  #TrumpRiot #Brexit  
EXCLUSIVE Britain could join USA, Canada and Mexico in new free trade area after Brexit  via @telegraphnews 
"We're gonna deepfry your Brexit". Genuine chant from the Tartan Army 
Internet. The great leveller. #Trump #Brexit  
UK government lawyers looking into Brexit process reversal  via @POLITICOEurope | Getty 
"I'm @timfarron & I've got more fingers, thumbs & toes than MPs. I INSIST on a 2nd #EU referendum. I'm an idiot who hates democracy"#LibDem 
VIDEO : Brexit Superstar Nigel Farage Says, "2016 is the Year of Political Revolution!"  #TrumpTrain #Brexit 
as your MP I will vote against Brexit and airport expansion in the south east 
A small way to show solidarity after Donald Trump’s presidential win, inspired by Brexit  via @voxdotcom 
Britain could join USA, Canada and Mexico in new free trade area after Brexit  
What does Brexit mean? Once we know, the people must have a vote on it | Tim Farron  
"The UK and US are countries engaged in a kind of cold civil war. That’s a recipe for economic stagnation"#Brexit 
Trump and Brexit are symptoms of the same larger problem: the longterm effects of neoliberal policies put into place by Thatcher and Reagan. 
The thing about Trump and the thing about Brexit is that these are not geographically limited events. This is a worldwide wave of bile. 
What has the EU ever done for Workers? Print this out and stick it on your wall! #Brexit #Article50 
The facists will call themselves 'anti-facists' - the anti-democrats will call themselves 'democrats' #Brexit  
READ: Construction output downturn after the Brexit vote was less severe than feared. Output rose 0.3% in September.  
Older voters were more likely to vote for Trump in the US and for #Brexit in the UK  
Irish tweeps. I have a favour to ask. Please don't watch The Late Late Show tonight. We are closer to our own Trump/Brexit than we realize 
14 countries have publicly expressed interest in a trade agreement with Britain after Brexit.  
"This Revolution - BREXIT & Trump victories - will roll out across the Western world"@Nigel_Farage today @horowitz39 Restoration Weekend. 
Democrats, Trump, and the ongoing, dangerous refusal to learn the lesson of Brexit  by @ggreenwald 
S&P just pulling out all stops now, says Italy Referendum Rejection Unlikely to Affect Rating 
So cool to see that #CalExit is a term now. Reverberates (and makes more sense!) much more than #Brexit, kudos, @YesCalifornia 
Meet Britain's new opposition: Gina Miller on her lonely Brexit battle 
With news of Trump's win after Brexit, @Irelandcricket have changed their team song to Clowns to the left of me, jokers to the right... 
On Wednesday, citing post-Brexit example, I said watch for vigilantes to start killing minorities. Today:  
BritNat's Brexit plan appears to consist of grovelling to former colonies who have since thrived. Not sure they have thought this through. 
I'm sure the £ increasing in value vs every major currency in world this week will shortly be turned into a bad news story about #brexit 
stealth booking darkzy for the same night as pondlife is gonna split notts more than brexit 
Lib Dem MPs vow to attempt to block Brexit unless there is a second referendum. All eight of them:  
A growing number of Labour MPs are threatening to vote against the government over Article 50 to thwart Brexit  
Markets recovered quickly after Trump's surprise win because of the lesson we learned from Brexit  
Working Class voting against themselves #trump #brexit #tories #ukip 
Orban spent more than Brexit Leave & Remain combined but Hungarians still wouldn't back anti-migrant referendum.  
...and fallback option for PArliament will not be WTO option hard/clean Brexit, as it also removes rights, it will have to be retaining them 
LibDem @timfarron reveals SHAMELESS bid to block Article 50: I want SECOND referendum on Brexit deal  
Keir Starmer MP in #York talking #Brexit with Rachael Maskell MP  
Yes, the media got it wrong about Trump and Brexit – here's why  
Brexit: Maybe we can show the strength of feeling here & now? Retweet means the voice of 'the people on Twitter' want to remain in the EU. 
C'mon guys! The government hasn't a bloody clue what to do about #BREXIT Tell them to bin it FAST! #NoBrexit  
TimFerron is right that if the Brexit deal is bad 4 UK we ought to resist activating Article 50,I hope more MPs do  
#Brexit and #USElection voting trends: income analysis  
The nominees for dumbest country, 2016, are...England for "Brexit"[camera pans, polite applause]USA for "Election"[wild applause] 
Lets hope Marine Le Pens wins in France. She is pro Brexit, Pro TRUMP & wants2secure France's borders.She is called a fascist. #VeteransDay 
Hanging about in another man's country just went out of fashion in 2016 via a combination of BREXIT and the arrival of President Trump 
If Brexiteers now claiming it was mainly an anti-elite 'movement' & not so much anti-immigration, must be relaxed about a soft Brexit then? 
But this is where we are, the kind of behaviour that #Brexit has made acceptable. Vile, homophobic assaults on grounds of toxic 'patriotism' 
A friend has been attacked & called a faggot for not wearing a poppy. Nationalist thugs emboldened by #Brexit (Friend is OK, physically) 
Nigel Farage: 2016 Is the Year of Political Revolution: Brexit in the UK and DONALD TRUMP   
Brexit didn't come from a campaign of lies  
Nigel Farage ‘to lead 100,000-strong march to Supreme Court on day of Brexit appeal'  Count my family IN Nigel.... 
Virtually the same exact thing happened with Brexit, but our elite media class was too arrogant and insulated to heed the lessons. 
It's Water On Mars's Fault We Didn't Learn From Brexit 
Don't we just see why Remainiacs hate @realDonaldTrump as he tells May I'll help you get you out of EU and make #Brexit work  
History Tells Us What Will Happen Next With Brexit And Trump  # via @HuffPostPol 
ATTN: All Irish Times ColumnistsYour continual use of Snowflake as an insult makes you look like a Brexit-obsessed teenager on Reddit 
Ruth Davidson's flip-flopsCampaigned for Remain - backs full hard BrexitCampaigned against Chinese investment - now backs investment 
Last night in New York to FoSF: Brexit is opportunity to plot a new course that will end partition of our island.  
"Michigan, Ohio, Pennsylvania & Wisconsin.. This is how it will happen in November." Farsighted punditry on "Rust Belt Brexit" from @MMFlint 
"BBC never will discover the answer to why it is they got this presidential election (and Brexit) so badly wrong"  
Imagine being Angela Merkel in a post-Brexit, post-Trump world. 
The same voices in TV and radio studios who are shocked by Trump’s victory were stunned by the Brexit vote  
Attached is a very detailed reason why a 2nd referendum cannot work. It was delivered at the UKIP conference  
Comparing how people voted in the #USElection and for #Brexit by gender 
Nigel Farage: 2016 Is the Year of Political Revolution: Brexit in the UK and DONALD TRUMP (VIDEO)  
UK's fourth biggest political party demands another referendum? When you only need one minibus for all your MPs (8) I would keep quiet :) 
Brexit could be reversed, government lawyers may argue  
.@TimFarron: Lib Dems wil vote against Article 50 unless the British people are given a say on final Brexit deal  
So much for a democratic UK. Just hope these numpties that try to overule or stall the #Brexit vote have alternative jobs lined up! #LeaveEU 
#Trump like #brexit victory in #UK critically dependent on naked racism bigotry & hatred Remember #JoCox #RIP #US 
Liberty is carrying out detailed research into what #Brexit means for human rights & civil liberties. Find out more:  
While everybody is talking about Brexit, our NHS is being savaged with Privatisation.  
Retired teacher donates £28,000 to local hospital after her investments saw a post-Brexit boost  
EU referendum and US election voting trends: the education divide  
Media are still refusing to label people unwilling to accept the EU referendum result and Trump being elected President as anti-Democratic. 
A small way to show solidarity after Donald Trump’s presidential win, inspired by Brexit.  
Great support for Lib Dem Brexit stance on Richmond Park doorsteps @sarahjolney1 
This is America's Brexit. Only much worse.  
Much like Brexit, this election will Haunt us for a long time to come. But we as a people Must keep fighting. 
Just saying a modern studies class with Mr Redford right about now would be an experience  #brexit #trump 
Lawyers for Britain to fight for Brexit in Supreme Court  
5 ingenious new uses for the Brexit Toblerone  
#lestweforget what Brexit really means  
Indian "liberal" oped writers:1. Got Modi 2014 wrong. 2. Got Brexit wrong.3. Got Trump wrong.Reliable market signals to bet against. 
WATCH: Boris Johnson has called on people to stop whinging about the US elections, like they did with Brexit, and get on with it.  
A small way to show solidarity after Donald Trump’s presidential win, inspired by Brexit  via @voxdotcom #Safetypin 
KASSAM: Just Like Brexit’s Cry Babies The Protesters Will Disappear, But Something Worse Will Replace Them  
Soft Brexit isn't possible. That's why the government is desperate to conceal the terms from Parliament and the people.  
Lib Dems 'will vote against article 50 if there is no new referendum'  
Americans are now wearing safety pins just like Brits did after #Brexit  
Pound creeps to five-week high as Trump takes traders' minds off Brexit  
Those clinging to white identity because you think it'll protect you 1) it's morally unkind 2) it's fluid. Look at Poles in post-Brexit UK. 
Looking forward to public Brexit meeting with @RachaelMaskell in York @ 4.30pm today then Brexit lecture @ 7pm @ York University.  
After Brexit, tolerant Britons adopted a simple symbol of solidarity. We should, too.  via @doublexmag 
Ask your Brexit blocking MP this question.Do you want to be sacked in the general election of 2017 or 2020 ? 
People have found an ingenious new use for the Brexit Toblerone  
Did you see @Matthew_Wright paying up for the bet he lost to @drdavidbull over Brexit on #wrightstuff this morning? 
Tim Farron @timfarron is standing up to brexit and has been consistently pro EU, pro Single Market. This is why we endorse @sarahjolney1 
"nearly a quarter of Europeans feel no longer welcome in the UK & a fifth plan to leave within two years".  #Brexit  
PLEASE STOP CONFLATING, BREXIT AND TRUMP, Trump didn't get the most votes, BREXIT did. #idiots 
I hate Trump win as much as the next Jewish PhD, but if y'all think popular vote is a good way to make decisions, I have a Brexit to sell u 
Brexit -where next for Nature? Some thoughts via @WildlifeTrusts- including need for overarching legal framework  
Just Like Brexit's Cry Babies The Protesters Will Disappear, But Something Worse Will Replace Them  
Looking forward to a @BBCWorld debate with @Nigel_Farage on #Brexit in London on Monday. Just like the old days...but in a new situation. 
How one pollster correctly predicted both Trump’s victory and Brexit  
jemma and catherine are so fantastic: anti brexit, anti trump, feminists and pro LGBT+ i LOVE THEM 
Lib Dem plan to wreck Brexit in the Lords is DOA.  
Excellent news: all is not lost with courageous leadership! MPs are preparing to vote against Brexit  via @HuffPostUK 
After Brexit, tolerant Britons adopted a simple symbol of solidarity. We should, too.  #safetypin 
Lib Dem plot to sabotage Brexit has been dashed by Labour who will NOT back second vote in Lords:  
Everyone up in arms about Tim Farron defying EU referendum, then u remember it's just the LibDems. Like being threatened by a poached egg... 
After a full English Brexit you need to take a big Trump. 
I was completely fucking wrong about this not being Brexit. But if it were actually Brext, a majority of Americans rejected it. 
.@YvetteCooperMP: We do a discredit to a whole series of people who voted to leave the EU if we pretend #Brexit and Trump are the same.  
Really useful explainer on the Brexit Article 50 judgment. Perfect prep for next month’s @UKSupremeCourt appeal! 
The moment I read this I switched from being a @Conservatives voter to a @LibDems voter.Thanks for taking a stand @timfarron #brexit  
Dozy Tim doesn't know he only has 8 MPs as he threatens Brexit block if no 2nd referendum is promised  
We are less than a month a way from the next big 'vote'. #Italy's constitutional referendum!  
There s no such thing as soft Brexit just as there's no such thing as soft suicide.   
The Lib Dems have threatened to block an Article 50 vote if theresa May does not promise a second referendum  
S&P predicts hard Brexit and fresh downgrade for UK  
The Brexit tabloid fantasy continues (and Harry's privacy gets a passing kick). Business as usual then !  
Really, Brexit? You're gonna throw stones? Fuck off.  
detailed article on Russia & Trump-NewsWeek 2 weeks ago-Russia made Brexit happen too.Russia is influencing elections around the world  
#NewSitcoms All liberals sitting together in their TV studios & smugly analyzing why they failed to foresee NaMo2014 or Brexit or Trump2016! 
To all those Brexit/Lexit peeps expressing shock about Trump - I wrote this back in May. You may not have listened, but you *were* warned.  
BBC's No2 politics story: "Some MPs 'ready to vote against triggering Brexit'". Actual story: "vast majority of MPs will vote for Brexit". 
Lib Dems Will Vote Against Triggering Brexit if No Second Referendum  
Those Brexit referendum "lies" in full. My NYU talk for @IndyVoices  
Thanks for the lesson Boris, but, frankly, f**k off. #Brexit means you have even less grounds to be a patronising git now than before.  
TechCrunch Disrupt London Brexit Sentiment Update: U․K․ Policy  
If Brexit and Trump show anything it's those who value fairness must do more than post to social media about it. Join us and fight for it.  
The Twilight of the Democratic Age: Trump, Brexit, and what to do to defeat populist authoritarianism 
Thanks to @NIChamber members & @britishchambers Marcus Mason for an excellent Brexit session this am. Taking NI issues to Westminster  
Brexit & Trump have blown a hole under UK foreign policy. At one point, UK may have to decide which way it will jump  
Lib Dem leader Tim Farron says his party will oppose triggering Article 50 unless second #Brexit referendum  
It's hard to see how a "hard" Brexit can be avoided, global ratings giant says  
Was Brexit in the 2015 Conservative manifesto? Well, yes it was. Turn to page 73  
Germany can't afford to have tariffs slapped on its car-makers' exports to the UK post-Brexit. We're Germany's #1 car export market! pic.twitter.com/CCeM1xAtai 
Started to write my new book "It's the labour market stupid" the why and how of Trump and Brexit'- what do you think? 
After failures in US election, EU referendum and UK election 2015, is it time to give up on polling, asks @barnespa 
Farage whether you like it or not did all the groundwork for a successful Brexit. The mans a legend. 
Buy your copy now before the pound plummets even further! #brexit  
'It makes me a bit nervous': Scottee's cabaret about queer lives in Brexit Britain  
Ireland will not hold Scottish Government Brexit talks 
Exports of goods surge in the wake of the historic referendum, as businesses look beyond the EU.  
Brexit's effect on access to new medicines - this week's editorial #accesstomedicines  
PROPERTY RISING IN UK I just saw this story on !  #brexit #trump #property 
2/2 But 30s Fascism was a part Utopian movement, driven by the young. #Trump and #Brexit are more nostalgic, and driven by an older cohort 
Attempts to frustrate, block or delay #Brexit by advocating a neverendum is not democracy it is anti-democratic  #BBC 
This is what the government will say when it appeals against the Article 50 ruling  
Exclusive: City bosses furious at Treasury minister after 15-minute meeting to discuss Government's Brexit plans.  
Brexit: a revolution?Or close, & won by:1.Immigration fear2.Voters fed up with Cameron 3.Labour constipated.4.Bad Remain campaign 
S&P predicts hard Brexit and fresh downgrade for UK  
RETWEET If you agree that Politicians should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum and get on with it! 
Here in England we voted Brexit and our American friends voted for Trump. Scottish independence really isn't such a ridiculous notion. 
A pro Brexit Tory has been chosen to fight the Sleaford and North Hykeham by-election. We should unite behind the best pro EU candidate. 
Post-Brexit Wales will welcome overseas students. They must not fall victim of UK Govt plans to reduce immigration.  
#Brexit and then #Trump allowed us to see who the traitors are among conservatives and how they should never be …   
NEW: Blow for Nicola Sturgeon as Irish minister rules out Brexit talks 
Hopefully she's finally twigged no-one gives a toss for what she thinks about him, any more than they did for what she thought about Brexit  
S&P says it's difficult to fathom how U.K. can avoid hard Brexit  via @jillianfward 
India 2014, Brexit ;Trump 2016- Disconnect of Liberals?  w/ @dhume @EllenBarryNYT @marwabalkar Avinash Iragavarapu  
FM @sebastiankurz meets @MichelBarnier, chief negotiator for #Brexit, in the frame of EU 27 consultations  
@adamboultonSKY and the Brexit parallels roll on ....  
Leaving the single market:  #singlemarket #brexit 
At their own peril.Start looking for a new job Traitors.Some MPs 'ready to vote against triggering Brexit' -BBC News  
No, Cameron's EU referendum wasn't a mistake - and Brexit didn't come from a campaign of lies either | @JohnRentoul 
Trump to fight for Brexit  
Brexit leader Nigel Farage calls Obama a loathsome creature  
Reuters: 'Hard' Brexit most likely outcome for UK leaving EU, says S&P. 
Dear #Westminster. So MPs plan to block #Brexit? Go ahead, knock yourselves out. It's your funeral. #Brexitmovement 
High time you listened to the people! #PM slaps down #Farron for ‘extremist’ #Brexit jibe!  #BBC #SKY #ITV #TORY #UK 
UK construction sees worst quarter in four years after Brexit vote  
After Brexit, tolerant Britons adopted a simple symbol of solidarity. We should, too.  via @doublexmag 
Hungary’s Orban Claims Fellow Countrymen Living In UK Won’t Be Affected By Brexit  
Brexit means Brexit: Major blow for Sturgeon as Ireland refuses to hold EU talks with the Scottish government.  
London is increasingly "another country" compared to the rest of the UK (although note 40% of Londoners voted for Brexit)  
Open Banking coming in 2018, regardless of Brexit, says Simon Kirby Economic Secretary to @hmtreasury 
MP: Trump's win is a BOOST for Britain because Obama was 'unsympathetic' to Brexit  
Trump is like Brexit, in the sense that they've promised a load of stuff they can't possibly deliver and it'll all end in tears. 
It's $2000 to file ballot initiative in California. Can we put it together for the #Calexit independence referendum?  
Brexit + US election prove: Massive gap between metropolitan elites and rest of world. UK Data + some solutions:  
The MPs who will - and won't - seek to block Brexit. My preview of the Artice 50 vote:  
Wearing a poppy after you voted for Brexit is like an American wearing a sombrero after voting for Trump. 
Brexit shoppers: you broke it, you pay for it. attitude that retailers are profiteering will crush small businesses   
we must ensure they lose their seats at the next election. Some MPs ready to vote against Brexit  via @POLITICOEurope 
Relaxing visa rules for high-skilled workers from India will help post-Brexit Britain boom  
Trump used as an excuse to push plans to create an EU Army and make the EU a "global superpower"  #Brexit 
The New BBC Training Scheme 
Here’s why Trump’s victory could make Brexit even harder 
Brexit is a national requirement!The EU & Euro will crack and fail, jump in the lifeboat and increase the distance by engaging with RoW  
Italy’s 10-year yield climbs above 2% amid concern the wave of populism will spillover to December's referendum  
People have found an ingenious new use for the Brexit Toblerone  
Trump's victory & Brexit's victory have similarities as well as many differences. This is one of the most awful similarities.  
Thanks Tim Farron. There are a lot of people who were lied to and duped and want to change their vote. A second referendum will allow that. 
Trump, Brexit and the age of popular revolt: 2016 in Long Reads  
Attempts to frustrate, block or delay Brexit by advocating a neverendum is not democracy, it is anti-democratic.  
Ireland will not hold Scottish Government Brexit talks 
#Brexit is a huge mess already, & an even bigger threat. This is so obvious that it beggars belief we haven't already just stopped it. 
Some hysterical woman cried so we should overturn the will of the British people & annul democracy. Yeah, doesn't work like that. #Brexit  
Brexit trawler: UK fishermen have high hopes for future  
An #EURef2 on the final #Brexit deal is a good idea, but only if #Article50 is revocable - which has not been established. @timfarron 
Blind mystic Baba Vanga who predicted 9/11, Brexit and birth of ISIS warns Obama will be ‘the last US president’  :/ 
Trump, Brexit and the age of popular revolt: 2016 in Long Reads  
Trump and Brexit are retaliation for neoliberalism and corruption  
Todays twitter poll: Pundits say "Brexit &Trump show you can't ignore the working class". If we all must be categorised, what class are you? 
If people are being paid to protest about #trump and #brexit - where do I apply? 
The Lib-Dems want a referendum on a final EU deal before we trigger Article 59 and start to negotiate the deal. They must be literally mad. 
It is my democratic right and my duty to oppose Brexit. I oppose it with all my heart. It is wrong, it is destructive, it legitimises racism 
So: Mass protests against Trump victory: good, activist! Mass protest against judicial Brexit delay: bad, Fascist  
Am speaking in Lewes this evening on Brexit and Trump and the law and policy of reality.  Pop along to @headstrongclub if you are around. 
Vital someone speaks for the 48% minority - well done @timfarron & @libdems.We must keep explaining the impact of Brexit on lives in the UK  
God, I’ve had enough of you. You consciously stabbed at the primal FEAR button with only a few degrees less severity than Trump/Brexit.  
They didn't think we would vote to #Brexit. They didn't think America would vote #DonaldTrumpThe out of touch insulated from reality media 
Theresa May faces Brexit resistance as MPs line up threatening to vote against Article 50  
UK's Lib Dems will vote against triggering Brexit if no second referendum  
I wish people would stop saying the Trump is like Brexit.It just makes me wonder whether we'll get Soft Trump or Hard Trump... 
Whinger Tim the plank Farron wants a second referendum is he the worst MP of all time completely out of touch with the great British Public 
The Sun again found guilty of telling lies during #brexit #Referendum :  
Very excited to be collecting this little fellow today....was tempted to call him Brexit but sadly been vetoed  
The last thing we need is anybody anything like as daft as Mrs Merkel.Trump will be good for jobs in UK after BREXIT  
A long transition period is needed to ensure #Brexit works for the City, says JP Morgan chief to the Chancellor  
Well said, Tim Farron. Voters not offered any choice of hard or soft Brexit, and Tory manifesto promised we would stay in the single market. 
It's back! The pound emerges as an unlikely winner after the U.S. election  
To lazily dismiss all Brexit or Trump voters as bigots is bigotry on the other side of the coin.My thoughts...  
Bowie, Prince, Cohen, Brexit, Trump. 
Art 50 bill will succeed so let's do it NOW! Salisbury Convention applies as manifesto says honour referendum result  
"It was actually about uhhhhh Brexit. Also it's about something that will happen next year. I'll let you know at that time"  
Far-right Brexit leader Nigel Farage, who helped Trump campaign, called Obama a "loathsome creature"  
Blow for Nicola Sturgeon as Irish reject plea for direct talks over Brexit  
The NEW Brexit Highway code. Do share.  
Rare letter from 2 former Lord Chancellors on p64 of today's Daily Mail says Brexit judges were not enemies of people  
Donald Trump and Brexit have highlighted the struggle to inform people in the internet age.  
Typically thoughtful piece from @TheEconomist on the need for parliamentary scrutiny to avoid a hard Brexit: 
Best brexit deal for the UK is #NoBrexit @timfarron 
Had an enjoyable chat with .@NickFerrariLBC @LBC re the collective emotional breakdown of the UK Left! Brexit now Trump =  
This is the sort of opposition to #Brexit that Corbyn's Party should be providing. Not the weary, drudging acceptance of it.  
Lib Dem leader Tim Farron says his party will oppose triggering Article 50 unless there is second #Brexit referendum  
"Lest we forget.... oh shit we totally forgot!" #Brexit #Trump #ArmisticeDay 
Damn @hasanminhaj. Cc Brexit  
The reasons for Trump were also the reasons for Brexit | John Harris  
That was always the deal. If we want Brexit and Trump, then we're not allowed Leonard Cohen. 
People have found an ingenious new use for the Brexit Toblerone  
Trump victory provides tail wind for anti-establishment votes across Europe. In Italy's referendum 52.4% of voters planning to vote NO (BBG)  
LD MPs to vote against Article 50, unless there's a promise of a second referendum on the exit deal @Fermentedmust  
An isolationist and protectionist President Trump means fewer trade deals and less global trade. The idea he makes Brexit work is delusional 
The majority of Brexit or Trump voters aren't bigots. But, tarring everyone with the same brush is bigotry on the other side of the coin. 
Nicola Sturgeon Burns Her Bridges in a PRO-EU Crusade.Threats Spat at the UK, Insults at POTUS.Should She Rely Solely on the EU ?#Brexit  
BBC News - Some MPs 'ready to vote against triggering Brexit'  
Tim Farron defends his second Referendum demand by saying "the people are sovereign" - unless 52% want out of Europe I presume? 
From Brexit to Trump "Commentators will “try to normalise” the result.  Don't. Both Brexit and Trump are horrible  
BREXIT: @LibDemPress says they will vote AGAINST Article 50 unless people allowed vote on deal. 
Lib Dem leader Tim Farron confirms his band of 8 will block Article 50 unless there's a second Referendum. He really has caught the mood 
.@TimFarron lays out @LibDems red line on Article 50. We will vote against unless British people given referendum on final Brexit deal  
Funny to hear Tim Farron invoking Trump’s unexpected victory as inspiration for the Lib Dems blocking Brexit vote. 
JAMIE FOSTER: Trump, Brexit and a new Freedom.  
.@TimFarron: We must not impose on British people a hard Brexit without giving them a say over final deal #r4today 
The Liberal Democrats are only party with clear position on #brexit & we remain resolutely, unapologetically pro EU @BBCr4today @timfarron 
Tim Farron on @BBCr4today defending genuine democracy and asking for people to have a vote on the terms of #Brexit. Absolutely right 
Farage: Hi, Donald. It's Nigel, I'm in America.Trump: Who?Farage: Nigel. You remember. Brexit. Your go-between.Trump: *click, brrrr*  
An Article 50 Brexit Bill is even more likely to pass than before  
In post-Brexit Britain, there is appeal in this portrait of a leader who is dignified and steadfast  
Referendum uncertainty is bad for economy, says former head of Scottish Enterprise Jack Perry. Read more here:...  
#Brexit and #Trump are similar - divisive, hate-fuelled campaign - leads to victors wondering why half the country hates them 
Some MPs 'ready to vote against triggering Brexit'  
The reasons for Trump were also the reasons for Brexit | John Harris  
Why the media got it so wrong on Trump and Brexit  via FR_Conversation 
This is America's Brexit. Only much worse.  
.@TimFarron: Lib Dem MPs will vote against Article 50 unless British people are given a say over final Brexit deal  
Hahaha snowflaks saying #Clinton received more votes so she should have won. Shame you don't apply that logic to the referendum result  
We should trust Sturgeon to fight Scotland's corner on Brexit. My column in @thetimes today. 
Brexit leaves London-based banks facing 'nightmarish' choices  
Some (currently rare) good news in the fight against xenophobic populism: Orbán lost referendum & parliamentary vote. Hate failed in Hungary  
In the US as in Brexit Britain, reject, resist, shun, boycott where viable, and scorn them.  
Voting against Brexit - the Lib Dem and Labour MPs set to oppose Article 50, from @BBCr4today 
Does anyone remember voting to open the borders and bring an end to our culture & civilization?No me neither.#DrainTheSwamp #Brexit #Trump 
MSM-please cut the 'Brexit is a revolution' stuff.It was tight,won by whipping up immigration fear & vague slogans.It would reverse now. 
Enemies of the people: MPs 'ready to vote against triggering Brexit'  
May and her gov mocked and turned their back on Trump Nigel stood by him, now Nigel has more say than May, we will BREXIT  
I am not keen on brexit or trump - but democracy allowing dissenting views to come to power is awesome.  Compare/contrast w China Russia 
I could cope with brexit, I could cope with Trump. But this? This? No. RIP Leonard  
“History tells us what may happen next with Brexit &amp; Trump” — Tobias Stone  
Governments and the Media Never thought Trump could win Just showed how out of touch they all are 
Brexit Britain needs the closest possible relationship with Donald Trump's America  
And the TNT commentary - from Shaq's strong words to Kenny to Bones - was a referendum on Cousins' leadership  
2016 has been an awful year. Brexit.Donald Trump becoming president.Glen Johnson potentially moving to Barcelona 
A small way to show solidarity after Donald Trump’s presidential win, inspired by Brexit - Vox #safetypin  
President Zuma must call a national referendum on Act 108 of 1996 to restore the land to the people.The people not the state as its colonial 
"I never thought I would experience such an Orwellian nightmare in my country" - John Van Reenen on #Brexit  
Overheard:Things like Brexit & Trump are why aliens won't talk to us 
After #Brexit, a #Calexit? Californians turn their backs on @realDonaldTrump  
.@RhonddaBryant,Stick to British politics tosser. We have enough left-wing loons of our own to deal with. #Brexit #TrumpWon 
Lib Dem, Labour and SDLP MPs tell the BBC they are prepared to vote against triggering Brexit.  
Trump’s strategy of making the race all about him worked. It was a referendum on him. 
The Trump/Brexit analogy needs to be handled carefully and not misunderstood as identity. Clinton would win by landslide in UK!  
"Brexit is regrettable, but it has the silver lining of distracting the Tories from doing damage elsewhere."  
Still gets me we watched Brexit and folks still set at home while white America rallied to elect a bigoted, sexual predator the next POTUS. 
#GER #EU whineover #USElection #Brexit /but refuse to SecureBorder that exposes all #Cologne #Paris #Brussels 
French tourism is suffering from Brexit and the fear of terrorism  
55% of Millennials did not vote. An abstention was, in effect, a vote for Trump. Same deal as Brexit. We were warned.  
I know I laughed at the Brexit idiots but this punishment seems undue 
After Brexit and Trump, here are the next five dominoes at risk in Europe  
THE SAFETY PIN:  IT'S NOT JUST FOR BREXIT ANYMORE  
We just lost Leonard Cohen, so that's Bowie, Alan Rickman, prince, Mrs Merton, Victoria Wood, Brexit and KKK backed Trump. Fucking 2016.  
Everyone should re-read Zadie Smith's brilliant Brexit piece now. I may have to get the last line of this paragraph as a tattoo  
This is America's Brexit. Only much worse.  
Obama said the election was a referendum on his legacy. America agreed:  
Reminder: Facebook = Hate Machine = Brexit = Trump. Social Media is The New Cigarettes  #  @HuffPostTech 
Oh for fucks sake.... Prince, David Bowie, Leonard Cohen... Brexit, Trump.... The Mayans were just off by a few years. 
A small way to show solidarity after Donald Trump’s presidential win, inspired by Brexit  via @voxdotcom 
Odd that in Brexit and Trump victory, voter turn-out among young people was low. Yet they are the most vocal in protesting both. 
This was made in the wake of Brexit and it's apparent in the last two days we need it too  via @YouTube 
It's Event Television's Fault We Didn't Learn From Brexit 
The global order is disintegrating - and not before time #Brexit  
The new nationalism of Brexit and Trump is a symptom of the digital age:  by @rushkoff via @FastCoExist 
Election Update: The BrockTV referendum passes with 81.5% of the vote #brocku 
After Brexit, tolerant Britons adopted a simple symbol of solidarity. We should, too.  via @doublexmag 
RIP Leonard Cohen. After Bowie, Prince, Brexit & US election, feels like the year genius died & morons took over.   
Trump e Brexit: 5 fatores em comum  
#UK #Brexit You are not alone over there. We are going to keep up and even increase the successes between our nations. #Trump #MAGA #GOP 
Tony Abbott, rolled by Turnbull over 30 bad polls, says Brexit/US vote shows why 'we should not be ruled by polls'  
David Bowie. Prince. Brexit. Pete Burns. President-Elect Trump. Leonard Cohen.Well Fuck You very much, 2016. 
I like this. Also nice way to show #empathy. >> A small way to show solidarity inspired by Brexit  #SafetyPin 
Is Trump victory good for Brexit? #Trump2016  #TRUMP #MAGA #NewsUsa #Deplorable #President 
Wear a safety pin prominently to show that you will help those who are targeted. This started after Brexit in the UK.  
know when FM went to EU after Brexit & junior minister took her for a Bratwurst (sausage to U & me) & said Nein, well here's Ireland   
Since June 27 (Monday after Brexit)High Beta: +26%Low Vol: -1%$SPHB $SPLV 
Trump, Brexit & Hanson - how we need to respond to defend #humanrights. My @smh opinion:  #auspol 
I remember similar incidents reported in the immediate days after the Brexit vote  
A small way to show solidarity after Donald Trump’s presidential win, inspired by Brexit  via @voxdotcom 
SAFETY PINS: Show solidarity after Trump win, inspired by Brexit via @voxdotcom Just bought 2k of em via @amazon  
Bye America! Thanks for having me! I still  you. Even though I'm happy to head home. Never thought I'd feel nostalgia for Brexit. 
Remember in June when people began to draw Brexit-Trump comparisons, and pundits reflexively dismissed this as fundamentally un-Serious? 
California org pushes for referendum to secede after Trump victory  
I checked that factoid. Here's what you said about Brexit:   You really freaked out!  
"The Trump victory, like the Brexit vote which foretold it, represents a crisis of capitalist liberal democracy."  
How bad an idea is brexit? The financial markets are less spooked by Donald Trump becoming President of USA than by brexit. 
#bbcqtDominic Raab looking very uncomfortable. Wondering if he's realised #Brexit is a really bad idea now - NATO 
Due to the high ingredient costs brought on by Brexit, Toblerone bars sold in the UK now feature larger gaps between their triangles. 
Racial and religious hate crimes rose 41% after Brexit, in case anyone thinks this wasn't predictable  
What is it about people who talk about democracy & them complain when they don't like the result @realDonaldTrump #brexit. It's not perfect 
What #PresidentTrump potentially means for #Brexit #Britain explained in 75 seconds!  #BBC #SKY #ITV #UK #TORY #NEWS 
Nigel Farage: 2016 Is the Year of Political Revolution: Brexit in the UK and DONALD TRUMP (VIDEO)  
Jonathan Pie nails it on Trump and Brexit - the smug left-wing who think anyone who thinks differently to them is evil are are also at fault  
Italy's prolonged recession, charted (courtesy of Moody's). Something tells me a referendum about "reforms" is not going to end well.  
After Brexit, tolerant Britons adopted a simple symbol of solidarity. We should, too.  #safetypin 
It is Brexit 2.0.  All the promises are being broken right out of the gate.  
#bbcqtBrexit is far too risky now that Trump is in charge, the world has changed  
we will never agree! I suppose the reason most journalists couldn't believe Trump won was because they didn't understand Brexit.  
Even the people across the pond who are traumatized by Brexit think we are crazy:  
The Executive Producer of #bbcqt is @HayleyVa.  She is- Anti #Brexit- Anti Trump- Pro LabourNow you know why #bbcqt is utter garbage 
Blind mystic who 'predicted Brexit, 9/11 and ISIS' warned Obama would be 'last US president' #Trump #USElection2016  
Serbian dissident friend of mine said, before Brexit, UK is going to become the next former Yugoslavia #FUK 
"The body is more a place than an object for me" – Antony Gormley RA on finding his subject, education and Brexit:  
'Brexit is not going away'. No it's not, but there is absolutely nothing you can do to prevent it. Sleep well. #bbcqt 
Nice to see post #Brexit xenophobia extending to Scots as @TasminaSheikh booed by #bbcqt audience for daring to mention Scotland 
Just like post-Brexit UK, hate crime has increased in post-Trump America. And who can be surprised?#bbcqt 
"I'm worried about the radicalisation of white racists" @sarahchurchwell on #bbcqtJust as true in Brexit UK as Trump's USA 
I think Brexiteers have misunderstood. Trump wants Brexit because he doesn't like treaties. He has no intention of offering us one. 
Trump, like Brexit, has turned over the stones - and all the racist, homophobic, sexist bugs that we thought were gone, are back. #BBCQT 
George Orwell put it best when he wrote that voters are not victims but accomplices. #Election2016 #Brexit 
He case you haven't work it out Toby the EU referendum was about identity and immigration. The US election hinged on exactly the same  
Au revoir Twitter tribeAm off to cycle (partly) from Bangkok to Saigon with my sonWhile I'm gone please:1) dump Trump2) banish Brexit 
Most hilarious group: Brits who voted for Brexit, but are shocked Americans voted for Trump. I can't even. 
This #bbcqt panel is a fine example of why people voted for Trump and Brexit. 
A small way to show solidarity after Donald Trump’s presidential win, inspired by Brexit  via @voxdotcom 
What do we not know about Brexit? An awful lot. Do not read before going to bed.   
Nothing explains #Trump and #Brexit better than listening to self-righteous out-of-touch political correctness on BBC Question Time.#bbcqt 
If we Brexit, we'll need America more than ever. I suggest our politicians stop spewing bile re #Trump & respect his new position. #bbcqt 
I really don't know what to make of the US election. But while America figures that out let's focus on Brexit. Let's stop Brexit. No Brexit. 
#bbcqt Remoaner Labour bore Yvette Cooper on talking rubbish as usual ,she does not get it Brexit Trump win Labour never get elected again 
I'm so glad leftists still can't understand why Trump won, or Brexit. It means they won't win an election for a generation. #bbcqt 
Joe: #Election2016 "American Brexit" Americans voted to exit from Decency. Me: they voted to exit from us--the rest of America. 
Nigel Farage: 2016 Is the Year of Political Revolution: Brexit in the UK and DONALD TRUMP (VIDEO)  via @gatewaypundit 
It must be awful for .@YvetteCooperMP Nobody listened to her over #Brexit. Nobody listened to her over US election She is talking to herself 
Uptick in racial violence after #election2016 also presaged by #brexit. In UK, July saw a 41% rise in racial/religiously-motivated offenses 
After #Trump and #Brexit, I am increasingly convinced that #Milosevic is the most influential political figure of our time. Why? 1/ 
#BBC......You did it in #Brexit and now you did it again. You have failed completely to represent the #democratic view of the majority.. 
I suspect they have observed the absurdities of the Ref & been considerate of the victims who are decent & valuable Europeans. #Brexit  
Donald Trump's face today was exactly the same as Boris Johnson's after Brexit won. Both broke shit, didn't expect to have to foot the bill 
So after lying about #Brexit and then lying about #Trump some bozos still think the #BBC has a future. #bbcqt 
Astonishing that some Euro MEPs would want to help us, despite the Brexit rhetoric. Altruism and decency alive and well in Luxemburg!  
A similarity between the US election and Brexit is that the youth have been betrayed. 
brexit worries ya?trump worries ya?thousands of disabled people dying in poverty didnt worry ya?then fuck right off. 
Trump won for the same reason that #Brexit won.Because people r sick of  elite/establishment/luvvies sneering down their noses at  people. 
Dear Twitter, do you agree with Michael or do you think this sort of sneering ungraciousness might be the problem that led to Trump/Brexit?  
Mainstream media doesn't bother with the working classes opinion, no wonder polls are skewed, brexit proved it, Irish election also  #vinb 
A small way to show solidarity after Donald Trump’s presidential win, inspired by Brexit  via @voxdotcom #SafetyPin 
V.good piece by @johnharris1969 on the comparison between Brexit and Trump and the effects of globalisation  
Think we got away with this one, can't tell the difference  @Ginofantastico @lemontwittor #brexit #CelebJuice 
#Brexit came for @Ginofantastico!  #CelebJuice 
Trump’s win deepens pro-Europeans’ commitment to maintaining unity at all costs and take a tough stance on Brexit 
"The Trump victory, like the Brexit vote which foretold it, represents a crisis of capitalist liberal democracy."  
Ok.....Brexit, Trump....yada yadaIs it wrong for a country to want to be more independent these days?Educate me #TexasbornRedneck  
Mr Brexit to the rescue. @realDonaldTrump @Nigel_Farage 
This MEP wants to help British people keep their EU citizenship - even after Brexit actually happens  
London-based banks face 'nightmarish' choices after Brexit  
1/5‘Liberal’-Left outraged at voters for both Brexit & Trump are spitting the “populism” smear with even more venomous contempt than usual 
When you've lied your arse off, promised millions of lunatics the Earth, accidentally won, and reality hits.#USElection2016 #Brexit #oops 
 However earnestly the media try and explain socio-economic reasons for Trump & Brexit, this just isn't right. 
@bbcquestiontime #bbcqt #brexit #indyref2 just a reminder qt next week comes from Stirling audience buses leave London at 9am sharp 
If there are differences with Brexit this a hugely unfortunate similarity ... @Bonn1eGreer  
Trump election same as Brexit. If all the young people now complaining had voted, they could have democratically defeated both of them. 
Need more Americans for this Brexit/Trump commiseration gift exchange! Help cheer a fellow liberal up:  
BBC are so biased, they are so out of touch with the normal working class person. Always showing the negatives of: Brexit, Farage and trump 
OK NI - when it's Brexit or Trump you should accept the result & get over it but when it's flags or 'gay' cake it must be resisted ! #GotIt 
RE Trump victory… not felt so happy since #Brexit day … look on #BBC luvvies faces… ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha 
Well quite frankly after Brexit, not sure England can talk. 
Look where Britain's Brexit elite plot. No expense spared  
Got a link?“@FreyaB_73: @johncusack - @NaomiAKlein was extraordinary on @BBCRadio4 this am. Trump/Brexit as people 'lashing out in pain'” 
Have not spoken to one person who says Trump is good news for UK/Brexit - if anyone knows of arguments suggesting otherwise, pls send links 
WEAR A SAFETY-PIN ON YOUR LAPEL TO REJECT THIS PRESIDENCY.  The better Brits did it to signify their rejection of BREXIT.  REJECT SEXIT! 
This document would have been more helpful before the vote Brexit Unknowns published by @UKParliament 
The verdict of the British people was #Brexit and we must respect it  
Let's be specific: Goldsmith must not win Richmond Park. To accept a Referendum that will do profound damage to our country is not possible. 
The reasons for Trump were also the reasons for Brexit  
#Brexit happened because of #immigration, Germany is finished and America voted in #Trump because of immigration. It’s all about immigration 
Fantastic,#Brexit,Trump victory, now we need Marine Le Pen and Geert Widers to be elected. 
Don't you love Brexit/Trump cultural luddites who  complain about globalisation and shrinking world by writing on the World Wide Web. 
Plague Inc: Evolved's latest update adds Brexit and vampires to the pandemic. Yes, really:  
Hate crimes went up 41% post-Brexit. Things will be worse here. Watch out for others. Speak up for those who can't speak for themselves. 
Spoke to an older couple earlier today who voted leave on Brexit "still haven't forgiven the Germans for bombing us" *SCREAMS INTO OBLIVION* 
The Dow surged to an all time high today despite investment bankers predicting doom as they did before Brexit... 
People jaw on about globalisation and the left-behinds and Trump and Brexit. Alex's thread lays out how this stuff actually happens.  
Voters in South Dakota overwhelmingly rejected a referendum to lower the minimum wage for young workers.  #FightFor15 
I know. More - maybe far more - than half, looking at the turnout. See also the Brexit vote in the U.K.  
Donald J Trump won the election by winning what Michael Moore called “the Brexit states.”  Michigan, Wisconsin, Ohio, Pennsylvania. 
This. Brexit felt a lot like a surprise bereavement. Can totally see Trump winning feeling the same way to non-bigot Americans.  
Not buying this 'politics is dead' drama.Brexit was a narrow win,with a perfect storm & whipped up immigration fear.Not a world 'movement' 
Americans are adopting this (inspired by Brexit) to provide safety to marginalized people #SafetyPin h/t @CocoDavies 
Benefits cuts for the poor while the tax-dodging rich drool over the prospect of a Tory tax haven #Brexit#Remain 
Brexit and Trump mark a whitelash. Politicians must not pander to it | Polly Toynbee  At her best 
The time is now, Germany. We The People are winning! Remove #Merkel #abmerkeln #merkelmusswegLet us #DrainTheSwamp & follow #Brexit  
Britain's Parliament is the right place for Brexit's knotty details to be untangled  
Oct 31 - May's promises to Nissan depend on a deal her immigration promises will probably render impossible #Brexit 
After Brexit, tolerant Britons adopted a simple symbol of solidarity. We should, too.  
Fundamental rights removed with Article 50, requiring Parliament' approval #Brexit  
Sorry, but our US Stock market is not experiencing the same effects that UK did, following #Brexit! The market loves Trump!  #MAGA 
the thesis is totaly sound -- dangerous refusal to learn the lesson of Brexit  by @ggreenwald 
UK MSM is ‘liberal’-bias cesspit. Flattering, sanitised reportage of anti-Trump protests aim to delegitimise vote outcome, just like Brexit. 
This makes sense: all looney lefties have a regular date with a shrink. What a surprise.#DrainTheSwamp #Trump #Brexit  
a la Brexit meaning 5 billion GBP would go to the UK's National Health Service. Which...it won't.  
Donald Trump in USBrexit in U.K.Marine La Pen in France The AFD in Germany It gives me cause for concern in Nigeria 
S&P: Hard Brexit is the most likely outcome 
Same sort of things happened post-brexit.Gay man has 'head smashed open' by Trump supporters on election night. 
I oppose Nigel Farage's #Brexit but in a democracy he has a right to march in protest against the judges I support. Defend right to protest!  
Trump victory is 4 the middle class, our Constitution & for Western Civilization. Brexit & now we r Americans again!  
If we’re going to stick with the Brexit analogy, we’ve hit the “spending on healthcare numbers” part of the fun.  
The reasons for Trump were also the reasons for Brexit | John Harris  
Post Brexit: Prince Harry felt need to make unprecedented public statement condemning harassment and abuse of his biracial U.S. girlfriend 
We'll now hear that these reports are exaggerated or simply over-reported for dramatic effect, a la Brexit.  
“History tells us what may happen next with Brexit & Trump” by Tobias Stone  
The real Brexit-Trump connection is the transatlantic elite's hatred of democracy  pic.twitter.com/8DK3dd4RbD 
Official figures in the UK put reports of racial & homophobic attacks up over 40% since Brexit. That will be our fate. #TrumpConsequences 
Seeing disgusting things happening in the usa because of this, basically what happened in the UK after brexit.Humans are disgusting 
I don't know what's happened on Day 2. But this also happened post-Brexit, and needs to be taken seriously.  
The SfEU take on why Trump makes Brexit more dangerous:(clue: right-wing links, climate change and trade)  
A small way to show solidarity after Donald Trump’s presidential win, inspired by Brexit  
Where climate may currently not enable a law or a referendum, what strategies and activism may affect that? This is obvi most long-term. 6/? 
Bike prices could rise because of Brexit vote, says Halfords  
What's the Oregon version of Brexit? ORExit?  
Excellent, useful analysis of 'post-truth politics' by @election_data - on Brexit, Corbyn, immigration, Trump  
@GalwayProChoice face off with anti-choicers. @nuigalway #Centenarytalks @EndaKennyTD #repealthe8th #Referendum  
Recent events have proved that we are not learning the lessons from history.A sobering article.#Trump #Brexit 
—What states don't have pro-choice laws on the books?—Those who do: can these be constitutionalized? How? Which by referendum? (4/?) 
@GuyVerhofstadt Britain can now give a lead to the world by stopping brexit dead ,and aligning strongly with Europe 
Jacob Rees Mogg, who called Heathrow's 3rd runway "essential to the nation", campaigning for Zac Goldsmith in his "Heathrow referendum".   
Trump is so out of his depth. He's got that terrified look in his eyes, like a post-Brexit Boris/waking up in bed with a murder victim. 
After the referendum I said that things would get worse before they got even worse. I think I was right. 
May position on Trump shaping up to be: "We need him for a post-Brexit trade deal so learn to like him or shut up."  
Did you vote in the #EuRef?What would you have voted in #USElection2016?#Trump #Brexit 
I don't know much but I do know a post-Trump our band and post-Brexit @wearevant is going to make for one hell of an angry tour coming up. 
‘High time you listened to the people!’ PM slaps down Farron for ‘extremist’ Brexit jibe  
What's a Brexit and can I eat it? 
House of Commons Library - “#Brexit: some legal, constitutional and financial unknowns” tl;dr: no-one’s got a clue  
Trump will be President but will #Brexit happen? A short video explaining the Article 50 case in plain English. Please RT  
#Brexit: ask the experts. Free talked by @commonslibrary Wednesday 16 November #UKPW16 
Dear BoJo the clown, you don't get to strengthen relations with European countries by leaving the EU. #brexit  
Parallels between Trump win and Brexit?  @MorningsMaria @FoxBusiness 
The reasons for Trump were also the reasons for Brexit | John Harris  
If Donald Trump's America won't defend Europe from Russia, Britain's Brexit negotiating position gets much stronger  
This man, "bllckchps", has captured the key feature uniting Farage, Trump, Brexit and fascism more broadly.  
FARAGE CALLS OBAMA 'LOATHSOME CREATURE'Brexit champion spoke at GOP rally in U.S. during presidential campaign  
Looks very much like the #Brexit, doesn’t it?  
Theresa May calls for ‘golden era’ between China and UK as Vice Premier Ma Kai flies in for post-Brexit trade talks  
Creator of indie game Paper Brexit has another psychological text adventure: Paper Drumpf.  
.@iamsambeeBrexit = good thing for EnglandTrump's election = good thing for USASo I assume u oppose them to ingratiate yourself w media. 
London's property market is "tanking by the day," management company says  
Trump e Brexit: 5 fatores em comum  #eleiçõesnoseua #G1 
London business wants to grant city visas to avoid a Brexit skills shortage  
I'm thinking of wild carding at Valencia!? Brexit, Trump and Sean Emmett as the 10th winner @MotoGP #dreamsaregreat 
BRITAIN: Brexit was the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertakeUSA: Hold my drink 
I was never 'left behind'. I voted Brexit. 
UK government one page summary of its grounds to appeal the Brexit judgment  
Just written a long post about how i feel when people say that Brexit & Trump remind them of my 2006 novel Farthing  
As the final result of the US election came in, @GMB attracted 1m viewers and 17% share - second only to the referendum result in June!  
If we don't leave the Single Market, we will still have to send money to Brussels. That's not what the British people voted for. #Brexit  
National UK election, Israeli election, Brexit vote, US Presidential elections.. Stunning string of nearly identical media/polling failures. 
#Brexit 2.0: How 'Trexit' will change campaign strategies globally.   
'Good for us – BAD for Europe' President Trump will be great for post-Brexit Britain  
Watch @AnnCoulter explain to @IainDale why the combination of Brexit and Trump will bring US and UK closer together  
In next week’s BRIEFINGS: The US election & markets, Brexit’s fallout & Global Entrepreneurship Week  
Why haven't social services sorted it out? Busy with 'child' migrants 
for Americans who want to know what the hate crime in the UK was like after Brexit, I wrote this at the time:  
Retweet if you believe @nick_clegg should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum  
The #farright is in the ascendency but it does not own the future, writes @lowles_nick  #Trump #brexit #populism 
“History tells us what may happen next with Brexit & Trump” by Tobias Stone  
This article illustrates the challenges of Brexit for the @Brexpats team so well we could have written it ourselves! 
Persuading life-sciences companies to stay in Brexit Britain could be an expensive business  
#brexit #TrumpPresident It's the age of "Triggering"... and it's gonna be FUNNY! 
He's an MEP, EU that hateful institution you adore. Interim leader of UKIP who got 4 million votes at GE & star campaigner for Brexit. YOU?  
Day 4 of our cross-Parliament #Brexit campaign. A question a day, in both Parliaments, until we have clarity.  
Young, British and living in Europe: "#Brexit has turned our lives upside down". Full article at  
Brexit + Trump = Brumpit which almost sounds like crumpet. I like crumpets. This is my way of rationalising what's happening at the moment. 
Also my phone autocorrects Breitbart to 'Brexit art.' One for the ages. 
Stories like this make me wonder how news media shd think about how to report politics post Brexit & post-Trump. Thoughts to @newswatchbbc? 
Here's the big question: Post-Truth politics worked for Brexit & Trump. So, does the liberal/left follow this lead, and just lie too? 
Trump, British Prime Minister Theresa May discuss U.K. relationship after Brexit  
Labour politicians need to drop this narrative that Trump's victory and Brexit are entirely about the "left behind". It's simply not true. 
Trying to work out how:Leicester PL ChampionsBrexit Liverpool top of the leagueDonald Trump president of USA  
First Brexit, then Trump, now 2 Agile Coaches in a room for 8 hours and not a post it note in sight! #worldgonemad 
"After Brexit: reflections on the politics of migration, race and gender" Join the debate at WE Party conference:  
Graph from 2014 that explains:a) Brexitb) why London finds it so hard to explain Brexit  
Businesses propose granting visas to EU nationals in London to avoid Brexit skills shortage  
Exports of goods surge in the wake of the historic referendum as businesses look beyond the EU  
I'm not homophobic, I'm not racist, I'm not a fan of Trump or Farage. What I am a fan of is democracy. #Brexit or #Trump the people decided. 
Trump achieved the Brexit-style upset he had promised, riding a surge of turnout among white-working-class voters.  
Post-Brexit barriers to free movement of labor will hurt more than barriers to trade | @CEPS_thinktank Daniel Gros 
Victor Orban Hungarian Prime Minister held talks with @theresa_may on #Brexit. Hungry agreed to maintain a good relationship as we leave EU.  
Just told if u'd of put a £5 bet on Trump becoming president, Brexit happening &Leicester winning the premiership the returns would be 5mil 
Trump Win Echoes Brexit, and Boosts Europe's Populists  
Just read Brexit and the election of Trump described as the 'Dickhead Spring'. I can go with that. 
Hey America can we adopt the post-#Brexit wearing of a safety pin to show our fellow community members that we are a safe space/protector? 
This makes me sad, and angry. America after Trump's election. Britain seen the same, with Brexit. I say NO to #racism, and all forms of hate 
Brexit and the impending constitutional crunch. My @TheEconomist column this week:  
Nigel Farage calling Obama a 'creature' could not be going down worse  via @HuffPostUKPol #Trump #Brexit 
.@ggreenwald on "Democrats, Trump, and the Ongoing, Dangerous Refusal to Learn the Lesson of Brexit"  
W/@MichelBarnier discussed #EU27 preparations 4 #Brexit negotiations,focused on #EU unity & clarity of the process for citizens & businesses 
In 20 years time and you're at a pub quiz and a question starts with, "in what year", just answer 2016@BBCBreaking #brexit #TrumpPresident 
Delighted with this review of the Brexit book I edited for @Arron_banks and @andywigmore 
I acknowledge that Brexit & Trump won. But, I do not accept racism and xenophobia. I reject that. I fight against that. Now and forever. 
#USElections2016: Donald Trump invites British PM Theresa May to visit 'as soon as possible'  #Brexit  
Dow record high shattered as #TrumpRally is...BIGGERBETTERFASTERSTRONGERThan post #Brexit market surge.#MAGA3X 
The #EU seems to be changing its own rules on solvency to attract post #Brexit banks to Frankfurt.  Ho-hum  
Blank faced white house staff listen as Obama tells them Trump has won. We know the feeling. - 
I find it so rich (i.e. infuriating) that @ggreenwald, who minimized Trump's chances, is now chiding others for missing "lessons of Brexit" 
If one person had bet on Donald Trump, Brexit and a Leicester win they could have won £30m  
It'll be 'Brexit times 100,' disaster for Texas, if Trump makes good on trade promises |  @JillCowan 
I'm annoyed by British people laughing that Trump is president just as much it annoyed me when people from the US were making fun of Brexit. 
Pollsters have got some front still wheeling out polls without shame despite brexit and trump making them look like idiots! 
After Brexit And Trump, Pollsters Struggling To Deal With Shifting Political Landscape  
Maybe he was calling in on David Davis' Brexit hotline...  
Forget Trump and Brexit, let’s all go live in the internet  
Congratulations @LNBDublin on your appointment and a good choice by @GUENGL #Brexit #PostBrexit 
Why Trump and Brexit won.  
Forget Trump and Brexit, let's all go live in the internet -   
And then of course whites are talking about a move to England, as though post-Brexit UK is somehow more comfortable and secure than here. 
'Good for us – BAD for Europe' President Trump will be great for post-Brexit Britain  
So many complaints over mainstream media coverage of Brexit & Trump, so why is crowd-funded journalism almost dead?  
Zac Goldsmith has accused me of wanting to stay in the European Union. Dead right. Brexit is bad for Britain #Richmondpark 
The only upside of Brexit and Trump is that it makes being Scottish feel even fucking better. #SexySocialism 
KL* As it is in eastern Europe – and we had a sample of it in Brexit... Now we have it is the US. 
First #Brexit, then Trump – is a Le Pen victory next?  
Thank you for your support of our school district referendum. We're encouraged & bolstered by our community’s support of our public schools.  
BREXIT will allow wages to rise and work forces to up-skill through welcoming the best worldwide talent.  
2016: Leicester, Brexit, Cubs, Trump and now one of Brendan Rodgers' best #LFC signings in Iago Aspas gets a call up to the Spain squad.  
This is America's Brexit. Only much worse.  
The Commons Library has helpfully published a brief showing just how little we know about Brexit  
This was a referendum on your "everything is offensive" political correctness crap and the result is Americans don't give a shit. 
.@LNBDublin appointed to European Parliament Brexit working group 
I wrote about why most of the explanations of Trump/Brexit are unsatisfactory in their simplicity  
England: "nothing can be more embarrassing than Brexit" America: "Watch this" 
Still worth a read. Tobias Stone's July warning of how #Brexit + #Trump could lead to international crisis and war.  
Just like the Brexit vote, the people of the US rejected neoliberalism!...  
Stop calling those who want to stop Brexit and who demonise "deplorables" as liberals. They're neo-reactionaries, affronted by democracy. 
28/ Pay attention when you’re out in public. Hate crimes shot up in England after Brexit, and I’d put money they’ll do the same here. 
Donald Trump, Brexit and the transatlantic echo  
I'm told that, post-Brexit, non-assholes over there started wearing safety pins to self-identify as good guys. This makes sense to me. 
Charge the U.K. If they stay after #Brexit and raise import duties if the leave!   
Is anyone keeping a list of post-election hate crimes and harassment? After #Brexit there was a spike. We need to document this. 
The pound has moved upwards against all major currencies today. Yet not a mention on @BBCBusiness.. I wonder why? #Brexit #USElection2016 
So Scottish trade deal negotiations should be made public, but #brexit negotiations kept secret? Talk about double standards. 
Write to your MP to ensure legislation protecting bats is not weakened as a result of #brexit @_BCT_ #batsandbrexit  
Just as the BREXIT "gloom and doom" from the left - it was all fiction:U.S. Stocks Extend Rally, Dow to Record high  
The parallels between Brexit and Trumpery have been absurdly overdone | Conservative Home @DanielJHannan  
Donald Trump lukewarm on Nato will help Britain in Brexit as our intelligence gathering will be even more vital for EU 
"PM: I'd like to speak to Mr Trump? US: who's this?PM: The PM.US: Mr Brexit? PM: I'm sorry?US: Mr Farage?PM: No.US: Please hold..." 
@RalfLittle He's *this* close to saying 'ape'. Disgusting. Empowered by foetid post-Brexit atmosphere. 
Check out @ShaunKing retweeting instances of #postelectionracism. Like Brexit, this vote has legitimised and emboldened racism  
This man correctly predicted Brexit, IndyRef and the General Election. He got Trump right too         
After Brexit I wrote this column about the power of wishful thinking. Feels relevant this week too:  
Doom-mongers wrong AGAIN: Britain's balance of trade STRENGTHENS after Brexit  
Brexit, Trump and now Iago Aspas gets called up to the Spanish National Team. 2016 has been an eventful year 
Time for a referendum then because knowing what needs to be done is cold comfort if its not actioned  #repealthe8th #itstimetorepeal 
This needs more attention > Trump and Brexit: why it’s again NOT the economy, stupid | @epkaufm  
Betting £10 on Donald Trump, Brexit and a Leicester win would have made you a multi-millionaire  
This must be right. "Was it class or identity?" is surely a blind alley, just like Brexit. It was both, separately and in combination.  
Trump/Putin/Brexit: Listen again with @anneapplebaum @peterpomeranzev @ArkadyOstrovsky @zygaro Zygar @puzzlesthewill  
Brexit and Trumpism are very different beasts — @montie  
Listeners stunned after BBC caller bashes 'sneering liberal elites' over Brexit and Trump  
On 4th December, President Hofer will be elected in Austria; Italy will vote 'No' in the referendum. The dominoes are all going to fall now. 
Trump and Brexit are retaliation for neoliberalism and corruption 
Me in @spectator -why I'm cynical re Post-Truth accusation used against Trump/Brexit voters or anyone who refuses to toe lie line of experts  
We've had Brexit and Trump. Now here are 5 more dominoes that could fall in Europe  
Will the wave that swept in Trump and Brexit carry far-right parties in Austria, France, Germany, the Netherlands?  
Dear America,As penance for trumping our Brexit self-harm,it's seems only fair that you take Nigel Farage from us.He can make tea & drive. 
The threat is *now*, and it's serious. As with Brexit, violent people feel they just received social approval to be violent.  
This is why pundits are so consistently unable to predict events - like Brexit and Trump - they're opposed to.  
It doesn't even have a clock. This is what a post-Brexit world looks like people.  
More ways Trump is like Brexit (and why he’s the new Obama) - my piece for @TIME 
Today Hammond will meet with Chinese officials to discuss trade. Huge opportunities for Britain post-Brexit #ChangeBritain 
Builder Bovis says prices, sales continue to rise after Brexit vote:  
The terrifying thing about Brexit and Trump is that when they don't improve people's lives, they'll pin it on their favourite scapegoats. 
Why is everyone surprised that #Trump won? Same with #Brexit It wasn't at all surprising to anyone who lives in the real world. 
Poor pro-Brexiteers now trying to explain why Brexit and Trump are not the same, whey they so obviously are exactly.  
Just when you thought Leicester winning the Prem, Brexit & Donald Trump as president was messed up... Iago Aspas has had a call up for Spain 
Social democrats shld stand firm, not bend to racist populism. Why Trump/Brexit magic solutions will self-destruct   
.@wwwfoecouk Chief Exec writes on why #Brexit must not be an excuse to undermine crucial environmental protections  
So Trump was right it is "Brexit+++"  
Good news this week, Tory govt loses supreme court case on bedroom tax and House of Lords puts a stop to privatisation of children services. 
What the Brexit result and Trump’s victory shows is that people lie to the people who do opinion polls  
May wins Hungary's backing on Brexit  
i agree: the trump Brexit analogy is overstated and understates singular weirdness and danger of the Trump victory. 
Duterte, Trump, 'Brexit': Populist surge worldwide  
How Trump used UK's Brexit to give Americans the courage to punish political elite   
ScotsTories howling about Scottish Government not keeping us apprised 'step by step'. How's that Brexit negotiation going? 
Trump to the left of me , Brexit to my right , Here I am stuck in the middle with you.  
There is no sign of a majority for any implementable #Brexit scheme. To push one through without an #EURef2 would be profoundly undemocratic 
Brexit and Trump mark a whitelash. Politicians must not pander to it | Polly Toynbee  
Much like with Brexit, people here feel like their will was usurped when in fact their downfall was the result of horribly low turnout. 
I blame Trump. Or Brexit. Or Climate Change Denial.Or anything I disagree with, basically.#TweetLikeALibtard 
In the meantime, behind news fixation on #Brexit & Trump -Virgin Care wins £700m deal to run UK social work service! 
Another reason why this not Brexit--always facile analogy :If this was ballot measure, Clinton/anti-Brexit would've won. She won pop vote. 
me: "1st brexit now trump the world's falling apart"@johnlewisretail: "this dog on a trampoline tho"me: "omg this dog on a trampoline tho" 
the overwhelmingly negative Trump & Brexit media coverage merely illustrates that they appealed to those who feel their voices aren't heard 
Sturgeon says we must respect the verdict of the American people, but refuses to accept either referendum result pic.twitter.com/Mtjg3pojoA 
These 2 charts show one way Brexit and Trump's victory were amazingly similar  
We've had months of anti Brexit by the left, BBC and C4, now they are anti Trump. What is it they don't get about democracy, unless they win 
Realising something very odd. I was wrecked for WEEKS after #Brexit referendum. Feel oddly upbeat and in a fighting mood after Nov 8. 
During the EU referendum, Corbyn refused to appear with former Labour Prime Ministers. (source: @ShippersUnbound's book). 
READ: Our founder @Arron_banks in @thetimes on what Trump learned from Brexit and we can learn from his success.  
Brexit and Trump mark a whitelash. Politicians must not pander to it | Polly Toynbee  
This is how the future voted - in both the US election and the UK 'Brexit' Referendum. If you're young & feel unheard, your time will come.  
See also #Brexit. 75% of under 25s voted remain.  
With UK and US isolating themselves, it's time for Europe -with Scotland a part of it- to lead the world #Brexit #Trump #indyref2 
Some v keen, aren't they, to say they predicted Trump/Brexit. Where does that glee stop? "Ha! I *knew* this World War was on the cards!" 
This American remake of Brexit is really grim. 
Shad Brexit minister @Keir_Starmer discussingBrexit negotiations and Wales. Tune into @BBCWalesToday later from 1830 
Wonder how much I'd have won with a bet on Leicester, Brexit and Trump..... 
Isn't it true that the #USA #Left & #EU #Remainers, don't actually WANT democracy, they just want things THEIR way? #Trump #Brexit or cry! 
If the referendum had been a general election, the Leave Party would have a majority of 166 seats #RespectTheResult 
Shadow Brexit minister @Keir_Starmer with @JoStevensLabour at LoadLok in Merthyr discussing Brexit impact on economy  
Victor Orban, Hungarian prime minister, said today Brexit was an attempt by a great nation to make itself successful in a new way  
#Trump's election victory was stunning. What are its parallels with the #Brexit vote?  
Fascinating analysis of how & why people voted. Like Brexit: More rural, anti-immigrant, let down by current path... 
FM: We'll focus on doing everything we can do to bring jobs to Scotland, which is more important than ever due to the Tory Brexit #FMQs 
THIRD OF BRITISH BUSINESSES ABANDON £65.5 BILLION OF INVESTMENTS FOLLOWING BREXIT VOTE (that’s caps, baby) pic.twitter.com/hrPUBCyv89 
Muse fans react to Matt Bellamy's #Brexit comments  
Dominic Raab: 'What you're allowing is die hard remainers to try and frustrate the referendum.' #ChangeBritain 
On the bright side: A Brexit-like crash doesn’t appear likely  
Brexit this, Trump that - riding is my relief, my medicine, in this crazy world. 
Nigel Farage claims Donald Trump's victory as 'Brexit times three'  
Psychiatry post #Brexit talk about to start: slight (!) change of the title by @robgpoole #eastdivconf 
Emily #Thornberry & Co. live in La La Land.The ONLY way forward is HARD #Brexit,border control and #migration CAPS. 
Theresa May aims for early meeting with Donald Trump in bid to clinch Brexit trade deal - story @joemurphylondon 
Today's Majority World Report #websummit2016 Lisbon #brexit #trump  via @SlideShare cc @tim @om @LaurieSegallCNN 
.@mrjamesob: People voted for Trump and Brexit because they want ‘change'. Why are they so confident about ‘change'?  
Takes a seriously brazen degree of shamelessness for commentators who failed to foresee Trump or Brexit now giving their hot takes on both 
Liverpool's Lib Dem group leader Richard Kemp says referendum on council tax rise for social services is "asking poor to pay for very poor". 
If you're feeling blue post #Brexit & post #Trump go see @KenLoachSixteen @idanielblake while still in the cinemas. #Solidarity offers #Hope 
May went on a desperation trip to India to discuss trade, she came back with a bill.. #brexit = a clownfest  
★★★★ @SusanCalman infuses the hour with terrifically sharp political comedy, about #DonaldTrump, Brexit, homophobia  
Another #Brexit supporter trying hard to prove that they are all abusive morons. #Remain #YesEU 
Trump's 'Brexit-plus' victory leaves some U.K. lawmakers cold  
Millennials reacted to a cruel world by going on Tumblr and trying to get people to be nice. And by not voting for Brexit/ Trump. 
In other words, Dublin has way too much office space planned, not enough residential. If Brexit migrants did come, where would they live?  
People older than me (on average) voted for Brexit and Trump. They saw the world falling and decided to set it on fire. 
After Brexit and Trump, here are the next five dominoes at risk in Europe  
What's wrong with MPs following their conscience and voting down #Brexit and then seeking an electoral mandate? 
Do you want to keep your EU citizenship after Brexit? @clivebull finds out how you could  
Brexit/Trump did listen to the unheard voices. Then thought, we'll use lies to con their votes out of them now and shaft them later. 
The U.S. managed to one-up Britain's  "Brexit"  fiasco. We clearly outdid them with our election  "Truckup" 
What does King Henry VIII have to do with #Brexit? @JoshuaRozenberg reveals all in the latest Law in Action podcast  
ANSA: ITALY COURT REJECTS REFERENDUM APPEALS 
Brexit Gnaws at ITV Ad Revenue, But Production Remains Buoyant  
Brexit , Trump, Robbie leaving 702 ( at last) and a possible downgrade to junk. What a great year.  
Wisest column of 2016 is @Peggynoonannyc on the protected vs the unprotected, from  Feb. Predicts Brexit and Trump:  
Well said Lyn.300,000 kids in poverty in Scotland and all Sturgeon cares about is how Brexit might lead to independence.  
Like day after Brexit, bigots emerge empowered, confident #ElectionResults have validated their views #Trumpocalypse  
The world needs to learn from the populist horror of Trump. The UK has time to prevent a hard Brexit and stop politics shifting far-right 
Read @ChukaUmunna on how Britain can and must remain an open country, despite the #brexit result  
Forget Canada, after Brexit and Trump people are asking if they can move to Mars  
How Brexit helps Chinese investors turn ‘Trump Panic’ into profit  
Australians laugh at Trump's win & scoff at #brexit but will take no notice on a bill passed today in the House of Rep's to ban refugees.  
Hillary won the popular vote. So had it been a referendum, she would be president. Which is yet another reason why Nigel Farage can sod off. 
Much easier to blame a large institution (EU) and a group (immigrants) for Inequality. Much harder to look closer at home for the real cause 
.@aliettedb @MyzLilith Brexit narrative is *heavily* driven by extreme racist tabloid media owned by oligarchs, normalizing fascist views. 
.@MyzLilith @aliettedb Beware: in the prevailing Brexit narrative, "working class" is code for "racist". But middle class can be racist too. 
Can't help but think some people struggle with concept of Democracy.Trump wins = #TrumpProtestBrexit wins = #MarchForEurope#AntiDemocracy 
#brexit polls were "wrong" is now universal narrative. During campaign there were more published polls saying Leave than saying Remain IIRC. 
4) The shocks to conventional wisdom of the Referendum result & Donald Trump's election make her victory a possibility if it wasn't already 
PMQs: Theresa May dismisses Tim Farron’s ‘extremist’ Brexit jibe | Politics | News | Daily Express  
Washington D.C. passes referendum to become 51st state  
‘Post Brexit values’  
Trump and Brexit  @jaclong 
Post Brexit Tory plan is "to dilute down employment rights to give businesses a lot more freedom" Workers must unite  
Wow! A fiver on Leicester City winning Premier League, Brexit and Trump for President  would have won you £15million.  
Very pleased to hear concerns & questions on NHS workforce - numbers, skills, future roles, safety and brexit - being raised at #hsjsummit 
Just like Remoaners, it would appear Democrats only accept democracy when it suits them. #TrumpProtest #Brexit #SoreLosers 
Donald Trump will be boost for post-Brexit Britain claims Charlie Wolf | UK | News | Daily Express  
Amazing how events (Brexit vote, Trump vote, death of Thatcher)peel away the left's thin veneer of tolerance to reveal their seething hatred 
All these people saying Trump may be good for Brexit... have you read what Trump has been saying about international trade? #idiocy 
Trump and Brexit: why it’s again NOT the economy, stupid  via @LSEpoliticsblog 
3/3 I am v keen for a peaceful mass demo if we lose Supreme Court case and Remainer MPs/peers start messing with Brexit. That is all! 
Business leaders propose a London-only visa for post Brexit Britain 
Europe needs own army, can’t rely on US forever – EU Commission President  #EU #Brexit  
The Brexit domino theory of EU disintegration may become a self-fulfilling prophecy, says @Princeton's Harold James 
loooooool it's like Brexitall these bigots were sold lies.  
The same thing will happen with Trump that's happening with #BrexitCampaign promises will be scaled down/abandonedCompromises will be made 
Another blow to Renzi: #Italy’s industrial output falls 0.8% in Sep, Weakening recovery prospects ahead of constitutional referendum.  
The Donald will be @POTUS &#Brexit Britain will be, once again,  a sovereign independent democratic country & leave the imperial EU  
Trump boost for our EU exit: We will get better deal with new US President as key ally  
seeing similar reports of post-election violence from the US as we did immediately after the Brexit vote here in the UK  
Britain holds talks with China to try to gain some post-Brexit investment  
The way to fix an unfair economy is using Elinor Ostrom's and @David_S_Wilson's work; not by voting #Trump & #Brexit  
I'M A TOLERANT LEFTIE 
#Brexit and #Trump - how do they compare? #VictoriaLIVE 
Oh what a surprise this has never happened before I’m so shocked how astonishing Brexit bollocks how could this happen OMG WTF  
The election of Donald Trump has strong parallels to Brexit. But the impact will be much bigger.  
Setting sail into the North Sea today. Onboard a trawler boat discussing Brexit with fishermen. Here's a look around my home for 7 days!  
Why Trump's victory isn't like Brexit  
Dont see this as just like Brexit. Clinton won popular vote. 
She respects the #Trump result wants to overturn #Brexit and ignore #indyref. Such muddled thinking is overwhelming. 
Market Impacting Event: Trump vs Brexit in one chart. $ES_F $SPY 
Were US election Brexit, Hillary would have won. So let's all watch our comparisons and narratives 
5Live caller: "Brexit was about eating our own food, looking after ourselves and stopping people messing about on their mobile phones". 
And the study suggests that Brexit had the same driver. Fear of immigrants not poverty. 
Trump’s victory may have given Theresa May unexpected leverage in the coming Brexit talks  
If Brexit's anything to go by, Clinton voters will experience:Shock AngerBurning shameAcute embarrassment New ideasAction planHope 
Interviewed Marine Le Pen... Brexit, Trump, France next? A Europe wide revolution? No, she said: "revolution mondiale" 
The wild animals are the rest of Europe, we are the dog. If only we, like the dog, could b allowed back onto the trampoline.#Brexit #europe  
Exactly like Brexit.  Let's not blame the bogeyman "white working class":  
I think what annoys me most about the economic analysis of Brexit/ Trump is that it robs voters of voice, autonomy. 
Trump and Brexit: why it’s again NOT the economy, stupid  via @LSEpoliticsblog 
Forget Canada, after Brexit and Trump people are asking if they can move to Mars  
It's the 5 stages of Brexit all over again: denial, anger, despair, depression, acceptance (learned helplessness) 
I think John Lewis now releasing trailers for an ADVERT is marginally worse than Trump and Brexit put together. 
As the scenes get ugly in America and leavers start to link the parallels to fascism and brexit, more people will switch to remain to fight 
it's all generational (and brexit) the young vote is the future so one day in 30 years we will get the right results  
Brexit and the US election will fuel right-wing tendencies in all countries. 10 months until we have elections in Germany. It's on, friends. 
24% of US electors voted Trump. Hilary won popular votes. 37% Voted for Brexit. Don't let media paint these as overwhelming majorities. 
We may have gone mad with #Brexit in the #UK but at least we haven't done this yet 
Democracy produces unexpected results; change is constantWe must analyse & adapt calmlyCrying foul doesn't help #brexit #trump #racism 
Muse fans react to Matt Bellamy's Brexit comments  
Imagine being in a coma for the last year and waking up to Brexit, Trump being president and shitty toblerones 
This man correctly predicted Brexit, IndyRef and the General Election. He got Trump right too  
One big difference between Trump and Brexit - they can vote him out in 4 years time. 
"It's going to be BREXIT PLUS PLUS PLUS." - @realDonaldTrump#Next4YearsIn4Words#ThankObamaIn4Words 
Isnt it disgusting that som USA ppl wont accept the outcome of VOTE  just as some UK PPL didnt after BREXIT & r still trying to derail it 
Trumped America and Brexit Britain are both calling the bluff of the established order  via @telegraphnews 
Bizzare to see mainstream media still 'creating a progressive narrative': Brexit/Trump=hate. When will they see they are not the majority. 
@AMDWaters just as in Britain after #Brexit American so called liberals proving that they only love democracy if they win #shame 
Imagine waking up from a 6 month coma now. Brexit, Trump, Boris Johnson as Foreign Sec, and Joey Barton not on course for Scottish POTY.  
Watch & cheer as #Trump reneges #Muslims #BuildTheWall #LockHerUp just as #Brexit promises turn to dust 
Based on the way that #Brexit and #Trump votes defied the establishment, the #ScotRef “no” vote now looks like the odd one out 
'According to the #Brexit playbook, over the next week the #TrumpTeam walks back pretty much every promise it made during the campaign.' 
What Donald Trump may mean for Europe - and the rest of Thursday's Brexit headlines  
White riot: how racism and immigration gave us Trump, Brexit, and a whole new kind of politics  
#johnlewischristmas ad obvious Brexit analogy. British Bulldog watching the party from outside then pretending to have fun bouncing alone. 
America only has to put up with Trump for four years. Brexit is for life unless we stop it! #brexit #brexitshambles 
Trump and Brexit: why it’s again NOT the economy, stupid  
Was thinking yesterday - with Brexit & Trump, we've basically waved goodbye to the idea of slow news weeks, haven't we? 
Large bodies contain multitudes. Something positive about the USA and Brexit Britain. (And demographics are on the side of liberalism)  
These celebrity gits who vowed to leave the country after Brexit and Trump won can't seem to find the airport.So let's point it out to 'em!  
Trump this morning surely like Boris Johnson after Brexit; done the bluster and negative attacks; no clue what to do now or how to do it. 
From back of the line to front of the queueTrump's victory hailed as a boost for post-Brexit Britain  
Interesting to see the protests vs "get over it" messaging of Brexit immediately echoed in the US. A lot of v similar dynamics at play.  
Brexit is a democratic decision that'll damage our democracy. It'll make us poorer, prolonging austerity. That's why I will speak against it 
Revisionism wild now on Brexit.Listening to #5live no voters seem to have been anti-immigration?It's all being re-branded as 'anti-elite' 
'Good for us – BAD for Europe' President Trump will be great for post-Brexit Britain #TrumpPresident 
US election: How Trump's rhetoric mirrored Brexit  
How about? "While Brexit is not the outcome I hoped for, it is the verdict of the United Kingdoms people and we must respect it".  
Shameful "we only like democracy if vote goes our way" portrayed by the Brexit remain ilk & anti Trump vote. Does the West want democracy? 
"Brexit and now Trump’s election are giving more credibility to the radical, populist vote.” 
Brexit & @realDonaldTrumpWhere is the Church in all this? Absent because it's too aligned with the ruling class & the liberal mindset. 
A warning for US from UK. After Brexit referendum, racist violence grew rapidly: thugs felt empowered by poll result  
Recalcitrant Remainers are sabotaging the UK’s negotiating hand before Brexit talks laments Labour's @AVMitchell2010 
Business leaders propose a London-only visa for post Brexit Britain 
Don't learn from Brexit & Trump's win. Keep trying to bully people into accepting opinions. Call them stupid for thinking for themselves. 
The BBC has a section on its website entitled 'Brexit lessons: A survivor's guide to unexpected voting results.'Mind manipulation! 
9 Brexit lessons from Britain that America might want to learn  
Donald Trump's win may have given Theresa May unexpected leverage in the Brexit talks   
Ignoring the referendum is exactly the kind of move that would lead to the empowerment of demagogues in Britain.  
Easily the 'Nailed It' tweet summing up recent Brritish American history.#brexit#TrumpProtest 
#brexit may have made sense 48 hours ago but no longer, we need to think again  
A bit baffled about all the "big upset" and "big surprise" headlines. If you bash something long enough, it will topple. #brexit #trump #EU 
All the talk of how Brexit will pan out is slightly complicated by the possibility the EU may not exist next year...  
British PM @theresa_may vows to boost relations with China, eyeing more Chinese investment @Number10gov #Brexit  
Donald Trump's victory hailed as a boost for post-Brexit Britain  @MailOnline 
#LessonsFromTrumpWin:Like #Brexit, the shocking upset pulled off by The Donald was delivered by citizens. We are in the ERA of CITIZENS. 
Trump’s win—and Brexit—send one message to young Africans: Stay at home  via @qzafrica 
#Calexit (like #brexit) was trending after Trump's victory. Could it happen? Our story on the push for CA to secede at 11:12 on @nbcbayarea 
Like Cameron gambling on Brexit all to stay in power. Rolled the dice and lost.  
Brexit and Trump are just the start — populism is coming to Europe next  
Brexit means Britain can benefit from this result, says James Forsyth:  
The world as seen through the #Brexit prism. Tragic.  
This is Brexit squared  
Top 5 Reasons Trump Won:5) Referendum on globalism4) End to PC culture3) Hillary corruption2) Supreme Court1) It's the economy, stupid. 
Brexit and trumpism are two cheeks of the same arse - @montie and @JuliaHB1 in undignified scramble to distance selves 
Not so fast, @montie. Some who led Brexit are racists; Brexit has generated bigotry, division and loathing.  
Post #Brexit - racist & islamophobic attacks increased in the #UK. This may also be the case post #Trump in the #US#StaySafe 
Those RTs are very reminiscent of Britain after the Brexit vote. All the racists hugely empowered. 
Nobody gave Leicester, Brexit or Trump a chance, yet they won. Even if no one gives you a chance, you give yourself a chance #RenosNuggets 
#MAGA Out these motherfuckers! Name and SHAME WHERE DO THEY LIVE? 1000$ #Trump #PresidentTrump #Protests #Brexit @PrisonPlanet 
As usual we saw @ #Brexit liberals don't accept democratic results when it's not suit their agenda they have to get use2it #PresidentTrump 
and still Jo Cox died in UK opposing Brexit. Imagine how much worse the US can be with our gun numbers. Terrifying. 
2016....The year of the Underdogs1. Leicester2. Brexit3. Portugal Euro win4. Chicago Cubs 5. Donald Trump 
Bigoted violence and threats accelerated under Trump and are accelerating now. We are not UK, we are US with guns; this is worse than Brexit 
To Trump US : Lesson learnt from Brexit 4 months on - Victory doesn't make the angry people who voted for you happy, they get even angrier. 
Just the same here after Brexit vote  
Trump's incredible victory is a second Brexit (only better) @realDonaldTrump@mike_pence#MAGA 
Chancellor Merkel needs to focus on her Home Game because that Tsunami that begat BREXIT & @realdonaldtrump might just arrive in Deutschland 
It's going to get worse. Victory = validation. Just like with post-referendum racism in Britain. 
#Calexit referendum is a joke and I'm ashamed as a native Californian that idiots believe in this garbage. 
America, we’ve been there with Brexit: here's how to cope over the next few days  
How the internet inspired, and fueled, the new nationalism of Donald Trump and Brexit  
Despite Brexit, Trump, & other stuff I remain optimistic that good things can & will happen. Let's work with this assumption for now... 
I moved to Argentina, they defaulted. I left, they inaugurated a technocrat. I moved to London, Brexit happened. I moved back to the US... 
A British friend whose relationship w/ mum suffered w/ #Brexit gave me this advice on dealing w/ family schisms. cc @tibbsy07 @drskyskull 
Many Brexit voters were conned by liars, but every single Trump voter knew they were backing a violent sexist racist. #noexcuse 
Where were the thousands of people in the street when Donald Trump was still just a contender for president?Damn Brexit effect. 
This is America's Brexit. Only much worse.  
The @nytimes said that if Donald Trump wins Market will crash by 10% whereas market rallies by 2 % Ditto happened in #brexit and #rexit 
"Hey, Britain! We'll see your Brexit, and raise you one Trump"*Folds* 
Irvine Welsh on the 30 year economic crisis that precedes the Brexit/Trump crisis  
Read Moore's acute analysis of why many workers voted Trump as an Anti establishment vote.This is America's Brexit! 
First #Brexit. Now #Trump's election. What will the "global network of pollsters" get wrong next?  
Genuinely cant believe how many people are "just now regretting not voting"You had Brexit as a warning if this is your nightmare, come on 
“After Brexit and this election, everything is now possible. A world is collapsing before our eyes.” —Gérard Araud, French ambassador to US  
I'd say this is the 4th time in succession that the Media got it wrong. Bihar, Delhi, Brexit and US Elections. Prediction polls are ptless. 
Brilliant article by Batten. BREXIT or EXIT? Round the houses with Article 50 or straight out the door with Repeal.  
Trump trumps pollsters and pundits to win the presidency of US. This was supposed to be bigger than Brexit and it is!! 
Obviously there's a lot more to the story. But Germany's mercantilism has helped lead to Brexit, the Greek depression, and in some way this. 
Just like fucking Brexit.  
we need full electoral reform, or switch to referendum government rather than representative corruptible gov #draintheswamp 
Forget Trump and Brexit, let’s all go live in the internet  
I can only admit there will be hate crime exaggerations in the days after Trump just like there was during Brexit just fear mongering  
This Los Angeles, California, protester is holding up a sign that says "CALEXIT," echoing Brexit  
"This is our Brexit x 100. And the anxious working classes who voted for him r going to get slammed the hardest."  
Brexit and Trump Mean One Thing: The World Is Sick of Bureaucracy  
After Brexit hate crimes increased by 400%. We need to #ProtectThePeople 
Lessons from Trump and Brexit: Don’t tell people what to think. | Blizzard | Ontario | News  
The Party of Lincoln is dead. Time for a referendum based on #Liberty #CalExit #NewCalifornia #CascadiaRising 
"It's going to be BREXIT PLUS PLUS PLUS." - @realDonaldTrump#Next4YearsIn4Words#ThankObamaIn4Words 
@wearejames at @powerstation_nz we played Glastonbury as Brexit was announced and last night was worse. No more gigs after elections #Angry 
You know, looking back it was only my British pals who predicted Trump could win and tried to coach me about it. #brexit lessons I guess. 
Taking a nod from post-Brexit UK and pinning on a #safetypin to let the oppressed and marginalized know they are safe with me. Join me. 
Big difference between Brexit and Trump? Right now, we'd take Theresa May in a millisecond. 
Brexit happened. Trump happened. But Adele and Beyoncé are still our queens. Onward. 
This happened in the wake of Brexit, too. People trying to say we're just being elitist. As if the POC calling this out aren't broke AF too. 
Like #brexit, #PresidentTrump appears to have upset all the right people. 
#ModiElection, #Brexit and #TrumpPresident have one message: NEVER trust the mainstream media. This is the Age of Social Media. 
incidents exactly like this happened in the weeks and months following Brexit here in the UK. It gave credence to racism 
“The American people have given that guy the thumbs-down.” @DineshDSouza on 2016 being a referendum on President Obama. #DSouzaUnchained 
Vigilance needed so rise in UK hate crimes that followed Brexit vote isn't paralleled in US after Trump win.  
I want to personally apologize to Britain for all the Brexit memes I retweeted. This is worse. Much, much worse. 
Trump boost for our EU exit: We will get better deal with new US President as key ally#Brexit #SolidarityUK 
#DonaldTrump's inner-circle: Rudy Giuliani, Newt Gingrich and the others tipped for big jobs in new cabinet #BREXIT 
I too fell for it. The same thing happened here with #brexit in the #uk - lessons learned too late? 
European Politicians Terrified By "Horror Scenario" After Brexit, Trump  
Post-Brexit,Trump, a real fear that my children won't enjoy opportunities I did. Of course, Trump voter might say: now you know how it feels 
Our Brexit motto should beBritain Is Great Again#BIGA 
A TRAGEDY: Like Brexit, sometimes young ppl don't fully comprehend what's at state 'til the horror of Trump becomes reality. #NotMyPresident 
i am willing to bet an overwhelming majority of protestors didn't vote during election. they have Brexit-regret. Screw em. 
Brexit: an inchoate howl of rage - in common with the Trump victory ...  #Brexit.  
We must use the Trump election, and Brexit, as a powerful motivator. A motivator to stay involved in the governance of our country @metiria 
After Brexit and Trump, I really want some good analysis of the Shy Voter phenomenon. It's a good article waiting to be written. 
Events like Brexit and Trump's win give people permission to act out their already-violent fantasies with gleeful abandon. 
I don't think they did it because of him. My guess it's punishment for Brexit!   
Based on #Brexit experience I'm particularly worried about empowered racists hitting streets and harassing minorities in first few months. 
Left-Lib disdain for democracy is astonishing!Brexit: Demand re-pollTrump win: Talk of California secession,#notmypresident marches 
Ah, the surge in the "we got our country back, go home" interactions that Brexit gifted us.  
Marketing's Brexit "survivors" say Trump win shows people are sick of being told how to think  
Wow!! It's just been 1 day and this #Calexit movement is serious in California. Wow!! Referendum in 2019. 
Those who are shocked that people are scared for their lives didn't do enough research on the candidates. Good grief. This really is Brexit. 
Brexit.Dylan's Nobel Prize.The Cubs.Trump's Election as President.There's somethin' happenin' here,What it is ain't exactly clear. 
After Brexit and Trump, what is point of @NateSilver538 
Makes a lot of sense. Read!“History tells us what may happen next with Brexit & Trump” by Tobias Stone  
A referendum passed on Nov. 8 will help pay for the Red Line - a bus rapid transit system that would run from Westfield to Greenwood.  
>man who wrongly predicted Brexit and President Trump thinks his opinion of his critics has any merit.Smart.  
Watching The Crown, bf said "What's the point, we already know the ending. Eventually there's Brexit and then this shitshow." 
Volatility Index has fallen 36% thus far this week, the 3rd largest 3-day decline in history (more than post-Brexit, now 5th on list) $VIX 
2014 Modi wave Brexit sweep and Trump knock out proves the end of hypocrisy in politics is near. Tell it like it is! Lutyens to go for six! 
@kwuchu this is exactly what happened to me, friends, and family in the days after the EU referendum. 
Apparently California is planning a Calexit referendum for 2019, I'm peacing tf out with them  
#Brexit and #Trump is a wake up call. The European left must now unite and organise to ensure #LePen is defeated in 2017. 
Dear @BBC Bit late now, but PLEASE can you stop putting @Nigel_Farage on TV?It's basically free advertising for fascism.#brexit #trump 
Not that the polls covered themselves in glory but (as with Brexit) the failures of conventional wisdom were demonstrably worse. 
The horrors of Brexit and trump have proven too much for @Malarkey as he escapes into the virtual world. 
Hey, 18-24 yr old Brits! You’re living through #Brexit. Any tips on how young Americans can cope with Trump? Email reporter @amygmcdermott 
Please remove Scotland from the brexit stupidity Ta  
With this year's brexit and election, everyone has been fearful and emotionally at odds. I’m not saying to bottle it up but consider this 
First Brexit, now Donald Trump. Don't despair, Chris Gunter will always be there  #HoldMeCloserChrissyGunter 
Same as Brexit the likes of Soros buying stock then dumping it at a loss to affect the markets  
#GlobalWarming Florida voters reject misleading referendum that sought to tax solar energy  
We Feel wrap up of twitter emotions during #USElection2016. Less anger & more fear than #brexit  
Just how many SNP MP's and MSP's voted Brexit and lied about it?It stinks. The people should know where they stand with representatives. 
nope, thats entire true. Didnt work out quite so well with brexit though.  Congrats!  
Reckon not much will actually happen and life will carry on. Just like Brexit. 
#CalExitthe time is now - vote YES on referendum in 2019 to exit the Fascist USA !!  
June 23rd: #BrexitNovember 8th: #TrumpWhere do I go next? 
Of course this nation state and border control nonsense will make most people poorer and therefore less in control of their lives.#Brexit  
Brexit made President Trump more likely. Trump makes President LePen more likely. I hope Boris is proud of himself. 
Trump & the #Brexit populists don't have plans, they have slogans, lies and scapegoats to blame for their failures. #Remain #Brexit 
Brilliant stuff on Brexit and Trump by one-time Labour leadership contender Bryan Gould.  
The political establishment tried to break the working class. They had enough. That's why Brexit and Trump came to be. End of. 
He played you all for votes just like the Brexit campaign lied for votes   
This human rights calamity of an election is not a marketing opp. Brexit is not a marketing opp. Do not do this. JFC. 
After Brexit, everyone "fears for the worst". After Trump's win, everyone "fears for the worst"After 1 week, everyone's busy with life. 
Donald Trump had predicted "Brexit plus, plus, plus." He was right  
Why I keep pointing you to @epkaufm Trump and Brexit: why it’s again NOT the economy, stupid  via @LSEpoliticsblog 
Contrary to @BBCNewsnight view, the Brexit/Trump phenomenon is not backward looking, it is forward looking. 
BBC #newsnight still pumping out the same establishment propaganda as they did after #Brexit. Hating Trump for no real evidence. 
No - that was #brexit - you're getting your referendums mixed up! ;)  
June 23rd 2016 - Brexit November 9th 2016 - Trump GOP December 4th 2016 - Hofer FPÖ  April 23rd 2017 - Le Pen NF  
Hey California you should talk the rest of the West Coast into leaving too. #Calexit referendum. 
Huff Post admits me, @Cernovich & Alex Jones owned mainstream media on Brexit and Trump.  
Brexit poses vital questions, yet Labour’s position is utterly unclear  
So although there are Brexit similarities in demogs of supporters US election was issue of LOW turnout whereas referendum was high turnout 
Study shows both Trump & Brexit are above all about immigration & race, & white fears of being overrun.   
Are these 3 things the only WAY OUT of Brexit mess?1 Independent Scotland2 Independent Wales3 United Ireland orIs there another way? 
This is America's Brexit. Only much worse.  
Trump won ... Brexit happened WTF ? ... hey ho life goes on .....  
What's the demographic for Brexit which YOUR PARTY caused over a leadership spat? 
White male's rebellion against a waining identity?Find a different way. Stop making terrible decisions for our future #brexit #Electionnight 
Let's not kid ourselves. The real impetus behind #Brexit and #Trump is racism masked as revolution against a corrupt elite. It's a scam. 
"2016 will be fine"*Trump* *4 Hour PPVs**Brexit* *Roman Reigns Push**Monday Night RAW* Fuck 
Looking back on 2016... #Trump #Brexit #Harambe 
at least the fucking brexit people didnt know what they were voting for 
Democrats, Trump, and the ongoing, dangerous refusal to learn the lesson of Brexit  by @ggreenwald 
Just like Brexit the BBC has nothing good to say about the Trump victory. Already blaming racist white voters just like they did Brexit. 
Florida voters reject misleading referendum that sought to tax solar energy  
Panicked EU BEGS Donald Trump to discuss TTIP trade over fears USA would go to UK first 
... says the multi-millionaire tax dodger & resident of the British Virgin Islands who warned us against #Brexit  
'#EU WILL NOT SURVIVE’ – Juncker’s right-hand man admits DEFEAT after #Brexit  
Brexit is still worse than having a total bell end rule America for a few years 
The economic suicide from Brexit self harm continuesBritish exports surge   
It's painful seeing the same arguments, anger, bewilderment & distress unfolding in America. Trumpageddon is a literal Brexit facsimile. 
A bit of good news ... Florida voters reject misleading referendum that sought to tax solar energy  
History will show that #BoatyMcBoatface was the turning point that led to the demise of democracy as we know it. #trump #brexit 
What a difference 21 Years makes 
Opinion: America, your Brexit has arrived  
Forget Trump and Brexit, let’s all go live in the internet  
Stop all Foreign Aid 
Esp 5. majority of Americans did not vote for Trump, nor did majority of Brits vote Brexit. systems both flawed.  
UK tried to outdo USA in stupid with #brexit ! We showed them! #trump Don't mess with the #USA 
For Donald Trump, winning is one thing, governing another. Just look what happened to Brexit.  via @GlobeHorowitz 
So this is actually something in common with Brexit: young people get it and have been let down.  
Will there be Amerexit jokes to match our Brexit sub-genre of comedy? Or is it all a bit too dark for that this time round? #AngloSaxonFail 
@MLP_officiel Will Marine Le Pen be France's Trump, France's Brexit? France should elect her without hesitation. We need strong leaders. 
Tory @AnnieWellsMSP hits out over SNP's 'dangerous obsession' with linking hate crime to Brexit  
Trump/Brexit make Ireland appear paradise for women, gays, minorities, with no anti-immigrant party, ok-ish health care and welfare. Love it 
Just like Brexit, the losers can not accept the results, the Will of the PPL have spoken, get over it Democrats YOU LOST! #MAGA MOVE ON 
New from me: the 5 psychological steps that have led us to Trump and Brexit.  
Historian David Olusoga on #BlackandBritish, #Brexit & beyond Read article:  @DavidOlusoga @BBCTwo @GuardianComment 
Exposed by #Wikileaks: the establishment knows that Muslim migrants will lead to misery for years to come. It's the plan.#Brexit #TRUMP #EU 
Donald Trump's victory hailed as a boost for post-Brexit Britain  
Yesterday was a Referendum Against Obama's failed Policies, HRC's Scandals n Massive CORRUPTION.#USElection2016 #myvote2016 #ElectionNight 
I don't know what to say Can't even think of a sarcastic comment. we can't even say it could never have happened in the UK #brexit #trump 
Michael Moore went on Bill Maher right after Brexit and told us exactly what was happening in MI, WI, PA. No one was listening.  
Australia: you'd better learn from Brexit and Trump f'ing quickly. Just saying "Dumb racist ha ha!" isn't going to cut it any more. #Auspol 
Trumpers never expected their guy to actually win the thing, and that’s their problem now-Garrison Keillor- They shoulda looked up 'Brexit' 
.@WRCaldwell01, Liam McCollum QC, @OliviaOKane1 & Chris Marshall at Brexit debate organised by @belfast_bsa , @TheBarofNI & @DanskeBank_Uk 
"I am horrified by what is happening in our government." Brexit and beyond with The Raincoats' Gina Birch:  
CONGRATULATIONS 
The Brexit revolutionaries could yet turn on Theresa May. My column from tomorrow's NS:  
Rachel Johnson on The Last Leg: "The whole Brexit thing was a shit show". I have to agree with a Johnson. Maybe a first. 
Correct @Daily_Express - it's YOUR Brexit, not "ours".  
To my US friends, family & followers...I know it's really annoying when people say "I know how you feel", but we really do. #Brexit #Trump 
Diff between Trump and Brexit: it’s the day after, and people who voted for him aren’t saying “oh god what have I done?” They wanted him. 
Want to keep your EU citizenship after Brexit? Listen to Luxembourgian MEP Charles Goerens @CharlesGoerens tell @clivebull how... 
Half didn't vote, quarter voted Clinton, quarter voted Trump. Very like Brexit. Sad mad and dangerous 
"Trump was elected the stock market is crashing we're all going to die oh wait it's over."#Brexit again  
There seems to be an upsurge of racist attacks and sentiment in the US similar to that in the UK following Brexit. Sickening. Heartbreaking. 
Is the new #Toblerone design a metaphor for Brexit? One Vogue editor seems to think so:  
'Brexit plus plus plus' underway.  
The Brexit buccaneers! Exports of goods surge in the wake of the historic referendum  
#brexit @realDonaldTrump president @JohnReesEvans UKIP leader Come on JRE, 19 days to #makeukipgreatagain #MUGA@UKIP @talk2meradiouk 
The American election result in similar to our Brexit, the people have stopped listening to the left wing propaganda spewed out by the media 
Dream on! You have no mandate 4 Brexit @theresa_may without a Parliamentary vote.Referendum was advisory&3m Brits abroad & young got no vote  
Right wing coup in Brazil, Colombians voted for, brexit in the U.K., trump being president. Fuck man the right wing has really won globally 
People ask 'how did the msm get it so wrong?'It's because the msm lies to us all.Yes they do.They. Lie. To. Us. All.#Brexit #Trump 
From Brexit to Trumpland: the revenge of the plebs. Next stop is continental Europe  
No one chart can explain Trump and Brexit. Except maybe this one.  
BREXIT remoaners new project?'GROW UP' Britons mocked after holding CANDLELIT VIGIL to mourn Donald Trump victory  
#media were wrong on  #BREXIT and  Presidential election because of a persistant  and a chronic in-built bias towards the liberal left 
Scotland, Brexit, USA, seems the politicians & financial institutions are so disconnected to the voting public they don't see it coming 
God help my poor home country...#ireland#Trump #brexit  
One thing that has come out of Brexit and the US elections is don't trust the polls.When was the last time a pollster asked your opinion ? 
MEPs consider plans for Brexit opposing Brits to remain EU citizens  
100%, no one listens to celebs as was proved over here with brexit. They live in a bubble & have no idea of the real world 
@Nigel_Farage relationship with @realDonaldTrump could pave the way for a huge trade deal post Brexit! Time for UK, US, AUS, Canada partner 
Dow hits closing record high as stocks soar – and dollar makes largest gains since Brexit  
Difference between this and Brexit:Trump is happening. There is no stopping.There is no delaying. Buckle up. 
NEXT UP: the end of the #EU.Dec referendum Italy, Elections 2017 France & Holland.Free Europe! #Brexit & #DrainTheSwamp#Frexit #Nexit 
Brexit made Trump likelier. Now trump makes LePen likelier @StevenErlanger 
Worst thing after Brexit in the UK was my head suddenly judging everyone I saw, deciding who voted for what - silent, fresh divisions. 
Work, art, love, decency, imagination. Lego-brick words perhaps, but Brexit and Trump will mean we’ll need them. 
Another Democratic lie unveiled folks. Just like Brexit, the stock market didn't crash. And, the copper market is skyrocketing. Yee Haw!!!  
UKIP called swivel eyed loons etcWin EU elections, drive U.K. Brexit Trump called worse and takes top world job. We don't just yield! 
FIRST BREXIT... NOW CALEXIT? California wants to leave the US after Trump election win  
funny how it was mainly the older people who voted to leave brexit and now it's the same for making trump president 
Brexit & the Presidency show that the voting age should be lowered & ppl over 55 shouldnt be able to vote cuz their vote affects US not them 
Why are Trump fans hailing his presidency as an 'American Brexit'? What are you leaving? Hope?? Common sense? Dignity???? 
Hate crimes went up 41% after Brexit. Sadly, I expect something similar after Trump.Brace yourself America. There's a lot more coming.  
See: Brexit fallacy. It's not "the future", it's "young people'". Young people always lean left. Then they age, pay taxes, dial turns right.  
The UK saw similar things after the referendum vote 
"Brexit. Trump. Prince. Bowie. Why did we deserve all this  this year?" -@steveaoki on #ElectionNight  
"Impeach Donald Trump" trending. Reminds me of the block Brexit bunch. Don't get your own way, throw a pathetic hissy fit. Grow up. 
UK likely to be front of the queue for a trade deal now with US, time to get on with Brexit.Waited  too long already  
l i t e r a l l y Brexit  
This is EXACTLY what happened in the UK after Brexit. Thinly veiled racism became blatant, the. next. day. :( 
"Excuse me is this the anti Tory vigil?""No this is the anti Brexit sit in. The anti Tory vigil is over there past the anti Trump march" 
It's like hearing the echo of the "old people stole our future!" wails post- Brexit vote.  
The young people who voted to remain in the EU are part of that same flame, and it's burning bright. #Brexit #Trump 
When you shame one side of the coin, you undermine the pollster data. Simple as Brexit 
Democrats, Trump & the ongoing, dangerous refusal to learn the lesson from Brexit. (via @ggreenwald) #IntelGroup 
Have the first of the many upcoming articles about all the millions regretting their Brexit I mean Trump vote been published yet? 
Orange Crush: Trump wins and the Brexit analogy holds.  writes @jamestaranto 
Trump, Brexit, Harambe...Just get us on a golf course with our mates and all will be good with the world! 
We're building a dossier of all the rights and laws threatened by Brexit - if you want to keep them please help us:  
Crazy how more old white people voted for Brexit and Trump. They wanna take us back to those times when only whites had the power. 
Look at @Ed_Miliband tweeting about Trump like he knows what the left should do next. No clue about Brexit and no clue about this either. 
California is the new Scotland. #brexit #TheMorningAfter 
Democrats, Trump, and the ongoing, dangerous refusal to learn the lesson of Brexit  by @ggreenwald 
I remember Ed Miliband was widely attacked for his 'predators & producers' speech, then 5 years later Brexit and Trump happened. Funny that 
As with Brexit, a sharp educational divide will emerge as a major driver of Trump. Just watch.... #USElection2016 
America has risen to its full height and elected Donald Trump to lead the free world.Thank you from England Americans!#Trunp #Brexit  
Okay, @Canada opens its immigration to US anti-Trump voters & UK anti-Brexit voters, we all form a supercountry together. @JustinTrudeau? 
@UKIP leadership election With bookies wrong in BrexitUS Presidential Are they wrong againWho will win 
Everyone complaining about Trump and Brexit destroying our future. Fine with me mate I never had a future anyways 
The internal trump poll was 1 vote out , our Brexit poll on the night was 0.1% out. Polling industry still in dark ages and it shows  
The CORRUPT Media pooh-poohed the very idea of both #Brexit & President-elect Trump. A PEOPLE's revolution is afoot! 
America, we’ve been there with Brexit: here's how to cope over the next few days  
How much would a £5 bet on Leicester, Brexit and Donald Trump have banked you?  
Theresa May warns Remoaners to stop fighting Brexit saying Britain 'voted to leave' after SNP's Nicola Sturgeon sta…  
heartbroken by #indyref. nauseated by Brexit. enraged by Trump victory. I would like just ONE vote to give me hope. 
New SfEU video: What Trump presidency means for Brexit... It exacerbates problems. Pulls us between EU & Trump US. 
Faster than the Brexit rebound! Michael Moore blown the heck out  
Next stop... -> Italy's 5-Star tours Europe in bid to sink Renzi's referendum  vía @Reuters 
Tbh when Brexit happened I knew America was bound to fuck up too 
Ha ha ha ... It would appear that the EU is now behind Russia & the UK in the 'QUEUE' !#GodLoveAmerica #Brexit #Article50 #LeaveEU #leave 
Trump is "America's Brexit"Trump was officially confirmed as president-elect on 11/9"11/9" in the UK is 9/11what do I win 
Between Brexit, the Cubs, and Trump, I'm sure there are more than a few bookies who've gone broke this year #DareToDream 
#calexit referendum California wants to vote to leave USA: 
First Brexit. Then Trump. The only thing that makes sense this year is Michael Jung winning An Olympic gold medal. 
The case for #Brexit has been massively weakened by Trump victory. Good piece by @tony_nog.  
Forget Canada, after Brexit and Trump people are asking if they can move to Mars  
When do Trump/Brexit voters start reflecting on their inability to relate to the other side?Or is that something only "liberals" have to do? 
This is America's equivalent of Brexit Remorse.  
Looking forward to seeing how Brexit and Trump tackle the establishment. I need to find out how the con ends 
Marketing's Brexit "survivors" say Trump win shows people are sick of being told how to think  
Believe in Your Mind.Media said Trump loses, Senate loses, Brexit loses, ObamaCare succeeds while my own research & mind said the opposite. 
which doesn't even touch on the increase in violence against minorities in the coming weeks, which we saw happen post-Brexit 
Is this what #Brexit felt like? 
@freedomlynn123 @Nigel_Farage I hope the 1st thing @realDonaldTrump does is a US/UK trade deal. Screw the undemocratic EU #brexit 
Unless you are on the front foot in the new politics, you lose. That’s the lesson of Clinton’s demise and Brexit  
Watch: Farage Says Trump Victory ‘Bigger than Brexit’  
blah blah t minus 14 days for europe blah blah I'm so sorry I ever said shit about brexit after the mess of an election we had 
Last night really felt like a referendum on how much white people care about people of color. The answer? Zilch. 
Berlin, London, Paris must resist Putin's push for a post-NATO Treaty. Ignore Brexit. Joint foreign policy to resist Putin gambit essential. 
Yes and who's the man Trump calls Mr Brexit the one he took by the hand & called a great guy? Our Nigel.#friendsinhighplaces  
SIGN our petition to urge politicians to #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum:  #ChangeBritain 
when you see trumps pundits claiming "this is our brexit moment", i want you to fully understand what that means: 
So this is like Brexit in that nothing the campaign promised will come true other than general harm.  
2016... Leicester win the Premier League Hibs win the Scottish Cup Brexit Cubs win the World Series Trump voted American President  
no trust in the polls anymore, they let us down on the 2015 general election, on Brexit, and now on Trump  WHY MUST U LIE 
Looks like Americans are not accepting Trump, a bit like Brexit- this is the working class vote not voice of Clinton brainless celebrities. 
Putin will want to keep Germany, France and Britain out of the negotiations and they must resist. Ignore Brexit EU-3 must work together. 
If you're a #Trump supporter or a #Brexit supporterplease stop following me or interacting.I don't want to call you cunts but I will! pic.twitter.com/LoBk3LeUM6 
Michael Gove had lunch with Rupert Murdoch and Rebekah Brooks a week before the 'Queen backs Brexit' front page con  
Democrats, Trump and the ongoing, dangerous refusal to learn the lesson of Brexit  by @ggreenwald 
2016 is the year of political revolution: Brexit in the UK and @realDonaldTrump in the US. 
Trump promised Brexit "times five." He delivered.  
Polls got Tory majority wrong. Polls got Brexit wrong. Polls got Trump wrong. Corbyn is buzzing.  
Last Night's Story: Underdog Trump Wins Brexit Like Upset Taking Most Battleground States #ElectionNight #Election2016 #ElectionResults 
Judging by condescending tone & blameshifting of Western MSM, academics & political elites: 0 lessons learned from #Brexit & #Trumpxit 
@LouiseMensch @NickyAACampbell .......Brexit in America by Supertrump! 
What a success @htw_uk debate on effect of #Brexit on #healthtech! Speakers articulating strong & interesting opinions based on facts #HTW16 
Liberals want to move to Canada. WHY NOT MEXICO? ARE YOU RACIST?#NotMyPresident #notmyfault #ElectionResults Brexit 
Full story of Gove meeting the Sun prior to a fake Brexit story in the paper by Press Gazette  
Obama said this election was a Referendum on his legacy.. You got it!!#trumpwins #Trump 
If the referendum had been a general election, the Leave Party would have a majority of 166 seats #RespectTheResult 
#BestoftheWeb Orange Crush: Trump wins and the Brexit analogy holds, by @jamestaranto  via @WSJ 
Britain: BREXIT was the stupidest, most self-destructive act any country could undertake.USA: ... Hold my drink...  
I'm at Paul Nuttall's leadership rally in Derby.  #UnitedWithPaul. "We need to ensure that Brexit means real Brexit". 
2016 is the year of shocking world events few thought were possible: Trump becoming president, Brexit, and us releasing The Last Guardian 
Difference between Thatcher/Reagan and #Trump #Brexit? The new rulers have no clue what to do. So it will quickly end in disaster 1/2 
a couple of the Trump meme-magic pepe-liker types I know are in full "I didn't think it'd actually happen" mode a la Brexit 
I urge any UK citizen currently in despair at #brexit to write to their MEP to urge support for this Amendment.There are millions of us!  
Michael #Gove met Sun editor and Rupert #Murdoch a week before 'Queen backs #Brexit' front page  
#TrumpPresident SCOTLANDS NATIONALISTS are HYPOCRITES, the SNP never respected BREXIT or INDEPENDENCE results #STURGEONsucks pic.twitter.com/853X9P7APP 
This is America's Brexit. Only much worse:  
Brexit voters get called racist & now Trump voters are being called racist. Can those on the losing end of democracy not accept defeat? 
I wanna move to CA if #Calexit referendum in 2019 for an independent country. Always loved CA. 
What a depressing year, first we had Brexit,then Donald Trumpet, thank Feck we've got Joey Barton to bring a smile back to our faces ! 
I think Brexit should wake you up  
The youth of today are so used to getting their own way. Protests against Brexit and now against President Trump #spoiltbrats 
What did I say?YOU BREXIT, YOU BOUGHT IT.  
If Brexit is anything to go by most of the people who voted for Trump have absolutely no idea of the implications of what they've done 
1. After Trump & Brexit, Canadians can't allow ourselves to be smug & passive. We *must* be active & effective champions for a better world. 
Goldman Sachs may shift some operations to Frankfurt because of Brexit  
Up next: A 2019 California referendum to leave the U.S. and become the 6th largest economy in the world. #Calexit 
Looking at my feed, clear that Trump's win is as much of a Rorschach blot as Brexit. 
Headlining @Channel4News, @jonsnowC4 repeats lazy Brexit = Trump thing. I tackled it for @TheTimes earlier  
QUIET: #GinaMiller has something to say on the #USElection2016 #ElectionNight #ElectionResults #Trump #brexit #article50 #eu #eureferendum 
After Trump and Brexit, populist tsunami threatens European mainstream  
Meet this fellow upset about Brexit.  Or something.  Whatever.    
1 #BREXIT 2 #TRUMPNext up: end of the #EU, #Italexit #Frexit #Nexit.We The People will defeat the evils of globalism, corporatism #TTIP 
Greece, Indyref, Brexit, Trump.  Will someone please ask history to get a grip, please. There's only so much we can take. 
Michael Moore honed in on the Electoral College and what he called "Our Rust Belt Brexit"  
SDLP reject Brexit vote!SDLP reject Trump vote!Emmm...What exactly does the 'D' in their name stand for ??ANY SUGGESTIONS FOLKS 
Shame tactics didn't work for Brexit, what do we do for the US election? SHAME THEM!Shit, that didn't work. How do we stop the rise of far 
‘Let Theresa get on with it!’ Hungarian PM tells EU to STOP MOANING and ACCEPT Brexit  
The Democrats learned nothing from Brexit. You fight fire with fire, not with a warmongering friend of banks that destroyed American wealth. 
Donald Trump's win leaves London's "citizens of nowhere" stunned for the 2nd time this year  
Brexit is NOT in the interests of the country or the EU. We should all (in UK & rest of EU) fight this for all we're worth. Especially now.  
Last night was a referendum on abortion. Abortion lost. #ProLife 
Japanese Ambassador to UK Koji Tsuroaka says Brexit may need an interim EU deal, & "nightmarish" for Japan if UK loses euro-clearing system. 
Trump victory echoes around the globe. Freedom loving people are inspired everywhere. Trump victory is Brexit 2.0.  
Columbia votes down peace treaty to end 50+ year war.Brexit.Cubs win World Series.Trump gets elected.2016 has been insane. 
I'm not going to bed again. In recent months have woken to: Brexit, Trump, & Madeleine Thien not winning Man Booker prize 
Brexit: "Old people shouldn't get to vote."Election 2016: "White people shouldn't get to vote."How about you shut the hell up. 
Here are some gentle words of wisdom from someone who lived through Brexit  
#Brexit, #Hexit, what's #Nexit? 
Hey man, thanks for the input, and thanks for the bold stance against Brexit. You've been a big help  
More info about @CamAnalytica, Trump's data science firm that also did work for #Brexit's Leave campaign:  
Goldman Sachs is considering moving from London to Frankfurt over Brexit  
1st Brexit2nd TrumpTwice bookies have paid me outHopefully the 3rd will be when @JohnReesEvans wins @UKIP election 
The end of the Obama/Clinton era should result in stronger Special Relationship based on ensuring that Brexit is a success for both UK, US. 
A Trump win may cast new uncertainty on a Brexit-battered IPO market  
Have set up a small Trump/Brexit commiseration gift exchange to make liberal Brits/Americans feel better. Sign up:  
If Brexit is a model for this, we’re about to see a wave of anti-Muslim and anti-immigrant violence led by white nationalist types. 
Time to ignore opinion polls for good, they lied about the Kenyan, UK, and US elections plus the Brexit referendum 
Nigel Farage says there are parallels between Donald Trump's election as US president and the UK's Brexit vote.  
You can exist in the midst of Lions and be comfortable. That's the Spirit of a Christian. #VictorAtokolo #WAFCAbuja #Brexit #Trump 
21/12/2012 End Of the World Brexit Trump AFD (Deutschland) USA/Mexico wall Le Pen (France) World War Three On tight schedule. 
Brexit and Trump winning are proof that screaming racist all the time with no proof isn't working anymore! #TrumpPresident #Brexit 
My mum correctly called the General Election majority, Brexit, and Trump. If I'd stuck a tenner on that combo I'd be too rich to tweet. 
Brexit and Trump could leave UK stranded between estranged allies  
Want to win a bet? Just find out who or what Nicola Sturgeon is siding with and bet on the complete opposite. #brexit #trump #indyref 
18 Tweets About How America Has Out-Brexited Brexit  
Exclusive: Goldman Sachs considers Frankfurt move over Brexit - sources  
A relief: a deceptive referendum funded by utility companies to derail solar energy in FL was defeated. background:  
Just days after the High Court dealt a blow to the government’s Brexit plans, six judges have announced they are...  
Memories of #brexit : the old (inc the ones who died in wars so we could tweet our disdain) screwed us over!!!  
Lisbon! I'm doing a talk tomorrow night with @MRMortagua on austerity, Brexit, the EU - and Donald Trump:  
"America Has Spoken:" Election "A Clear Referendum," Say Experts: "2016 Wasn't Nearly Bad Enough" 
The US has lost any right to mock the UK for Brexit  
After meeting John Rees @JohnReesEvans today, I endorse him as my favoured candidate for #UKIP leader. #Brexit #JRE4leader #UKIPLeadership 
Some lessons from post #Brexit Britain for Trump supporters #ElectionNight #Election2016 
What President-Elect Trump potentially means for #Brexit Britain explained in 75 seconds. #USElection2016 
#Brexit was a 2nd Battle of BritainUSA has just joined you in the war against globalismWe going to win this allied together@RealAlexJones 
From my mate @kitwyeth: "You know, £5 on Leicester, Brexit & Trump would have got you £12.5m. Frankly, still not worth it". Awesome! 
Trump victory weakens NATO. Brexit weakens Europe. Putin got everything he wanted.  
The same people who bashed #Brexit are now callin for a #Calexit. Let that sink in. Their political convictions blow like the wind. 
The commonality between #brexit & #USElection2016 is the lack of a compelling liberal/progressive vision for twenty-first century politics 
8/We cannot write off people who voted for Trump and need to separate them from the man. Many were crying with frustration like Brexit. 
Democrats, Trump and the ongoing refusal to learn from Brexit. A very intelligent election response by @ggreenwald  
If your analysis of Brexit and Trump starts and stops with "racism" then you better work. 
Parallels run strong between shocking Donald Trump victory and #Brexit  
Obama basically said, "you win some, you lose some." Doesn't understand it is a referendum on failure at every level. 
Bottom-line is if your 5 yo is worried about Trump/Brexit it's probably cos you, the parent, are a hysterical waste of organs. 
here's a thought. Both sides are accepting the result, why can't you and all the other Remainers accept #Brexit 
Awful watching US friends go through so many of the same emotions/questions as we did post-Brexit.  Thinking of organising a gift exchange 
How the internet inspired, and fueled, the new nationalism of Donald Trump and Brexit  
Forget the Media, the Celebrities and the Polls. They don't win elections. The PEOPLE do! #Brexit  #Trump  
Brexit?!  That's nothing!  Watch this! 
My hot take: Trust no hot or cold take that doesn't contain a critical look at the role neoliberal policies played in Brexit, Trump et al. 
Brexit & Trump are a reflection of modern, office-based journalism - if you don't have boots on the ground, you don't know what people think 
"Trump’s victory had nothing to do with gender...2016 ended up being a referendum on Washington, D.C., period."   
Another Sky insult: less intelligent voters pro-TrumpIt's this condescending attitude that results in Trump/Brexit wins!So who's dumb now? 
Waking up today to see the KKK standing proudly in their paraphernalia makes me weep for what the world is becoming.#brexit#Election2016 
The people have spoke twice this year, Trump & Brexit. Hollande & Merkel must be very worried what 2017 will bring to France & Germany. 
NS says "we have to respect that" did she forget she is not respecting the outcome of Indy & Brexit ref! 
Trump's victory reinforces the reality that those trying to sabotage Brexit are on the wrong side of history. 
This man correctly predicted Brexit, IndyRef and the General Election. He got Trump right too  
uk: brexit is the worst political decision this yearamerica: anything you can do i can do better 
After Brexit there was a sustained rise in hate crime. Step 1 of organizing is solidarity. Let's make sure we're looking out for each other.  
I personally want to thank @BarackObama for campaigning against #Brexit and against @realDonaldTrump - thus guaranteeing their success. 
I saw this precise argument used in the Israeli elections and Brexit, after both votes defied polling results and media predictions. 
This was how American 18-25 voted.  Maybe there is hope after all.  But just like in Brexit they were overshadowed by older voters.  
If you thought Britain got worse post-Brexit, just wait for what's coming next  
As with Brexit, a lot more complicated than 'left behind' blue collar workers. Left behind voters on $100K a year? Please...  
Old people be causing all our problems, they're the same reason for brexit. Digging our graves when they're already half way in their own.  
(17) They now have validation. Precedent. In light of a 400% increase in hate crimes in Britain after Brexit, that is absolutely chilling. 
I'm just walking around Manhattan and the number of times I've overheard the word "Brexit" is remarkable. 
#Brexit & #Trump wins show people r willing to go to any length to show their deep mistrust of the current order. 
Brexit polls - off by 4%2015 UKGE polls - off by 7%2016 POTUS polls - off by ~2.3%Yesterday's polling miss smaller than most ppl think. 
EU considers offering Brits ‘voluntary citizenship’ after #Brexit  
I read there was a correlation between Brexit and support for the death penalty. Look at what my liberal state just did:  
I have no idea if this will help, but I’m going to try anyway: The morning after Brexit felt very much like this for everyone effected. 
I'm guessing 'despite Trump victory' will now enter the BBC lexicon alongside 'despite Brexit'. #despitebrexit #despietrumpvictory :) 
SNP accused of ‘dangerous obsession’ of linking hate crime to Brexit  
My American friends please take note. This happened to the United Kingdom the day of Brexit. Good times ahead. Well done USA.  
Everyone has the same agenda - a happier healthier & wealthier nation in the long run. #embracechange #brexit #modi master stroke 
Now all 4 of the other 'Five Eyes' countries can progress their stated desires for post-Brexit bilateral free trade agreements with the UK. pic.twitter.com/ObOzAJ9nlA 
BRITAIN: Brexit is the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA: Hold my beer. 
After Trump and Brexit, populist tsunami threatens European mainstream: 
It's really rather funny watching all the #brexit types lauding the election of a protectionist president. Not quite getting it, are they? 
Opinion: America, your Brexit has arrived  
.@realDonaldTrump's #USelection2016 victory is a "second #Brexit" says the boss of @WPP 
- Leicester Champions - Brexit happening - Liverpool top of the league - Donald Trump US president   
Populism ends in disaster for the same reason it first prospers, because of its flagrant disregard of facts and reason. #Remain #Brexit 
Same liberal rant.Never "Could WE be wrong"Always "THEY cannot see the light" Keep head in sand!#Trump #Brexit 
Populists are the psychopaths of politics, they can outmanoeuvre us because they are unconstrained by facts and reason. #Remain #Brexit 
It is America's Brexit moment. Trump has made loads of promises he can't deliver on. 
The UK is very different from the US.Let’s not be lazy when looking for answers for Brexit and Trump.(data at ) 
After last night's MARTA referendum vote, the MARTA team wants to say Thank You Atlanta for your support!  
Whether it is #brexit or #TrumpPresident this will leads us to more inequality, more animosity and more financial stress on the 99% 
I was in London for the Brexit vote and now with this historic vote one thing is certain, pollsters are clueless these days. :) 
Clinton lost because of #misogyny.Trump won because of #racism.This was a referendum on America. America voted for hate.#NotMyPresident 
Trump & Brexit—a revolt of working-class whites who felt stung by globalization and uneasy in a diversifying country 
A £5 bet on Leicester winning the league, Brexit, and Trump becoming President would have won you over £15m (via @Coral) 
Price people out of education and you get Trump, Brexit and elites. 
Trump...Brexit, same thing. 
They called Brexit the final 'screw you' from the baby boomers to the millennials. This seems to be the US version 
Wow this whole thing is so similar to Brexit. Almost to the dot. 
Democrats, Trump and the ongoing, dangerous refusal to learn the lesson of Brexit  by @ggreenwald 
BRITAIN:  Brexit is the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA:  Ok watch this!#notmypresident 
This election was just to distract us from the fact that over 3000 students votes no towards the athletic referendum fee #SFASU 
After "Brexit" we got "Brainexit" #ElectionDay #TrumpPresident 
As with Brexit, it's painfully easy to imagine the alternate outcome. And that's what makes this outcome feel so wrong. 
and so, as with brexit, the older generation set fire to their grandchildren's future, and will not be here to pay the price.  
Lot of similarities with Brexit. Ignoring the underlying political-economy &fixating on racism/bigotry is the easy thing but not very useful  
Brexit MPs hail Donald Trump's shock win as 'positive' trade opportunity  
Worse. Brexit won't have an 8 year maximum time limit. If it goes ahead, it's for life.  
Brexit has provided hatred with a sense of entitlement... I fear the same will happen in America... Stay safe my LGBTQ brothers and sisters 
So @NicolaSturgeon you respect verdict of American people but condemn & dispute #Brexit verdict of British people? You're a slimy hypocrite. pic.twitter.com/MxXHQDWcFn 
So according to the Brexit playbook over the next week the Trump team walks back pretty much every promise it made during the campaign 
Celebrate! Victory over the #globalists, #corporatism, #sjw. We The People are going to #DrainTheSwamp. Thank you #Brexit, thank you #Trump 
Trump promised Brexit 'times five.' He delivered.  
Leicester can win the title, Trump can be the President, Brexit can happen.. Surely #Rovers can get a new owner. #VenkysOut 
Trump President, Brazil Coup, UK Brexit..Welcome to the 2016 MADHOUSE:#Cancela2016 
FTSE 100 closes +50 at 6893 - a replay of BREXIT in double quick- time! An excess of unnecessary panic, when situation did not justify it! 
But We WON'T Respect The Brexit Vote even if the Majority Voted Leave  
I've made a small edit. Could Sturgeon make this statement about #indyref or #brexit? She hasn't to date...  
"Post-Brexit values". Ok, time for the liberal left to stop whinging and make a fist at defining this before this cunt and his ilk does.  
Voting in 2016: BrexitHoney GDonald Trump  
How racism and immigration gave us Trump, Brexit, and a whole new kind of politics.  
there was no 'soft' Brexit option on the ballot paper. We voted to leave! 
Brexit and Trump results of unexpected turnout of plus 50s in a protest vote. Part austerity, part pure nostalgia 
Americans will realise the mistake just like when brexit became real 
One big difference with Brexit: No one’s kidding themselves that Trump supporters woke up this morning regretting what they just did. 
#brexit Erasmus + is vital for language degrees in many European languages. Participation in Erasmus + is not dependent on EU membership. 
If your a Lab MP representing a Northern seat that voted Brexit, those vote patterns should rightly terrify you.  
Well, I hope this election has been a cautionary tale for anyone considering Brexit. 
Genuinely thought Brexit was the worst thing to happen to politics this year...America always have to one-up us... 
Two Thirds of those MPs Who no longer represent the Majority of the people in the UK Will suffer the TRUMP affect in 2020 
The day AFTER #Brexit The top Google searches in UK were "what is the EU" and "what is Brexit" - wonder what the top searches are today? 
"As Brexit turns sour, what else can UK Conservatives do but ape Trump's authoritarianism?" Me in @spectator 
America's voters fired their ruling elites last night. This is Brexit on steroids. 
US scientists deeply concerned about Trump anti-expert stance, parallel to Brexit & UK scientists.  
NEW - Trump and Brexit: why it’s again NOT the economy, stupid  
Brexit Latest: Eye 1431 is in shops now.  
Disappointing Election results 3: Brexit 2: Trump1: Kelly Clarkson over Justin Guarini 
Look how young people voted in both #Brexit & yesterday. There is hope for the 's future. Let's support them, embolden them to make change 
Michael Gove met Sun editor and Rupert Murdoch a week before 'Queen backs Brexit' front page  
Thank You @Nigel_Farage You helped our world with #Brexit and America's #Brexit+++. We love you! You're a hero to the ppl of UK & America!  
This is America's Brexit. Only much worse:  
We officially don't have to feel bad for Brexit anymore  #trumpwins  
Similarly to when we take driving licences off old people who could cause harm, can we do that for voting as well? ¯\_(ツ)_/¯ brexit + USA... 
"both Brexit and Trumpism are the very, very wrong answers to legitimate questions that urban elites have refused to ask for 30 years" 
@Daily_Express telling @theresa_may she should trigger #Article50 now, put a stop to anymore spanners been thrown in the #Brexit works.  
After #Brexit and  #TrumpPresident, the media luvvies are hedging their bets by throwing their combined weight behind Robert Mugabe. 
What has the EU ever done for Workers? Print this out and stick it on your wall! #Brexit  
UK: "Brexit is the most stupid, self-destructive move a country could make"USA: "Hold my beer"#TrumpPresident 
During a chat some three weeks ago, top diplomat @HardeepSPuri had told me he saw Trump carrying the day. He had also got Brexit right. 
Desperate Brexit stuff as usual from The Sun. Not being at the back of the queue is a far cry from being "front of the queue."  
This was our nation's referendum on black lives, LGBTQ rights, reproductive justice, isolationism, and the dignity of immigrants. 
Trump’s shock victory hailed as ‘Brexit 2.0’  #Election2016 
Experts said Corbyn wouldn't be #Labour Leader, Brexit wouldn't happen & Trump never a PresidentHappy that experts not backing Corbyn 4 PM! 
Lesson from Trump + Brexit is that we MUST listen to the angry working class, as I was telling the croissant delivery boy only this morning. 
Trump faces an instant $23 billion Treasuries-market referendum  
"Old people's fault" "Not a majority" Useless Twitter hashtags "The rules shouldn't apply" "Waaghh" It really is Brexit 2.0 
@bbcNews How come, with all my money, you employ dumbbows who got Brexit and Now Clinton Presidency wrong. @jongaunt got both 100% correct 
The American Brexit. In June, Britain voted to leave Europe. Yesterday, America voted to leave America. 
Sorry to bother you, Morpheus, but, on reflection, I wonder if I can take the blue pill after all.#Brexit#trumpwins 
England: Brexit was one of the stupidest, self destructive actions a country could make USA: Watch this, hold my beer 
How to be "progressive" today:-Imply everyone who disagrees with you is some kind of bigot-Reference Brexit to cover your shame 
Brexit, Trump have made 1 thing clear: There's no conspiracy controlling everything. What we should fear is people with conspiracy theories. 
After Trump and Brexit, populist tsunami threatens European mainstream  
I know a lot of you are tired of hearing about the election right now, but give us a few more days. This is Brexit-level salt on steroids. 
First Brexit, now Trump: Europe's populists see green light for insurrection  via @POLITICOEurope | Getty 
And let's not forget the Scottish independence referendum or the U.K. general election--2 other recent great polling failures.  
@jongaunt The BBC and Sky have gone into denial. It's the Brexit vote all over again. The Brits have shown the US there is an alternative... 
I Will be challenging Trumps Presidency 
Trump achieved the Brexit-style upset he had promised, riding a surge of turnout among white-working-class voters.  
This is very interesting. I was all about this years ago. Can be done via referendum, striking one line from CA constitution#FreeTheBear 
So grateful to Mpls voters for your commitment to our students, schools & community by renewing the referendum  
This electon was a clear referendum on canidates who tell it like it is on the most important issues of our time  
.@RickyGervais shares his thoughts on #Decision2016, adds "I guess Brexit doesn't seem so bad now"  
Improved...BRITAIN:  Brexit is the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA:  Oh yeah? Hold my beer. Watch this. 
Well @gordon_white has been saying this would happen, that it'd be America's Brexit. People, pay more attention to the wizards in your life. 
Labour ‘allowed 3.6million migrants in over 13 years to change Britain’ 
I am #proudtobecanadian but am scared that the xenophobia that caused Brexit and Trump will be coming here soon. Just look at Kellie Leitch 
Once we #draintheswamp, we'll help you with #brexit! #presidentelecttrump #underdoges #victory 
Trump's election has parallels to Brexit, but the impact will be much bigger for the world, writes @StevenErlanger  
Greenwald, who predicted HRC might lose, on the Dems' ongoing, dangerous refusal to learn the lesson of Brexit  
I fear we're living in "interesting times" people.#Brexit #Trump 
EU-Norway fish negotiations currently under way. In future UK will be at the table #Brexit @ConMEPs @ScotTories @sff_uk 
So...just like Brexit: those who were most against the outcome were those who will have to deal with the repercussions the most.  
Don't think California would leave? People didn't think Brexit or Trump would win either. #WednesdayWisdom #CalExit 
Leicester CityBrexitChicago CubsTrump Odds are that the odds don't mean shit. 
Brexit feels  
Democrats, Trump and the Ongoing, Dangerous Refusal to Learn the Lesson of Brexit  
Brexit & Trump were demagogues yelling "Elite experts aren't that smart" who found a big enough crowd to say "YEAH." They have no real plan. 
Well someone should be practicing what they preach eh @NicolaSturgeon? Ok to accept and respect America's vote but not the referendum?  
People who don't bother to vote make a lot of difference. Brexit and the USA! Make sure and attend your GAA AGM and elect the right people 
Polls get blamed for missing May 2015, Brexit and Trump; but it's the media that deserves scorn for missing the biggest story of our time 
Brexit started this. So now we fight to kill brexit and show people decent people still exist. Love. The Mafia. X  
Night after Brexit I had a gig and crowd really lifted me. Need some of that at the Marlowe in Canterbury tonight. Joe & I on stage at 7.30 
That's right! And Brexit! Didn't have room in the tweet for that. Yeesh. This year, I'm telling you. . . .  
A Brexit parallel I hadn’t thought of: so much fearmongering on the establishment side  
'16 Peak odds comparisonLeicester EPL: 5000-1Trump: 150-1Pens Cup - 35-1Broncos SB - 12-1Cubs WS - 12-1Cavs NBA: 10-1Brexit: 7-1 
Bond referendum passes. Turf fields are coming to Henrico County schools. Our story from the summer:  
Let the election of Trump be a warning to Westminster Remainers: the West is tired of your shit. Tread carefully. #TrumpPresident #Brexit 
Progressive Americans were smug about Brexit & elected Trump. Progressive Canadians: Let's organize.  
So... this happened last night  #MAGA #TrumpTrain #PresidentTrump #DrainTheSwamp #TrumpWins #PresidentElectTrump #AMERICAWON #Brexit  
Angry white people are to blame for Brexit & US election nightmare. History has shown that nobody is more dangerous than angry white ppl. 
Why the media (including me) totally failed to see Trump and Brexit coming - me in @FT in March (£):  Metropolitans 
I know it's complicated but I can't avoid the conclusion that Facebook played a huge role in this, in Brexit. 
Last deployed after Brexit, it's time again for sad monkey cat. pic.twitter.com/sjXkFD4Jb1 
Brexiteers: Are you sure you want to leave the EU now thatTrump is POTUS? Maybe re-think this? Have a 2nd referendum? Just sayin' 
Like Brexit, Trump is the panicky shriek of a frightened people whose privilege has lost its currency.It's white flight from reality.  
Actually, it is. We just compressed it all into the overnight session, rather than the 2-day dip that happened after #Brexit.  
10-year Treasury yield swings from biggest dip since Brexit to largest rise of 2016  
A key difference between Trump and Brexit is that it's much harder to predict the result of choosing a person than choosing a policy. 
A £5 treble on Trump, Brexit and Leicester to win the league would have paid out £12.5m  
It's brexit all over again, people are accusing thousands of being racist and homophobic because they didn't get their way. #TrumpPresident 
Ummm, this looks awfully familiar with Brexit huh?  
"We learn from history that we do not learn from history" - Hegel #quote #TrumpPresident #brexit 
WOWThis is like Brexit butt hurt on steroids Chill the fuck out you 'tolerant' bunch... 
What ever Corbyn & McDonnell tell you, 'access to' but not 'membership of' the Single Market is 'Hard Brexit'. It's the same as Tory Brexit 
It's brexit all over again, people are accusing thousands of being racist and homophobic because they didn't get their way. #TrumpPresident 
First the Brexit, then the Bregret  
Brexit & Trumpit are new wave of racial politics. Pakis should not be worried, we have been electing leaders for same phenomena for decades. 
With a sexual predator in White House hope Americans won't suffer sexual violence epidemic in the way Brexit licensed UK xenophobic violence 
‘I feel more disgusted about the other side winning than I do about my side losing.’ James Meek on  Brexit and Trump  
Trump's journey to the White House shows people are voting against the establishment... Is Brexit contagious?  
In our constant attempts to beat the UK, we decided to do something dumber than #Brexit. Way to go us. Gonna go cry now. 
Just like #brexit, the older generation has put the proverbial in & screwed the future for their children  
Just fine…we in the Colonies voted Brexit too. 
Thanks to the Sun Prairie community for supporting the Phase 1 Referendum! Two elementary schools opening in fall 2018!  
Might do a tweet where Britain says no country could do anything as daft as Brexit and then America says hold my beer. Those seem popular. 
The Globalists are losing BIG TIME...Brexit, Trump, Wilders...Canada needs to catch up with reality...Trudeau/Wynne/Notley/Monsef MUST GO!!  
Here's a look at the similarities of the @realDonaldTrump and Brexit campaigns  
I think we may all agree .....that we are living in the most interesting of times...#ParadigmShifts#Trump #Brexit  
Brexit Britain and Trump's USA. Eurgh. I'm a Welsh European, Get Me Out Of Here. 
Theresa May was singing to a different tune in '07,when she said MP's should have a veto in #brexit #EU negotiations  
BRITAIN: BREXIT was the stupidest and self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA: Hold my drink. #TrumpPresident 
#Brexit market panic lasted 2 whole days.  Post-Trump election panic doesn't even make it to the market open.  
What does the #Brexit and #USElections have in common? Both times, people voted, and then asked, what does it mean anyway. #MorningAfter 
Maybe everyone that voted for Brexit & Trump isn't an uneducated moron. Maybe they are just sick and tired of being ignored. 
Between last night & Brexit, Western civilization has failed democracy. #themorningafter 
I read this after Brexit and re-read it now.  
But can I just please point out, the UK took a lot of flack with Brexit! There was no mourning period, it was 0-100 savagery  
First bloody #Brexit now #PresidentTrump and yet "Boaty McBoatface" is the one vote the fuckers decide to overturn. 
The US has lost any right to mock the UK for Brexit  
People now think Brexit and Trump triumphs are a sign that Honey G will win X Factor  #TrumpPresident 
So they really did vote for Lex Luthor. I can't help but feel #Brexit forced the door. He just kicked in. In Jackboots. 
Market reaction shows Donald Trump's victory is no Brexit moment  
Last night was a referendum on what white people thought about 50 years of civil rights movements. A majority stated they could give a damn. 
Useful to re-read Michael Moore's "Rust Belt Brexit" prediction.  
#Brexit #Trump. Now time for #TurkExit (troops) out of #Cyprus and right of #refugees to return 
@epkaufm spot on as usual. Trump and Brexit: why it’s again NOT the economy, stupid 
I have to think that the odds that British parliament pocket vetoes Brexit just went down. 
10-year Treasury yield swings from biggest dip since Brexit to biggest rise of 2016  
George Soros defeated for the 3rd time in a row this year:#GeenPeil, #Brexit, @realDonaldTrumpPower to the people!Destroy the plutocracy! 
Mind you if Trump genuinely does understand our post Brexit values perhaps he could explain them to the government  
And was way, way more dangerous than Brexit!  
What happens when you add Donald Trump's foreign policy to Brexit? #Election2016 #ElectionNight 
This is like Brexit, except if Brexit won without winning the most votes. 
For Americans, the Brexit vote should have been a sign of things to come, writes @StevenErlanger 
The markets tell us President Trump is worse than Brexit  
German stock market the morning after Trump's victory. Yep, totally a horrible global crash, just like Brexit.  
Brexit & Trump made me realise that I am proud so proud of London where we made history by electing @SadiqKhan as the Mayor of London. 
15 year old on a bus: "I think Brexit is worse. The Americans get to vote again in 4 years. Brexit is forever." #truedat 
Hear HearIn wake of Trump & Brexit, broadcast media needs new 'experts', new debates,extend the commentariat, move outside its comfort zone  
@iammrcup I can’t believe it. It’s exactly the same results as Brexit over here. Disgruntled elders voting against the ‘system’. 
Many journalists  and pollsters didn't see Trump happening - or Brexit . So how come ? 
And I thought brexit was bad... 
@dreyer_smit Good God! What is wrong with these people? We had this kind of childish reaction over Brexit.   
Watching @BBC trying to make sense of election and whats going to happen, When they have spent 2 years being wrong about #Brexit and #Trump 
As on #Brexit day, @FT has pubbed a @realDonaldTrump tabloid for free distribution in City and @Hudson_News in US 
WINNING: President Elect Trump, Brexit, Putin, Assad, and the G-Zero. 
Great that a major political party is asking for environmental standards to be maintained post Brexit  
Republicans fuelled Trumpism, Tories fuelled euroscecpticism. Both stunned when voters went for the real thing (Trump/Brexit). 
Nigel Farage: '#Trump victory a super-sized Brexit'   #ElectionNight #Elections2016 
- Brexit happening - Liverpool top of the league - Donald Trump US president   
I just can't believe this is real life.. Is this what Brexit felt like? 
9 Brexit Lessons From Britain That America Might Want To Learn  
Britain- Brexit is the single most self-destructive thing a nation can undertake. America-  hold my beer. 
$SPX same line as China and Brexit on the low  
Brexit. Trump. Common sense replacing political correctness at last. French elections soon.....Le Pen? 
"What does Trump mean for Brexit?" was among the top questions on #Brexit in the hours following @realDonaldTrump's #USElection2016 win 
Given Brexit & Trump, can we all now agree that liberals mocking & shaming opposing voters is a truly awful electoral strategy? 
UK voting for Brexit, USA electing Trump, Renault keeping Palmer over K-Mag... 2016 sure is a year for strange choices. 
#BrexitWhatever is good or bad about Trump everything has changed, we need to rethink Brexit 
Mood in NYC feels a lot like London the morning after #Brexit - shock,silence,fear for the future 
Brexit, Trump and Liverpool are top of the league...  
My tweet, 2 days after #Brexit#trump $GLD 
How do we feel, UK? Imagine Brexit happening if most people voted against it. 
In case you missed it, the #MARTA16 referendum passed!   
Can't believe this guy bet on Leicester winning the prem, Brexit & Trump as president... just bagged £100m from £1  
Nigel Farage: '#Trump victory a super-sized #Brexit' #Brexit2 
Wrote this at 2am while freaking: Trump is Brexit squared 
This man correctly predicted Brexit, IndyRef and the General Election. He got Trump right too  
So @NicolaSturgeon are you finally going to accept the verdict of the British people on Brexit and Independence?  
Donald Trump's election victory was more improbable than #Brexit. The UK was +250 to leave the EU. Trump reached +600 to win the presidency. 
.@Nigel_Farage THANK YOU Nigel for helping America have our own #Brexit. We appreciate you so much! #TrumpTrain 
Watch: Farage Says Trump Victory ‘Bigger than Brexit’  
*******EAT YOUR WORDS*******This hypocrit says she is going to respect the American vote, try respecting the Scottish & UK referendum.  
The sales tax referendum has passed. Thank you for speaking up for the lagoon!  
Statement on my proposal for an offer of individual associate EU citizenship. #Brexit  
With Brexit, you've revitalized a movement that helped us defeat the evilest of presidential candidates. Thank you & God bless 
We now have a US President who likes our country and understands our post-Brexit values. 
Trump called it: "Brexit plus plus plus."  
The 45th US President @realDonaldTrump has proved to the world that people don't trust the entrenched political system - Brexit plus plus! 
In UK there was a surge in racist attacks after Brexit vote.And we don't have guns.I'm kind of dreading the evening news today. 
If you put $5 on an parlay of Brexit, Trump, and Newcastle FC you'd have $25 million right now 
Well done @realDonaldTrump who has already agreed to meet @Nigel_Farage for post #Brexit talks and trade deal  
More Britons voted for Brexit than against it.More Americans voted for Hillary than for Trump. 
The only good thing is that Trumpamerica has wrested back the title of World Champion Political Stupid from Brexit Britain. 
Seems @UKLabour is far to busy working out how to kill of Brexit to worry about the people of UK and its democratic choice. 
The Arab Spring, Brexit and Donald Trump have one theme that now endangers the world  
Hey India, it's a great year to hold a referendum in Kashmir. They might actually vote for you. #Brexit #Trump 
Bahamas voted against women's rights and the British voted for Brexit, can't get any crazier than that right? America:  
The election of Donald Trump has strong parallels to Brexit. But the impact will be much bigger.  
Hate crimes after Brexit went up 5 fold. Look out for your neighbors. People of color, LGBT, Muslims, immigrants, we are with you. 
After Brexit, as I recall, hate crimes in Britain shot up a staggering amount. I don't expect any less here in America. Please be careful. 
But as with Brexit the reactionary middle class often gets written out of the 'wtf happened' narrative – can't happen this time 
.@Muse's Matt Bellamy allegedly voted for Brexit  
Thank you, Forsyth County, for passing the 2016 Bond Referendum! @wsfcs appreciates the support! 
A very good read from a historian's perspective: History tells us what may happen next with Brexit & Trump  
.@pgonin Worry not, the eternal optimist believes we will survive both Brexit and Trump. Out tomorrow in @dagensindustri. Respect democracy. 
There are remarkable parallels between Brexit and the triumph of Donald Trump.  
Occurs to me to repost this, from 3 days after Brexit:Brexit leaders walk back some of their biggest promises  
Poor Jon Snow, BREXIT & Trump all in six months.A difficult year for the metropolitan media elite.But I suspect they have learned nothing.  
One comparison with Brexit that isn't fair: more people voted for Brexit than voted remain. In the US, more voted for Clinton than Trump. 
Well @POTUS you were wrong about Open Borders, #Brexit, Obamacare....and turns out you were wrong about @realDonaldTrump also #DealWithIt 
Nigel Farage says Donald Trump understands our 'post-Brexit values' and predicts 'further political shocks'.  
One common element behind Brexit and Trump: a Murdoch media stirring up hatred and fear 
The @LiamFoxMP appointment is looking V clever today. He is close to nearly all of the Republicans now running the House and Senate #Brexit 
Today, the establishment is in deep shock. Even more so than after Brexit. 
If Democrats learn that this was a referendum on Obamism they will come out strong in 2 years. But they likely won't. 
Eerily similar to what we saw post Brexit. Perhaps something to be hopeful about though.  
The establishment is in shock. Even more so than after Brexit. Prepare for further political shocks in the years to come - @Nigel_Farage 
I learned from Indyref that me calling the other side baddies didnae work. Then saw same mistake with Brexit. And now Trump. 
Watch: Farage Says Trump Victory 'Bigger than Brexit'  
Nigel Farage: "we now have a President who likes our country and understands our post-Brexit values"  
Brexit, Trump... there are going to be a lot of human rights issues coming up. Join Amnesty, get involved locally;  
With the apocalypse only 243 days away, Brexit UK grieves the loss of its hard-won title/epitaph "Most Backwards Developed Country" Nov 2016  
2016 was a referendum on the performance of @BarackObama. Obamacare, stagnate economy, spreading ISIS... Clearly America has had enough. 
Blessed to serve @wwsweb community! Grateful for the resounding support for our referendum! Looking forward to our upcoming focus groups!  
What Brexit and Donald Trump can teach the centre left about politics. By Remain campaigner @wdjstraw  
The Year of upsets:LeicesterBrexitCleveland (Cavilers)CubsPresident TrumpWhat's next? 
MESSAGE TO THE WORLD!People don't vote for Trump, Brexit, Le Pen. People are voting against the alternatives!!STEP UP YOUR GAME IDIOTS 
And except that Nigel Farage has repeatedly praised Trump's campaign, and Donald Trump referred to himself as Mr Brexit. 
Britain: No country could ever indulge in such an embarrassing & self-destructive act as Brexit.America: Hold my beer. #TrumpPresident 
This is America's Brexit. Only much worse:  
Imo 'nihilism' is perhaps *the* key neglected factor informing both this and Brexit  
Sarah Palin says Trump winning is just like Brexit: That is probably the first true thing she has said in a decade! 
Prof @MD_Nalapat's record remains unsmudged. Absolutely accurate on Iraq, Libya, Egypt, Syria, Brexit, TRUMP - TRUST his take! #Nostradamus 
Great plan for the 48% post #Brexit. Any ideas for associate #Britizenship for #EU folks in the UK? .@NewEuropeans 
Email from old American friend (living abroad): Our Brexit is Bigger than Your Brexit!!! and bigly so 
'It's time for @realDonaldTrump to keep his pledges on recognition of #Crimea referendum'  
2016 played us all.Vine got deleted Prince diedBrexitThere's a clown apocalypse And there's an orange man running america 
People that voted for Brexit & Trump are the same people that try & board the tube before letting you off. 
Having some second thoughts about my global recession call. As with Brexit, the short-run case isn't that clear. Still a disaster 
Donald Trump predicted "Brexit plus plus plus," and he was right  
#isitok that between #brexit and #trump I am genuinely scared? Can't even emigrate to escape this one, need a new planet 
Perspective: Trump *might* be gone in four years, but Brexit is forever. You Brits are still the bigger idiots. 
Trump and Brexit: why it’s again NOT the economy, stupid  via @LSEpoliticsblog 
Greek fiasco, Brexit, Lepen, Trump: When in doubt, blame it on the people and their "illusions" or vengeful reactionism. As "the left." 
poor folks didn't vote for Trump, like they didn't vote for Brexit and didn't vote for Tories so when we dropping this fucking narrative? 
A whiff of something unpleasant akin to post-Brexit around here - it is OK to think people who voted for a PIG were WRONG and indeed STUPID 
Brexit happened. Trump has happened. We need to work hard to EDUCATE the people who voted, about racism, sexism and the division it creates. 
This Election Is a Referendum on Hate.  
This is Brexit squared  
Just like Brexit, America has voted for a gigantic con | @campbellclaret 
Brexit and Trump - people are not born thick, it has to be taught & the media must now fall under the harshest spotlight. 
Gold has pulled back from its biggest jump since the @Brexit vote  
BRITAIN: Brexit Was The Stupidest, Most Self-Destructive Act A Country Could Undertake!USA: Hold My Drink... 
The new 'Special Relationship'... #USElection2016 #PresidentTrump #Brexit #farage 
Man, 2016 has been a wild year. Cubs. Cavs. Brexit. Trump. And Jerry drafted a good QB. #unbelievable 
The fact Brexit and Trump becoming POTUS happened shows how many uneducated, easily manipulative simple minded fucks there are in the world. 
Muhammad Ali, David Bowie and Prince die plus Brexit and Donald Trump.The John Lewis Christmas Ad better be fucking spectacular this year. 
brexit and trump in one year, really makes you doubt the competency and education of the masses 
This idea that #Brexit and #Trump supporters are stupid is nonsense. Being dismissive like that has led to these results. #wakeup 
Watch: Farage Says Trump Victory 'Bigger than Brexit'  
The best comment I heard during election last night: "The election of Donald Trump was the voters referendum on  progressive liberalism." 
If today and indeed Brexit teaches us anything it's that we have failed to invest adequately in education. #Election2016 
Obama didn't make his candidacy a referendum on racism, ran on fighting for the little guy. Hillary did opposite:  
The "hidden" #brexit type vote appears to be white women, it seems as though they voted different then they polled #RaceTrumpedGender 
Brexit is fuelling a growing rift in the SNP. Sturgeon can’t get her second independence referendum 
I was and still am dead against brexit, but I just love the idea of #Calexit. Make it happen guys. 
The size & breadth of overnight trading was 4-times the tumult seen in Treasury futures after the UK referendum: FTN Financial's Jim Vogel 
Such a sad day. I'll say what I said after Brexit. Now isn't the time to mourn, now is the time to organise. Use your right to protest  
The same with Brexit- again the so called 'selfie obsessed' generation have more compassion & humanity then their elders.  
Still waiting for some pervert to tweet me their £10 Leicester, Brexit and Trump treble. 
Watch: Farage Says Trump Victory 'Bigger than Brexit' Against huge odds 
Trump's trade advisor told us the UK would be at the front of the queue for a post-Brexit trade deal - ahead of EU  
Voted no, I was a racist. Voted brexit, I was a racist, America votes in Trump....apparently by racists.Democracy eh  
Terror attacks in Brussels.Alan Rickman died.Mass shooting in Orlando.Brexit.Donald Trump.2016, ladies and gentlemen.#ElectionNight 
Hate spiked post-Brexit, and may spike TODAY in US. Here's how to intervene if you witness it. Via @jmonkiew Thx to @namirari @MuslimARC 
The damage Farage, UKIP, D Mail, Sun, Express cause leads to events like Brexit and Trump. 
U.S.: how many layers of irony are you on?Brexit: like maybe 5 or 6 right now my dudeU.S.: you are like a baby. watch this 
Picked Brexit ...Turnbull and Trump wished I had that success with race horses 
my dad voted brexit. i wish i'd spent less time tweeting about it and more time trying to educate him about how it would affect his kids 
Britain & the USA are both heading towards Putinism in which the corrupt super-rich manipulate a gullible mass. #Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
This ISN'T Brexit. This ISN'T the howl of the disenfranchised working class against the faceless establishment.  
#ElectionNight After Arab Spring, Brexit,and now this time to take science out of political science 
Shame you didn't have that point of view on brexit you sket @NicolaSturgeon  
DO NOT SELL your 401k shares. You will get burned. After Brexit vote, London's Stock Exchange plunged. It recovered almost immediately.  
Crimea, Brexit, Syria, Trump. War is coming. 
Why not spend some of the 10s of billions to be wasted on #Brexit on education & training for the modern economy#Remain #YesEU. 
I have the horrible feeling that our Brexit vote provided the example & encouragement for the Trump campaign, which harnessed the same anger 
Excellent piece on why Donald Trump's win will make Brexit more painful, by @JeremyCliffe : 
The similarities of Trump and Brexit campaigns are striking   
The night of Brexit felt exactly like this.  
2016:1. Leicester City2. Brexit3. Joe Allen4. Trump 
Most shocking thing in 2016? Trump? Brexit? For me it was the moment Mrs Brown's Boys was voted 'Greatest Sitcom Ever' by the general public 
enjoying Mihir & his buddies sour grapes play out - externalising their mistakes & learning nothing from Modi, Brexit, Trump & soon Fr & De  
First there was #Brexit... and now there's president #Trump... is it the end of days?! THE HORROR!!! #CatsOfTwitter #whiskerswednesday 
Apparently the bulk of the American electorate took the Brexit vote as a challenge to see who could be the most self-destructive. USA! USA! 
The risks of a Trump presidency—protectionism, isolationism, and global turmoil—lead to a more painful Brexit 
8. Trump will also be less useful as an ally than Clinton in negotiating Brexit. 
 To our friends in the UK- how'd we do?  #Brexit 
Young, British and living in Europe: "#Brexit has turned our lives upside down".  
7. Geopolitical context for Brexit completely changed. Will still happen. But imperative to do so in way that doesn't further fracture West 
I am told a £5 accumulator placed last year on Leicester-Brexit-Trump would have made me £12.5m. Damn. 
Interesting to compare this to Brexit- where 75 percent of people aged between 18 and 24 voted for Remain. (Source: NBC)  
.@NicolaSturgeon, we voted to leave the EU as a United Kingdom. People now want the Gov. to get on with the job of making Brexit a success. 
Trump and Brexit: why it’s again NOT the economy, stupid  - from @LSEpoliticsblog 
So it has been a strange year. Brexit, Trump...and those four horseman riding up the road this morning 
“After Brexit and this election, everything is now possible. A world is collapsing before our eyes.”  
When political elite in their self interest bubbles don't listen to the little people about real issues they get Brexit & Trump 
@NicolaSturgeon How about respecting the verdicts of your own people?! #indyref #brexit #irony 
Victory for Donald Trump: this is Brexit on a global scale, writes @JonnElledge  
brexit v presidental electionproof that the older generation are ruining our future cos they still have the same mindset as the 1950s  
Grim that it's the 21st Century and the majority of both Brexit and Trump votes were swayed by racism. 
U.S. friends: Hate crimes went up 41% here post-Brexit. Please watch out for the vulnerable now. Be vigilant. Intervene. Have their backs. 
First Brexit and now Trump is president... what the hell is going on?!  
If you put a £5 bet on a Leicester, Brexit & Trump treble it would have paid out £15.1 million...  
#UPDATE British growth to nearly halve in 2017 due to Brexit: EU  
RETWEET If you agree that Politicians should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum and get on with it! 
This is a fairly depressing read. If you thought TTIP was bad..."So what does Donald Trump mean for Brexit?"  
If Brexit and Trump have taught us anything it's that fear mongering is a powerful tool and that people are idiots 
If our MPs know there are no positives for brexit then they should do the right thing & put the UK first #nobrexit 
If you bet on a Leicester, Brexit and Trump treble, you have a gambling problem. 
Trump's win has so many parallels with #Brexit- record  numbers of people voting against a political elite that wasn't listening to them 
This is the third election I have watched be won with identity politics, not economic arguments. Poland, Brexit, US. 
American Brexit. 
the increased racist sentiment n violence we had / are having here post-Brexit is bad enough just IMAGINE what is going to happen next there 
One lesson I’ll take from Brexit and Trump is that we need to face up to racism, not either pretend it doesn’t exist or excuse it. 
Brexit #2  
Real danger for America in the short term, as we saw with Brexit, is those who now think their extreme racist views have a stamp of approval 
We asked a professor to analyse the polls since the EUref. His verdict? Brexit is not the will of the British people  
Let's be clear, the reason stocks are briefly down is JPMorgan etc had bet they'd control the White House and lost like they did with Brexit 
America is following Brexit to revolution, there is no more status quo. But the sun comes up and the world still spins. (I pray.) #Hamilton 
A £10 bet accumulator on:-Leicester winning the league BrexitTrump winning US electionThis would be worth a staggering £25 million. 
Friends abroad asking if trump, if backed into a constitutional corner, will go the people referendum style, populist style? 
This. Brexit/Trump/whatever isn't going to be opposed by handwringing. Okay, we dropped the ball. Learn from it and get back in the fight.  
>Well, instead of squabbling, let's settle this like civilised men. Do you think there should be a 2nd Brexit referendum? Only Y/N answer  
"I thought Brexit was big, but boy, this looks even bigger" - Farage, May and Corbyn react to Trump win  
as with Brexit, a call to return to a version of country they've never experienced, and never existed. 
Donald Trump tells @itvnews that America is having 'its own little Brexit' after election victory #USelection 
Trump vs. Brexit » @WilfredFrost highlights the similarities and important differences. #CNBCexplains 
Again: polls in UK actually got Brexit right. Polls here didn't. Markets in both cases were clueless.  
Like Brexit, the result was dictated by angry older whites who don't have to live long with the consequences of what they've done. 
History tells us what will happen next with Brexit and Trump  
Trump and Brexit have destroyed the economic case against Scottish independence  
Those aspiring to find a job in sports analytics should look towards replacing pollsters who blew predictions on Trump, Brexit and Trudeau! 
The rise of the strong man populism: Putin, Erdogan, Orban, Kaczynski, Duterte and now Trump. & in the UK after Brexit May is populist too 
#Trump's White House win was foreshadowed by "Brexit," expert says  
If folk don't like the outcome of Brexit and Trump other countries are available to go to and let us get on with it.  
Old people ruined Brexit and now the Presidency. 
.@rickygervais on President Trump: "I guess Brexit doesn't seem so bad now"  
Wow. Brexit effect to market? Fine, remember that was over and completely recovered in 5 days. Calm Down people. 
Nigel Farage hails Donald Trump's win, saying "the revolution continues"  
well at least I can cash my DJ/Cavs/Brexit/Cubs/Trump parlay that I almost forgot about  
Alex Salmond, Merkel you are truly shameful! Trump has won, Brexit won, Scottish Ref won - get over it! The only racists are lefty loons. 
OMG!!! A £5 treble on Leicester, Brexit and Trump would have paid out £12.5 million..  
For financial markets, Donald Trump's triumph has brought back memories of the Brexit vote  
Brexit, Trump and Liverpool are top of the league...  
2016 has been crazy. Leicester winning the league, Brexit, President Donald Trump.. But Liverpool are actually top of the premier league. 
The success of Brexit/Trump is less about 'working people having been failed' and more about them being lied to very effectively. 
.@TuckerCarlson: Just like Brexit wasn't about Nigel Farage, this is not entirely about Trump; it's a reaction against the people in charge.  
Implied probabilities of Trump presidency, Brexit  
What does President Trump mean for UK-US "special relationship" and #Brexit?  
#Brexit, American-style: #Trump supporters have told political & journalist class 'where to go' - UKIP MEP Coburn 
Applies to brexit, too. Most people aren't nice & it isn't because they're poor or uneducated.  
FOREIGN POLICY: #Brexit was just the warm-up. #Trump's victory could upend the entire world order  via @MarcChampion1 
>call people racist & sexist instead of discussing policies like humans>brexit wins>keep going>Trump wins>keep goingFucking idiots 
I'm sick to my stomach - Is this how Brexit made you feel? 
I saw the same BS in 1980 with Reagan, and this year with Brexit.  It was obvious the press were lying.  
The refugee crisis, mass war crimes, Brexit and #Trump make me wish Mayan predictions about 2012 apocalypse had been accurate #Trumpocalypse 
Fascinating. As with Brexit, focus on "blame the olds" story obscures the big vote for insurgency among middle aged.  
Google nach Brexit:"What is BrExit?"Google nach #ElectionNight :"Nuclear Launch Codes, how do they work?" 
This is why #brexit and #trump scare me. Because history. 
If you thought Trump winning was a surprise, you've clearly learned NOTHING this year.Leicester CityBrexitHoney GLiverpool top November 
It's exactly the same as Brexit. They want to look everywhere for culprits except in the mirror. 
Woke up thinking that, like Brexit, many DT voters didn't think he wld actually win, so they voted to have their "voice heard" against HRC+ 
Britain chose the BrexitThe SC chose to bury Fmr Pres Marcos in the LMNBAmerica chose TrumpBut if u choose me promise di ka magsisisi 
In wake of Trump and Brexit, broadcast media needs new 'experts', new debates, extend the commentariat, move outside its comfort zone. 
British and American fortunes are declining. Trumpism and Brexit are merely based on an antiquated notion of American and British greatness. 
Pros/Cons of 2016 Cons:BrexitTrumpEbolaAlan RickmanDavid BowiePrinceMuhammed AliHarambePros:The Iguana escaped the snake 
UK's 2017 growth forecast slashed in half after Brexit vote   
If we dismiss everyone who voted Trump or Brexit as flat out stupid, wrong, and evil, we may as well admit defeat because they outnumber us. 
I remember the Brexit cycle. This bit is where everyone gets blamed except the people who actually voted for him. 
We will never forget.9/11 & 11/9#ElectionNight #USElection2016 #Trump #Brexit+++ 
It's important to note that we can't pass this off as 'just Americans' or 'just Brexit'. Right-wing extremism is becoming a worldwide trend. 
Reading the Trump victory so utterly wrong - and before this Brexit - is a stunning failure of global punditry. Punditry is an echo chamber. 
I predicted a Trump victory because, like Brexit, working class westerners prefer far right solutions to the problems of globalization. 
.@realDonaldTrump victory is a referendum on jobs, failing Obamacare, broken VA & Immigration system, PC gone overboard & dishonest media. 
Friends: Please look out for each other. If you see anyone being mistreated (something we saw after Brexit vote), please help them. 
The main reason given by Brexit voters was around sovereignty. Had nothing to do with "stopping foreigners" well done on your bigotry tho   
Sturgeon: “this is the verdict of the American people & we must accept that”.Pity she can't accept Brexit is verdict of the British people 
This reminds me too much of what happened with brexit, all the horrible hate crimes that ensued afterwards. Please stay safe 
President Trump... After Brexit, let's not act like we're so surprised. Horrified, yes. But not surprised. 
My latest: #Trump & #Brexit: NOT the economy, stupid @DAaronovitch @reihan @faisalislam @GoodwinMJ @stephenkb : 
NEW - Trump and Brexit: why it’s again NOT the economy, stupidhttp://buff.ly/2fZk6er  
Well, America actually did it. It Trumped Brexit. 
Establishment politics & polls that back it up are dead. Trump & Brexit both did 'the impossible'. Think Corbyn has no chance? Think again. 
The 45th President thought the Scottish independence referendum was "really exciting", before welcoming the No vote as "a great decision"  
Any account of why Trump won/Hillary lost needs to account for the fact that she probably got more votes. In this respect, not like Brexit. 
...and we thought Brexit was embarrassing! 
After Trump and Brexit, populist tsunami threatens European mainstream:  
Once again, like after Brexit, one of the biggest market routs was in Tokyo  
Brexit was supposed to be a cautionary tale, America, not a blueprint. 
Can the Brexit supporters and the trump supporters go join each other on another planet and not ruin ours for the rest of us please  
Strong parallels between #Brexit &  #Trump voters, yet education gap greater in UK and partisanship the driver in US  
After Brexit, harassment spiked. This is going to happen in America. Here's a guide to defusing harassment.  
I honestly think the EU referendum, the elections in the UK and the American presidential elections have shown Twitter is a bubble 
Congratulations, Mr. and Mrs. Brexit.  
First brexit now trump,,, you really wouldnt expect people to make such idiotic decisions but here we are 
Brexit vs Trump $ES_F $SPY 
Most people who voted to Brexit are better off than they were 20 years ago. It's nothing to do with 'social justice' - it's all about values 
I wonder how @matteorenzi is feeling about the rather complex Italian constitutional referendum on Dec 4th:  
I think it is safe to assume that with #Brexit and @realDonaldTrump winning the US Presidential race, the #TTIP agreement is now history! 
"The mood on Wall Street is similar to after the surprise brexit vote."-- @jillwagnerCBS  
Remainers said they'd leave the UK if it was Brexit, & Clintonites said they'd leave the US if it was TrumpWhere are they all going to go? 
Remember how hate crime peaked after brexit?? Yeah imagine what it's gonna be like in America now Trump's in charge 
88% of registered voters voted, the highest turnout ever, like BREXIT for the UKThis just proves you can't trust ordinary working people. 
Oh look, another poll: Italy Referendum: ‘Yes’ 47.9%, ‘No’ 52.1%: Euromedia Poll 
We should all be working together for human rights, equality, and economic development, not fuelling hatred & division: hence EU not Brexit.  
UK & USA had a competition in 2016 to see who could mess up most. We thought we won with Brexit then they voted #Trump  #USElectionResults 
Let's be clear this was a referendum of elitist can't sit here mean girls white feminism. Lena Dunham and squad have been rejected. 
Brexit and Trump are rage against a deaf establishment. They speak to those who have been marginalized and forgotten. Listen and adjust 
Ngl I thought all you part time politicians would disappear after Brexit and what not but nah here you are again with your expert opinions 
After Trump and Brexit, populist tsunami threatens European mainstream:  
Remember. Trump #brexit the #AltRight and the rest of the hate, are all REACTIONS to progress. Don't let the reaction, decide your actions. 
Paddy Power says the Leicester/Brexit/Trump treble would have been priced at odds of 3,000,000/1. So £5 = £15million 
2016 with Brexit & Trump has proved to me that:1. Majority of people are still stupid2. Discrimination is still very rife 
Con majority, Corbyn leadership win, Brexit, Trump nomination, Trump Presidency. As a community, we have failed.On behalf of us, I am sorry. 
- Leicester win the league- UK vote for Brexit- USA vote for TrumpIn the year of upsets, Honey G is 9/1 to win X Factor...  
Robin Walker MP: "I've always made clear I would accept the result of the referendum and it was right to trust the people with the decision" 
Trump's White House win was foreshadowed by "Brexit," expert says  pic.twitter.com/5hsvcS56Kg 
What worries me more than anything, I think, about both #trump and #brexit is the glorification of anti intellectualism. Terrifying. 
Wanted to say congratulations to Bruce you've worked so hard towards Trumps win we brexit ppl u.stand how good it feels to get rid od crap  
But to anyone saying 'this is a time to mourn not act', as folk did after Brexit - no! Time to hunger and thirst for righteousness. 
Home to the UK to hear the incredibly disappointing news. Brexit and President Trump. 2016 is quite the year  
America: ahh no way! They did it! They did brexit hahaha!Britain: Right America, its your turn. Truth or dare?America: Dare.. 
#BREAKING British growth to nearly halve in 2017 due to Brexit: EU 
People say America should come together. But on the victor's terms? Like Brexit, some gulfs are unbridgeable without losing who you are. 
#Brexit, #PresidentialElection2016 show, that media has lost focus on what matters, namely to listen w/out political agenda #mediarelevancy 
Brexit, Trump, Russia. This is going to be fun! 
1/ Striking how much of the ‘Liberal’-Left punditocracy is reacting to Trump's win in almost exactly the same way as it did to Brexit's win. 
@metromorning I think this will be like Brexit all over again. The people will wake up not understanding, then regretting what they've done 
If the rise of racist attacks against minorities after the Brexit vote is anything to go by, I just pray Muslims in the US stay safe. 
Spoken like a true elitist who completely doesnt understand WHY Brexit happened and @realDonaldTrump won. 
seems like America saw brexit and thought how can we Trump that 
Donald Trump predicted "Brexit plus plus plus," and he was right  
Brexit, Trump and Liverpool are top of the league...  
The 'left behind' choosing Brexit & Trump narrative is a perfect example of confusing correlation with causation. No evidence for it. 
Don't panic. Yet. Me in @IBTimesUK  on Brexit, Trump & the political economy of globalisation:    
Nottingham in the Age of Brexit - living humanely in our post-referendum world Book your free seat … #BeingHuman16 
Extraordinary: 31 of America's 35 biggest cities voted in favour of Clinton. This is the rural revolution, just like Brexit #election2016 
Oh Trump won,  lol and we thought brexit was bad 
Really is remarkable how #PresidentTrump reaction mirrors #Brexit. Academics will have a field day studying wider global zeitgeist. 
America laughed at us for voting Brexit then go and vote in Trump! Honestly Solidifying yourselves as the arsehole of the world #Trump 
The world did not collapse after Brexit and will not collapse with Trump as President. When will doom mongers stop their pathetic hyperbole? 
What with Brexit and Trump, all we need now is for uber to be run out of town, TFL gone and @taxiapp_london takeoff & we have a full house! 
.@MaureenDowd: Will there be buyer’s remorse, as with Brexit?  
Trump's victory showed that the so-called experts and mainstream media didn't have a clue. Should've been obvious since Brexit though. 
The BBC in particular, first with their (continuing) anti-Brexit campaign, and with their three-month anti-Trump...  
Just Like Brexit older people have voted on the future for the rest of the population  
Donald Trump and Brexit have proven the centre ground is dead – and the 2008 recession killed it  
The year 2016 has seen two stunning wins for the people against the globalists, Brexit and the USA presidential election of Mr Trump. 
The only positive about Donald Trump becoming president is that Brexit is no longer the biggest fuck up of 2016 
GCSEs in 2036: Explain why 2016 was the biggest political disaster in the 21st century with particular reference to Trump & Brexit.(6 marks) 
First Brexit now Trump. Like father, like son. 
Brexit and now this. The western ruling class consensus appears to be in favor of reforming a national bourgeois. 
"Everything about this feels identical to Brexit."  
The US even had to outdo us on 'the worst democratic decision of 2016'... couldn't just let us have our brexit could they??? #ElectionNight 
There should be a Common Sense Committee that steps in whenever people do something stupid like Trump or Brexit 
After Trump and Brexit, populist tsunami threatens European mainstream:  
Thoughts are with my stateside chums right now. I'd say unbelievable but after Brexit I can believe anything. 
Forget trump and brexit. The thing I'm still most worried about is this bloody diamond formation and not scoring from open play #saintsfc 
Your worst nightmares came true today. This is #Brexit on steroids. A racist, bigoted, misogynist @POTUS has been elected.#Election2016 
Still think there's no dealing with / listening to Trump and Brexit voters because there's no non-disastrous way to give them what they want 
2016 a year to remember -Brexit-Trump wins elections -Kanye announced presidency 2020-no more dinner at the white house 4 Bey & Jay Z 
@RalfLittle Amidst all the hysteria the fact is this is reversible .... 4 years. Unlike Brexit 
I can't believe it.. I guess this means you guys won't be making fun of brexit for a while.  
This man correctly predicted Brexit, IndyRef and the General Election. He got Trump right too  
Stupid, small-minded morons, now appear to be the global majority. Brexit happened here. The dipshits revolted & won.Now what, dipshits? 
First Brexit, then Trump, what next, the Irish government supporting bodily autonomy for women?! 
Trump to the left of me,Brexit to the right.Here I am stuck in theMiddle with you!  
Brexit. Trump. Leicester City. The world's full of surprises. But one thing remains the same: Mangal 2's delicious kebabs. Fuck all else. 
Politicians, don't blame voters for Brexit or Trump, consider it a performance review by your boss, the people who put you there. #BeBetter 
Brexit caused lasting rise in hate crime, new figures show  
A £5 treble bet on Leicester, Brexit and #PresidentTrump would have returned £12.5 million(via @oggieuk @GoodwinMJ) 
It saddens me that this is exactly what happened with Brexit. Young people have a brain but not enough voted  #Elections2016 
Between Brexit and Trump, the Anglo-American alliance is going to be largely absent from intl affairs for 4 years. An interesting experiment 
To quote my granddaughter "it feels as though England & America had a competition to see who could mess up the most in 2016" #brexit #trump 
President Trump and Brexit. 2016 is a terrible year 
2016:1st - Leicester win the Premier League2nd - Brexit3rd - Trump becomes President4th - Arsenal  
If you're appalled at the rising tide of racism overseas remind yourself how 79% of us voted in the 2004 citizenship referendum. 
Brexit, Trump, Bowie, Prince, Esc keys, headphone jacks… 2016 must be an unprecedented year. 
Donald Trump predicted "Brexit plus plus plus," and he was right  
If you are upset about #Trump or #Brexit, look on the bright side: you'll die at some point and won't have to worry about anything anymore. 
UK: Brexit was the craziest thing a country could inflict on itselfUSA: Hold my drink bro... #USElection2016@ManrajOthi @RaviSinghKA 
Okay, I thought Brexit was a bad decision...good job America for making us look good again  #Trump 
Dear America,You have failed your own IQ test today.Sincerely, Britain, who failed their IQ test with Brexit.#DonaldTrump 
Despite Brexit & Trump, the most shocking event of 2016 is still the fact that Tottenham fans thought that they would win the fucking league 
So, Jeremy, when will you stand up and say that Brexit was wrong, despite majority voting for it. Seems only fair, right?  
After BREXIT and Trumping America, the statisticians & masters of the polls have lost total significance (with or without margins of error). 
You do the Brexit material again, forlornly remixed. 
If you think 2016's been a rollercoaster ride (Brexit and Trump), strap yourself in for 2017. Elections in France and Germany to come. 
Snape dies, Prince dies, Brexit happens, we lost Harambe, Chelsea gave the number 7 shirt to a holding midfielder, Trump president. 2016. 
The Simpsons predicted this back in 2000 #Trump President. #DonaldTrump America. #wednesdaywisdom Simpsons. First Brexit. #Election2016 
Like his Trotskyist friends who welcomed Brexit as a working class revolt, Jeremy totally misses the role of HATE:  
Between Trump and Brexit we live in an amazing time. This is a Skip Bayless world right now. Doesn't matter what you say, only how loud. 
What a sad day..... From Obama to #Trump?? A president that is racist and sexist... time to move out of America.... First Brexit then this,, 
This is America's Brexit. Only much worse.  
We've just seen this in the UK. Brexit made crazy promises to get attention and votes. Forgotten the very next day. 
The British must be relieved. The Americans have reclaimed their title as the dumbest electorate in the universe. #Trump #Brexit #USElection 
I got 99 problems and global, late-stage capitalism is all of them #USelection2016 #brexit #politics #latestagecapitalism 
Key difference between US electing Trump and UK voting for Brexit is the absence of the UK's 'oh god what have we done' next day reaction 
True but nothing should surprise us after our EU referendum & comments made since including insults to the intelligence of Brexit voters.  
A tweet about a £5 bet on Leicester to win the PL, Brexit to happen and Trump for president would have got you loads of RTs today. 
Opinion: America, your Brexit has arrived  
First Brexit, now Trump, next Honey G to win the X factor. What a year it's been. #2016 
I'm simply dumbfounded Is immigration, racism, lack of education such a global issue that it's driving people to vote for Brexit & TRUMP??  
Pollsters got UK election, Brexit referendum and the US election wrong. They're telling us 'Corbyn is unelectable.' Who believes that now? 
Brexit and the U.S. election bear some striking similarities. Both were won with a part of the electorate largely ignored by opinion polls.  
Superb! First Brexit, and now Nigel Farage has the ear of the most powerful man on earth, #DonaldTrump. 
UK Brexit campaigner Farage 'hands mantle' to Trump  #USElection2016  via @AFP 
Manufacturing growth beats forecasts as industry shows no impact from Brexit.  
Stop saying bc you don't live in the US that it won't affect you, it will. Just like the Brexit will affect you. We're all screwed. 
Doing @thismorning  1045 with Holly, Phil @Kevin_Maguire  in denial over the Brexit style kick in the Establishment for US 
I think the late great @TerrypratchettQ said it best. #Trump #Election2016 #Brexit  
EU citizenship proposal could guarantee rights in Europe after Brexit  
I am told that a £5 treble on Leicester, Brexit and President Trump would have returned £12.5 million. 
This is America's version of Brexit. Nobody thought Brexit would pass. It did. Nobody thought Trump would win. He did. WILD. Totally wild. 
.@Muse's Matt Bellamy apparently voted for Brexit  
Just like #Brexit America is going to wake up to -holy shit, this effects my retirement/business?-holy shit, he's going to do what? 
Trump did better than Ronald Regean against Carter in 1980Media @CNN &pollsters got it all wrong-just like 'Brexit' 
Honestly? This makes Brexit look like a vote for the Green party 
America , England might have voted brexit and won't take anyone in but come to Scotland and we'll crack open the whisky and welcome you 
Brexit, Trump as President, GBBO on C4. Im done. 
Just a panicked reminder that Trump and Brexit are not black swans, and Ireland has many of the same ingredients quickly fermenting. 
No idea why people from the UK are acting so shocked an appalled....you voted for brexit . #TheWorldIsBurning 
The US has lost any right to mock the UK for Brexit  
Are we at the FRONT of the queue for a trade deal now? Obama had threatened we would be at the back post #Brexit. 
A £5 bet at the start of the year on Leicester to win the PL, Brexit to happen and Trump for president would have won you £12.5 million... 
I'm tired of being told to respect views which are destructive, inhuman, divisive. I don't respect them. I deplore them. #Trump #Brexit 
Now I have heard everything. Sturgeon saying we must respect the result of the election. Does that apply to Independence and Brexit? 
Brexit, trump, Wilders next or 
As if today wasn't bad enough, this c**t is coming to ireland. Can we build a wall to keep her out? Or refuse her entry cause of brexit?  
Common theme of #Brexit and Trump victory - young people no longer control the political agenda. Ageing population affecting our politics. 
Anyone who attempts to cite brexit cos "their side" lost the US election instantly loses.  May as well wave a white flag :> 
UK Brexit campaigner Farage 'hands mantle' to Trump  #USElection2016 
SATIRE: Something something Brexit something something Donald Trump something something Sword of Damocles.Let’s just go back to bed, yeah? 
I thought explaining Brexit to my kids was bad. Explaining Trump is worse  
I dared to say on July 25 that Trump's victory is possible. Systems are being challenged throughout the world. Duterte, Brexit now Trump  
VIDEO : Nigel Farage, "It Feels Like Brexit Day in America!"  
1. Leo won the Oscar.2. Brexit.3. The Cubs won.4. Trump is president.Truly the year of memes. Now all we need is Half Life 3. 
If you don't see the link between Brexit, Trump and Honey G then maybe you ain't as woke as you think you are. . . 
whats happened today wont just affect the US. this combined with Brexit will give a voice for racists who had to hide before. 
Woohoo! We are no longer the dumbest nation on earth! Result. #brexit #trump 
What US and Brexit vote would have been if driven by millennials  
Let's not forget one thing no matter what they say This is an incredible victory for the working classes of the world #Brexit#Trump 
Next big votes to watch? Referendum in Italy on December 4th. On the same day, Austria will elect a new president. And then there's 2017...  
If your conclusion after Brexit & Trump is that 'outsider' Jeremy Corbyn might also win then you know zero about how our world is changing 
those ppl who voted for Trump, Brexit, Honey G are all cut from the same cloth. And shall dwell in the same corner of hell together 
Twitter predicted that Brexit won't EVER happenTwitter predicted that Hillary will ABSOLUTELY winConclusion: Twitter is full of idiots 
Much like Brexit I think we've seen another result that the people want to see change, they go with the answer that provides the most change 
Putin's checklist:2016:SyriaBrexitTrump2017:Le Pen 
In wake of #Brexit+#USElection, @iainchalmersTTi mission to teach children to detect BS has never been so important  
Here's a look at the similarities of the @realDonaldTrump and Brexit campaigns  
So @brandseye's data predicted Brexit and now Trump despite all other monitoring tools saying the opposite. Very impressive accuracy! 
This is how much he loves Britain & wants to help build our post-Brexit future #notapatriot #narcissist 
The unthinkable has happened twice this year with Brexit and Trump. But it won't happen a third time. Charlton will not beat Millwall. 
FLASHBACK: TRUMP PROMISES ‘BREXIT-PLUS-PLUS’  
Maybe if we'd have let the result of the Boaty McBoatface vote stand, none of the rest of this would have happened? #Brexit #DonaldTrump 
Fully expect a post brexit style increase in racist attacks. Don't be silent, if you see something, say something. 
A £5 bet on Leicester City, Brexit and Trump would have won you £21.5 million. HT @sahloul81 
Today's twitter poll: How do you feel about the Trump victory (and does it relate to your Brexit vote)? 
Chilling words from Israel.Basically like Brexit, Trump means permission for whatever the hell agenda you have. 
#Election2016 I'm told a £5 Treble on @LCFC , #Brexit & @realDonaldTrump would have yielded £15.1 million. 
Sturgeon to launch dramatic Scottish Court bid to block Trump's presidency. She expects to win, just like with Brexit.  
Ok getting a little annoying now see Brits on our high horse about Trump. We voted Brexit. We're the exact same. 
if brexit & the US elections doesn't tell you that the older generation is fucking up everything for us idk what will 
Glad Farage did NOT become an MP. He has helped the USA immensely. So Trump IS Mr Brexit:  via @MailOnline 
I thought Brexit was bad enough for us but America has definitely topped it by electing Donald Trump all I can say is good luck America  
BRITAIN: Brexit is the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA: Hold my beer.#trumpwins #Elections2016 
Disagree with him lots, but @BrankoMilan on deep changes in the world economy and distribution is essential background to Brexit, Trump 
Tories... Brexit... President Trump...  
Brexit, Trump and Honey G. 2016 everyone. 
The polls say he cant win---Polls success rate 2015 Election-"Wrong". Referendum-"Wrong"-US Election "Wrong"-100% Failure! Come on Jeremy!  
2016 deaths:- David Bowie - Alan Rickman- Prince- Muhammad Ali- Faith in humanity #Election2016 #Brexit 
Ain't it great that old uneducated white males are the leading voice of the world , first Brexit now Trump 
"Typical America. We do Brexit and they have to go bigger." best quote ever. 
Leicester winning the PL, Trump, Brexit. I'm going to start betting on everything I don't think will happen and become a millionaire. 
Buhari wasn't prepared for low oil prices, or Iran re-entering the oil markets, or #Brexit. Safe to say he won't be prepared for Trump. 
Trump + Brexit show how effective it is to convince white majority their way of life is under threat, regardless of what else is said. 
First Brexit, then Bake Off, now this 
WE HAD OUR SECOND BREXIT!!!! 
USA have top Trump-ed Brexit here 
Like a true best friend to the UK, America clearly decided they couldn't let us be stupid on our own... #brexit #Trump 
Me today. Marriage breakup, Brexit and now Trumpmageddon. I'm outta here.  
Just as with Brexit, I really cannot believe what just happened. I wake up again to another shocking and disgusting result. 
-BRITAIN: "Brexit was the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.-USA: "Hold my drink" #trumpwins #Election2016 
Brexit. Trump. Now I see what is meant by the 'special relationship'. 
Brexit vs US Election  
A £5 bet on Leicester to win the Premier League, Brexit to be voted, and Trump for US President, would have won £15.1m  
The last two times we went sleep during a vote Brexit happened and they closed Fabric. They don't want us to sleep  
#Trump and #Election2016: An American #Brexit?  
Palin says Brexit led the way for Trump's victory  
2016 gave us Brexit and Trump and took away Prince, Bowie and Gene Wilder. This is the saddest tweet I've ever twote. 
The time has come for a serious look at polling companies and pollsters. They got it wrong with Brexit & now with Trump. 
Leicester, Brexit, Trump, just goes to show anything can happen, think I'll apply for the Arsenal job when Arsene goes #DtMakeUsGreatAgain 
Not even you, Brexit.  
Yet again after #Brexit, 2015 General Election and now the US Presidency result, expensive pollster companies got it wrong. Experts my arse! 
The markets tell us president #Trump is worse than #Brexit  
Like Brexit was like- okay we might not be on the prime fucking timeline but this???? One sec 
The #RichmondPark by-election will be a referendum on the #referendum, says @LibDems leader @timfarron 
I’d say we got off pretty lightly with Brexit… 
“@TPG_Tatl: It's LITERALLY Brexit 2.0, the older generation ruining a country for the youth. ” //não votaram, sifu. 
Britain: brexit was the stupidest most self destructive act a country could undertake USA: hold my drink 
£5 bet on Trump, Brexit and Leicester City would pay out £3million today #USElection2016  
No American I know would vote for Trump. But as with Brexit, this is a reminder that the majority have different values. That is deeply sad. 
'BIGGER THAN BREXIT' Farage hails astonishing Trump win as establishment is hammered  
Bowie, Prince, Brexit, Victoria Wood, Alan Rickman, Theresa May, Toblerone, Police Shootings, Harambe and now Trump, damn 2016 
A £5 bet on Leicester to win the Premier League, Brexit to be voted, and Trump for US President, would have won £15.1m!  
A £5 treble on Leicester, Brexit and Trump, you would've paid out £12.5m  
BREAKING: Michael D Higgins has started building a wall around Ireland to keep Donald Trump and Brexit away from Ireland...  
This is our Brexit move. Who knew we could be this glib & casual with our nation's most powerful office. Stand back & watch the market tank. 
A letter in today's Scottish Daily Express: Brexit is now the main distraction from the day job  
First Brexit and now a Trump becoming president, yet again the older generation are deciding the fate of our generation, we are FUCKED 
You man voted for Brexit and you don't know what will happen next. You voted for Trump and you don't know what will happen next. 
People moaning about the Election in the same way they did about Brexit. At the end of the day, people voted for what they wanted, end of! 
Brexit: "I'm the worst thing to happen in 2016!"US Election:  
Remember all the angst about declining voter turn out? Brexit & US Presidential election reversed that. Be careful what you wish for. 
We got Brexit. USA got Trump. Clearly the majority is voting to shake things up. I hope we, the apparent minority, can prove them wrong… 
Apparently a £5 accumulator on Leicester/Brexit/Trump would be worth £12.5m this morning 
After Trump and Brexit, populist tsunami threatens European mainstream  
Hate crime will spike. It happened in the UK after Brexit, it'll happen today. If you see something, say something. 
I guess Brexit doesn't seem so bad now. 
A £5 treble on Leicester to win the Premier League, Brexit, and Trump for US President would have won you £15.1m (via @Coral) 
3. People will get disillusioned. Then: extremism to distract and/or stab-in-the-back myth blaming the losers for obstruction. (Cf Brexit.) 
Looks like a good day for Mrs May to bury the bad news about the India trade mission disaster! #muddledmay #brexit  
Why 2016 officially sucks in a tweet:RIP £ (Brexit)RIP HarambeRIP Muhammad AliRIP Note 7RIP America (President Trump) 
Brexit. Trump. Probably Le Pen. Republican dominance, Tory invincibility & Lab annihilation. But for @RSylvesterTimes we'd have Leadsom too. 
First there was #Brexit, now there's #Calexit 
Brexit Secretary promises two-way sharing of info and analysis to ensure the UK gets best divorce deal from the EU  
Hate spiked after Brexit, and will likely spike tomorrow in US. Here's a guide to intervening if you witness it.  
Brexit comparisons to Trump are fine, but Trump lasts a maximum of 8 years. Brexit will last for generations 
Hate crime went up by something like 43% in UK after Brexit and we don't have guns... Truly worrying 
I Want My Country Back, Too. . I wrote this after Brexit. I imagine many Americans are feeling the same today. #trump 
Americans can't say they don't know what they voted for #Trump so limited similarities with #Brexit 
This guy blamed Brexit on women using the flower filter and blaming us again for Trump...... 
Opinion:  Donald Trump delivers America’s Brexit  
Obama said this election was going to be a referendum on his legacy. He got it!  
It's Brexit in America, lets block Trump, grow the fuck up you pathetic losers.  
re trump (and brexit) - people need to stop talking vaguely about populism when they really mean popular white supremacy 
after brexit and trump being elected, i won't be surprised in the slightest if honey g wins the x factor 
Proof that 2016 has been a disaster:Bowie diedPrince diedBritain voted for BrexitBake Off moving to Channel 4Trump elected president 
Trump is now inevitable. Brexit isn't. Fight it! 
trump in, modi, brexit, time for great optimism i would say, things can only get better from here on. 
Expect multiple attacks on "foreigners" in the USA. Happened, and is still happening, here following Brexit. Except 'Mericans have guns. 
Getting to work.It will be a difficult day!The only #Brexit supporter and now also #Trumper.Got bag full of LEMONS.Must hide grin!RT  
What the fuck 2016... Brexit, Trump, Leicester won the Premier League, bake off moved to channel 4, Honey G will probably win the X factor 
Dont u think now might be the time to show a little humility abt how the 'third way' contributed to this mess? #trump #brexit @CoffeeandCave 
Would the 52% who didn't vote for Trump like to join the 48% of us who didn't vote for Brexit & start our own thing on Mars. #USElection2016 
Glad I found my £5 treble on Leicester/Brexit/Trump in jeans back pocket before washing. Pays out £12.5 million.  
Our @NMRQL fund went short the day before Brexit and the day before Trump was elected President. Eery when quant models outperform humans. 
what are you smoking? More people voted brexit, more people voted for trump.. Majority of the world is happy. Deal with it 
Brexit and Donald Trump? No amount of dabbing will be able to solve this mess 
A Trump, Brexit & Leicester City to become 2015/16 PL champions treble, would have returned in excess of £12,000,000.  
He is the epitome of why the UK voted Brexit and US voted Trump..head so far up his own backside he only hears his own voice 
Donald Trump's victory hailed as a boost for post-Brexit Britain  via @MailOnline 
Every celebrity dead, Brexit and now Donald Trump is president. 2016, kill yourself. 
First Brexit. Now this. Wow. 
"May's approach to Brexit previously seemed directionless, or confused, it is now utterly derailed" 
#Trump: Martin Schulz isn't too happy with the result. He says it's another #brexit night with people voting against  [the establishment] 
Brexit. May. Now, Trump. I haven't been this concerned about the right wing since Jermaine Pennant. 
At longest odds, a £5 Treble on Leicester winning the league, the UK voting for Brexit and Trump being elected would have paid £22,654,530.  
You think Brexit and Trump are IT? Wait for France to elect far right Marine Le Pen! Self-destruct in 5-4-3-2... "First Brexit" 
BRITAIN: Brexit is the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA: Hold my beer.#trumpwins #Elections2016 
U.K. &  USA are the new dumb and dumber #trumpwins #Brexit2 #ElectionNight #brexit 
After the EU referendum, England lost to Iceland. After the US election we face Scotland. Oh God... 
Donald Trump and Brexit have proven the centre ground is dead – and the 2008 recession killed it  
Leicester 5000/1Brexit 3/1Trump for US President 150/1£5 treble payed £15.1m.  
After #brexit looks like USA voted #Fuxit 
Brexit. Trump. Mike (gay people can be "converted" into heterosexuality) Pence. Putin. W T actual F, world. #passmethepills #getmeinthering 
You would've thought Hillary will win the way her supporters were so vocal, same as brexit... kinda scary to see how lowkey racists are 
Americans on twitter were laughing when Brexit was happening.. we told you to mind your business...you didn't mind your business #trumpwins 
This has been a stupid year for the human race. First Brexit, now Trump? Like cmon humans, i know we're dumb but not this dumb. 
Our grandkids ’But why did u vote for Brexit and Trump?!’Us ‘do u want the KKK army to hear you? shut up and eat your radioactive sludge!’ 
Brexit, President Trump. Next, election upsets in Germany  (bye bye Merkel), and French elections. #Bilderberg must be crapping themselves 
America with Trump and Britain with Brexit. This is who is in more economic trouble  
Brexit is a side show today, but there is a real risk that in 2-3 years time Britain will feel quite lonely in the world 
Apparently #USA #Presidential election was only advisory as it was unclear which #Trump the people voted for!  #Article50 #Brexit #Leave 
fuck Donald trump fuck Nigel farage fuck brexit fuck marine le pen fuck vladimir Putin and fuck Mrs browns boys too cos it's fucking shit 
18 tweets about how America has out-Brexited Brexit  
Anyone know what the Leicester/Brexit/Trump treble came to?...Can't find it on Twitter 
Major difference between this and Brexit: by this time on Brexit day I'd read about 20 tweets that had me in stitches. No one laughing today 
Duterte. Pacquiao. Mocha. Brexit. Marcos. Trump.Welcome to our very own post-modern world where nothing makes sense anymore. 
Here's what I tweeted at the time of Brexit. Seems doubly relevant today.  
Brexit now @realDonaldTrump Shows people want change and it's change we need! Very interesting times ahead. 
A huge problem with this election and Brexit is the way the media reported them. 
First Brexit, now Trump.Ed Balls is going to win Strictly, isn't he? 
Another #Brexit myth squashed.  
Donald Trump and Brexit have proven that the centre ground is dead - and the 2008 recession killed it 
Russia Today Head: "Corbyn. Brexit. Trump. World is sick of the establishment, its lies, its lying arrogant media"  
2016: The year of the upset...BrexitLeicesterTrump@The_Honey_G?#USElection2016 
After brexit, US might as well wife UK  
Brexit leader Nigel Farage congratulates Trump on a 'brave campaign'  
Trump/Brexit. Angry, uneducated white men don't vote for change, they're terrified of it. It reminds them of their impotency. 
Brexit, peace treaty in Colombia, US Elections: hate went 3 for 3 in 2016. 
Brexit and Trump elected as president just shows how stupid people on this planet really are 
"Brexit wasn't, in the end, a global event, while Trump’s victory is." @RichardBarley1 on politics and markets   
Funny how English people care about what's going on in America but when the brexit happened they weren't arsed worry about your own country 
And of course much like those who chose Brexit, they ARE the trolls on the internet. Those hate filled people now filling up my mentions. 
USA thanks u from the bottom of our hearts @Nigel_Farage for your confidence in & advice to our 45th president. Voters rallied to our BREXIT 
From Brexit to the US elections, it's clear - people want what they want. Majority 'want their countries back.' 
While America works out what to do next, please stay focused on Brexit. Now is the time for Brexit by stealthy means if we let it. No Brexit 
The world has lost its marbles. Brexit, this Trump nutter, pasty tax. I've never been more excited to plan my funeral. 
Brexit ++ indeed. Another 'uprising against the elites' led by a man who travels in a goldplated plane. No positives  
Markets react to #USelection- NASDAQ, S&P futures drop- Crude oil prices plummet- Gold surges most since #Brexit 
If you thought the weeping and wailing of the Remoaners after the referendum was bad, best pull up a chair. 
Once again, as the same happened with brexit, older people ruin the future of the new generations.  
WE GOT OUR OWN #BREXIT WIN!  THANK YOU, AMERICA!  
Charles Berry: 'why am I surprised by Trump, by Brexit - because the inputs to my views are not sufficiently diverse' #womenonboards 
Democracy in 2016- Brexit- Duterte- Thai constitution from junta accepted- Peace in Colombia rejected- Trump is president 
Brexit, Trump and now 02 alert me to Phil Collins in Hyde Park next year. May drink wine at 9am. 
BRITAIN: Brexit was the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertakeUSA: Hold my drinkTWITTER: You stole that joke 
#isitok that Nicola Sturgeon has said,If the American election is not overturned she will have no choice but to ask for a second referendum 
Im in Shock!! #USpresidentialelections #brexit  no, disappointed  this year has proven that most people still miss the olden days 
As an American living in England now I have to be embarrassed by Brexit AND Trump 
UK diplomat told me: "After Brexit I thought I should I leave the UK. But you can’t leave the planet." 
If you are in politics and you cannot understand why people voted for Brexit and Trump, you shouldn't be in politics. 
First Leicester City, then Brexit, then Donald Trump. You just know Honey G is going to win the X Factor.  
Europe congratulates #TRUMP.A first and vital step to #DrainTheSwamp.Let's make the future better. #Brexit #Nexit #Frexit #Italexit 
Well... Brexit is no longer the biggest embarrassment of the western world. Cheers, America, thanks for making us look good again :/ 
Brexit and Trump. The world has gone insane. 
At least with Brexit a lot of people didn't realize what they were voting for. We knew. We knew all too well.  
Woke up, like the morning of Brexit, hoping to see a result of equality for the masses. Sadly, I'm left sick in the stomach, once again... 
Do you think Clinton will ask for another referendum  ( I mean election)?Don't mock the working class, they out beat the celebs any day.  
Yeeees youre right @MrFrankBaraan - from Brexit to Trump win - polls inaccurate   
Tobias Stone wrote this following Brexit  
it's the best possible result for Brexit Britain!!  
Repudiation of the continuation of a largely fictitious legacy. I told you that Brexit presaged a Trump victory.  
Brexit, Trump and the Ultimatum Game  
Shocked By Trump Win, Brits See Brexit Parallels And Commiserate  
My article on tribal instincts explains the rise in intolerance evidenced in brexit and #ElectionNight . But how to solve it is less clear. 
Brexit+  
For anyone who is surprised by this result, you should have been tuning in to @RT_com which has called BREXIT, Corbyn AND Trump. 
Whether its Modi or Trump victory or Brexit, it proves that people conside News Channels merely mode of entertainment.#TRUMP 
We did Brexit and felt stupid but wow America, you've really outdone us this time  
Brace yourself for the new Reagan-Thatcher: Donald Trump and Brexit leader Nigel Farage  
Similar to Brexit. The opposing campaigns were so inept & out of touch with the public that xenophobia & fear were seen as better options. 
#2016 will be remembered as the year when reason took a vacation #Brexit #Trump #Leicester #USElection2016 #PresidentTrump 
Donald Trump's stunning victory is hailed as a boost for post-Brexit Britain  
Fell asleep: BrexitFell asleep: Trump*never falls asleep again**sleep is evil* 
World cald us extremist nd now wht they r doing with thereselves,Modi in India,Brexit referendum in England nd now trump triumph in America 
Shell shocked. First #Brexit & now #Trump What is going on in the world? Racism, Sexism, Misogyny & Hate. Lack of education. Reality TV wins 
ANZ Chief Economist Richard Yetsenga: #PresidentTrump triumph no Brexit  #ElectionNight #AmericaDecides @ricyet 
A £5 treble on #Leicester, #Brexit and #Trump would have paid out £12.5m.  
Look At The RedWe Bled 4 TrumpWe Stunned The MSMThought We Were A JokeNever UnderestimateWe The Ppl#Brexit #TrumpTrain#MAGA  
When you see Croydon, Brexit, Piers Morgan and President Trump trending simultaneously  
Post Brexit there was a huge spike in racist hate crime by people who felt emboldened by politics. Imagine that with guns. 
Bigger than Brexit - how did the polls get it so wrong?  
Our media, our governments, have managed to create a policy of 'me' not 'we' & this is what can be seen worldwide right now #USA #brexit 
After Brexit and Trump, middle-aged white men just need a new Eric Clapton album to complete the hat trick 
this isn't brexit 2.0 this is fucking hitler 2.0 
This is a *much* more substantial victory for modern populism than the Brexit vote. Trump gets to be President, we didn't make Farage PM. 
2016 has given us Trump & Brexit, but we won't stop kicking the kyriarchy. *rolls up sleeves*  
@Otto_English Exactly and the UK must cancel Brexit and form a much closer relationship with the EU. 
Not sure a Tory supporting, Brexit voting populace get to call Americans stupid for voting in favour of dog whistle racism. 
Brexit - Trump elected - establishment on the run - brakes put on the New World Order. Rejoice in this victory of freedom & democracy. 
Imagine voting Brexit and then feeling like you have a right to laugh at the Americans and Trump  
First #Brexit and now #TrumpWins. We really are destroying the world one country at a time, aren't we?  
Obama's meddling in Brexit probably contributed to Leave ... his campaigning for Hillary didn't appear to help much either. 
I can't believe how many people are shocked with Trump winning the presidential election, it was an anti establishment vote like #Brexit 
Brexit, Trump and Liverpool are top of the league WTF is happening..  
Brexit Vs US Election - Deja Vu All Over Again - Remember this...   "Never gonna happen... all the experts said...  
Sky Views: Trump's victory is the American Brexit  
This is what @RealDonaldTrump being elected means for Brexit  
Britain: what's the dumbest shit we can do...... BREXIT. Top that America!America: hold my beer. #Elections2016 
Celebs, politicians, media-they have no idea what it's like living in the real world. Like Brexit, elites were blindsided by President Trump 
We knew it was nearly identical to Brexit  
People of the World. Like #Brexit, the decision is made #USADecides #Trump. No point whining. Buckle up, stand tall & proud. Make it work! 
First Brexit and now Trump... Like America did for those Brits who wanted to stay in the EU, I hope everyone in the US stays strong in this 
Mad how the silent majority are taking over votes, sounded like everyone was against brexit, and Trump, yet both won 
The angel said:"First #Brexit, then president #Trump.When #HoneyG wins #Xfactor ALL prophecies are fulfilled & the Apocalypse is upon you!" 
Nah Brexit, bake off and now this, hope honey g wins the X factor to top off a truly memorable 2016 where we all lost the plot  
As with Brexit, if you tell people they are deplorable racists they will very definitely not vote for you. 
Isn't @BBCNews meant to be politically unbiased?? They've gone in to melt down with the trump hate barrage just as they did with Brexit 
I'll never sleep the night of an election again.First #Brexit and now #Trump. Too much of a shock to wake up too. 
It's like the US watched Brexit and thought "you think that's bad... watch this!"It's not a competition America!!We are equally stupid. 
£5 on Leicester, Brexit & Trump would have returned £12,500,000  
If we learn one thing from Trump victory,which we should have with Brexit,is that the progressives are completely out of step with the world 
first Brexit, now Donald Trump all we need now is honey G to win X Factor  pretty much sums up humanity #ElectionNight #USElection2016 
UK Government should be grateful that Nigel Farage reached out to Trump in the campaign. Now we can get a #Brexit trade deal with the US  
Update on the devil's three wishes for 2016:Brexit Trump Honey G  
After Brexit and Colombia, now Trump. Pollsters should start soul searching. 
People voted Trump & Brexit, it's a democracy, stop being pissy. Maybe they've got fuck all & no prospects and it's a fuck off to the system 
My blog on 'Why Inequality Matters: The Lessons of Brexit' may have resonances in light of  US election result...  
I can't believe it. I can't believe this is America. It's the USA's BREXIT moment. I am very, very sad. 
First Brexit.Then the US Election.They say bad things come in threes, so no doubt now that Honey G will win X Factor. 
Meanwhile all those who voted for Buhari and now want to run away from Nigeria, between Brexit and President Trump, u might need 2 try China 
England:"Nothing can be more embarrassing than Brexit."Trump *wins*me:  
It's time to rethink Brexit. We can no longer rely on NATO to keep us safe.  
Possible paragraphs to explore: sexism, racism, the economy, xenophobia, Brexit, class, disenfranchisement, social media... 
Everyone melted down after #Brexit too.. haven't heard a word since. Chill out it's all just a scam to make u think u have a choice anyway 
If MPs are unhappy about #Brexit, they should vote against #Article50. Nation before party now. 
Recap of the year 2016:BREXITArroyo freedDuterte as presidentPacquiao now a senatorPPAPTrump as PresidentMarcos buriedWorld's end 
Guess #Brexit wasn't a lesson anyone took to heart huh? Or people didn't vote in protest? Or 3rd party? How the Fuck did we get here? 
So the whole international strategic context on which successful Brexit depends - NATO, WTO etc - now undermined… Joy 
First this whole Brexit nonsense and now America... 
The message of a Trump electoral triumph on the heels of Brexit is that we should stay home and fix Nigeria + create jobs here 
One of the sadder things about Brexit/Trump confounding the polls is that Corbyn will be more convinced than ever that he could actually win 
Anything and everything is possibleBrexit, Trump, what nextTfL directors past and present in court ??? 
HUGE THANKS to every RT group, RTing for days on end, some non-stop, you all played a big part in this. CONGRATULATIONS AMERICA! Brexit x 5  
Phenomenal. And I was complaining that we were living sanitized lives. Trump is in. Brexit. 85% of Indian currency invalidated. Whatay. 
A £5 treble on Leicester, Brexit and Trump would have paid out £12.5m. 
If EU elites don't learn the lesson of Trump/Brexit, they will face similar retribution at the ballot box. 
trump and brexit have legitimised racism. hate crime has risen by 41% in Britain. the systemic validation of hatred isn't theory: it kills 
Surely a key lesson from Trump and Brexit is the danger of not having compulsory voting #ElectionNight #Elections2016 
If you'd had a £5 treble on Leicester, Brexit and Trump, you'd now be £12.5m richer...   
UK: Brexit is the most ridiculous thing to happen this year. USA:  
The Brexit & Trump victories should tell everyone not to under estimate @jeremycorbyn. The media, establishment & media are out of touch. 
People have clearly reached breaking point. The establishment is paying the price for not listening . #Trump #Brexit #BrexitPlus #POTUS 
Here come the same #Brexit excuses on BBC "voters were mislead, ignorant, racist, old" - why are the left such bad losers? #ElectionNight 
Lots of Brits after Brexit and Americans today are half-jokingly announcing they're fleeing to Canada. Now imagine you live in Syria. 
'But, but, Brexit!!1!' Isn't a response to our criticism of Trump & Pence, it's world's apart, Brexit can mean nothing, Trump can't. 
UK: No one can do worse than BrexitUS: Hold my drink 
So the polling companies have been wrong on:US election 2016EU ReferendumUK general election 2015 
First #Brexit NOW #PresidentTrump .....not a good year for THIS guy...#AmericaFirst 
@2tweetaboutit @realDonaldTrump great news for the world  the Racist mayor of london has to eat humble pie#brexit 
*may my girl Nicola Sturgeon always look after me as a Scottish citizen and save me from Brexit and harbour me from Trump amen* 
So, Brexit is not the worst thing that happened this year #trumpwins 
President trump. This is the year of doing what you want to do, rather than being told what you should do. #Trump #USElection2016 #Brexit  
Donald #Trump's victory offers new hope for a post-Brexit trade deal, but raises concerns about the future of Nato  
This is nothing like Brexit, we don't have a Donald Trump in charge, we have a centre party who pushed marriage equality through to law. 
Memo to UK MPs. You've just seen what's happened in USA. You didn't see that coming, so don't even THINK of trying to block Art 50 #Brexit 
Americans have be conned like so many in the uk were conned over brexit. Only about 1000x worse you gang of twats 
First Brexit, then Trump. What the hell is going on world. 
At least the Financial Times will not have such a one track mind going forwards. It can blame Trump as well as Brexit now...... 
You were there for us through Brexit. We are here for you. Don't let anyone tell you you are not entitled to your grief or your rage. 
Just as British establishment united to put positive a spin on Brexit, so US establishment will now try to convince us Trump is the Messiah. 
BBC has dishonoured itself in US election & UK referendum showing itself to be just the PR department of a broken Establishment.. @jongaunt 
First Brexit and now THIS?!? Not a good day, not a good year. Be good, be kind, fingers crossed our children save us from our mess. 
The US delivers its own Brexit with astounding Trump victory and The Don proves impossible is indeed nothing. Wow! #TrumpWins #USElectionsSA 
Brexit and now Trump shows the extreme Right's genius at making blue collar workers think they give a damn about them. Sadly, they don't. 
Trump victory will embolden bigots in the US just like Brexit did in the UK... only American bigots have guns 
#PresidentTrump #Brexit is a wake up call to the elite and media luvvies in the western world..... start listening to the quiet majority! 
Remember how I told you how Brexit presaged this race? I do. 
Pupulism and ignorance won again, first Brexit, now this. I keep losing faith in umanity 
Brexit now Trump, comedy industry. Starting to feel like your pious lefty Liberal schtick is out of touch yet? 
Britain shot themselves in the foot with brexit, America just shot themselves in the face #PresidentTrump 
A £5 treble on Trump, Brexit and Leicester happening this year would have made you a cool £12.5m #Trump 
Incredible! What price was a Brexit/Trump double?? 
The snow and timeless feeding of sheep help me blank out Brexit and Trump voters. Terrifying.  
Brexit 2.0  
Friends from the UK and Brazil are saying "Wow, it's your Brexit," or "your impeachment." With respect, something much larger just happened 
Both Brexit & this garbage fire were led by an instigation of white rage. The media, in giving space to that rhetoric, stoked the fire. 
Oh dear America.What have you done?Your new president is endorsed by the KKK. Putin will also be happy.Makes Brexit look almost sensible. 
So dumb...remember Brexit? The markets tanked and came right back up the following days.  
WATCH: @realDonaldTrump is the 45th President of the United States. A political upset as big as Brexit.See his victory speech right here.  
Europe's shares fall by most since aftermath of Brexit vote following #Trump's win  
The markets tell us president @realDonaldTrump worse than #Brexit, writes Saul Eslake  #Election2016 #ElectionNight 
Brexit & Trump all in one year... Have they figured out how we can live on the moon yet? 
a bet ye Nicola Sturgeon is thinking of reasons to use Trump becoming president as an excuse to push for another independence referendum 
Impeachment in Brazil, Brexit in the UK and now Trump as president.We are truly going back to the medieval times. #ElectionNight 
Brexit and Trump have taught me one thing about the internet. Social media is a very small community of powerless people living in a bubble 
Another bad night for pollsters. Time for methods to be reconsidered. Brexit, Scots ref, Gen election and now this....all way out. 
The UK voted for "Brexit", the US voted for "Fuckit!" 
Well Brexit voters, pressure's off you for being the most self-deluding, gullible, racist-enabling morons this year. So there's that. 
2016: the year of ridiculous results - Leicester win Premier League  - Cavs win from 3-1 down- Brexit- Cubs win from 3-1 down- Trump 
The US vote and rejection of the Establishment reminds us that there can be no watering down of #Brexit. 
Ladies and gentlemen. The Brexit - Trump double has been achieved.  2016 has been a wonderful year. The year patriotic  people struck back. 
2016:1st - Leicester win the Premier League2nd - Brexit3rd - Trump becomes President4th - Arsenal  
In August #Trump predicted a Brexit-style surprise. Oh I know. Everyone's trying cast themselves as the new fat tyrannical Henry VIII!  
BRITAIN:  Brexit is the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA:  Hold my beer. 
'BIGGER THAN BREXIT' Farage hails astonishing Trump win as establishment is hammered  
England: Brexit is the stupidest political move a country could possibly make!America:#ElectionNight #AmericaIsOverParty 
"Brexit will never happen""Leo will never win an Oscar""Cubs will never win the world series""Trump will never be president"Some year. 
First Brexit, now this.. U better believe Marine Le Pen is about to take over France.. The racists are winning in 2016 guys 
Brexit EU more divided than ever Russia arms sale maxTrump POTUS US more divided than ever Biggest winner of 2016: Vladimir Putin  
With Brexit and now this, it's seems that we are moving into a world that is extremely selfish and lacking in compassion. 
Just woke up to the news. I feel exactly how I felt about Brexit. Humanity, what are you doing? 
Brexit and now President Trump. The world is 99.9% sick of inbred legacy politics. the 0.1% is Ireland. We're Still licking Legacy arses 
Brexit and Trump belie the idea that the west and its norms are universal. Liberal democracy cannot be trusted to accommodate others. 
Only MSM pundit I know who called #Brexit and #US2016 right was @MrHarryCole - there may be others, he is the only one who took my money. 
Exactly the same scenario as #Brexit.  Devastating result for forward thinking millennial, women & minorities. #ElectionDay #Elections2016 
First Brexit  & now Trump .... I've never been more proud to live in Ireland  
Brexit + Trump = Most people shouldn't be allowed to vote. 
Just like those in Britain who refused to vote for Miliband so gave Tories a majority which then gave us Brexit  
We are living in a world of hate. It's incredibly sad. #PresidentTrump #brexit 
JUST IN: UKIP leader and Brexit campaigner Nigel Farage congratulates Trump. More here:  
OMG America what happened! I didn't think this would happen after our f**k up with Brexit. #trumpwins #TrumpPresident 
Congrats to the American people, they continue the British Brexit result,a warning to the political elite across EU,change or disappear 
So the polls were wrong again, well the data crunchers will have to explain this. Brexit & then this, wth?  @qataharraymond @wgkantai 
I can't believe my eyes... It's like Brexit, but with much more devastating consequences... #USADecides #USElections 
After Brexit, the last election and now what's happened in US - can we now official announce the end of polls and pollsters? 
Brexit & the election of President-elect @realDonaldTrump show that ordinary people want to throw off the shackles of political correctness 
First brexit and now this. This year is a joke. 
#Brexit and #Trump's campaigns tell us that if you lie, are vague about policy but keep appealing to people's fears, it's a winning strategy 
My thoughts following the EU referendum. Even more relevant now I think.  
£5 on Leicester, Brexit and Trump would have given £12.5m returns.Would have preferred a pint and for things to stay as they are tbh. 
This is Brexit except the people who voted it in have semi-automatic weapons. 
How do the moderates recover from this and from Brexit? How do you battle people who win on lies, and just saying what people want to hear? 
All this bollocks about "the people sticking it to the elite": bloody Brexit inanity all over again. The man is a billionaire, FFS. 
First Brexit now #trumpwins in America.  Is this a white vote consolidation against islamophobia?  #ElectionNight #DonaldTrump 
but we knew. we've known. since brexit. we are just the uneducated problematic children of Britain. this is no surprise, devastation aside. 
This is why you NEED to get up and vote if you can you cannot sit things like this out. First Brexit and now this wtf is going on 
Brexit and now Donald, David Bowie is gone & Honey G is going to win The X Factor. Someone somewhere has got to be having us all on? #Trump 
Brexit. Leicester city.  Now trump 2016 Year of the unexpected. 
BRITAIN: Brexit was the dumbest move a country could ever make.USA: Hold my beer... 
Omg trump actually won? Meaning America is mainly populated by idiots much like the uk and the brexit voters  #ElectionNight 
Text from the Queen of England: "Lol, and you were worried about Brexit?!" #USElection2016 
You can bet son of a Scottish mother Donald Trump won't leave Brexit Britain at the back of the queue 
Respect to Emily Maitlis on @BBCNews for admitting she & the chattering classes got #Trump & real voters totally wrong. Same with #Brexit! 
and you thought Brexit, Prince/Bowie and Batman v Superman were the worst things to happen in 2016 
Brexit and US election proves how small the Internet is we all thought we wouldn't leave the EU & we all thought Trump would lose, now look 
What odds would I have got last year for a wee double - a Brexit and a Trump win ? 
Brexit & Trump are proof that latent hatred is still louder than  in the free world. Time to act, and keep acting. Work has just begun. 
Credit too to the octopus @FoweyAquarium which, I believe, was the only cephalopod to predict both Brexit and Trump 
Americans feeling what England felt during Brexit. Two unfortunate situations in major nations decided by illiteracy via democracy 
We've been here. Huge surge in racist attacks after Brexit. The bigots will feel empowered. How to prepare and protect each other? 
Leicester win PLPortugal win EurosCubs win World SeriesIreland beat All BlacksBrexit#Trump wins US election2016. Year of the underdog 
The US Elections & Brexit have taught us to never trust polls and always be prepared for the unexpected. 
With Trump in Washington,Brexit in Britain and gutless Turnbull in Canberra, leadership of the Anglosphere must fall upon Justin Trudeau. 
Interesting how in a digital age of so much conversation, a silent majority is still possible & powerful. #brexit #Elections2016 #ListenMore 
Brexit?Donald Trump President?Surly that means Honey G is winning the XFactor. What a. crazy  world we live in people. 
the #CalExit referendum vote is in 2019. until then, register to vote and educate your friends and families about this! 
#brexit doesn't seem so bad any more .... #PresidentialElection #PresidentTrump #USElections #uk #Lordhavemercy #americadecides2016 
What a Year... #Brexit #trumpwins #Elections2016 
America: aye pal u thought Brexit was funny watch this 
Fellow white able-bodied ppl, our kind have made Brexit &Trump. We must step up & work for a better world, every day. 
Counting blessings tonight: NZ still a great place to be, but we're dreaming if we think the Brexit/Trump wave won't land here next election 
2016: Theresa May, Brexit, Trump, Celebrity deaths, Hull KR relegated, Hull FC win the cup, Liverpool top of the league. Kill me now. 
Donald Trump wins Presidential Election in 'America's Brexit'  
Leicester win the league.Brexit.Trump.You know @The_Honey_G is going to fucking win @TheXFactor. 
All we need now is for honey G to win the X factor #PresidentialElection #brexit 
I went to sleep to earnest commentators explaining why Trump could not possibly win. Did the BBC learn nothing from Brexit? #USElections 
Everyone a few months ago: Brexit is the worst thing to come out of 2016America:  
There's no magnanimity on my part. Brexit & Trump supporters have been denigrated, abused, systematically libeled & rubbished. And we won! 
First Brexit, now this...who wants to join me in the Land of Ooo? We're all in this together homies.  #ElectionNight #adventuretime 
Between Brexit and Trump, I feel the world teetering towards unknown dangers. Irish leaders need to be steady and focussed. #morningireland 
How the fuck do the younger generation have any hope when surrounded by a majority of people who voted for Brexit and now Donald Trump 
Brexit. PM Theresa May. President Trump. Stop the planet I want to get off. I am going to build a socialist utopia on the moon. 
Brexit then Trump. It's like the UK has cheated on its wife only to find its lover has been in a horrific accident. 
It's not about Trump. It's about the millions who voted for him & it's vital we understand what motivated their voting choice. Ditto Brexit 
Ok. Recapitulons...Brexit impossible? Fait. Trump impossible? Fait. Ne deconnons pas en 2017. #onditjms2ss3 
Robert Shrimsley: Donald Trump just delivered America's Brexit  
Donald Trump is winning and things are getting very Brexit  
UK - BrexitUS - Trump ElectedIndia - Currency BanNepal - ??? 
This is LITERALLY Brexit all over again BUT WAY WORSE.  
Can we bet money that Americans will have voters remorse just like England did instantly over Brexit.  
Trump wins the election.... The Brexit result.... Leicester win the league.... Great British Bake Off sold to channel 4......  
Cue 'white racist vote' angst which will have some merit but will ignore 28% of Latinos voting Trump. See Brexit analysis for details. 
At last, a real reason for a second referendum ... are we friends with Trump or friends of Europe? The question that was never put. 
I'm a Brit and this is the second time this year I'm skipping to work. The masses are ready to fight the establishment! #Brexit #Trump  
It's kind of odd though, I mean Americans laughed at us over Brexit but they have literally elected a rapist to lead their country 
“We’re going to wake up in the morning to a Brexit-like reaction in the stock market,” @chucktodd says 
#USElection #brexit As a British American- bewildered & ashamed. France &Germany its your turn-rescue western democracy from fascism #irony 
Brexit. President Donald Trump. World Champion @WolfeyGlick. Darkest timeline confirmed. 
There's a big US/UK Brexit/Trump lovefest happening on 4chan right now... "anglo master race"  
BREXIT happened .. Get over it .. TRUMP won .. Get over it .. The public have voted on both sides of the Pond .. #OnOn 
Next year Marine Le Pen is standing for the presidency of FranceShe will have been delighted by Brexit and Trump 
Well, feeling a bit better now that Brexit is only the *second* stupidest decision of 2016. 
Brexit and Donald Trump becoming president has proved that racism still exists in 2016 and people are just done with pretending it doesn't. 
Experts said Corbyn will never b Labour Leader, UK wont vote Brexit & Trump will never be PresidentSo happy they r not backing Corbyn 4 PM! 
They wanted Brexit. They got it. Brexit kinda shafted them. They wanted Trump. They got him. They're gonna need more lube. 
#Brexit & #Trump wins prove polling industry 'bankrupt' -intent on manipulating the outcome of elections instead of honest representation 
so sorry  can I tempt you to move to London?! Brexit doesn't seem so bad now 
Between Brexit & Trump, one thing I've learned in 2016; "liberal" engagement in current discourse is optimistic at best, deluded at worst 
First Brexit, now President Trump. I get the impression that politics is drifting to the right. 
Lesson for Africans #Brexit #ElectionNight - Put AFRICA FIRST 
BRITAIN:  Brexit is the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA:  Hold my beer.#uselection2016 #USWahl2016 
When Brexit happened, attacks on minorities increased by 57%. Its vital steps like this are taken now to ensure safety. 
1. Globalization is officially the Loser of 2016, and it isn't close. Brexit, now Trump. Western working class wants the rules rewritten 
Reminder: Brexit was followed by an increase in hate-crimes. White folk, let's be vigilant and help if you see this shit going down. 
Victory for Trump: this is Brexit on a global scale says @JonnElledge 
what with both Brexit and Trump's victory, the world should've just ended in 2012 like we were all led to believe 
We live in "interesting" times :)#USElections #ElectionDay #Brexit #Trump #Du30 
I lost quite a bit of faith in my country and humanity for Brexit. NOW THIS?! I'm moving to Mars. I can't get far enough away from lunacy. 
President Trump, Brexit, some odd Sun/Moon decisions by Gamefreak... it's like we're in an alternate reality. The terrible XY timeline. :x 
Let's all remember that President #Trump backed Britain & backed #Brexit! I guess we're at the 'front of the queue now'!! 
I was told I'd be skint after Brexit & I'd die at war if Trump became president. Grapes are still 2 for £3 in Morrisons and I'm still alive. 
Suddenly the vote for Brexit doesn't seem that bad..  #ElectionNight 
Race/religion related hate crimes increased in the U.K. by 41% after Brexit.  Keep this in mind going forward 
After Brexit and Donald Trump, even Milan can win the Scudetto. 
2016Leicester champions#Brexit Portugal winning the EurosTrump presidentImpossible is nothing. 
Oh no... What a worrying world we live in.#brexit #donaldtrump those seeking to destabilise doing a grand job 
2016 summed up. First Brexit, now this. White people too bitter about minorities having a voice/rights so they've fucked it for everyone.  
Once again the polls were wrong. It did not show Brexit coming either. Here’s why:  
I lost a little bit of faith in humanity when the UK voted for Brexit...but that doesn't remotely compare to Trump becoming President.  
Muffed three in a row, eh, @TheEconomist? 1. #Modi 2. #brexit 3. #trump. Bloody supercilious buffoons, #deepstate flunkeys 
Since brexit anything is possible, its just a real shame people are allowing this to happen 
First Brexit.Then Trump.Next France. pic.twitter.com/Tml9Nx8wSr 
I was 17 when Brexit happened & knowing I couldn't have a voice was so frustrating. God knows how young Americans must be feeling today. 
I think everyone who didn't vote brexit and everyone who didn't vote trump should just get together and have a sesh 
He's in..As I've said all along & re Brexit. People do not understand how hacked off others are. They just dismiss them as "thick" or racist 
A £5 treble on Leicester, Brexit and Trump would have paid out £12.5m 
Good, bad or indifferent 2016 will go down in the history of our planet as as a pivotal year #Trump #brexit 
Perk about trump winning means that Britain are no longer the most unintelligent nation after brexit...yaaaaay 
remember when brexit happened and the amount of hate crimes that happened in the UK? now think what its going to be like with trump 
Forgive me UK, because I know Brexit is a disaster fire. I get it. But your people aren't armed to the teeth like it's WW3. 
Remember when we left the EU and the Americans started laughing?? Ngl I'd take Brexit over Trump any day 
I've seen 9/11; Brexit and Trump.  I've also experienced the birth of my child; the end of apartheid and the fall of the Berlin Wall #hope 
Brexit smoothed the way for Trump and Le Pen is licking her lips in France. 
I'm waiting on Nicola Sturgeon to come out and declare how a Trump victory is a good enough reason for a 2nd referendum 
What a year !!!!Leicester Won the Premiership Britain left the EU #Brexit Donald Trump is President of USA What's next? 
Brexit was the trailer, Trump is the feature film. 
People who voted Brexit, who are now publicly voicing how foolish Americans are for voting Trump and they see no similarity whatsoever 
Daaaaammmn. Brexit and Trump, congrats 2016 u killin it 
Let's not pretend that racism, sexism and homophobia aren't creeping up on Australia. Take brexit and trump as lessons not to sleep on hate. 
Not for the first time this year I have woken up dumbfounded. Unbelievable Jeff #trump #brexit 
Leicester City win the Prem, Brexit leave, Trump President and Honey G still on X Factor. The year of "say whaaaaaaat?" 
Hate crimes spiked after Brexit. I'm terrified of the consequences of Trump's win in a country where you can buy weapons at a grocery store 
Back to back #brexit and #donaldtrump 's win reflects a wave of anti-globalization, anti-free trade, inward-looking, xenophobic mind-set. 
Brexit and US presidential election just proves that opinion polls have no credibility whatsoever. Voters think so differently. 
Everyone is saying this is worse than the Brexit but just remember, you can't assassinate the Brexit! 
Leicester, Brexit, and now President Trump... Everyone running to the bookies to put money on Honey G  haha! #ElectionNight 
i've been so naive abt both brexit and election, like i didn't even assume either outcomes were a possibility its mad 
Remember the rise in racism after brexit? Imagine that multiplied by 100 and shitloads of them have guns. 
I hope racist attacks don't pick up in the states, the same way they surged here post Brexit 
2016: Dim white people being told the evils of capitalism are the fault of immigrants. #brexit #USElection2016 #AmericasBrexit  #2016 
Post-Brexit, we saw 60% ^ in xenophobic hate crime, and a 147% ^ in homophobic hate crime. What will happen in US with access to guns? 
Friends in US, so sorry to hear news this morning. From Brexit vote I can tell you the shock, the anger and the worries don't fade. 
Trump winning is also like Brexit in that neither winning party actually planned for this eventuality 
"I voted Trump just to let the stablishment I am angry but I didn't want him to win" is the new "I voted brexit but I didn't want to leave". 
Ok. I'm going to deal with this in the same way I dealt with Brexit: with random acts of wanton, needless kindness & aggressive inclusivity. 
First Brexit. Now Trump. Surely this is a time more than.ever to make the case for critical media literacy's place in the school curriculum? 
After Brexit was voted through there was a massive upswing in racist attacks. Please be careful out there. I can't really say much else atm. 
Welllllllllll 2016 has been sick init brexit and trump in one year :D 
So apparently a £5 bet on Leicester, #Brexit and #Trump would have brought you £12.5m in winnings...2016 folks! 
Yep there's definitely a Brexit vibe in the air today 
A £5 Treble on Leicester, Brexit & Trump would have paid out £12.5 Million...  
I feel like those who voted trump are those that would've chosen brexit for 'immigration' reasons 
#trumpwins wow how nice to jump back in time with a racist, misogynist and climate change denier as presidentit's Brexit all over again 
At least, now, Brexit just looks like a decent bit of British bants 
Sorry to all my US friends. If we get the 50% in each country that were against trump and brexit together, will we have an awesome country? 
2016:Q1 - Everybody diedQ2 - #BrexitQ3 - Bake off ends (I never watched it but many did apparently)Q4 - #TrumpHoly #$@% 
"To trumpalize": new verb, meaning exploiting the Establishment's arrogance in order to win an election. Synonym: to Brexit. 
America is officially nuts. And now most probably f***ed. Brexit looks a genius decision compared to what America have just done. 
I'll want to see the look on Putin's face. Everything he wanted coming through. Brexit, Trump. I need a sip of the Russian vodka he's having 
As dark as our local politics are, after Brexit and now this, I'm feeling we're doing better than most!  
Well, I thought the UK were foolish over #Brexit But America, you have certainly Trumped us on this one.  
White people are afraid of becoming marginalized because they know how they treat the marginalized. That's why we have Brexit & Trump. 
Leicester CityBrexitUganda qualifies for AFCONAndy Murray becomes World #1Now Trump... 2016 has real played a number on us. 
TRUMP?!. So Brexit and now Trump?! NEXT IN THE WORLD: wasp sharks with tasers attack the earths core and implode central gravity. The end. 
feels like brexit morning all over again - never thought this would happen but somehow it did, yet this time it's even worse 
Americans always have to out-do us Brits, you couldn't just let us have Brexit. You had to go one further and elect a twitter troll. 
Woke up with the same dread I did on Brexit morning, this is what happens when important decisions are put in the hands of fucking idiots. 
Corbyn.Brexit.Trump.Politics is actually important. Don't put something on the ballot unless you're prepared for it to win. 
This feels like Brexit all over again! Absolutely unbelievable. Shocking, catastrophic mistake. What a scary world we have created. 
So apparently a £5 bet on Leicester, #Brexit and #Trump would have brought you £12.5m in winnings...2016 folks!  
so, can California ‘Brexit’?‘Cexit,’ if you will. 
Brexit failed to trigger a drive for European integration, maybe Trump will - only upside we can see tonight -  
Brexit, Trump and Hunny G..... Welcome to the end of the world. 
Asked David Miliband in June on the Stronger In bus whether he'd rather live in Brexit Britain or Trump's US. He said neither would happen. 
Never believe in another poll again.#ElectionNight#brexit 
Brexit, and now this. Holy shit we cant trust ourselves with important decisions. We need alien overlords. #Election2016 
So what does Donald Trump mean for Brexit?  
I wonder what the future holds with a president that doesn't believe in climate change? Brexit and Trump in one year  #USElection 
Brexit x President Donald Trump = Scary time to be a normal human being. Lord help us.  
A £5 Treble on Leicester, Brexit and Trump would have paid out £12.5 Million...#Elections2016 
Here's what we've learned from Brexit:(1) Trump will fail to deliver on nearly all his promises (because they were always undeliverable) >> 
Trump IS Mr Brexit: Sarah Palin says Britain led the way with shock EU vote  
 Brexit,  Trump.                Next France ... #Democracy 
Waking up British on Brexit day was hard. Can't even dare to imagine how I would feel to wake up as an American today #PrayForAmerica 
UK:BrexitFrance: Terrorism Greece: Refugees Italy: Earthquakes  USA: Trump The Apocalypse is coming. #ElectionDay #Elections2016 
All I can say is congratulations #Trump.A year of the unexpected- #PresidentTrump #brexit #endofblackmoney in india hope all are great moves 
Brexit Vs US Election - Deja Vu All Over Again  
Americans: at least in 4 years, assuming the world hasn't ended, you can reverse your terrible mistake. #brexit 
within a day of brexit, random unprovoked attacks against immigrants in the UK shot up. trump reality is going to get real very fast in us  
Brexit, Trump are both symptoms of this problem. The world needs to deal with white privilege & entitlement. 
this actually makes brexit look good 
@EtonOldBoys BRITAIN: Brexit is the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA: Hold my beer. 
This election was a referendum on sanity and human decency. America voted against both. I guess we ultimately get the president we deserve. 
#TRAMPOLENEBREXIT and now TRUMPJust say 'you'll make it great again' and you get in.The world has just become a much scarier place.XxX 
"Election 2016, thy name is Brexit."  
Like the UK and Brexit, you now need to adapt to this very large change that a lot of people didn't want. Try and be cool, yeah? 
PLAN: Hilary voters plus #remain voters from brexit forge a new civilisation on the moon? #ElectionDay 
The brexit and now this election is making 2016 feel like the prologue to some kind of chaotic dystopian revolution 
I can't believe he would win. Wtf is happening to the world. First brexit now donald trump is president? 2016 is a horrendous year. I'm so- 
A £5 Treble on Leicester, Brexit & Trump would have paid out £12.5 Million...  
2060 History Exam- "Discuss which of Brexit and The US Presidential Election was most crucial in starting World War III?" 
And we thought Brexit was a madness........ 
It's like waking up to brexit all over againTo all of our American friends, you have our love and support!!  
Anyone have the Leicester, Brexit and Trump treble? 
The politics of 2016 is utterly terrifying, first brexit and now "the land of the free" vote in a sexist, racist bigot. I'm shocked. 
Leicester winning the Premier League. Brexit. Donald Trump becoming POTUS.The year of the underdog continues.#ElectionNight #Elections2016 
Trump for white people. Brexit for Brits. UMNO for Ketuanan Melayu. Well, that's how you win the people's vote. 
Customers who bought Brexit also bought ...  
MPs trying to scupper Brexit should heed Trump victory. The people have spoken. They will not be forgiven if they defy Brexit 
Remember that time the UK was stupid and voted for Brexit? Me neither, because the USA voted for Trump as president. 
Trump and Brexit...What a great year!! Get the message Champagne Socialists!!! 
They had to one up us on Brexit, they couldn't fucking help themselves 
Congratulations PRESIDENT TRUMP!!! A great day for the USA and the world. @realDonaldTrump Brexit+++ 
Things I did not see coming:-GSW blow lead-Trump-Brexit-Kid named Glenny I follow on Twitter gets BSS job and surpasses me in popularity 
Trump and Brexit happening in the same year cementing the international rise of the far-right 
Brexit & Trump shows if one side is racist it breaks polls as people don't like admitting to being racist to pollsters. But will vote for it 
BRITAIN :Brexit was the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake. USA : Hold my drink 
I think what's saddest of all is that, like Brexit, inciting hatred is the way to win votes. Become as poisonous as possible and you'll win. 
Brexit , POTUS Trump  & MP Wilders  
I heard a patronising @bbc5live intellectual describing Trump voters as 'poor, uneducated whites' this morning. Join Brexit voters: rejoice 
Can we get a refund on 2016? #brexit #trump 
Brexit suddenly doesn't seem too bad 
1st Brexit ...& now Trump ... & maybe tomorrow, Zuma will lose the vote of confidence (wishful thinking) @Radio702 @Eusebius 
Trump becoming President, Brexit & Tory majority proves hate & division wins & that just makes me so sad. #Elections2016 
President Trump calls for unity. See? It really is Brexit II, reversing all the pre-vote claims the very morning of result. #Elections2016 
Congratulations to @realDonaldTrump on a formidable US Presidential Election victory!  Brexit moment!!! #Election2016    #USA #Politics 
My heart breaks for the LGBT, the POC, the disabled. The horrific spike in hate crimes in the U.K. post-Brexit was one thing, I fear so much 
First Brexit, now Donald Trump is president? Nah I might have to go live on Mars or Pluto soon #ElectionNight 
Hate crimes increased 41% in Britain after Brexit. This will be important for us to remember tomorrow morning & for the foreseeable future. 
WATCH: @Nigel_Farage – This is “bigger than Brexit”  
Wow 2016 what a historic a year to remember.Democracy gave us TRUMP & BREXIT.  
Brexit Trump Honey GPeople: voting matters. 
Leicester winning the league, Brexit and Donald Trump being elected POTUS. What crazy thing next, Scotland getting to a major tournament? 
old people- vote for trump- vote for brexit- vote against scottish independenceold people- don't have to live with the consequences 
2016 the year of L's.First Brexit Then TrumpWhat next? 
How about everyone who didn't vote brexit and everyone who didn't vote trump join together and make a new country? I'd be fully behind that! 
Democracy is a bitch. #Trump #Brexit #Zuma #Erdogan #andrzejduda 
... my only advice is "build bridges", "get over it" ... as per #Brexit, don't try & destabilise the whole country with your righteousness. 
This is another parallel with Brexit - that sense of the victor/s thinking, "Oh Christ."  
So I'm hearing that a £5 treble on Leicester, Brexit and Trump would have returned £12.5m. 
Brexit, Trump... never underestimate the immense force of human self-harming stupidity. 
Britain: Brexit is the most self-destructive act a country could have made.USA: hold my beer #USElections 
I posted this as the Brexit result came in. Sharing again as it seems even more relevant.  
Leicester, Brexit, now Trump... What a year 2016 has been. All set up for Scotland win at Wembley! 
What Donald Trump's victory means for post-Brexit Britain  
In a year where I thought no one could do something as stupid as Brexit... USA have managed to trump it  #USElections 
I'm guessing some Americans will be feeling the same sense of shock, anger & sadness many Brits felt after Brexit. 
Brexit felt like the UK had undergone a hard-right coup, empowering all the racists. Getting a sense of deja vu today, on a larger scale. 
Leicester won EPL!UK voted brexit!Portugal won euros!TRUMP NOW AMERICA PRESIDENT!Arsenal To Win UCL or EPL this season!Fav this Tweet  
Britain: Brexit was the stupidest, most self destructive act a country could undertake. USA: hold my drink 
America with Trump and Britain with Brexit economic pain comparison  
Leicester winning the league was cool. #Brexit was a surprise. But #Trump? What the actual f*ck 2016?!? #ElectionNight #USElections 
Did man just say brexit plus plus?  
2016 is going to be one difficult year to explain to future generations... #trump #brexit 
18 tweets about how America has out-Brexited Brexit 
A £5 treble on Leicester, Brexit and Trump would have paid out £12.5m.2016 is broken.  
First Brexit now Trump. All the best  
Like post-Brexit, expect uptick in violence over the next few days against communities of color and other marginalized groups. Stay safe 
UK election, EU referendum and now #Trump's Presidency. How out of touch do pollsters and the media have to be before we all stop listening? 
Russia elected PutinBritian went with #BrexitIndian ended up electing ModiNow USA has elected Donald Trump. 
Of course they do. Islamism to Brexit to Trump - triumphs of far-right against working class and population at large  
This is absolutely spot on. Post Brexit/Trump the liberals & left must galvanise & begin the slow fight back to reason and fairness.  
If Nigeria's 2015 election, BREXIT, and America's result so far taught anyone anything, its don't underestimate  ignorance coming together.. 
First #Brexit and now #Trump - I'm done. 
Second Brexit 
Im all in for Brexit if it means britain leaves the fuCKING PLANET 
Pessimism of the will and frustration of the intellect (to misquote Gramsci): the nightmare continues, after Brexit, Trump. Le Pen next? 
I guess Donald Trump & Boris Johnson can now officially exchange hair bleaching tips #idiocracy #brexit #blondambition #itsreal 
If someone had put a £1 accumulator on Leicester, Brexit, Ireland beating the All Blacks and now Trump, I reckon they would be pretty rich. 
Nicola Sturgeon set to announce Scotland to have another referendum on whether we should leave Planet Earth. 
A Trump victory means makes it all the more vital that Europe stays united as a bastion of freedom and democracy. #YesEU #Remain #Brexit 
So long Brexit and hello trump .. a trump is a different thing where I come from  
First Brexit, now Trump is president. That's twice that I've fallen asleep and woken up to madness. I'm becoming an insomniac 
Politics and politicians brought #brexit and #ElectionNight #results2016 on themselves. Don't dare blame the voters or #democracy 
Donald Trump’s election victory felt an awful lot like Brexit  
Ok 2016... any more surprises up your sleeve? Leicester City winning Premier League, Brexit, Colombia referendum, Chicago Cubs & now Trump 
Said it re Brexit, sadly repeating it tonight: Democracy only works w/ an informed electorate. Media failed, let agitprop rule #Election2016 
Brexit and Donald Trump. 2016What a time to be alive 
All this shite about Brexit and now Trump is a major cover up by FSG because we never signed a Fucking left back in the Summer. 
Polls are unreliable. Trump voters, like Brexit voters, were too ashamed to say who they're voting for when confronted with the question. 
Who is in more economic trouble? America with Trump or Britain with Brexit? 
The US has lost any right to mock the UK for Brexit  
Leicester, Brexit, Hibs and now Trump.What next 2016? A St.Mirren win? 
Tonight saw the second major political upset of the year after Brexit. Congratulations on a huge victory for the people against the elites.  
First Brexit then Trump, my belief in democracy is waning fast. Sad sad year for politics. 
SEEING PEOPLE I KNOW WHO VOTED FOR THE TORIES IN THE LAST TWO GENERAL ELECTIONS AND FOR BREXIT SAYING ON FACEBOOK "WHAT HAVE DONE AMERICA??" 
Donald Trump’s election victory felt an awful lot like Brexit 
Who had the Brexit-Cubs-Trump parlay? 
First Brexit now this, can we get an update on Mars colonisation progress? @NASA 
at least it makes brexit look a lot less embarrassing 
*IMPORTANT* To all US friends; keep eye on minority, mexican, muslim and foreign heritage countrymen; hate crimes up by 40-50% after Brexit 
After Brexit and Trump, Marie Le Pen must seriously fancy her chances in France 2017. 
#Trump wins. America experiences its own #Brexit  
Europe unite! We need a strong EU in the world all the more now. Say no to Brexit, remain in the EU. 
#TrumpWins. Feels like morning after the #Brexit vote except with nuclear codes not just increased #Marmite prices & fewer #Toblerone peaks. 
The British and Americans have, with their courage, landed a massive hammer blow to the ruling elites this year. #Brexit #Trump 
Sturgeon lost Indy ref, Brexit ref, her HR majority then she backed Clinton, got a tip for the 3.00 at kempton Nicola? 
If there's one thing Brexit taught me is that my friends are intelligent and understanding. But what we aren't is a majority. 
First Brexit and now man like trump, the world is a bigger joke than my life 
The world feels like a big social experiment! #Brexit #Trump 
Please can we move all the Brexit supporters to the US, and bring and the Hillary supporters over here to the UK? 
Time to dust off post #BREXIT blog - we need to re-double our efforts to build an economy that works for all  
First Brexit, now Trump...2016, I give up - YOU SUCK!  
Welcome to Americas Brexit. #election2016 
Brexit and Trump gave a platform  & legitimacy to prejudices and lies, giving voice to the social and economic divisions amidst the plenty. 
What an unbelievably crazy year. #Brexit & now #Trump. 
Im scared for my daughter's future  #doomed what is going on people?! It's 2016, it feels like we are going backwards #brexit now #trump  
Same with Brexit  
Well I never thought I'd live to see history being made twice #brexit #Election2016 my condolences to the UK and US. Tough times for us all 
With this and Brexit, the world has been set back. Been made more isolationist, more bigoted, and more accepting of hate. 
UK: “Brexit was the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake 2016”USA: “Hold my drink” 
And I thought brexit was bad  
'Make America Great Again' that's what they said about the UK with Brexit and now look at us #ElectionNight #AmericaIsOverParty #ElectionDay 
Grim times #Trump #Brexit but we must continue to challenge racism,sexism,homophobia,war,poverty & keep on campaigning. #HopeNotHate 
It feels like Brexit but with guns. 
I honestly thought Brexit was the most ill informed and damaging choice a country could make....then America dealt their Trump card. 
If you'd put £100 on a brexit and Trump double you'd have won over £5,000, or enough to build a concrete bunker. 
Everyone: Brexit is the most stupid decision a country could take this year.America: Wait till you see what we've planned for you all. 
As with Brexit, it's important to split Trump's swing vote (poor whites who lean left or non-voter) from his core vote (mid-income bigots). 
Possibly. Big lesson of Brexit/Trump is shaming of populism make people hide their true preferences in polls, reveal them only on voting day  
First Brexit, now #PresidentTrump ... What did the youth of today do so wrong to have to endure this? 
Exact same thing, the youth weren't heard, again. #ElectionNight  #ElectionNight  #Brexit  
Didn't say everyone was - but the 400% rise in hate crimes after Brexit came from fucking somewhere didn't they?  
With a Pro-Brexit American President ... #BREXIT IS FAR CLOSER THAN YESTERDAY :-)  
There is no such thing as a soft Brexit! No Brexit! No Brexit at all! We need Europe to be stronger now than ever! Nth Korea safer than US  
'This is bigger than Brexit'  you know something is important when even the Brits think it's more important than them 
Brexit suggested it, this confirms it: the world is in the grip of fear, prejudice and rank stupidity. It's a plague. Speechless. 
Buhari, Brexit, Trump. Life don score us hat-trick be dat. 
Brexit? Trumpxit??? We still have room in Barcelona. Best place in the world. 
Brexit and Donald Trump are an indication of the liberal media having lost touch with reality, they no longer speak or represent the masses. 
The insane odds on Leicester, Brexit & Trump all happening  
BRITAIN: Brexit was the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA: Hold my drink 
'Brexit wont happen.' 'trump wont win.' right then, whats next? 
"Think Brexit, but with a shitload more guns" - @sarahkendzior has nailed it. 
Racist psychopath bigot. I don't know what ya'll were thinking America. I'm baffled. This is worse than brexit. RIP America. 
This is America's Brexit. Only much worse.  
Britain: "#Brexit is the stupidest, most self-destructive thing a nation could do to itself."USA: "Hold my beer." 
And we thought Brexit would have a bad impact on the world 
WOW. God bless America. Capitalism is saved. And boy did my "ANGRY WHITE MALE" and Brexit predictions come true! 
Theresa May's Brexit negotiations just got exponentially easier.. 
*Brexit**Gawker dies**Trump Presidency*Wonderful  
What is worse, President Trump, or Brexit? The market says Trump.  
Feel sorry for the kids in 200 years time who are gonna have to answer "explain the election of Trump & Brexit" for their History GCSE 
America, you managed to even out-idiot the UK with brexit. A shame our generation hasn't more power yet  
Wow. I thought Brexit was a shock. This was just inconceivable. 
You'd think people would take Brexit as an example of the impact of their votes... Guess humans are just dumb lol 
The 4 levels of stupid in ascending order 1. Stupid2. Extremely stupid3. Brexit stupid4. American stupid 
Truth is, market effects are temporary since Trump was very vague in terms of actual policies. Brexit effect in UK is quantifiable worse. 
go have fun with your brexit 
2016 has really been the year of deteriorating international relations/peace. brexit, donald trump as president? goodnight. 
Look at last Israeli election, UK election, EU Referendum, US Pres election. Polls 180 deg wrong. Media overwhelmingly on losing side. 
Like Brexit, it will be interesting to see how this all pans out. It's good to challenge the establishment, but in both cases, not this way 
£5 treble on Leicester winning league, Brexit and Trump becoming president would have paid out £12.5 million.. 
Lesson from #Brexit. Before you go around accusing half of the US of being Nazis, Racists, Idiots ... try disaffected with the status quo. 
Let's look on the bright side. At least we won't be the biggest laughing stock of the world now after #brexit #ElectionNight 
#trump #2016 #brexit #welose #fuckus illustration by @zhion pic.twitter.com/O7IPm4QutD 
First brexit now trump, 2016 really has been a shite year for politics worldwide  
Somehow brexit no longer being the largest political mistake of the year is not particularly comforting. 
if things aren't bad enough already I have to spend part of the day debating Brexit with off the scale smug @Nigel_Farage 
How many Trump voters or non-voters will shit themselves when they see what the immediate ramifications are? Just like Brexit. 
The real common factor between Brexit & US election-is Crisis of Authority-not of democracy-1st time since modernity 'they' lack legitimacy. 
UK: Brexit was the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake... USA:  
Brexit 2.0 
The world will look shockingly different by next year: Le Pen, Trump, Brexit. We need to fight harder than ever for progressive ideals. 
2016 has literally been the worst year; Muhammad Ali died, harambe died, brexit, unloyal penguins and Trump about to become president 
2016 is truly the year white people show how stupid they are. 1st Brexit now Trump. Doubt I wanna know what comes next. #ElectionNight 
Think Brexit, but with a shitload more guns. Seriously. That is our future.  
Brexit and Donald Trump. Fear wins in 2016 
Some smartarse is going to pop up soon & say they had a £20 treble on Leicester to win the Prem, Brexit & Donald Trump to be president #2016 
Suddenly the EU is looking great. We need a soft Brexit to avoid being in bed with dangerous President Trump 
2016 - who woulda thought:- Leicester City wins BPL- Brexit- Cavs win #NBAFinals- Cubs win #WorldSeries- Trump wins #USElection2016WOW 
A hypothetical £5 treble on Leicester, Brexit and Trump would have paid out over £15m. #ElectionNight 
So social media is not the real world. Left of centre ideals are only the majority on platforms like this. Brexit & Trump have shown us. 
Brexit was followed by a rise in racist bigotry and attacks... Be careful my American friends. And maximise your compassion settings.  
Brexit is no longer the most ignorant decision a country made in 2016 
If you'd had a £5 treble on Leicester, Brexit and Trump, you would've paid out £12.5m...  
Donald has Trumped Brexit and looks to be the next US President! Everyone outside the US will remember today's date as 9/11 #USElection2016 
Upside? US election and Brexit prove that polls are useless in modern politics. Sleep on that, Stephen McNeil. 
Is this one of those BREXIT situations where idiots realise the meaning of Donal Trump's presidency AFTER he has become president?  
There's always someone worse off than you. All of a sudden Brexit doesn't seem so bad 
Gold rally strongest since #Brexit as Trump leads White House race:  #Elections2016 
First Brexit. Now Trump. I literally cannot wait for the next season of The Voice when they will vote for a mute person to win. 
As the UK found with Brexit, the l problem is that populism is actually quite popular. Now fearing a Le Pen victory in France next year: 
A £5 treble on Leicester to win the Premier League, Brexit and Donald Trump becoming president would have paid out £12.5m. 2016. 
Imagine writing the history books for people in 100 years. Well in 2016, Brexit and then Trump. That'll be a fun history lesson. 
A thing Trump and Brexit have definitely done to me is remove all inclination towards "smash the system and see what happens" style politics 
I am so SICK of been told by experts these things can't happen when I know that they will. #Scotland #Corbyn #Financialcrash #Brexit #Trump 
Brexit? Won't happen. Trump for President? You're having a laugh. Liverpool for the Premier League... 
I don't know why anyone thought he couldn't get in after Brexit.. he appealed to the worst in people and they responded 
At least America only has 4 years of it, the U.K. has to suffer for decades now. #Brexit #ElectionNight 
Donald Trump delivers America’s Brexit  
£1 on the Leicester, Brexit, Trump treble at longest odds would have paid £4,530,906 #2016 
'Two great political revolutions' Farage claims Trump victory is BIGGER than Brexit  
Come on then, own up, who was on the Leicester/Brexit/Trump treble then? #Banker #ElectionNight 
This is what happens when you let the same audience who vote on Celebrity Big Brother vote for ur country. Brexit & now Trump. #USElection 
Yep. This is Brexit all over again.  
Has Nicola Sturgeon used this to seek another independence referendum yet? 
Twitter is even worse today than it was for brexit man shut up  Scotland has bigger problems we're gonna get scudded at Wembley on Friday 
My mind is blown. First Brexit and now a power mongering racist billionaire is about to have the nuclear codes #RIPAMERICA 
Leicester City, Brexit and now Trump.Just need Honey G for a MASSIVE 4 fold!! 
MAIN #COMMODITIES STORY: #Gold Surges Most Since Brexit as Trump Set to Win  via @EdVanDerWalt #ElectionNight 
David Bowie gone. Alan Rickman gone. Failure to help deal with the refugee crisis. Brexit. Trump. Can 2016 stop now. #ElectionNight 
If mainstream politics better served the public we wouldn't have Trump or Brexit. I blame politicians not the voters. 
All that Brexit and the US Elections has done is shed light on the hate and evil that has already been festering. It hasn't produced it. 
The political classes in both the UK and US have failed us, leaving an environment where brexit and Trump triumph 
On the plus side, when the dollar depreciates as much as the pound did after Brexit, going to Wrestlemania is going to be cheap as shit pic.twitter.com/urXjSp7DpV 
A £5 treble on Leicester, Brexit and Trump would have paid out £12.5m.2016 is broken.  #ElectionNight 
So many similarities with Brexit: the young voted for Clinton, the old for Trump. Moral? Don't underestimate the angry white man 
Our Glorious Leader is about to speak! Hahahahahahaha.... I haven't had this much fun since Brexit.  
Crucial for education to promote: questioning, critical thinking, empathy, respectful relationships, citizenship & hope.#brexit #US 
Post-Brexit racism was bad so I dread to think what happens when you add armed militias into the mix 
Is this our Brexit? 
Try not to get despondent. We mustn't. I think many of the younger generation are furious about Trump & Brexit, they & we can be the change. 
World was supposed to be doomed after brexit, enough of the people have spoken again!! Hopefully Trump will sort out the Toblerone crisis! 
Black Swan (1): BrexitBlack Swan (2) Trump winsBlack Swan (3) Roffey gets Gold right 
I'm sorry again about Brexit which made Trump winning statistically more likely. This rise of nationalistic conservatism is terrifying me. 
British people got super confident with their racism after Brexit, I can't even imagine what America will be like after this 
How much has Brexit, Trump election & even revival of several African regimes been influenced by scare mongering citizens into nationalism 
BRITAIN : Brexit was the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA : Hold my beer… 
But how do you go from Obama to Trump? I can't comprehend this. This American election makes me look at brexit like we got off lucky 
Brexit was followed by a sharp uptick in racist attacks. Be careful out there on Wednesday, non-white Americans. Be careful.  
Donald Trump did say it'd be like Brexit...Follow our continuing #ElectionNight coverage  
One lesson common to #Brexit and #Trump: we don't know our fellow citizens. A dangerous place to be in a democracy. #ElectionNight 
Let's impeach the president and stop the Brexit.... We want our equilibrium back...  
Waking up to the news of Trump's near victory feels like some kind of cruel deja-vu of Brexit. :/ 
There are people on here who were duped into voting for Brexit by Farage that are laughing at Americans for being duped into voting Trump. 
Calm down America, I'm sure it's just "advisory", and you can have another one when the butt hurt gets too bad. #Electionnight #brexit 
Never underestimate the power of the common man..World altering decisions r made at grassroots level! #Modi #Brexit #Trump #Electionnight 
On the plus side at least most of the old people who voted for Trump and Brexit will be unlikely to survive the nuclear winter of 2019… 
Turns out when you run racist bigoted campaign, many voters agree but are too embarrassed to admit it to pollsters. #r4today #Trump #Brexit 
Brexit was the trailer, Trump is the feature film. 
'Brexit' and this have been years coming. Attitudes changed and mainstream politics has been in denial. Oh well, now to make it funny... 
The EU referendum vote in the UK led to a 200%+ rise in hate crime. Stateside friends and comrades please stay safe. 
Theresa May needs to make a big bold move and stop #Brexit now. A united and forward-looking Europe has never been more vital for Britain. 
Like after Brexit in UK people will now feel encouraged in their hate. Fascism is here to stay. I urgently need a jetpack #USElection2016 
US election & Brexit were about the overlooked/ignored/demeaned. The right understands that. Until the left does, this will keep happening. 
This is just like brexit..... You Americans will realise you're screwed later  
#Brexit #USElection2016 the world has changed. don't know what lies ahead but it's too late to get off the train. Adapt or get left behind 
Remembering my first thought after #Brexit on June 24th:  
This election, along with Brexit, proves that Russophobia and red baiting do not work as campaign strategies. #electionnight 
First #Brexit, now this... Can we scrap leaving the EU and leave the planet instead? I hear Mars is nice this time of year! #ElectionNight 
This is Brexit all over again, old racist white ppl setting their country up for failure 
I am so over this year -  cancer, Brexit and now Trump! F you 2016. That is all. Am going back to bed until 2017. 
Like Brexit, a LOT of people voting for Trump but not admitting it.... 
2016 will go down in history as the year the racists made a comeback. Brexit and Trump, the world is expiring. 
This man correctly predicted Brexit, IndyRef and the General Election. He got Trump right too  
There was a time we could have mocked America for electing Donald Trump president. That was before Brexit. 
This. So much this. (Applies to the UK and Brexit too btw.)  
2016 is full of surprises: BrexitLeicester CityPep at CityCity beats BarcaLiverpool topArsenal 4th and now Trump as President. 
This brexit sequel is so much worse than the first  
Hey, Remainers: you were so worried Brexit would put us “at the back of the queue”, are you happy now we’re about to be at the head of it? 
Well, since #Brexit happened and now Trump, #CalExit doesn't seem that farfetched. 
Regardless of whether you are Pro/Anti Trump/Brexit, 2016 has showed how disillusioned society is with Establishment politics. #ElectionDay 
Can you invite me. The world is f**k up. #ElectionNight #Trump #brexit #NoLoyalty #selfishness…  
I feel bad for non-white Americans. If Brexit is any guide, Trump victory is going to unleash a wave of hate unprecedented in recent times 
Ffs it's gonna be a brexit result all over again I can feel it. Cant see anyone supporting Trump but somehow he's up there leading ATM. HOW 
Post #brexit and Trump, the EU needs a "1000 Talents" program to help scientists who want to leave. Reverse Hitler's brain-drain. 
I'd say I can't believe this has happened but sadly after Brexit I can. Disaffected, fearful white people made a very stupid decision. 
England: - Nothing can be more embarrassing than Brexit!America: - Hold my beer.. . 
I'd say I was surprised, but after Brexit I've reassessed my confidence in human ability. Thoughts going out to everyone affected in the US. 
Interesting discussion to be had about an age where social media feeds & news consumption narrow the views we are exposed to #Brexit #Trump 
2016Lost:Alan RickmanBowiePrinceTerry WoganCaroline AherneMuhammad AliVictoria WoodGained:BrexitTrumpHardly a fair exchange 
Europe: "Let's do some dumb shit no one can beat. #brexit.USA: "Challenge accepted." #trump 
THIS IS WHAT VOTERS DO when they disagree with direction a country is taking.TRUMP, BREXIT about identity and against unchecked immigration 
 BRITAIN : Brexit is the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake. USA : Hold my beer. 
Already people in minority's groups were being harassed, so very worried about a spike in hate crimes in Merica, like we saw post Brexit. 
This feeling is Brexit plus plus.  
I don't get the Trump vs Brexit comparison.Trump won on simple promises,slogans, playing on divisions,xenophobia & hate.Whereas Brexit.. 
Hey Britain we see your Brexit and we raise you...#ElectionNight 
Never underestimate the power of racism and hate in people's hearts. #Trump #Brexit 
This is how we felt in Britain in June, waking up to #Brexit. Winning didn't take the edge off our racists, either. 
Brexit and likely Trump win show that liberal voices are limited to TV studios and opinion pages 
2016 can officially go down as the worst year in human history:Terrorism, mass shootings, #Brexit, Harambe, President Trump 
Påminner om @anneapplebaum art. "Trump, French nationalists, & a Brexit could mean t end of the West as we know it"  
BRITAIN: Brexit is the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA: Hold my beer. 
Daddy, is Donald President? Maybe Is that your fault?No. Brexit is my fault.Proud father. 
Welp, America's #brexit just happened. @realDonaldTrump won. Don't care what MSM says. 
This is where Trump asks Farage what he did next after Brexit, and he has to admit they ran away and denied all responsibility for the vote. 
Just like in Brexit, you can never underestimate the power or number of ignorant cretins that use 'patriotism' to defend their racism. 
Not to be outdone by the UK and Brexit, America has played their Trump card.. #ElectionNight. #Election2016. 
I genuinely thought there was no real chance of Trump winning. But then again I thought the same about Brexit happening. I give up on people 
After Brexit, Trump. This is not the failure of democracy, but the proof that the education system has collapsed worldwide. #ElectionNight 
Has Donald #Trump just delivered Brexit-Plus? ABC News in the US has called the election in favour of US President Donald J. Trump #election 
So...never ask @NicolaSturgeon for betting tips. She never backs a winner.#indyref#brexit#Trump 
Britain: Brexit was the most short sighted and stupid self destructive act a county could vote for. USA: Hold my beer. 
this is brexit all over again but 100x worse 
Remember when Brexit happened and we all wanted to kill ourselves, well Americans must feel that x20 right now 
I saw what happened in England with Brexit and it wasn't good. So what I'm going to say is; be a good person, regardless of what happens 
Yo this isn't brexit level scary this is fucking we're going back to the 19th century scary 
"Brexit have been the most embarrasing thing a country could have done in 2016.USA: Hold my beer" 
I was racially abused the day after Brexit & the day after Charlie Hebdo attacks.America tweeps-keep safe.Nothing is more important than u 
When do we start googling "What is Brexit?" 
At least Americans now know what Brexit felt like... 
this is literally brexit all over again; people think that the right decision will prevail and everything will work out. it won't. 
And because someone asked? Yup, this exactly the same feeling after the Brexit Vote.*hugs timeline very tightly* 
In a world of Trump (and Brexit and Hanson), be a Trudeau  #ElectionNight 
The year of political shocks continues BrexitLee KeeganDonald Trump 
Comparing the Trump vote to #brexit is madness-we only voted out of Europe.Americans voted out of the world. 
First Brexit and now President Trump! 2016 has been a very odd year! The year of fear-mongering and the power of the media. #USElection2016 
First Brexit now trump? My Hogwarts letter better come soon cos Lord knows this society can't be lived in 
what odds would you have got for a Leicester City, Brexit and Trump treble. 
EU leaders - inc May - must meet. We need quick fix to Brexit so that can work together on mega-economic and geopolitical crisis. 
Sooo are we gonna start seeing the Brexit-style "gosh I didn't think he'd actually win I just wanted to stick it to the man" posts now? 
That's it. I'm calling a do over for 2016. With so many celebrity deaths, Brexit and now this. When 2017 hits lets just pretend it's 2016 
Considering Brexit and Trump I think it's time we ditched any notions of copying US or British ed systems #edchatie 
EU citizenship proposal could guarantee rights in Europe after Brexit  
Bowie died, Prince died, barrier reef died, atmospheric CO2 at 400ppm, Brexit happening, and you idiots still expected good news in 2016 
UK: Brexit was the stupidest, most idiotic act a country could undertake. US: Hold my drink.  
I hope Brexit and Donald Trump has been a shock for all young people, life ain't no joke, we have to make effort 
This is ridiculously similar to brexit  
I would like to congratulate the BBC on their impartiality. I would like to but as this was the most biased garbage since Brexit I can't 
Britain: Brexit is most stupid, self destructive act a country could possibly undertake. USA: Hold my beer...    #Election2016 #Trump 
Flight prices just went through the roof, I bet. #Amexit #brexit 
That's the last time I complain about Brexit, that's got nothing on actually voting for Donald Trump to run my country. Y'all outdid us all. 
#Elections2016 #Brexit; two unforeseen results? @CFAinstitute global poll in 2015 pointed to members worrying most about political risk 
Due to the Brexit vote we only get to leave the EU, the US just voted to leave reality. 
Well all we need after Brexit and trump is honey g to win X factor and karthick to win the apprentice #XFactor2016 #apprentice 
why is the older generation capable of ruining the younger's life and freedom just because of their age. the wrong people voted. brexit 2.0 
both brexit and trump in the same year, and if they lowered the voting age to 17 I can assure you these results would have been different 
Brexit, Trump and it's been raining all night, this is the end of the world. 
The only thing that brexit and trump have taught us if that if you don't conform to the left you are a racist 
First Brexit, now Trump... What a time to be alive  
It's a lot scarier to admit that people voting for Brexit/Trump are educated, intelligent racists. That's why a lot of people refuse to. 
I genuinely understand that people want change but with Brexit and Trump they've not voted for change, they've voted for chaos 
Good news Britain! We are officially not the biggest dickheads of 2016! Hooray!#ElectionNight #brexit 
2016.Great Britain: Brexit.USA: Brainxit. 
So "people who voted Brexit are racist.""People who voted Trump are racist."How can a majority be demonised by a minority? #Brexit #Trump 
Important lesson of both Trump and Brexit: have no policies of your own. Allow people to project onto you whatever their favored plans are. 
Trump and Brexit are not isolated events: they are part of a trend and dark times lie ahead for us all. I have never felt so devoid of hope. 
Will Christopher Forsyth be invited to join the UK government’s Brexit appeal legal team after writing this piece?  
If you voted NO in the referendum or voted for Brexit you really have a cheek to be saying how stupid Americans are for voting Trump 
>UK votes for Brexit >USA votes for Donald Trump The world is about to become a much more entertaining place 
People who voted Brexit weren't dumb, neither are those who voted Trump. They're the people you need to win so you can implement your ideas. 
Fucking fascists. We can still beat the Trump/Brexit impulse in the U.K. We have a chance to save western democracy. 
It's 2016 and Racism is still very real. You're a fool to think otherwise. The Brexit and now Trump becoming president? I'm moving to mars 
I never thought Brexit would happen, it did.Never thought Trump would win, he has.Wont deny WW3 happening now 
Claiming the country back - common theme in Brexit, USA and elsewhere.  Narratives of victim hood and resentment. So familiar 
Nothing like being reminded how disconnected and disappointed I felt during brexit. Hf America  
#ElectionNight is causing turmoil on global markets This is what it's doing to the pound: 
Britain: brexit was the stupidest, most self destructive act a country could undertakeAmerica: hold my drink #Election2016 
We just succeeded in creating BREXIT, AMERICAN STYLE! Trump believed in the American people when the elites and the media ignored them. 
This time last year I predicted that UK would vote Brexit and US would elect Trump. Politics isn't a spectator sport. Don't mourn, organise 
As it was with Brexit, polls were wrong again. Congrats to all Trump supporters. Just like Brexit, an unexpected but well fought victory! 
- Brexit and Trump in one year....  The racists & ignorant have spoken. 
This election was all about America getting the chance to officially say WE CANNOT STAND YOU HILLARY.  Referendum on this greedy phony. 
Oh America, what have you done?! I feel the same as I did morning after Brexit, ashamed. #Election2016 
2016 will go down in history as the year in which racism won, Brexit and Trump. I feel physically sick. 
In #Colombia's Oct referendum,after majority voted NO to peace deal w/rebels,friend said:"1st #Brexit, now this;next #Trump will win in US." 
The difference between this and Brexit is Theresa May doesn't lead us through this. 
Ok!  We sure showed the Brits! Brexit's got nothing on us! 
As Le Pen said of Brexit: "Look at how beautiful history is!" Don't look too hard, of course  
*looks at trends* *WTF America* *Oh America**Brexit and Trump*  
Someone out there must have had a Leicester City, Brexit and Trump treble. 
Please be extra safe out there my friends. I’m worried about you. Remember what happened after Brexit. 
Think about the post-Brexit increases in homophobia, xenophobia and racism, and then imagine what America is in for. Utterly petrifying. 
Education increasingly the meta-predictor of voting behaviour on both sides of the Atlantic. Big divides in Brexit and now in US election.  
I really thought Brexit was the worst political decision that would happen in 2016. Heads up. We'll get through this together. 
errr, no, right on brexit.  U follow the news at all?  U wanna take a guess at how having a clown for president will work out?  
THANK YOU, FATHER FOR THIS GREAT DAY OF HISTORY, #TRUMP & AMERICA'S BREXIT! MY  FEELS JOY!! AMEN.#dtmag 
Somewhere over the Atlantic celebs leaving the UK because of Brexit cross in the night with celebs leaving the US because of Trump... 
This is the same feeling as brexit - when I went to sleep I thought there was no way I would wake up to this result. 
I've said this before, but Trump, Brexit, Marine Le Pen, etc are all part of a Western white supremacist backlash. 
After #Brexit and #Trump You know #HoneyG will win the #Xfactor and Ed Balls will win #Strictly. You've heard it here first. 
Brexit and Trump sounds like the worst crime fighting duo ever. #ElectionNight 
Waking up to the saddest twitter feed EVER. Stay strong folks & keep fighting for your country. We're still fighting the Brexit train wreck! 
First #Brexit now @realDonaldTrump - it's clear that the commentators & left-wing activists are out of touch with real people. #democracy 
#BREXIT#LeicesterCity#CronullaSharks#WesternBulldogs#Ireland vs #AllBlacks#ChicagoCubs and#PresidentTrumpThe year of the upset. 
When British people say Americans are dumb but we live in a country where 52% of our people voted for a Brexit from the EU.  
First Brexit, now Trump. The "world is crumbling before our eyes," says French ambassador.  
Remember how all the racists thought their opinions had been validated with Brexit? That but with guns. #ElectionNight 
Even after Brexit, so many smug elitists still thought a President Trump couldn't happen. #ElectionNight 
get your brexit jokes off of my feed. this isn't a competition. this isn't a joke. this is a living nightmare 
.@Nigel_Farage: @realDonaldTrump’s victory wll be ‘bigger political revolution than #Brexit’  
Shocked, but like Brexit shows ordinary people feel pushed around & had enough of liberal media telling them what's best. #ElectionNight 
Trump's advisors have said he'd want a quick trade deal with the UK after Brexit (more from @JustParkinson here ) 
Today, as Brexit showed before, democracy is massively flawed. (But there arent any other better systems.) 
First it was Brexit & now Trump. Liberal media must project the will of the people & stop projecting its wishes on the people. 
oh ffs it's brexit all over again  
Britain's top reactions to Donald Trump becoming president:1 "No"2 Tears3 Panic4 "Well at least they can never say 'Brexit' again" 
'This is bigger than Brexit': Britain reacts as Donald Trump looks set to be next US president  
we just trumped the brexit 
Theresa May, Brexit, Trump... I've never been more grateful for this guy.  
This is the era of #Brexit and the era of #Trump. Make no mistake that Fascism is mainstream again. 
Just like #Brexit is anti-establishment, @realDonaldTrump is anti-establishment could @JohnReesEvans as anti-party establishment be next? 
Did I make fun of the UK for Brexit? Because I take it back now. In the race to be the most idiotic nation, we have bested our former colony 
The left and media acting exactly how they did on morning of Brexit.Grow up. It was funny the first time. Now it's just embarrassing. 
A Trump win cannot be seen in isolation - Brexit, Modi, right wingers in Europe, all part of similar post-crash trends. 
Once again - the grassroot people are the ones that vote.  Not the Twitter elite.  Mugabe will tell you. Trump & Brexit will agree. 
we voted for brexit, america voted for trump, honey g is set to win X factor and I'm still clapped, someone restart 2016 now 
Brexit, Trump and the Checkatrade Trophy all in one year. What a nightmare. 
A reminder that anti-immigrant rhetoric and violence spiked in the days following the Brexit vote. 
This election was a referendum on the so-called "liberal media." 
From July: Munich, Nice, Turkey, Brexit, Trump: It’s all connected #ElectionNight #Election2016 pic.twitter.com/42GmkA6cR4 
That's exactly what i was saying one hour ago, here's the result of the lack of education that characterize the World 2.0 #Brexit #Trump 
This election is a complete referendum on Obama liberal policies and Hillary corruption 
Congratulations! BREXIT WINS. CUBS WIN THE WORLD SERIES. DONALD TRUMP WINS THE PRESIDENCY OF THE UNITED STATES! #ElectionNight #TrumpWon 
It's like Brexit .. except that Farage becomes PM. 
After Brexit and Trump we really did dodge a bullet with Tottenham not winning the league lads. 
Brexit.. now this...  true disaster.  
this is exactly what i deserve for all my brexit jokes 
Just waking up?- It's looking like Donald Trump has got this- Pollsters got it massively wrong again - Everyone's comparing it to Brexit 
Seems Trump has scored big in the 45-64 and 65+ age groups. Wasn't that segment also the one that determined Brexit? Seems right? 
Obama said this election was a referendum on his legacy--yep! You got it! Happy to oblige!  
2016...hmm let me think...yes! #brexit #trump #reset #turmoil 
Like brexit, but with guns. 
The betting trends for Trump were alarmingly similar to Brexit...  
Trump has been predicting his campaign would be “Brexit plus.” Bet we’re going to hear that again tonight 
After the 2015 general election I promised to be massively sceptical of polls. After #Brexit I really meant it. After #USElection2016 ....!! 
We live in a world where racism, bullying, xenophobia and lying guarantees election success.The idiots have won.#USElection2016 #Brexit 
Trump, Putin, Brexit, Erdogan: Europe should have enough reasons now to unify. The world needs a strong EU, a voice of reason. 
Polls said Tories would not get majorityPolls said that #Brexit would not winPolls said Trump would not win Polls say Le Pen can't win.  
What have we done to deserve this? Tories. Brexit. Trump. Is there another planet we can live in? Or can Scotland now PLEASE leave the UK? 
Today I am meant to be inspiring young teenagers to save the planet. If only adults would show them some leadership on this #brexit #trump 
This isn't Brexit 2.0. Britain was lied to. Trump was pretty honest about his intentions. Think about what you've done, America. 
At least Brexit doesn't look that bad now 
"This is bigger than Brexit."Britain reacts as Donald Trump looks set to be the next US president  #ElectionNight 
The #Brexit vote, fueled by anti-immigration hate, was followed by racism & violence against minorities. Be careful America! #ElectionNight 
two men who have changed the world#NigelFarage & #DonaldTrump#PresidentTrump #Electionnight #USADecides #Brexit #USElections #BrexitUSA 
.@PennyRed wrote this about Brexit in June and nailed how I feel in the US now. See you in the morning, America.  
I've now been through Rob Ford, David Cameron, Brexit, and seen Trump happen. Smart liberals have no idea how to win dumb people votes. 
As with Brexit & UK 2015, I think polls are failing because people who think they'll be criticized for their views just lie when surveyed. 
So modern-day racism has given us Brexit and Trump. And yet we say we've moved forward. Still think racism isn't a disease? 
Judging by what happened in the UK after Brexit the results will  give racists a massive feeling of legitimacy. Please be safe 
2016: the year when a large majority of the world's most talented people died..  the ones left voted for Brexit and Trump. 
#Brexit and #USelection: showing minorities and immigrants that having citizenship is NEVER enough to feel home. 
Imagine if you'd have had a Brexit and Trump both teams to score and win acca you'd be rolling in it 
Brexit + Trump = a much more protectionist world, and risks turning back the tide of globalisation across the world economy. 
First Brexit and now president Trump? 2016 will go down in history as the year humanity took a giant step back. #Elections2016 
Brexit and Trump show, to some degree, the increasing divide between the average voter and the elite political class. 
Rising regional inequality is the overlooked story of our time. You saw it in the anti-London resentment of #Brexit and now you see it here.  
OK Scotland. It’s either Indy or going down the sh*ter with rUK as it reacts to Brexit trade disaster by cuddling up to Trump. You Yes yet?  
I feel for my American friends. Welcome to Brexit reality. 
So there I was putting my faith in polls again last night -after #ge2015 and #Brexit you'd think I would've learned...expect the unexpected 
Steve Hilton: Hidden Voters Swinging Election as They Did in Brexit #ElectionNight #FoxNews2016  
America's worst nightmare was 9/11. Now it's 11/9.The tables have turned! New change! #ElectionNight #USElection2016 #ElectionNight #brexit 
This is a 2nd lesson, after the #Brexit vote, about how crucial #education is. 
Gold sees biggest rally since Brexit as Trump leads White House race  
I'm in shock.. All the data was wrong apparently, a silent white wave that only Bannon and Brexit foretold. 
VIDEO: Sarah Palin likens #Election2016 to Britain's Brexit vote.  
First Brexit, then Trump. The world is a strange place right now. Re-writing history.  
BRITAIN:  Brexit is the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA:  Hold my beer. #electionday #Elections2016 
Brexit Part II. White People Strike Back#ElectionNight 
Makes 'day after' Brexit seem like child's play. In terms of political-econ-social implications, but also psychological depression. Sad day 
I know it may seem like I'm overreacting, but I saw how fast public sympathy for minorities dropped post Brexit emboldened by politics. 
Dumbest Choice by the Dumbest People Of The Year chart:#1: American's elect Trump as POTUS (HOT SHOT DEBUT)#2: UK votes for Brexit (-1) 
People lashed out at working class over Brexit and now Trump - the problem is not that they have voting power, it's the options they have. 
BTW, Brits, if you're clutching your pearls about Trump I hope you didn't vote Leave, cause his whole campaign was just Brexit supersized. 
After this and the Brexit, I truly believe that there should be an age limit to vote.  
Brexit syndrome:1. Blank Astonishment2. Gallows Humour3. Rage & Blame (inc of voters themselves)4. Reengage - enquire, rethink, respond 
Worst year for desi expats. First Brexit and now Trump, lol. Pack yo bags, fam. Sargodha calling. 
Donald Trump is on the brink of delivering 'Brexit for America' #USElection  
people who claim that they feel 'frightened' or 'unsafe' by Trump/Brexit are such pretentious little drama queens 
Well America seems like you can't really take the piss out of #brexit anymore  
1st Brexit now Trump. That is some message of frustration & disillusionment with the current political elite....... 
FLASHBACK : Barack Obama was wrong about #Brexit and he was wrong about @realDonaldTrump #TrumpTrain #Trump2016 
BRITAIN: Brexit was the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake... USA: Hold my beer, watch this #USElection2016 
Brexit spooked global markets. Trump's victory could be so much worse  
Front of the queue: The prospect of a President Trump makes a trade deal with Brexit Britain much more likely.  
Today I've learnt that people are fake. Publicly they're against Brexit and Trump yet privately they voted for both  #ElectionNight 
Groundhog Day #Trump #brexit  
As with Brexit, we can't just condemn people for being dumb. They're sick of the system. 
Another Brexit surprise! Lesson learned don't believe the polls ! 
"You called this for Hillary Clinton all along, and you were wrong. Just as you were wrong on Brexit!”  
Wow. #Brexit #Trump - Opinion Polls mean nothing. What a year in Politics, 2016 
British voted to leave EU #brexit Americans voted to leave their own country #ElectionNight #TrumpPresident 
It feels like Brexit multiplied.Heartbroken & scared at what this means for us all.The world is in chaos.#Elections2016 
4) Wether its BLM, Brexit , the us election or anything else. someone always will be like "oh suddenly everyone cares!" LikE WHY?!!!??? 
Dear Britain, we see your Brexit and raise you a Trump. No one out dumbs 'Merica! #ElectionNight #wtfamerica #howisthispossible 
Looks like the UK's tomfoolery with Brexit has just been trumped in the USA. Fear of immigration leads to strangulation of freedom for all.  
this is what scares me. the general election, Brexit, now this. throughout history we've generally become more progressive - until now?  
Looks like he's got PA. 99% reporting, 58,000 vote lead.This is #Brexit^10A massive epic "fuck you" to the hated Establishment! 
After Brexit, Trump's victory is proving that the World is changing, refusing globalisation and opting for protectionism. 
I suddenly don't feel so bad about living in the land of #brexit  
Brexit was rural people rejecting the metropolitan elites. This is a majority of people rejecting all human decency. 
Trump said this will be our Brexit. He may be right: economic disaster, regret, people ruing joke votes and protest votes and believing cons 
After Brexit, closet xenophobes felt legitimated and hate-crime shot up. In America, those people have guns. #ElectionFinalThoughts 
Been poo-pooed but said for months Trump would win. In the same way Brexit worked, people who felt ignored/without a voice think he's theirs 
After Brexit and now Trump the left needs to start understanding people's rejection of globalisation and why they see it as such a threat 
#brexit and #trump2016 victory mark the end of liberal lies. Humanity has woken up. #draintheswamp #TrumpTrain #draintheswamp #MAGA 
Nicola Sturgeon just launched an ambush that could derail Theresa May's Brexit plan  
BRITAIN  —  Brexit is the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA  — Hold my beer. 
Britain vote Brexit. America voteTrump. The working peopleare rebelling againstgovernments.They are going fucking rogue. 
The end of a beautiful relationship? This and brexit: talk about being likely to suffer disproportionately.  
World insane TODOs: Brexit Erdogan / Turkish Coup d'état  Trump Austrian far right Marine Le Pen World War 3#ElectionNight 
Pro tip from the UK to the USA #brexit #Elections2016 
To the contrary, pollsters missed Brexit, UK election, Turkey.. and on and on. That's the new precedent. @kleinmatic @jeremybmerrill 
The rise of populism in Europe, Brexit, and then this. We are in the 2000's equivalent of the 30's 
England: Nothing can be more embarrassing than Brexit. America: Hold my beer. 
My TL is covered with people who regret voting third party. This really is second Brexit. 
2016, the year that took away Bowie, Prince & Snape and gave us Brexit and Trump instead. What a festering arsewipe of a year, roll on 2017. 
Brexit and Trump within 5 months of each other. Just proves that angry old white men with a lot of money still have the final say. 
David Davis pledges to share Brexit thinking with devolved governments  
Hate crimes increased 40% post Brexit. Trumps acceptance speech will be the most important speech of his and our lives. 
American voters in Sweden: 'It's like Brexit all over again but this time it's the US who screwed up'  #ElectionNight 
Protest votes just like Brexit, not necessarily because Americans have a clue of what Trump will do differently. 
#Brexit was bad for minorities in the UK. Can't even imagine how a #PresidentTrump victory will be for minorities in the US. #ElectionNight 
We dared to ask: "What about second Brexit?"  
2016... Leicester won the League. UK voted Brexit. USA voted Trump. 
At least Brexit seems trivial now. But it's ok because apparently America is going to be great again despite zero ideas on how to do this. 
Brexit. Hansonism. Trump.There are far too many disillusioned folks out thereLet's work together to bridge the gap#SpreadLoveNoteHate 
Good news UK. Brexit wasn't the most stupid thing people voted for in 2016... @BBCBreaking 
Brexit and President Trump. Dumb and Dumber. 
2016: ✓ Zika virus ✓ Prince died✓ Brexit passes✓ Trump winsAll I have left to get Apocalypse Bingo is "Giant Meteor." 
Hello to my friend who since 2010 has been on losing side in three Labour leader campaigns, two generals, an EU referendum & a US election. 
Donald #Trump predicted repeatedly he would deliver an American version of #Brexit; Looks like he was right. #ElectionNight 
Oh fuck, the racist attack aftermath of Brexit, but with guns. 
On September 17, 2016 we said that Cuban Americans would use the 2016 election as a referendum on Obama Cuba Policy  
Hate crimes in the UK surged by 400% in the wake of #Brexit. We need to protect our brothers & sisters. #ElectionNight 
Sit on twitter and call them Villagers. They will choose your leader for you. They have done it to US and U.K (Brexit) and they are in Ghana 
The Daily Mail wrote a 'positive' story about Brexit. James O'Brien destroyed it in less than two minutes  
"Decline & Fall" : Playing now all over the world. #ElectionNight@ThePoke @davidschneider #Trump #Farage #Brexit  
Racist attacks and hate crimes increased 41 percent after Brexit. "Be vigilant. Stand up. Stay safe." Worth saying again.  
An anti-Nato pro-Putin protectionist bully in White House makes Brexit doubly dangerous @InFactsOrg 
Welcome to the US Brexit, we want our country back! 
Between this & Brexit we need to reassess our ridiculous newfound faith in determining the future from data & our instant consumption of it. 
So I guess Brexit wasn't the stupidest thing to happen in 2016. Christ. 
As the fascists around the globe congratulate each other & unite, Brexit voters take note: you were the catalyst WW3  
Sick.You wanted Brexit plus plus then.Good luck to you. It's terrible, divisive and small-minded. You are already diminished.  
I have seen @EdConwaySky next to a graph of doom two too many times #Brexit #Trump 
The sad thing is that it will take years for people to find out that Brexit and Trump are not the answers to very real questions. 
I know we said this after 2015 elections and Brexit, but this is the last straw for political polling. Gives a completely false picture. 
2016 lessons to kids: "To succeed in life, you must be a xenophobic, racist, lying, obnoxious, bully and a misogynist"#ElectionNight #brexit 
"Obama is the biggest loser tonight after Clinton. It's a referendum on his entire legacy." Which Trump will gut Jan 2017.#ElectionNight 
Gold has its biggest rally since Brexit as Trump leads the White House race:  
Soooooo the older generation caused Brexit and now they're causing Trump's presidency...and yet millennials are looked down upon for selfies  
Trump winning is like Brexit passing, it did so on romantic pledges of greatness.Brexit reality is comin to fore,rude awakenment for USA nxt 
This is nothing like Brexit. The UK left a broken political construct. America's just walked away from the civilised world. 
This feels like Brexit by 10. 
I'm pretty sure I went into shock after Brexit so American friends please look after yourselves. Talk to people, give hugs, hold on.  
They can parse every trend & swing state. At the end of the day this election was a referendum on how racist America truly was, is, will be. 
Britain: Brexit is the most blinkered, most self-destructive act a country could do upon itself.USA: Here, hold my Bud Light. I got this. 
Marine Le Pen's path to victory looks much more obvious now than it did pre Trump and pre Brexit. These things no longer unimaginable. 
If Brexit taught us anything, labelling half the populace "uneducated idiots" for their choice is wrong. The problem is deeper #Election2016 
As well as Canada, New Zealand's an option for Americans wanting to emigrate after 'America's Brexit' #ElectionNight  
and you man was laughing at brexit 
Brexit and now this. That's the last time I go to sleep confident I know the result of an election. Congratulations to the pollsters! 
Stop comparing this to Brexit! #Trump as President potentially far more tragic, more divisive, more explosive & more deadly for whole world. 
i feel like a similar thing with brexit, older people vote for a future that they won't really see, it's sad that so many don't even get 
I just woke up to  catch the results of the US election, there's a shitstorm going down in my newsfeed I haven't seen since...Brexit in 2016 
We thought Brexit was a major earthquake. Now it looks like we need to regauge the political Richter Scale. 
Trump winning is a bit like our Brexit. No one believed it would happen & when it does, people will want a reelection. #ElectionNight 
Britain is currently rethinking Brexit. We just entered it in much more severe way and without possibility of undoing it soon. LOL at us. 
Oil tumbles as Trump leads U.S. election in potential Brexit deja-vu:  
Any market downtown is ONLY TEMPORARY, just like the BREXIT vote impact in the UK proved! 
Britain be the dumbest country for opting for Brexit.USA - Bitch please! 
Van Jones "This is a Whitelash against a black President" No its a referendum against corrupt Hillary, bankers & corporations and FOR USA  
I apologize for how I bashed the Brits for their idiotic Brexit vote... seems we Trumped you. #electionnight 
In front of our eyes a revolution in the West seems to be underway #brexit #USElections I advice my sons not to start a polling company 
Remember folks, same rules as Brexit. If you long-term investor ignore this. Traders obey rules obey stops & don't force the trade #JSE 
2016. The year everyone decided they hated each other. #brexit #ElectionNight 
It wasn't even just a referendum on sexism, racism, and xenophobia. It was a question of which was more important: facts, or name-calling. 
FYI this is exactly how Brexit played out, and likely for the same reasons. Even down to me waking up and using this GIF. :( 
And we thought Brexit was bad... #ElectionNight 
Now we're over our shock...If the UK economy takes a hit next year, arguments about whether it was Brexit or Trump will actually never end 
I guess it's time to call him Mr. Brexit. 
Same goes for PoC/LGBTQ communities - remember post-Brexit spike in hate crimes. The alt-right are sore winners. Stay safe.  
Polls got the U.K. election wrong.Polls got Brexit wrong.Polls got the U.S. election wrong.Polls are utterly broken.#ElectionNight 
Donald Trump is set for a #Elections2016 victory in 'America's Brexit'  #ElectionNight 
First Brexit, now Trump.I'm starting to think the public shouldn't even be allowed to vote at the National Soap Awards. 
After the Brexit vote, it became clear that a lot of us live in self-reinforcing bubbles, outside of so many shifts going on in the world. 
This isn't #Brexit.Brexit was Middle Tennessee State (15) beating Michigan State (2).This is USA Hockey defeating the Soviets. 
If we live in a world where Brexit and Trump can happen, then we live in a world where we can have our President removed. It's possible. 
Its a changing world. Brexit. Duterte. Trump. 
Mark my words: This is by far the biggest political earthquake of my lifetime - it's Brexit x1000. 
after Brexit hate crimes went up...idiots feel empowered to act...sad truth of life 
Knowing how I felt waking up after Brexit & how so many Americans are feeling this morning makes me so angry & heartbroken. This is not fair 
Trump, Brexit, Duterte etc happen when you think one minority's problems aren't your own. This is why human rights are EVERYONE'S concern 
There was a 41% increase in hate crimes in the UK after the Brexit vote. Please be alert here in the U.S. if Trump wins. Be vigilant. 
Thought we might be dumbest nation on earth with Brexit but been knocked into a cocked hat. You stupid stupid people. What have you done. 
Sarah Palin compares Donald Trump's strength in #Elections2016 to the Brexit result  #ElectionNight 
yo did someone hit save game before brexit and also the US election because i think we need to go back 
This book explains Trump, Duterte of Philippines, Brexit and so on. It talks to the rise of single issue parties/candidates.  
first brexit, now this. one of history's greatest middle fingers of all time is being raised for mass media attempting to control people. 
This is Brexit all over again. Ppl hiding their intentions from pollsters, & once in the booths voting in anger at being left behind. 
Britain, we forgive you.  Brexit really wasn't that bad.  WTF, America? #electionnight #brexit #americadecides2016 
if this is truly like Brexit, the next thing that will happen is Trump & co. will backtrack on all major promises & leave governance void 
Lesson of this (and Brexit): Vote like your vote actually matters. 
Why is there an assumption in North America that Brexit is a bad thing ? I truly doubt whether many of you have better information than I do  
First Brexit, now this... I'm gonna put on the kettle if anyone would like some tea/coffee/hot choc 
Someone will have to reinvent Data, Probability & Statistics, after the upset caused by Brexit and the #USElection2016. Numbers were wrong. 
Looks like I was right...first Brexit now Trump...a vote against the establishment... 
The outcome of US election and UK Referendum send an unequivocal message that over powerful,extreme right wing media have trashed democracy 
Even if Trump didn't win, or Brexit didn't happen - We would still have to face the fact that western racism is seriously dangerously rife. 
Year of the shock. BREXIT. Duterte. Trump. A protest vote. 
Am America noooo...how can this be happening? The UK is screwed with Brexit now you guys with this? #ElectionNight 
Brexit and Trump actually won despite all the fear mongering and being rated as top 10 global threats.What a time to be alive. 
After the Brexit hate crime went up as morons felt empowered.Pray for America this night. 
"don't worry, that will not happen" was the biggest lie I've heard this year... #brexit #Trump #Election2016 #ElectionNight #ElectionDay 
look girl, we got our own Brexit problems here... Australia looks looks like the best bet (for now)... 
I was in London the day after Brexit and friends were stunned, saying no one they knew had voted 'Leave.' Tomorrow will feel very similar. 
Scarier than Trump or Brexit is the swing to the right that western politics is taking. Racism and misogyny is celebrated. Scary times. 
You'd think Brexit would've taught the media that falsely labelling half the populace "uneducated bigots" is not a good idea. #ElectionNight 
One thing to change for the rest of my life. I will never believe a poll again. I thought they'd taken Brexit type crap into account. 
Just FYI Brexit was a warning not a guide manual. #Election2016 
England: Nothing can be more embarrassing than Brexit. America: Watch this. 
Just like Brexit, old white people have screwed the future. 
Never say never* 1st it was Brexit* now it's Trump* 2019 ANC will get 70% 
Word of the day: 'Fremdschämen' (just as it was after the Brexit vote)  
Now I know how all those people who voted against Brexit felt. #WTFAmerica 
I'd bet Trump, like Farage on Brexit day, didn't see it coming. Saw him at rally last night, and he seemed like he believed the polls. 
After #Brexit and #Trump, will the media learn that insulting voters with legitimate concerns is not a good strategy? #ElectionNight 
Between Brexit and this the whole world seems backwards 
Hey guys, remember when we all thought Brexit was bananas? Ah, the good old days... 
No matter the outcome #Brexit & #Trump have exposed #MSM and made fools of elitesWe need to promote that@pruemacsween @AyesHavit #auspol 
Remember when Trump predicted a U.S. Brexit surprise? #ElectionNight 
First #Brexit, now #Trump. Ty British, ty Americans; we, the Greeks, used to think we were the most stupid all over the world #ElectionNight 
From @nakulssawhney's FB wall: #Modi in India, #Erdogan in Turkey, #Brexit in Britain and #Trump in USA. When is the next #MarsMission? 
Brexit. Cubs. Trump. Time to buy a lottery ticket. 
If I learned anything from Brexit a lot of people are going to blame 'stupid people' for Trump & not the powers who left them so desperate. 
The last time markets fell limit down like this was Brexit. It was followed up with various forms of interventions from every major CB. 
I wonder what the next Brexit/Trump election will be? Where else will people be able to vote with their middle fingers?#ElectionNight 
"Anything is possible" used to be a positive phrase. After #brexit and #Trump it is now the phrase of nightmares #ElectionNight 
US and Brexit appear to show that when you think half the population are incredibly thick and stupid they're thinking the same about you. 
Markets respond to election results with some of their most violent reactions since Brexit  
You know how British shows get bigger, flashier and generally worse American remakes? This is that. This is Brexit American style. 
Night summed up by @NickyAACampbell Brexit political earthquake Trump meteorite #ElectionNight 
Brexit and Trump in one calendar year is mind blowing. Hatred and othering are the most effective political tactics in 2016. 
Hate crime in the UK surged by 400% in Brexit's wake. We need to defend our brothers and sisters. We need to propose visionary alternatives. 
Brexit 2: The Wrath of Trump 
England: "Please learn from Brexit."America: *elects Trump*England: "We should have been more specific." 
If Brexit is anything to go by, the next fortnight in America if you're anything but a white male will be horrendous. Stay safe everyone 
If Brexit is any guide, expect hate crimes to skyrocket, as the racists suddenly feel they're the majority. 
The British regretted after Brexit. The Americans are already regretting voting for Trump. White people are just stupid. #ElectionNight 
After #Brexit, Elections in the USA show again that populism is invincible even in mature societies  
Brexit and Trump proves one thing.Both UK and USA need a new Education system 
first brexit and now trump....global political elites keep getting stunned by the reaction of voters to the political status quo. 
Wish we had some #brexit wisdom for you guys but there's nothing. It's crushing tonight and it'll be crushing for a long time #ElectionNight 
Not unusual for markets to react this way.. Dow was down big after Brexit vote and if I remember correctly, Dow was down after Obama won too 
Last summer during Brexit vote, all Brits stunned. Nobody thought it would happen. All I talked to said it as a warning to US. 
Dear Great Britain,I'm sorry I made fun of your Brexit voters.  So, um, can I come and crash at your place for awhile? #ElectionNight 
You know for all the older generation's complaints about Millennials, it's the older generation who now made Trump, Brexit, etc. happen. 
Britain: we don't need EU we're better than that.  Nothing can go wrong or be better. US: I see your #brexit and raise.. #ElectionNight 
We laughed during Brexit but guess who's Boo Boo the Fool? GUESS WHO'S FREAKING BOO BOO THE FOOL AMERICA 
With Trump, Brexit and the rise of right wing populism - the left need to adapt, fast. #ElectionNight 
I was in Paris on the day Brexit passed. Night before: No it can't happen. Day of: How in the world did this just happen? Déjà vu 
Brexit. Colombia peace deal. Trump. This isn't a good year for the media predicting things. 
BRITAIN:  Brexit!AMERICA: Here, hold my beer. 
Remember when we thought #Brexit was a disaster? *Cue hysterical laughter* #ElectionNight 
Brexit 2: The Brexenning 
- Primeiro o Brexit- Agora AMERICA GREAT AGAIN- I love you Reagan- I love you Thatcher#ElectionNight 
Remember when we laughed at the UK when they voted for #brexit yeah well you know...karma and stuff... #ElectionNight 
Rumours of the death of enlightened liberal humanism have not been exaggerated #Trump #Brexit #Elections2016 
Can we have our own Brexit and cal it calexit #calexit 
Watching in the UK it feels just like Brexit night all over again except with nuclear codes instead of Marmite price rises #ElectionNight 
According to The Economist 63% of white male & 52% of white female voted for Trump. Looks like the Americans have done their own 'Brexit'. 
Brits acting like this makes Brexit minor in some way though. NO LOL. This is all related. This is the international rise of the far right. 
The GOP, written off by the media and Dems as dead for 8 years, is about to control the entire federal government. Referendum on Pres Obama. 
Vile #AltRight threats now against @PeterBeinart & others as triumphant antisemites dance in US. Like rise in open hate after Brexit vote 
“I keep thinking about #Brexit”Clinton supporter says Trump’s expected success shows “divided” USA#ElectionNight 
Brexit, Trump - all we need is me to win some games and 2016 will be the year of the unexpected. 
I'm terrified for my friends. Hate crimes increased massively after Brexit, I'm scared the same will happen in America after Trump. 
That sick feeling I felt on waking up to the news about Brexit was nothing compared to this. 
the fucking hubris, of me looking at the brexit vote, sure it'd be remain, and when it wasn't thinking "oh those provincial racist idiots" 
Congratulations America. Enjoy your #Brexit! Those who "sat out", "protest voted" or "wrote in" funny names, great job! #ElectionNight 
"This is deja vu of #Brexit - very worrying": Analyst on falling oil prices amid #DonaldTrump's #Election2016 lead  
And we thought Brexit was bad. 
A £5 treble on Leicester, Brexit and Trump would of paid £12.5m  mad that 
Brexit Feeling. Nur viel schlimmer. #USWahl2016 
@misterhsk that is so, so vile, the hate is already surfacing like the racism did when Brexit hit us, the world is broken  
Age demographics of the #USElection2016 is pretty reminiscent of what happened at #Brexit. (source CNN). #ElectionNight 
Brexit Britain and Trump America. My 2 kids (w/ UK & US passports) are angry and worried. And the Continental escape route is closing ... 
Coming from behind seems to be a theme lately, no jokes pls.-- nba finals, World Series, Brexit, now #Election2016 
Never one to be upstaged, the U.S. saw the fallout from your #Brexit decision, U.K. and decided to outdo you! Wheeee!  
Market reaction compared with the Brexit aftermath. MXN and EURUSD stand out  
Two minutes of silence for those Americans who laughed at Brits after Brexit and still voted for Trump.#Election2016 #ElectionNight 
I understood Brexit. I voted for it. I don't understand voting for a racist sexist pig. Very different things.  
First the Brexit, then Colombia, and now the USA... What the heck is going on in the world of polls? What's going on with the world? 
UK: there's no way the USA can't fuck up more than we did with brexitUSA: don't believe me just watch pic.twitter.com/wCQFWWG5T0 
Oh dear .. another luvvie that didn't understand Brexit. X  
This puts Brexit in the shade. What on earth is going on with 2016? My heart bleeds for all civilised Americans.#vilepopulism 
Wow shocker Nasdaq futures halted trading. Brexit hysteria all over again #ElectionNight 
#PresidentTrump + #Brexit = Roll Back #Globalism. #Media, #polls & #Establishment all said neither one could happen. #MAGA @realDonaldTrump 
I think I realize why I was so freaked out over Brexit. Because I thought, yes, the west is going through one of these phases. 
.@BretBaier on market reaction: "This is more than just panic. This is Brexit supercharged. This is the U.S. The biggest power in the world" 
Do you though? #brexit RT @007pod: @JeremyMJordan come to England. We do it better...  
Hmm, could it be that Plato was right about democracy? #brexit #trumpshit pic.twitter.com/JwZCDmn24B 
If you don't count the 2015 U.K. Election, Brexit, the Cubs win, and tonight, been a great year for the experts. 
Market futures are dropping -- only temporary...good buying opportunity...Just like BREXIT ... 
Hate won in 2016.-Brexit + Colombia + Trump. 
The UK saw a lot of ugly gloating, racist incidents against immigrants in the days immediately post-Brexit. I fear America will see the same 
What both Trump and Brexit results show is that many white voters feel isolated, excluded and frustrated. And also racist. 
The aftermath of Brexit was a marked increase in hate crime here. It's a very real worry, please all take extra care x 
England: Brexit was definitely the most embarrassing thing any country could vote forAmerica: Hold my beer 
From Brexit night  
"This is Brexit supercharged" - @BretBaier's take on the election results tonight 
This is like Brexit, except that you can't delay President Trump for years while you try to figure out how to clean up the mess we made. 
Don't overestimate the kindness of humans. What lies beneath? They gave the world Brexit, Abbott & now Trump. Silent bigotry.#auspol 
Just like Brexit, welcome to the underbelly of America. Racist, misogynistic, anti-intellectual, fearful. Fucked. 
How neoliberalism fueled the racist xenophobia behind Brexit and Donald Trump  
Brexit 2.0 #wow! 
This is NOTHING like Brexit. Voting for UK sovereignty is NOT the same as voting for a racist, sexist, ignorant pig as US President. 
Britain post Brexit - "Hey Everybody, Look how stupid we are" America today - "Oh yeah? Watch this !" #ElectionNight #USelection2016 
Nigel Farage: this result looks 'bigger than Brexit'  
So far this is exactly like Brexit :D  
Same way they got it wrong with Brexit...  
BREXIT: I voted for this but I didn't think it would happen.America: I voted for this but I didn't think it would happen. 
This is the Michael Bay version of Brexit. Typical yanks trying to one up the brits  
This and Brexit are both white people saying "we're not the problem *they* are". Couldn’t be more wrong 
It's BREXIT times ten! 
RT @bpedaci: BRITAIN:  Brexit is the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA:  Hold my beer. 
Never underestimate this man ... Juncker did, Hillary did ... @Nigel_Farage #USElection2016 #Brexit #Article50 #LeaveEU 
Loughnane: we had an earthquake with Brexit, we've had a tsunami with Trump 
Dopo Brexit Trump 
2016 will be remembered as the year of Brexit, President Trump, Leicester City and Lincoln Red Imps letting slip a 1-0 first leg lead. 
When we Brexit, we are changing immigration laws, maybe we can Brain Drain America 
Indeed. And Europe is itself deeply divided. Italian referendum, French and German elections will now determine our collective future  
I realised, after Brexit, that the problem for pollsters is that many people lie, afraid to be honest about how they vote. 
This is the end of civilization. #Trump #Putin #ISIS #Brexit 
One of the worst things about Brexit was that it told the far right that they were right. And it made us all distrust each other. 
A #Trump victory will make #Brexit look like a touch of man flu#USElection2016 
All I care about now is that the condoms in porno referendum in California loses. 
BRITAIN:  Brexit is the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA:  Hold my beer. 
Brexit comes to America. People are angry and want to be heard. Don't have to like the messenger but have to hear the message. 
Reminded of my tweet after Brexit in June! 2016 will go down in history.  
This is Brexit on steroids.Dow futures are down 1000 pts already. Your 401k is about to get crushed. This is a social and economic calamity 
everyone is calling this another brexit. folks, the apple NEVER falls far from the tree 
This is Brexit 2.0! 
Trump, Brexit and yet you wonder how Zimbabwe keeps voting Mugabe. How different is the message? 
Buhari president, Brexit, Trump... this straight out of Revelations, b. 
It was like the British said, "nothing can be more embarrassing than Brexit"Americans replied: "challenge accepted."#ElectionNight 
Remember when Brexit was the stupidest thing a major world power had done all year? Good times. 
The "Oh god, how did this pass, this was meant to be squashed" feeling is exactly how we felt as Brexit unfolded. 
2016 is well on its way to become the year when liberal democracy rejects liberal internationalism. #trump #brexit #ElectionNight 
NEWS CHANNELS DECLARING TRUMP VICTORY. AMERICA HAS DONE IT. AMERICAS BREXIT 
Is this how it felt when Brexit was voted in? 
This man correctly predicted Brexit, IndyRef and the General Election. He got Trump right too  
This is Brexit. A lot of uninformed, angry people voting based on the wrong criteria. We will all likely pay the price for long, long time. 
Millions of Americans laughing at their British Brexit cousins, thinking "There's no way we're that stupid," ignoring their shared blood. 
Depending on how the next year goes and how Brexit turns out, I will deadass move to London and start my life over again. 
BRITAIN:  Brexit is the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA:  Hold my beer. #ElectionNight 
First Brexit, now Trump. Establishment is dead, change is alive. 
Democrats lost by chasing swing voters & centre ground. Scotland Brexit & Trump prove a new age has dawned. People want authentic connection 
I'm normally a glass half full, every cloud a silver lining person, but I've got nothing for this. Except that Brexit now looks small beer 
#Brexit comparisons are being made by celebs on this election night -- read tweets:  
This will make #Brexit pale in a consequence ... A mere peashooter vs a bazooka #USElection2016 
Man I thought #Brexit was horrific, this is Cataclysmic! #ElectionNight The Horror The Horror #WorldGoneMad 
Like Brexit, the #USElection2016 is a reminder that people live in a bubble of their own worldview and political leanings 
It didnt start with #Brexit - that too like 2night are symptoms. We have officially entered the Post Intellectual World. 
Down 788 points. Trump has officially crashed the market harder than Brexit and 9/11. 
Actually, this election was really to put the dollar back to where it was related to the British pound.#ElectionNight #myvote2016 #brexit 
Trump followed our Brexit playbook to the letter. The UK media didn't have a clue as usual & neither did the US.  
The U.K. showed us what happens when you don't take your freedoms seriously with #brexit and y'all followed their lead.  
It feels like Brexit night all over again - polls pointing slightly one way, then voters playing their Trump card. 
You voted for Brexit, and you are moaning about Trump winning.  #ElectionDay 
First Brexit and now this. The Irish passport office won't be able to cope. 
Remember how Brexit passed and before the UK even did anything POC were getting assaulted on trams? That’s us tomorrow. Stay safe. 
Alan RickmanDavid BowiePrinceGene WilderMuhammad AliBrexitTrumpWith still 6 about weeks in 2016 
Was Proved wrong thrice Brexit, US Polls & British Polls. Nothing wrong in accepting it. 
Like Brexit all over again. So unfair 4 the younger generation who must watch selfish old white men dismantling their future brick by brick 
I feel like an American watching all the British freak out over Brexit. 
Remember: immediately following Brexit, hate crimes increased exponentially. Expect the same in America. Be vigilant. Stand up. Stay safe. 
#Election2016 #brexit When scared white people vote to "take back their country."  
After brexit racist attacks went through the roof, just wait to see what happens in America when people feel they have permission from trump 
Trump kept saying this was going to be like Brexit, and, well......  
French ambassador to US: "After #Brexit and this election, anything is now possible. A world is crumbling before our eyes." #ElectionNight  
DID WE LEARN NOTHING FROM BREXIT ???!  
The vote is in: #MARTA referendum passes in the City of Atlanta with 72%! #atlpol #gapol #transitvote #LetsMoveATL 
So #Brexit & #Trump are actually opportunities for #Africa to assert herself as the Global Order reconfigures itself. TAKE THE CHANCE! 
Trump win: leadership of free world moves to Europe. Urgent for Berlin, Paris, London to work closely together despite Brexit. 
National exit polls are showing a Brexit-like vote in which people under the age of 40 went Clinton, over the age of 40 went Trump. 
America: You got played even worse than #brexit played us. They had to outright lie to us but you didn't even need that #electionnight 
England: #Brexit is most embarrassing thing everAmerica: Hold my beer#ElectionNight 
After #Brexit, I wrote: #Africa needs to stop mourning the West & become more selfish with itself as Europe & the US are doing. 
(1) Brexit shocks pundits. (2) Markets tank. (3) Markets rebound, pundits puzzled. (4) Trump close to winning. (5) Pundits point to market. 
Moral of Brexit vote was that white voters want things they will not admit to pollsters. That now truer than ever 
After Brexit: 'I'm not living in the country I thought I was' After tonight: 'I'm not living on the planet I thought I was' #electionnight 
2016 is the year we realised that racism, homophobia, sexism and ableism is much more prominent than we all thought #ElectionNight #Brexit 
Not shocked to see what is happening in the US. #Brexit says it was always on the cards. The world will be a different place after this.  
Markets swings mirror Brexit turmoil  #ElectionNight 
Dow down 800.By comparison, Dow was only down 600 after unexpected Brexit vote.  
Post Brexit ... in the USA this is the opposite of Pres Obama election night in 2008. Its Halloween 2 weeks later #HauntedHouseOfHatred 
Brexit and Trump have shown that too many pundits and media people live in a London, New York and LA myopic bubble. #USElection2016 
Remember all those Americans taking the piss about Brexit? Ooooops 
Wolf referenced #BRexit sentiment Is @CNN finally getting a clue 99% is sick & tired af of establishment MSM & politicians? #ElectionNight 
This is Brexit on steroids #ElectionNight #Election2016 #AbsoluteCarnage  
#America we made HISTORY tonight. It's time to CELEBRATE!#Europe #Russia #brexit #Germany #France #ElectionNight 
TO ANYBODY WHO DIDN'T THINK TRUMP HAD A CHANCE. ONE WORD. Brexit. 
I remember on a trip I took to Rome years ago, seeing bronze plaques depicting the rise and fall of the Roman Empire. First Brexit... 
The similarities of Trump and Brexit campaigns are striking  
RT @bpedaci: BRITAIN:  Brexit is the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA:  Hold my beer. 
Trump said this would be Brexit x10. It certainly feels like it. 
Key messages from #Brexit & #uselection2016. Share your wealth or destroy your democracy. And pandering to mobs is bloody dangerous. 
The media and political elite continue to get it horribly wrong.#Brexit #Trump and #Hanson here in Australia...  
This is not like Brexit. This is much, much more dangerous  and inexplicable 
Can't Trump & Brexit voters live together in one country & Hillary & Remain supporters in another? They can have guns. We'll have liberalism 
Time for some self praise. Check my tweets on @realDonaldTrump & markets reaction. Brexit plus plus only 2days back. @DrGPradhan for 1 day  
Guess the lesson from US election and Brexit is that media, pollsters and mainstream politicos don't understand a major part of electorate. 
Brexit caused lasting rise in hate crime | The Independent #Elections2016  
No one expected #Brexit. And no one expected Trump lead. No one as in the  media. That's how we form our opinions, right? 
Brexit: exit from EuropeTrexit: exit from common sense and reason 
This was the same as Brexit. The press, loving the ratings, covered the "edgy person" without fact checking or pointing out lies. 1/ 
Democrat supporter: 'It feels like US version of Brexit' #Election2016 #ElectionNight 
Didn't think Duterte would win. Didn't think Brexit would happen. Didn't think Trump would have a chance.Bye, political analyst dreams. 
Brexit or Trump: Take this terrifying quiz to find out:  
America, not to be outdone by Great Britain, decides to Brexit also. 
#Brexit has taught us what we can expect now is a massive spike in racist and anti-queer violence. Please stay safe friends. #ElectionNight 
Brexit ain't so funny now is it  
First Brexit; now Trump. The establishment media needs to have a deep & long look at itself. It's not representative of the general public 
With #Brexit and now #PresidentTrump the idiots (no: the angry, the dispossessed, the uninformed, the gullible) have taken over the asylum. 
I've been telling Lefties that their condescending establishment world view  is dead. Maybe Brexit and Trump will finally bring it home. 
Reminder of this brilliant, and profoundly sorrowful tweet in the days after Brexit.  
I called Brexit and Trump win - the media is so biased and out of touch with THE PEOPLE! #electionnight 
remember right after brexit the number of civilian attacks/bullies towards POC in uk had significantly increased for a whileplease be safe. 
Like it or Trumpit both #Brexit and now #Trump was a protest vote to reject the political elite and vote in favour change. 
.@Nigel_Farage  has compared @realDonaldTrump 's huge upset tonight to the unexpected Brexit victory in June.  
Even @SarahPalinUSA is saying "this is exactly like #Brexit. We look forward to a great relationship with Britain" @SkyNews 
UK: the #Brexit is a catastropheUS: Watch this.#2016 
This short explanation on Brexit from LA Times' @Vinncent went viral in June. Worth reading again  
It's LITERALLY Brexit 2.0, the older generation ruining a country for the youth.  
Nobody thought Brexit would pass 
Like Brexit, Trump happens when people fell left out of their society, their economy and their politics. Something to ponder. #nzpol 
Its Brexit all over again. Only 40% of the young voted, immigrant & Afro-American turnout is down. Its made all the difference 
"Now markets are moving like it's Brexit 2.0 in the U.S."  
Hey 2016, you gave us the death of all artists, Syria, Brexit, Colombia, even the clown apocalypse, you can. Stop now. 
BREXIT American style! #MAGA! 
Markets are mirroring Brexit turmoil as Trump advances  
Brexit & Trump: Many people are too embarrassed to tell pollsters how extreme their views really are. Then they go vote & win & be extreme 
Leicester City Brexit Trump Nothing about 2016 was normal 
Trump well into a win. USA rejects the establishment. Proves the people of the U.K. After #Brexit are made of the same grit. #Ukip 
Brexit.  
Not been a good year for liberalism. I understand these decisions were democratic but Brexit & Trump seem like steps backward for humanity. 
"No way Leicester will win the Premier League!" "No way Brexit will win!" "No way Trump will win!" Oh, 2016, you little rascal... 
What do I tell my kids tomorrow? I haven't even told them about Brexit yet. 
Brexit II 
This election is like Brexit. Nobody thought it would go down like this.. #Elections2016 
This is way past Brexit in the WTF-o-meter and is approaching "messing with the BBQ Shapes recipe" territory. 
Thinking about the surge of racial abuse and violence in the aftermath of Brexit. Stay safe, friends :( 
Brexit all over again  
Trump, Brexit, No. 
We chose Nawaz. India chose Modi. UK chose Brexit. Now, US choosing Trump. Trudeau is probably the only saving grace democracy has.  
Brexit and Trump in one year! Someone stop the world, I need to get off 
PoC: expect a Brexit effect - this is license for all the latent anger to be expressed. Look out for each other in next few days 
Well I can't knock my British friends for Brexit anymore. #ElectionDay 
Leicester winning the Premier League. Brexit. Donald Trump becoming POTUS. The year of the underdog continues. #ElectionNight 
After Brexit I was ashamed to be British. But after this I'm ashamed to be human. 
good news for #brexit as we jump the "queue" 
#Brexit and #Trump have proven once and for all, never believe what you read/see/hear in mainstream media. Incredible how wrong they were. 
At least Brexit looks ok now. 
When the whole world is mad at the UK and US for Brexit and Trump.#ElectionNight 
The lesson I took away from Brexit was that there were no adults in Britain, all of a sudden. Well. 
this is our brexit. unbelievable 
One thing is clear from Brexit, US elections etc: Calling common people racist, uneducated fools does not win elections. 
The liberal Left Ain't singing anymore, they're leaving the stadium in droves, "they think it's all over" it is now!A Brexit Win Double 
First Brexit, now this. 
England: Nothing can be more embarrassing than Brexit. America: Hold my beer. 
We're witnessing a referendum on ObamaCare, which Dems rammed through Congress. @EvanBayh, @russfeingold voted for it, and lost tonight. 
This will go down in history as one of the most stupid decisions the people could've ever made, right next to Brexit. I can't believe it. 
IVE BEEN SAYING THIS SINCE THE BREXIT HAPPENS !!!! IF YOU ARE GOING TO BE DECEASED IN THE NEXT FEW ON COMING YEARS YOU SHOULDNT BE VOTING 
This..is our Brexit...#ElectionNight  
As a protest, Brexit was a face tattoo. A President Trump is setting yourself on fire in the car park of where you used to work. 
The Brexit vote, fueled by anti-immigration rhetoric, was followed by violence against minorities. Be careful. Stand up for your neighbors. 
I'm hearing #Brexit are you? @CNN @HillaryClinton?  #ElectionNight 
As a US citizen, i see your Brexit and raise you a total fucking imbecile 
Trust and believe I said that America hadn't hit rock bottom yet that we were just circling the drain... you thought #Brexit was joke?!? 
So half of Americans watched what Brexit did to Britain's economy and the pound sterling. Then they said, "We'll take one of those." 
Mr. Brexit. 
BRITAIN:  Brexit is the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA:  Hold my beer. #USElection2016 
.@ericbolling Trump, Brexit, Cubs... all upsets. 
Is the new #Toblerone design a metaphor for Brexit? One Vogue editor seems to think so:  
This election is a referendum on elite media and polling. 
Dear America, we voted #brexit so you didn't have to do this. This is not a competition you know.... 
England: Nothing and no one can be more embarrassing than Brexit. America:  
Comparisons with Brexit are fallacious. This is much worse. 
if trump wins, there will be a global market crash tomorrow, a 3-5% market correction down, this really is brexit in america #ElectionNight 
idk in a weird way stuff like this and brexit makes me feel less depressed about pakistan. majorities are assholes. 
so we thought we had it fucked up with brexit out here, then you decided Trump is the best for your country. youre all crazy i dont get it. 
.@JerryBrownGov can we do a California Brexit I am serious 
@WDFx2EU8 " We have a #Brexit on Sterioids"!!!!! @ 
lol Brexit doesn't even seem that bad now? 
It's now very likely that the #USElection will prove to be America's Brexit moment  
Please America, don't pull a Brexit! #ElectionNight #Elections2016 #NeverTrump 
We saw polling error in the 2014 midterms, in Greece, with Brexit ... #ElectionNight  
Things have all gone a bit Brexit  
It's too bad that both in this case and Brexit, they don't have the chance to actually choose what's good for them. 
Brexit & the US elections will be big chunks. Students will write essays about what went wrong. 
The Tories might finally get the idea & get on with Brexit  
this is boots the psychic goat he predicted the brexit vote and now he says clinton will win BOOTS DON'T LET ME DOWN  
We are witnessing a #Brexit in the United States #ElectionNight 
Media mis-polled Brexit and now the presidential election...Clearly displays bias or poor recognition of social pressure skewing results 
The Italian Job, The Office, Brexit. I do wish America would stop taking  things that we've done and making them much bigger and much worse. 
the mid west needs to exit. like brexit but mid wesxit 
Nigel Farage tells @itvnews that if Donald Trump becomes US president it will be 'bigger than Brexit' #Elections2016  
Well done on a great result! Mr Trump is now Mr Brexit - Nigel just conceded!  
Right. That's all I can bear - time for bed. I suppose it puts Brexit in perspective, anyway. Good night.  
After Brexit, I figured no other nation can take a bigger L in 2016Boy I was wrong 
Is America about to Brexit? 
'Bigger than Brexit': markets, US dollar plunge as Trump takes Florida – live  
Can Cali make our brexit now. Or can an earthquake split us off and drift us westward 
People are openly crying at the #Clinton rally in New York"This is very similar to the night of June 23rd" says @SkyNews re #brexit  
Jean and Bernard from the U.K. have been watching results come in, in Miami. "It's like Brexit," they say. #Elections2016 #electionnight 
Looks like Brexit on steroids. The left elites here and in Europe don't know what's hit them. 
USA Election 2016 is a Referendum on Racism 
England: Brexit!USA: Whatever. Check this out!Cut to credits 
FANTASTIC! AMEXIT MUCH NEEDED. Clean out the SNAKES and #DrainTheSwamp. THANK YOU for leading the charge in Europe and UK's BREXIT!#MAGA 
There are clearly Brexit commonalities, but there is a wider American story people are not getting. 
The moment @KTHopkins predicted that just as Britain had Brexit, the US would get 'Trump-it'  
Looking like American #Brexit tonight #PhillyVotes 
I hope attacks against minorities don't rise like they did in the UK after Brexit, stay safe everyone 
How the pollsters got #Election2016 wrong - just like #Brexit  
A man that 61% of country believes is unqualified is just 1 blue state away from becoming President. This is Brexit all over again #khou11 
Maybe Trump won't be so bad, we thought Brexit would be terrible & look how well that turned outOpens another bottle of whiskey at 4.30am 
'Clowns to the left of me, Racists to the right, Here I am...'  #ElectionNight #Trump2016 #Brexit #Wow #USElection2016 
How the pollsters got the US election wrong - just like Brexit  
Donald Trump is in the lead and things just got very Brexit  
Wonder if we’ll get Brexit-like stories of nonvoters who say, “I didn’t think it’d actually happen."  
England: Surely nothing can be more embarrassing than Brexit America: Yo check this out! #ElectionDay #Election2016 
IF #Trump wins and I hope he will, is a  referendum on Big government high taxes massive regulations and open Borders. 
Looks like 2016 is going to be the year of two big political revolutions @realDonaldTrump. Would be bigger than Brexit!  
Leicester winning had a price: Brexit.Cubs winning had a price: Trump 
I really was laughing at brexit. Sorry to all my english folk for all dem jokes.  
One thing Brexit and US election are showing us: You can't persuade people to vote by telling them they're dumb if they don't agree with you 
First Brexit. Now looking like Trump will be President. What's next? Honey G as Mayor of London? 
This feels like a referendum on decency & decency lost.#electionday 
This is worse than Brexit 
The unexpected is happening. Looks like the next president of the US will be Donald Trump - as he said it's Brexit plus plus! 
This is what happened with Brexit. Once people have the anonymity of the voting booth they show their true colors. 
Brexit analogy misses point. Rational grounds for being in/ out of EU. Tonight a far starker choice of views, leaders risks - & more serious 
Brexit, Trump and in Indonesia's context, 411, show that people make choices emotionally not rationally. Then they regret it later 
BRITAIN:  Brexit is the stupidest, most self-destructive act a country could undertake.USA:  Hold my beer. 
Holy fuck... It is literally Brexit all over again! The youth are getting screwed over by our elderly.... pic.twitter.com/1tIu9WTEVv 
Trump/Brexit are obviously not alone in their thoughts. Moron votes count too. Spread love and educate for the generations to come x 
i said this after brexit and i'll say it again: just in case, i'm really good with visa appointments in berlin 
It seems #MARTA16 referendum passes with 71.5 % approval rate at 86% reporting! #atlpol #gapol #transitvote 
'Muslims are in fear as US is on brink of Brexit moment', Muslim leader Linda Sarsour says  
So this is what #Brexit felt like, huh? 
England did a jackknife into the pool with brexit so of course america has to do a cannonball off their neighbour's roof 
That's something that needs to be examined. Worth rereading on Brexit polls  
So Trump actually was Mr Brexit 
How do we get a California secession referendum up and going? 
I feel sick. Can't watch the US election anymore. It's over. Brexit then this. 2016 has been a bad year. And no more Bowie. 
Imagine you had £20 on a Leicester, Brexit, Trump and Honey G 4-fold. 
I've seen this horror movie already #ElectionNight #brexit 
Watching media luvvies,as it dawns on them they backed wrong horse, is delicious.Just like #Brexit all over again.What a yr 2016 has been 
Cambridge Analytica, which did private polls predicting Brexit, used polling weighted for more white male turnout to predict this 
Last two market shaking govt moves intertwined w/ global market shocks- R3xit (Brexit). Demonetisation (Trump). Wonder if deliberate timing. 
This presidential vote may be America's Brexit moment. But far more significant. 
As of now it looks BREXIT repeat--poor/rural/school educatedl/working class rejecting elitist glbalisation:)) 
2016 we got 3-1 Finals, Cubs World Series, The Life of Pablo, Brexit, Lemonade, Bowie died, Prince died, and this election iconic year 
Motherfucking Brexit *was* the model all along. White idiots shooting themselves in the foot. 
This is nauseating, Brexit night deja vu 
I apologize to all the skeptics who warned me about a Brexit. I believed the polls in the US were solid and extensive. I was wrong. 
This will not be Brexit. This will make Brexit look like a fucking day at the beach. 
My Brexit night all over again. Pushback against globalisation strongest in the most open societies. Something to ponder. 
This is Brexit gang!!!! #ElectionNight 
Just remembered I tweeted this at 3.30am on Brexit night...  
New York Times Prediction. HELLO PRESIDENT TRUMP. BREXIT   
2016 is the worst year I've ever witnessed.1st Brexit and now it looks like Trump's about to become POTUS, Lord have mercy. #ElectionNight 
"Yeah, this feels an awful lot like the EU referendum result," says BuzzFeed UK political editor @jimwaterson 
Wake up to hear the dollar is tanking. Worst part is people knew this would happen for Trump votes re Brexit and people still voted anyway. 
Polling showed that Brexit was close. Polling did not show that this was close. Everything we know about measuring voter behavior is a lie. 
Am I the only guy in the world who was in the Brexit party AND the Trump party? 
US: Seriously dude, don't vote for BrexitUK: Opps, my bad. Don't vote for Trump though alright?US: Say no more. 
Look at Brexit. People tired of the establishment. This election is a perfect example. Career politicians in trouble. #ElectionDay 
Anyone else having the 4am Brexit disbelief/panic all over again?!  
Dow Futures:Brexit Reaction: 500 points Reaction Tonight: 750 points #ElectionNight 
Stop the world. I want to get off. #Trump #Brexit #Everything 
UKIP gains: wow where did this fascism come fromBrexit: wow where did this fascism come fromTrump: wow where did this fascism come from 
Referendum , Brexit  now this !?  I no longer understand humanity. 
Dreadful #Brexit -esque fear clouding over. Please let humanity, inclusion & hopefulness win this time. #ElectionNight 
Honestly, my patience for the surprise people have for Trump and Brexit and how racist this world is, is pretty non-existent. 
TrumpBrexitMeanwhile in India a committed action orientated PMI know where I'd rather be 
Brexit all over again. Millenials about to let their future be mortgaged  
Brexit + Trump: reactionary symptoms of the crisis of global capitalism and liberal democracy. The next years are going to be very dark. 
I have seen it all now.Brexit and Donald Trump in the same year. Logic, sense and reason are strangers to this world 
hope those third party voters are feeling brexit levels of regret right now  
'Bigger than Brexit': markets, US dollar plunge as Trump takes Florida – live  
Are they still accepting people onto those Mars trials ? #electionnight #brexit 
Just like Brexit, I think the economy and the market will outperform. I'm long America. 
• Brexit • Donald Trump • Marine Le Pen ...#ElectionDay 
Host: Welcome to the Worst Politics In The World Card Game.(UK plays Brexit)(months pass)(America plays Trump card)UK: Congrats. 
If #brexit was any indication if #DonaldTrump wins hate crimes against minorities in the USA are going to sky rocket. 
"this could be an ideological revolution" @krauthammer "a worldwide brexit revolution" 
Brexit analogy: people expressing resentment at being told they are backward, adding insult to injuries they feel change has brought them.  
Brexit and the American election is proof racism still exists. 
2016 MISD Bond Referendum Passes. Read more here  
Thank you Nigel!! This is our BREXIT! GOD BLESS AMERICA AND GOD BLESS THE UK! 
World: "Man, the UK really screwed up with this Brexit vote, not sure we'll see a worse blunder this year." U.S.: "Hold my beer." 
Can @NASA hurry things along so some of us can move to Mars? #ElectionNight #Elections2016 #Brexit #Trump #Putin 
This + Brexit, end of the post-war order, really. 
We may have Trumped Brexit tonight. 
So this is how Brexit felt! #ElectionNight 
Brexit, American edition. These emotional voters will regret their decisions soon enough. Sick to my stomach. #ElectionNight 
It's only one election, without the permanent changes of #Brexit, but given America's power and influence, would a Trump win be bigger? 
If he wins it's going to be like Brexit - the majority of the people who voted for him will google "what is a President"  #ElectionNight 
America just pulled a Syriza and a Brexit, at the same time. Ouch. #ElectionNight 
The day after #brexit  went like -1) Promises retracted2) Millions wishing they could vote again3) Worldwide facepalmGet ready America 
Off to the US for weekend . I think it's fair to say we understand the Brexit effect  
"Is this the US' version of Brexit?" @katiecouric to @YahooUK editor-in-chief - Watch  #ElectionNight 
For this to go full Brexit, we're due a ton of people tomorrow going "Oh I wish I'd voted/I only meant it as a protest". #electionnight 
This reminds me way too much of the Brexit. I hated the Brexit. I hate this. 2016 is the worst year. 
2 Tory governments, Brexit, Indy ref & now fucking Trump. A want voting tae be banned for ever man 
Just like before impossible brexit, they said market down & economy down, then market went up and economy grew. Same thing happening here. 
Similar feelings to the night Brexit votes came in. We all know how fucking catastrophically that ended.  
This is America's brexit."People are surprised it's so close!"Who are these people that haven't been paying attention for the past year? 
Hello brexit my old friend. We never learn, do we? 
Trump outplaying pollsters, grabbed major swing states, redrawing electoral map. US Brexit moment? Not just yet. Long way to go still . 
Yesterday I was told categorically by a respected adviser & commentator that Hilary would "walk it".... this feels like Brexit de ja vu 
With this & Brexit, I feel like I don't know people. I don't trust their reasons, hopes, or ambitions. I feel totally paranoid & I hate it. 
It's still too close 2 call US Election but it's clear Brexit-like backlash & anger DID apply in US. And that polls were inaccurate. 
trumpian nationalism/isolationism closely represents the brexit leave party. the british pound is at a 31 year low. i am worried 
Wow... the DOW Futures have dropped 600 points! This is bad. This could be brexit bad. 
OMG DAMN REPUBLICANS DOW JONES DOWN 700 POINTS, THIS IS WORSE THAN BREXIT. COMPLETE POVERTY IS COMING TO AMERICA. DAMN GOP, DAMN TRUMP  
This night in US politics is like Brexit? No.It's like Brexit having a kid with Hannibal Lecter.#ElectionNight #ElectionDay 
Brexit looks like an X Factor semi final result now. 
BREXIT 2: The SEQUEL [NOW WITH MORE EXIT] 
WHERE'S YOUR FUCKING BREXIT MEMES NOW CHUMPS 
Thinking a lot about the #brexit voters who were shocked by the results because they didn't know what they were voting for. #ElectionNight 
I spent 4 years studying International Relations and Politics, in less than 6 months Brexit & Trump have upended everything I was taught 
Did we learn NOTHING from #Brexit??? 
Stop saying Brexit! THIS IS WAY WORSE THAN BREXIT!! We may have just destroyed the entire world. 
Democracy is not a linear progression. Established 'Western Democracies' can experience setbacks too #Trump #Brexit  
With #Drumpf being this close and #Brexit, it's hard not to be saddened by the large amount of hate out there in our world now. 
Right in the middle of Brexit and Trump. Nowhere to escape to.  
Dow is now down more than 700 points. Bigger crash than Brexit in June.  
Why didn't we see this coming? UK voters chose Brexit. Polls have shown Marine Le Pen could reach 2nd round in French elex 
You know who looks really smart right now? Everyone who said Brexit was a harbinger.#ElectionNight 
Nigel Farage: "Market moves suggest Brexit may be happening again". #ElectionNight 
[David Bowie & Prince die][Brexit passes, Vine is shut down]The World: "please... let us rest..."2016: "...just one more thing" 
Any chance California can pull a Brexit and leave the US? Honestly scared right now. #Calexit #ElectionNight 
Hillary will most likely win but I had hoped for a referendum on decency that would set the course for 2020. Did not happen. #ElectionNight 
Remember after Brexit when people said "I voted for leave because I never thought it would actually happen" DID YOU LEARN NOTHING AMERICA 
I was in Europe during Brexit, I couldn't understand how dumbfounded Brits were. Now I just feel really, really stupid. 
ask yourself“DID I DO ALL I COULD HAVE DONE”Its a good Lesson.We r still Try’n 2have hope. SAW BREXIT RIP GB APART IN ONE NITE Must 
How do you say “Brexit” in American English? 
I feel horrible for the women of this country. It's like a referendum on their dehumanization, and it's not going well. #ElectionNight 
american elections, brexit and philippine elections aka holy trinity of elections gone wrong 
World: "Wow, no one could have had a worse polling screw up than the #brexit polls" America: "Hold my beer and watch this" #Elections2016 
Once again looks like the Media tried to manipulate how people vote in the US Like they did in our BREXIT Referendum THEY FAILED AGAIN 
Everything about this feels identical to Brexit. 
Post Brexit, no one thought it'd be possible to out-stupid Britain.But you know America. Never one to back down from a challenge! 
i remember laughing at brexit and saying rofl theres no way america could fuck up something that big 
So is this how it really goes down? Brexit, Trump, the rise of white nationalism, fear of foreigners, antisemitism, and misogyny? 
To all the people who said a brexit type thing could never happen in the u.s. u were wrong. 
Shades of Brexit 
By the way, if you think Brexit is going to be reversed, you can forget it. You may not think they're related, but they are.#ElectionNight 
"Brexit plus plus" indeed. 
Oh and just in case you mistakenly thought the "Brexit" had somehow rebounded in the UK and the pound had improved? Yeah not so much...  
this take on brexit also applies to the election cause whiteness is brazy like that  
whatever the result of US election, #Brexit was a foreshadow of discontent with political establishment 
Nigel fucking Farage came round to America AFTER Brexit happened to endorse Trump, and y'all STILL didn't have a sense of urgency. 
BREAKING:DOW DOWN 723. MARKET PREDICTS A TRUMP VICTORY  World Financial Markets R Tumbling. Peso in a free fall.#Brexit#VICTORY 
Don't you love it when the silent majority say "That's enough" and go out to vote. Brexit 2.0 #ElectionNight 
Typical America. We do Brexit and they have to go bigger. 
EXACTLY what happened in Brexit. The Millennials did not make the vote.  Their future lost again.  
Brexit taught me that white people will burn their country to the ground to avoid sharing it with black and brown people 
My tweet after Brexit  
i hope all you protest voters are happy with how this is turning out to be American Brexit 
Dow futures down 730 points, S&P 500 off almost 5%. This is shaping up to be way worse than Brexit. #ElectionNight 
Oh Holy Mother of God this can't be happening. It's going to make Brexit look like a ballet lesson... 
So the trifecta seems to be in reach: Brexit, Colombia peace deal, and U.S. election. Clearly a global backlash against the establishment. 
When brexit should have been the most embarrassing political move this year but America let a cheeto in a toupee make it this far...  
Anyone reminded of #Brexit? #ElectionNight 
Echoes of Brexit: The surprising thing to me is just how surprised everybody is right now that @realDonaldTrump is doing what he's doing... 
The "Brexit" analogy is also looking a lot better tonight. 
Brexit on steroids.#ElectionNight 
Brexit was a fucking stroll on the beach compared to this. 
Dow futs -700. 5 months after Brexit 
Harambe died. Vine died. Niitro died. Our hope in America is dying. My pet fish died. Duranbrook died. Brexit. 2016. 
The voters have spoken and they approved the #WakeTransit referendum. Learn more about the future of transit at  
You know how y'all laughed at us about Brexit? This. 
What makes this so much worse is that, unlike the Brits, we had Brexit in hindsight 
So... looks pretty much like brexit, older generation voting for a future that the new generation doesn't want  
I thought Brexit was gonna be the biggest mistake of 2016.But the American voters are about to Trump the British.  
This election night feels like Brexit all over again, with the glum faces of all the clueless 'experts', so out of touch with the voters. 
I regret making all those Brexit jokes now its not as funny when it happens to you 
Come on America... please don't reach Brexit levels of stupidity. PLEASE!! 
Markets are moving like it's Brexit 2.0 in the U.S.  
I think this is going to be our BREXIT!!!!! November 8th, 2016 could be the American BREXIT! #MakeAmericaGREATAgain #ElectionNight 
Ireland will now be stuck between Trump's US and post-Brexit Britain. Holy fucking shit. #USElection2016 
"We underestimated the vote in rural areas" - Chuck Todd. Sounds a whole lot like Brexit. 
Brexit Polls: No wayUS Election Polls: No way Can we all agree polls can no longer be trusted?  
ITS FUCKING BREXIT PLUS. WE ARE DOING IT. MY FUCKING GOODNESS WE ARE DOING IT. 
So...about those Brexit comparisons. 
Brexit just got bigger. How about Worldxit? #ElectionNight #USWahl2016 
I’m ready to “call” Atlanta’s MARTA referendum. At 66% reporting, it’s leading with more than 71%. Congrats Atlanta! 
Wow... Trump actually looks like he's gonna win. This is like Brexit all over again 
At this point, S&P futures down exactly as much as they were on Brexit night. We can break that if Trump's victory confirmed.  
If @realDonaldTrump wins he wld likely control all three branches of govt. plus Supreme Court nominations. Earthquake cf Brexit mini tremor 
Foreign investors have already pulled billions out of US markets. Maybe they learned something from #brexit 
Feels like brexit is happening all over again... 
Between this US election, Brexit and the Brazilian coup, I hope 2016 is the year the Left realizes shaming voters isn't a winning tactic. :/ 
No, a Trump win is not "America's BREXIT". It's the trigger for a global financial collapse and the flashpoint for numerous wars. 
First brexit & now Trump winning. Two nations that conquered the world have become the laughing stock of the world. 
#ElectionNight is #Brexit redux--ppl don't believe it could happen, till it happens... then everyone regrets their decision 
Brexit will be Fuming! Worked so hard to win the title of most ridiculous ballot result in history only to have USA snatch it away so soon! 
The night of Brexit, a quote stuck with me. “Never underestimate the combined power of white people running scared from minorities" 
THANK YOU to all who cast their ballots today! With 70% of precincts reporting the referendum has been APPROVED by voters. 
The reason it's so close? My hunch is that lots of people who have never voted before have turned out for Trump. Brexit deja vu 
phliippines: hey look at us fuck up *elects duterte* britain: oh yeah beat this *brexit*america: oh yeah 
Like the post Brexit panic this will pass.  Panic sellers will, as always, get creamed. But SCOTUS saved is incredibly good for business  
IS THIS WHAT BREXIT FELT LIKE?! 
10Y plunges most since Brexit to 1.74% 
"Michigan, Ohio, Pennsylvania: the Brexit states" @MMFlint called it months ago. #trexit 
US: lets have trump runUK: oh yeah? we call & raise you a brexit!US: we call your brexit & raise you a trump for president!DOW: uh, guys?  
Mr. Brexit, people. 
Thank you to the voters of Kershaw County for passing a bond referendum and penny sales tax - we appreciate your support!  #myKCSD 
America's about to have first hand experience of what brexit felt like 
Watching the US Election.. feeling sick. It's like Brexit round two. Helplessly watching a nation make a stupid decision. 
(not brexit-sick, but sick, you know) 
So, basically, 2016 has taught us that pre-election polls are completely useless. #Brexit #ElectionDay 
Right now, this election is looking like a referendum on Hillary Clinton, even with a racist sexual predator on the other side. 
"Hey England. You think that #Brexit was crazy?  Hold my beer and watch this."   -   America 
Getting Brexit deja vous #ElectionNight 
Continuing my previous tweet: It happened in India with Modi; in UK with Brexit; and now in US, whatever may be d end result Trump proved 
I remember seeing this graph during Brexit.  
BREAKING: Voters reject North Jersey Casino referendum. Story by @ACPressHuba  via @thepressofac 
Well Britain, we tried to beat them this year but it's looking like Brexit wasn't good enough. 
This is Brexit's other shoe. Only worse. Much worse. 
Stop comparing this to Brexit. That was a nation quitting a club. This is the world's largest power willfully choosing a crypto-fascist. 
This is our Brexit moment. We have a lot of work to do. #ElectionNight 
Brexit? 
Hi Brexit how are you? 
AMERICA IS ONLY A FEW HOURS FROM HAVING ITS OWN BREXIT  
If Trump wins it will make Brexit seem like a minor hiccup. #electionnight #election2016 
Trump winning, Brexit..reminders that the world does not progress linearly. So keep fighting for love lest we go back to hate. 
If tonight is the American Brexit, we need a name: AmExIt? #Elections2016 
this feels too much like brexit for comfort. the memes no longer make me laugh. I'm just terrified. 
Remember Brexit? Remember what you were supposed to learn from that? REMEMBER?No, of course you don't. #ElectionNight 
AP: New Jersey casino expansion referendum is defeated. 
@jongaunt What a night!! They say lightning doesn't strike twice #brexit now @realDonaldTrump . They were wrong!!  
On the bright side, Brexit is probably the least of our problems now. 
BREXIT PLUS PLUS PLUS?NYTimes raises Trump win probability from 15% to 59% to 64%!!!!!!!!#MAGA #Trump2016 #ElectionNight 
Flashbacks to Brexit night right now like  
Can't wait to wake up tomorrow to see someone has sent in a Leicester/Brexit/Trump Treble  
Were the markets wrong? Brexit 2? Hillary might lose?   
Is the United States on the brink of its own Brexit? #ElectionNight 
a trump win would be a polling failure magnitudes beyond brexit. yougov had remain up only 49-51. 
ELECTION RESULTS: Waupun approves school referendum authorizing $36 million in bonds for improvements. 
trump is similar to brexit, no one took it seriously or thought it was an actual threat so didnt put much effort into oppsing it 
This is feeling a lot like the Brexit vote where the day after a ton of people go, "I didn't vote because I didn't think any way we'd lose" 
And I thought Brexit was embarrassing. 
Brits joking that this is our version of the Brexit  Our Brexit was in 1776. Sit down and eat your food, baby girl. 
I remember watching the Brexit polls and laughing at how close it was early on... And then all of a sudden I stopped laughing. Deja Vu.  
Brexit happened. Trump might happen. MK Dons still exist. 2016: you are the worst. 
Brexit: The Sequel  
Leicester City.Brexit.Now Donald Trump.Your turn @ChelseaFC 
The bookies have had a mare in 2016. Leicester, Brexit & now Trump  
Is this what Brits felt during Brexit? Are millions of Americans tomorrow going to Google "What is Donald Trump?" 
Did we upgrade to Super Saiyan Brexit level 2 or something? 
The decline in stocks over a Trump possible victory is another huge buying opportunity like Brexit. 
Brexit who 
Here's sound advice from our friends in the UK on how they coped after Brexit. 
LeicesterBrexitDonald Trumpyour turn @acmilan 
I feel like brexit was the electoral equivalent of a controlled apple leak 
Michale Moore onNBC right now ran his Brexit states theory by me and I actually think it was pretty sound. 
Sound a familiar Brexit story! Some are saying if the current trend in favour of Trump continues the polling industry is dead#uselections 
From last year's General Election... to Brexit... to Trump's early returns... why does anyone still take any notice of opinion polls? 
BREAKING:DOW DOWN 430. MARKET PREDICTS A TRUMP VICTORY  World Financial Markets R Tumbling. Futures markets going DOWN. #Brexit#VICTORY 
Now you know what watching the Brexit results felt like. 
Uneducated white people brought about Brexit and they might bring about a Trump presidency. Ignorance is winning and I want out 
Brexit. Trump. What is it telling us about society and conservatism? 
We scoffed at Brexit. We told ourselves that it'd never happen. Then we watched in horror as it happened. This is one + the same. 
I've stayed up tonight so I don't have the shock of waking up to a result like the UK Referendum. Can anyone explain what's going on!  
If Trump wins can we Brexit America? 
Between Brexit and the American election, Canada wanders in like  
BREAKING: Virginia Beach light rail referendum fails 
Whatever tonight's result, after Brexit, Colombia referendum, US elex et al, the polling industry needs to take a long look at itself. 
This may not be Brexit but it feels like it right now 
Brexit is beginning to look like the good old days 
If tonight and Brexit proved anything, it's that people who are paid to predict elections and conduct polls are stealing a living. 
Make no mistake: This election is a referendum on boorish masculinity:  
Brexit "Made in the USA"???? 
Are we potentially seeing #brexit part two?  #Trump is shocking the world right now. #fox10phoenix #ElectionNight #fox10phoenix 
Brexit bleek kinderspel. 
Now I know what Brits felt like watching Brexit happen before their eyes and wondering "how in the world . . . " 
considering americas founding tradition of one-upping britain, electing trump is the only logical response to brexit 
This will make Brexit look like the Toblerone kerfuffle. 
Then again, after Brexit and the failure of the Yes vote in Colombia, strangely none of this feels surprising. 
If any American news stations would like to interview a drunk English man about the parallels with Brexit I am totally there for you. 
We are watching #brexit part 2 as the BBC starts to panic as #TrumpTrain pummels them! A joy to behold 
This is #Brexit. The market is already responding. This mess is actually happening guys. Thanks Comey! Thanks Johnson! #YayYouGuys! 
Brexit part 2 #ElectionNight 
Question of the night: who got it more wrong: UK pollsters ahead of Brexit or US pollsters ahead of tonight? 
#BREAKING - Dow stock futures fall more than 500 points & Peso down 8% as Trump holds lead. This is a market tumble similar to Brexit 
Wow - gold over $1,300, up $30 on huge volume. It did this when anti-Establishment Brexit won, too. #Elections2016 #ElectionNight 
What's Brexit in Spanish? Peso's fall against the dollar now the highest since the 1994 Tequila Crisis.  
Incidentally, after Brexit & now Trump media needs to take a hard look at itself for giving airtime to loud morons in the name of "balance". 
This is a similar feeling we had regarding Brexit.... worlds gone mad 
So like Brexit: 1) hm, that's anomalous, given how secure the outcome is 2) bizarre, shouldn't be doing that 3) should I be worr- 4) oh god! 
Donald Trump is now favourite to win the #USElection - is it Brexit all over again?  
If #Brexit taught me anything, it's don't underestimate how much stupid people hate foreign people. Trump could win this. #Election2016 
We are close to approaching the brexit drop (in velocity/magnitude) 
Trump said this election would be "Brexit plus-plus-plus". This NY Times prediction chart certainly bears that out  
If Trump wins don't blame Black and Latino voters. White folks did this. This was a referendum for White Nationalism. 
Americans: I'm moving if Trump winsBrits: I'm moving once Brexit kicks inCanadians: *bundled up in blankets with Tim Hortons* we're good 
If Trump wins, atleast Brexit won't look as bad anymore. #ElectionNight 
Wow....Dow futures down over 400. Looking a lot like the morning after #Brexit, folks!! MAGA #Election2016 
The world is sick & tired of normal politicians! #Trump looking good for a #Brexit! US$ being belted! #Election2016 
Looking on the bright side, at least Brexit Britain will now only be the second stupidest nation on the planet. #USElection2016 
So this is what Brexit felt like first hand. 
News media: you can stop saying "Brexit effect" and just say "full-blown racism." 
"It won't be like #Brexit" they said. "Stop comparing this to #Brexit, you fools" they continued.Well, look at that now.#ElectionNight 
i remember this feeling whilst watching the Brexit votes were coming in, sigh. 
After Brexit I was paranoid and fearful about this election. Everyone said, oh don't worry.  Not the same. 
Brexit feels.... 
This election is in part a referendum on boorish masculinity.  
We'll see how it shakes out. But Brexit should have been a clue to the US on how wrong things can go in a relatively short time. 
Pundits have a lot of nerve talking about non-globalist, anti-intellectual, brexit-like trends and not talk about RACISM as a driving force 
It's Brexit! 
I'm sorry America. Brexit should of been a warning sign not an encouragement 
Brexit-Alarm!#USwahl16 
Update: Mr. Brexit  
Brexit, No in Colombia, and now Trump. 2016, go fuck yourself. 
D.C. voters approve referendum to petition Congress for statehood, according to @AP projection. More:  #Election2016 
I've seen this movie before. This is following almost exactly the Brexit script.  
I feel like this whole President Trump & Brexit thing is an episode of #BlackMirror gone too far. MAKE IT STOP. 
Trump v Brexit: Here's how similar their campaigns were. Will we see the same result? #USelection2016 
Just saying. Donald Trump’s American Brexit  via @BostonGlobe 
Brexit veterans will recognize the shape of tonight's Dow futures financial chart  
This election is a referendum on hate. Lets hope we at least squeak by:  
The bookies had Trump at 9/1 an hour ago. Clinton & Trump are now both 10/11. Trump has done a Brexit! 
Brexit feelings. 
NOW PLAYING: Brexit 2: The Colonies#ElectionNight #atx 
You are watching the USA's version of Brexit.  
The Clinton camp has gone as quiet as the Remain camp went at about this point during the Brexit referendum. 
It's all getting a bit Brexit in here 
We learned NOTHING from Brexit, huh? Nothing at all? Voting is a right and a responsibility and you just shit on it. Hope you're proud. 
I think at least half of the heads of the Fairfax and ABC commentariat are exploding now like they did over #Brexit. They don't get it. 
I watched the coverage hour by hour on BBC during #Brexit.Patterns are playing out exactly for #ElectionNight SOMETHING is happening!!! 
If the babyboomers in one year block Bernie Sanders, choose brexit and then pick Trump, we better revise our image of hippies. 
I am now in a fully blown Brexit PTSD flashback. 
Oh God, I'm getting #Brexit dejavu. Can this year get any fucking worse? Florida WTF? 
Oh fuck, we're going to be calling him mr. Brexit aren't we 
remember when we thought brexit could never happengood times #ElectionNight 
Donald Trump is drastically outperforming expectations so far tonight. He really may win. America’s Brexit? 
Independence, Brexit, Trump. Fear makes people do bizarre things. 
ES was limit down during Brexit night 
Brexit and U.S election tweets are my fave english/american combo since Sporty Spice and Bryan Adams sang classic banger When You're Gone 
Same trend as #brexit. Old people r trying to screw the young #USElections2016 #USElection2016SG 
Here’s the thing: Clinton can underperform like this in VA without major problems in other states. This has a real Brexit feel to it. 
Market moves suggest Brexit may be happening again. 
Florida's voting pattern reminds me of England's Brexit vote.  Biggest city voting one way, most other areas voting the other.  
American liberals, a Brexit guide:It hurts. A lot. The world is not what you thought it was 
Anyone else getting a serious bang of Brexit off these results at the moment? #ElectionNight 
Is this what the anti-Brexit felt like on the eve of election? It's not going to happen. It can't possibly happen!! It's happening.. OMG. 
STOP SAYING THIS REMINDS YOU OF BREXIT 
a @realDonaldTrump win would be even sweeter than brexit , burn the whole stinking dung heap in Washington to the ground 
Atlanta’s MARTA referendum looks very good. It’s at 70.7% at 32% reporting. I think we can be pretty confident in this passing. 
I like Nigel. He gave me hope that we can Brexit her Butt. We can Drain the Swamp. We can Make America Great Again. #tcot #ccot #gop #maga pic.twitter.com/n54pKhqgic 
What we are seeing in the #USElection2016 is #brexit x 10. We did tell you this would happen #TrumpPence16 
This isn't like the 2015 election. This isn't like Brexit. A Trump victory would be the biggest disaster to befall the West since 1945. 
We will welcome any Americans that want to #Brexit over here when Trump wins, bring your sisters 
The sweet wind of #Brexit is blowing across America... Do you feel it? 
I know Clinton still has better chances than Trump but it's beginning to feel a bit like the early hours of the Brexit count #ElectionNight 
So Brexit is happening right before our eyes #ElectionNight #DemVotes 
I’m not saying it’s going full Brexit over here yet, but this feels familiar.  
So per exits, CBS has Trump UP 5 in MINNESOTA within 1 in MICHIGAN #brexit 
It's beginning to feel a lot like Brexit. 
#Florida votes YES on Brexit 
Big local win in Wake County: the transit referendum passed. 
BREXIT IS HAPPENING??? 
Hey USA. You know this brexit thing is making things a little crazy over here.Could we borrow Obama since you arent using him anymore...? 
I'm feeling the exact same way as the night of the EU referendum. I'm just here thinking that humans are way too stupid to rule this planet. 
Feeling a lot like #Brexit. Damn, #AmeriKKKaLots of racist dreams coming true tonight! You're gonna get that wall, folks! Yay!  
Florida should Brexit. In fact, I think they'd probably vote in favor then Google what it means immediately after.  
/ES limit down chart from Brexit? too soon?  
The Daily Mail wrote a 'positive' story about Brexit. James O'Brien destroyed it in less than two minutes  
This feels like Brexit nght all over again and not just because I've finished the snacks before 2am 
So, what have we learnt so far tonight? At the CNN party it turns out that @MattBellamy, the lead singer of Muse voted for Brexit.  
74 of 84 precincts reporting: The MCCSC referendum passing with 81.38%. 
This Florida count is approaching the "BUT ISLINGTON IS STILL TO DECLARE, RIGHT?!?" stage of Brexit night. 
Opportunistic tosspot Nigel Farage - leader of UKIP, architect of Brexit - just said he'd prefer to be a US citizen. #USElection2016 
Marion County #transit referendum passes. 58-42, 3/4 of vote in. 
Over in England... Mr Brexit appears on TV  
Tonight is basically a referendum on how cool America is with racism and misogyny. 
Good job, City of Jackson. Liquor Sales Referendum wins 858-508. That's so much easy revenue that we've been throwing away for too long. 
Finally! Starting to get results from Atlanta’s MARTA referendum. It’s up 66% at 5% reporting. 
I'm afraid to sleep even though I'm soooo tired. Last time I slept easy... woke up to Brexit and Farage victory speach... 
not going to bed if hillary's winning cos i did that with the eu referendum and woke up to a country full of racists 
sleep is for the weak. and the confident. you know what i did the night before brexit? slept like a stupid, confident baby 
8:35pm Henrico bond referendum update (almost half the precincts in): Schools projects, 84% yes. Rec/Parks projects (turf fields): 76% yes, 
With the Election finally here, maybe now when I go to America people will have more to ask me than what my opinion of Brexit was. 
Went to bed during the summer- 'Remain' comfortably in front. Woke up to brexit & the world changed....bedtime calls again!  
Floyd County votes 'yes' to $87-million New Albany- Floyd County Schools referendum. 9 of 16 schools will see improvements. #ElectionNight 
With 73 out of 600 precincts counted, voters favored a mass transit ballot referendum 58.9 percent to 41.1 percent.  
Just wondering: Is this how Brits felt during #Brexit? 
CNN's live coverage is pathetic compared to BBC's during Brexit. BBC has commentary and analysis. CNN has Blitzer just yelling numbers. 
Unofficial early voting results for the 2016 MISD Bond Referendum: For - 58% Against - 41%. Stay tuned for final results. 
Early Results for ADVISORY REFERENDUM B DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA STATEHOODYES to approve 87,892 - 86.96%NO to reject       11,190 - 11.07% 
Getting Brexit flashbacks #USElection2016 #ElectionNight 
The New Albany Floyd County School referendum has passed:  
Peso is going nuts. Currency volatility right now has "Brexit feel," says one forex expert 
Maybe if Trump gets elected they'll pull a brexit and say it was non binding. 
Marion County, Indiana reporting 58% in favor, 42% against #transit referendum #transitvote @Transit4Indy 
if you voted for trump ironically i hope you guys understand that's basically how brexit happened 
Went to bed with #Remain leading. Woke up to a #Leave win. Not going to repeat my #Brexit mistake with #Election2016. Up till Hillary wins 
Two things that are making it hard to sleep. 1. Brexit2. Mrs.Brown's Boys won a BAFTA 
I would go to sleep but the last time I did, Brexit happened #ElectionNight #ImWithHer 
Remember when Americans roasted us about brexit but now they're bout to be stuck with either satan or the devil as their president 
I went to bed when i thought we'd voted remain for Brexit so i'm staying up until we're sure. You're welcome #ElectionNight 
Whereas in the UK we can laugh a bit. Except we did Brexit so we've no room to criticise. 
I'm having flashbacks to brexit. I'm going to sleep. Will be interesting to wake up.  
This u.s election will be like another Brexit. They'll turn round in 6 months and say thanks for voting but we're gonna get 2 more n revote 
I swear theres soooooo many undercover racists/cunts. Both Brexit and this election looked like it would be remain and Clinton. 
Perhaps there could be a country where all the non brexit people + anti trump people can live in peace and unity?! 
americans were lol'ing at us when brexit happened and now look at y'all 
I remember at this point of #brexit night we were relaxed. Then came Newcastle, then Sunderland, and then... chaos. So sit tight. 
Just to put it out there, if BBC & others put as much effort into covering European elections as they do American, might Brexit have failed? 
[cough] Brexit [cough] 
Geuinely not expecting/predicting anything after everyone being so sure of Brexit...just crossing all the fingers #Election2016 
The Scottish independence vote didn't end well, brexit happened... Please don't let the wotsit win. 
Thank you for thinking about the 48% and Britain's young people! Our own Government has sidelined us. #Remain #ParliamentisSovereign #Brexit  
Unofficial Results after all voting centersSchool Referendum:Yes 19921No 16889 
LOL, FL kind of looking like Brexit after all. #gulp 
I've run out of teabags. This happened while I was waiting to hear the results of Brexit as well. I don't like the similarity... 
I predict a Trump victory tonight. Fasten your seatbelt. Brexit style revolt of the working class against Wall St and the elites 
We have VERY early results from Indianapolis: Transit referendum winning up 59% 
I'm sitting in the same chair I was sitting in for Brexit. 
This is like going to bed the night before  Brexit. Assuring myself it would be fine then waking up to a horrible reality. Let's hope not. 
Farage called Brexit day our 'independence day' - Nigel, the USA already have one of those.. #ElectionNight 
'We’ll get our Brexit' Ukip MEP @oflynnmep accuses Remainers of not respecting EU referendum result  
#Brexit-style fallout after #ElectionNight? RT America's @AmeeraDavid & Larry King discuss  
Folks, I love you all but please stop comparing this to Brexit. The US is a far more diverse country 
I want to be positive about the American election but, Brexit. 
All these reporters and journalists seem to be just reassuring each other that Trump can't win. See Brexit. 
having an involuntary flashback to Farage on Brexit night ngl  
Feels like the #Brexit results all over again. 
Is brexit a country - harry booth 2016 
This is an accurate prediction. Cornetto prices have gone up post Brexit.  
After two Tory victories and a Brexit, I've learnt that when I stay up all night the bad guys win. So, for all of our sakes, I'm off to bed. 
i wanna sleep but im so anxious for America rnthis is the exact same uncertain feeling as BrexitPlease be kind 2016 
It'll be like Brexit when the trump supporters realise how stupid of a mistake they made and then they wished they changed their vote 
after Brexit did me so dirty I'm prepared for the worst tbh 
#Koenders discussed Europe, #Brexit, free trade @AucklandUni: 'NL is solid partner New Zealand in negotiating Free Trade Agreement with EU' 
I used to be pretty confident that Clinton would win the election, but then again, I was also confident that Britain wouldn't vote Brexit... 
like with brexit i was so sure we'd stay and look how that turned out. it's low-key hell. pls. idek if this election is rigged but not Him. 
I want to trust that Hillary Clinton will win but I will never trust anyone or anything again after brexit 
It's feeling pretty tense over here America. Please don't do a brexit and do the right thing #imwithher 
This election is a referendum on hate  
All I'm saying is at least if Trump wins we can call it "2 Brexit 2 Furious." 
Popular App That Led To Brexit Victory Could Be Secret Weapon For Trump  #tcot 
Just spoke with a friend from Northern Ireland who is watching the election closely..."I think this will be your Brexit"AMEN. 
Going to be honest. I don't really understand what I'm watching, but it feels a lot like how watching Brexit felt. #Election2016 
Let's just hope when I wake up it's not a repeat of Brexit. Goodnight 
British Bookie: ‘Mr. Brexit’ Might Pull Off A ‘Surprise Across The Pond’  #tcot 
I so wish this vote was a referendum for secession.  
Nigel Farage says "I learnt a big lesson from the Referendum - don't try and call an election too early!"  
I want to go to sleep, but the last time I went to sleep on a night like this I woke up and Brexit had happened. Sleephobia. 
It's Brexit Day in America #ElectionDay #MAGA3X #TrumpPence16  
Very important point - at this point on Brexit night everyone was convinced Leave would lose. 
We wouldn't have bathing beaches of this standard if EU hadn't insisted we stopped being dirty man of Europe. An EU success Brexit threatens  
A huge message we need to take from the Brexit and Trump debacles is how important education is. 
Is this Brexit day in the US? I hope so.— Nigel Farage (@Nigel_Farage) 
Could I swap my Brexit Britain passport for a Welsh European passport?  
Everyone in the UK is suffering monumental PRSD now, given both Brexit and the last UK election, right? It's not just me? #electionnight 
I'm eating crumpets watching the US election. #Brexit 
which way did you think #Brexit was going to go at this time? 
The last time I sat here and watched the BBC cover a nationwide vote, it ended in Brexit. The time before that, a Conservative government.   
BREAKING : Only Public Poll that Correctly Called Brexit Predicts Trump Victory  
Remember when the exit polls for Brexit looked so dim that even Nigel Farage conceded that things didn't look good. 
VIDEO : Nigel Farage, "It Feels Like Brexit Day in America!"  #ElectionDay #TrumpTrain #Trump2016 
The Brits in the group are still traumatized by Brexit so they're especially worried. #ElectionNight 
I swear I don't have anyone on my timeline that wants Trump to win, but this is exactly what it was like during Brexit  #ElectionDay 
I genuinely thought Trump was just a self-parody with no chance, until Brexit. After that, anything seems possible. 
british people making fun of america as if their stupid asses didn't vote for a brexit  
#ElectionNight BBC think people hate Hillary because she's a woman...lol! They've learnt nothing from Brexit. 
Last time I went to sleep feeling this nervous I woke up to Brexit.  Hopefully better news awaits in the morning.   
Forex markets now betting more confidently on Hillary. Dollar continuing to fall vs Mexican peso. Brexit II or right second time?  
seconded. We Brits will never be able to laugh at Yanks again. We did Brexit. They won't do/elect Trump. 
Oh, I remember Brexit/Like it was only yesterday/Mr Buzzcock on my shoulder...  
Brexit Britain, rolling up to an ex's house at 2am in a rag top MG, Rod Stewart blaring, wondering why no one is impressed  
I have a feeling this election will end just like Brexit"HAHA don't be stupid, we won't leave the EU""Oh wait""Trump's been elected" 
Expect a lot more of this type of behaviour in Theresa May's #Brexit nation of pedos and reprobates.  
If Trump loses, his decision to portray himself as Mr Brexit may well be partly to blame. Few Americans could want what we're going through. 
NIGEL FARAGE: “It Feels Like Brexit Day To Me” (VIDEO) -  
I want to believe it'll be a landslide for Hillary on #electionnight but Brexit makes me think twice lol 
Unlike with #Brexit I am praying to wake up to the news of the first female US President #ElectionNight #HillaryClintonForPresident 
Last time I went to bed on election night I woke up to find myself in a Brexit-bound dystopia. I'm TERRIFIED to close my eyes tonight! 
I'm convinced America isn't stupid enough to vote for trump but I was also convinced Britain wasn't stupid enough to vote Brexit lol 
People call Trump a racist for wanting to build a wall but prob voted out on Brexit because there's too many foreigners in the U.K. 
@realDonaldTrump Good luck from UK. May you have your #Brexit! The freedom-lovers of UK are rooting for you! God Bless America! Pls Retweet! 
Away in a May-ngerNothing in her headApart from BrexitUntil her political death bed #Article50Carols 
I keep saying the lesson we need to learn in 2016 is: YOU BREXIT, YOU BOUGHT IT. Voting is real, people.  
Having serious Brexit Eve flashbacks. It'll all be fine, they said. Go to sleep, they said. 
It’s often said that necessity is the mother of invention. In this case Brexit is the necessity.   
Why do I have a Brexit-esque feeling that I'm gonna wake up and Trump is going to be president... 
Yikes! The ITV coverage of the election thus far is an absolute shocker. Comparing the US general election to the Brexit referendum is crazy 
How many relationships destroyed by this referendum? It needn’t have happened & never should. Thanks, David Cameron.  
I will be staying up for the USA election tonight, in order to avoid that 'waking up to Brexit' shock. #ifwecandoBrexittheycandoTrump 
TrumpLand film-maker Michael Moore (@MMFlint) is worried a @RealDonaldTrump presidency will mean a Brexit-style "America leaving America".  
Just in case anyone is really interested in #Brexit lies.  
Off to bed for a few hours before the results start pouring in, let's not have a repeat of the brexit morning shall we! #ElectionNight 
Political pundits on USA TV talking about "Brexit effect" & "Brexit type vote". That's us. We did that. Thank you, the other 17,410,741. 
It's gonna be an eventful night across the pond !! Hoping it isn't another brexit type disaster and SHE gets the Presidency! #ElectionNight 
He's referring to what Brexit meant to people rather then it's literal implications. Closing borders, becoming xenophobic, etc.  
Watch those "Brexit Dads" in Fairfax, Wake, Hillsborough. Key in 2004. 
This ‘Psychic’ Scottish goat was right about Brexit -- and now it has predicted a winner for the U.S. election:  
Oh America, Remember when yall made jokes about #Brexit? #ElectionDay   
Some welcome perspective from Vanity fair on #brexit and #indyref2 
Wonder off this in Tory #Brexit plan? "Brexit: now Scotland and Wales battle PM in court"  
My colleague, the great Prof Rodney Brazier on constitutional law & Article 50 in @thetimes #Brexit  
Vegas Oddsmaker Predicts Brexit-Like Win For Donald Trump -  
Always a joy at this point in an election reading folk who claim to know what's going on. No-one does. Remember GE 2015 or EU referendum? 
Goodnight one and all. Truly hoping I wake up to America's first female president. The alternative is as bad or worse than #chaoticbrexit 
.@nick_clegg: 'So it’s Parlt & the people versus Brexit establishment. No wonder Brexiteers getting so twitchy'  
I'm scared that if I go to bed Brexit v2 will happen 
Hoping & expecting a decisive victory for Hillary. But having woken up wrong on Brexit, feeling a little unsure. 
If this is like that brexit thing where I woke up and the world had ended I shall be livid 
Political pundits on USA TV talking about "Brexit effect" & "Brexit type vote". That's us. We did that. Thank you, the other 17,410,741. 
The last hope for Trump supporters is that all the polls will be wrong like Brexit, except the polls weren't actually wrong on Brexit 
Conservative MPs draw up plan for debate and vote on triggering Brexit talks before historic Supreme Court hearing  
#Brextremists like Farage are terrified that support for #Brexit will fade away as the lies and fantasies hit cold reality.#Remain #YesEU 
European Parliament considers plan to let individual Brits opt-in to keep their EU citizenship. Fingers crossed   
If #Brexit goes before The Lords, it could be some time before we get a decision....  
Firms such as Airbus & VW think cost of funding would rise after hard Brexit, according to study leaked to Sky News  
I don't think Trump will win but then I was convinced we wouldn't vote for #brexit so...  I'm nervous #ElectionDay 
Yet more Brexit armageddon. The nightmare continues.Multi-million pound fighter plane contract for Sealand  
'EU WILL NOT SURVIVE’ – Juncker’s right-hand man admits DEFEAT after Brexit  
So. Who fancies staying in the #EU with me? #yesEU #Europe #brexit  
Nigel Farage "It Feels Just Like Brexit Day In America #ElectionNight 
The msm will try to hide a trump win till last moment remember brexit 
Some of these Trump voters almost make our Brexit voters look intelligent 
Anyone else feel anxious about going to sleep tonight? Can't help but recall the shock and horror I felt waking up to Brexit 
Not gonna lie, after Brexit, I'm nervous for #ElectionDay 
I'm scared to wake up tomorrow and see that trump has won it will be the same heart breaking feeling as waking up to brexit 
#BBCNews showing their usual bias. Haven't seen them this happy since they reported that REMAIN had won the referendum. 
EU referendum: Since the vote, Remainers have been bullied by Brexiters  
European Parliament considers plans for Brits opposed to Brexit to remain EU citizens  
This US election is more tense than Brexit  
Good luck @realDonaldTrump from England! This feels like #Brexit all over again! Ignore the exit poll! #VoteTrump #Trump #ElectionDay 
Post-Brexit Britain feels divided. Investors don't like divided countries. Britons, beware  via @BV 
Why UK health professionals should be very grateful to the High Court. My thoughts on #Brexit ruling @bmj_latest 
I bet everybody who enjoyed Noel's House Party voted Brexit. 
CNN guests have now said "Brexit vote" ten times in last ten minutes. Amazing how it is seen as a critical parallel. #ElectionNight 
#Brexit was and will always be an inherently racist campaign  
Brexit may be final straw for some couples, say divorce lawyers  
Brexit was a working class retaliation. You ignore people 4 too long & they will eventually rise up!America is Next TRUMP#ElectionNight 
OK this Brexit drinking game is totally unsustainable. Gerger just said "Brexit" 6 times in 30 seconds on CNN  
On CNN "Brexit" seems to have become shorthand for a situation where no one knows what the fuck's going on. #ElectionDay #USElection2016 
@chemistrypoet On the 3rd day of BrexitMy true love gave to me3 high court judgesAnd a £ coin now worth 80p.#Article50Carols 
Jingle bellsJingle bellsBrexit go awayOh what fun it is to wind the racists up all day#Article50Carols 
Gina Miller on her Brexit legal challenge: 'This had to be done'  
I'll be seriously pissed off if we wake up to Trump as President. It'll make Brexit day seem like waking up and realising it's a Saturday! 
Why am I not surprised. Brexit is turning out to be an attempted coup by the far right. #Farage 
What a glorious notion, yes please #Brexit  
My lifeboat in the event of Brexit was #indyref2. If Trump wins then it's Mars One  
Markets reminds me of #Brexit vote day: Stocks Rise With Mexico Peso, Safe havens lose out on early projections.  
Only Correct Public Brexit Poll Predicts Trump Victory  via @BreitbartNews 
Really hope we don't wake up to the news we are all dreading. That they've removed bubbles from Aero, and Kitkat loses a finger #Brexit 
Brexit was bad enough. We don't need a sequel. 
I've seen nothing but support for Hillary across my channels this week... But it's like Brexit all over again. I don't follow douches. 
Britons grumble as size of iconic #Toblerone chocolate bar reduces post Brexit  
Seriously tho, how come Americans get stickers when they vote and all we got was disappointment and a referendum that nobody wanted/ needed? 
First exit polls coming soon. Remember Brexit. Would be a shock for Team Hildabeast if she is not ahead. #ElectionDay 
This is how the bookmakers odds looked on polling day for the EU referendum. My blog on deceptive data:  
Tomorrow @ScotNational ...  Scotland joins court challenge to Brexit vote  
If you are ready for Crooked Hill to EXIT then it's time for the American people to do a BREXIT.  "Vote Trump"  
Anyone else thinking about an all nighter to see who gets to be leader of the free world. If brexit was nerve wracking...... 
Just like Brexit... Soros-backed groups plan to protest against democracy... but only if they lose. If they win it's all cool.  
TRAITOROUS MPs Are trying to Block Brexit UKIP Will Stop You By targeting those MPs seats You will NEVER Get away with your TREASONOUS Act 
. "You know, it feels just like Brexit Day to me." --Nigel Farage#MAGAX3 
Can Britain continue to thrive as a hotspot for life sciences after Brexit?  
I can't help but sense the same feeling there was before Brexit. Surely people aren't stupid enough to vote that way, surely! 
#Article50CarolsDing-dong miserably we sighThe slide to Brexit’s ruthlessBack from Asda now I spyMy Toblerone's half-toothless... 
BREAKING : Only Public Poll that Correctly Called Brexit Predicts Trump Victory  #ElectionDay #TrumpTrain #VoteTrump 
Someone needs to show this chump a history book. It was July 4th 1776. Kind of shows the historical illiteracy that drove the referendum.  
The U.K. government is facing a £25 billion hole in its finances because of Brexit  
Odds for Donald Trump to win US election exact same as they were for Brexit  
He was right about Brexit and has now made his Election 2016 prediction. Meet Boots, the psychic Scottish goat:  
See Brexit, raise you Trump! #WTFAmericaIn5Words 
“My advice to #Trump is say nothing,” says @Nigel_Farage. “I feel as I felt on #Brexit day.”  via @POLITICOEurope 
Any other Brits having referendum flashbacks? The maps. The #IVoted emoji. Asking yourself whether or not you should go to sleep. 
When you cannot go to bed because you're British and remember June 23rd. #scared #NeverTrump #ImWithHer #ImWithAmerica #Brexit #2016 pic.twitter.com/49azukNzq7 
Only Correct Public Brexit NATIONAL Poll Predicts Trump Victory:TRUMP +5TRUMP 50%, #CrookedHillary 45%11/3 - 11/6 
SURPRISE?! Only correct Brexit poll predicts VICTORY for… 
When Hillary began her campaign:–Ed Miliband was a likely PM–An EU referendum was just a policy pledge–Corbyn was an obscure backbencher 
Does Farage not know what Brexit is? Because that would explain a lot.  
I talked with the entire U.K. about our election. We ain't going out like Brexit!  
Could I just remind all MPs that the majority of people are looking on in amazement at their attempts to reject the referendum result. x 
Whatever Trump outcome, he's shown (as per Brexit) that 'ordinary folk' are pissed off with the establishment/elite. Things need to change 
Feels just like it did the night of Brexit, with added fucking scary 
The Daily Mail wrote a 'positive' story about Brexit. James O'Brien destroyed it in less than two minutes  
I called it for food price inflation in the UK a month ago (b/c sterling is crashing) and now it’s clearly happening. Thanks, Brexit! 
Only Correct Public Brexit Poll Predicts Trump Victory#Election2016 #VoteTrump #MAGA #DrainTheSwamp 
Associate Citizenship of the EU for those who voted to remain #Brexit #Ukip 
This election is more than a referendum on foreign policy and economics. It's an unusually profound question of American values & identity. 
.@sunflowerinrain @_gmh_ the post-referendum narrative of Brexit is that we’re chattels owned by the neo-fascist right; escape is forbidden. 
Why this election is a referendum on hate  
Gordon Brown: We need a Brexit deal that heals the north-south divide  
European associate citizenship: Here is my amendment proposal regarding EU citizenship for nationals of a former member state.#Brexit  
Donald Trump & Brexit @BabestationTV . Part Three. 
Democracy Institute, ONLY pollster to correctly guess Brexit, has Trump winning by 5.  Same as my prediction:   
Why are we subtitling the Welsh lady speaking English? Is this a Brexit thing?#secretlifeof4yearolds 
BREAKING NEWS:POLLS FROM SOUTHERN STATES ALEADY SUGGESTING A TRUMP LANDSLIDERT! RT!INDEPENDENCE  DAY, AMERICAS BREXIT 
European Parliament considers plan to let individual Brits opt-in to keep their EU citizenship. #Brexit  
So much Brexit shit is gonna get buried tomorrow. 
post brexit britain: marmite now costs £57 per jar, toblerones only consist of 3 triangles per bar and the NHS is still dying 
If #ElectionDay is like Brexit I fear the Americans won't understand the consequences until it messes with food like Toblerones or Marmite. 
This has to be the best idea in years. Go on #brexit I'm staying in Europe! Fantastic.  
Gordon Brown: We need a Brexit deal that heals the north-south divide  
Hell, yes. I've always been European and I've no intention of giving that up due to the likes of the #brexit fools.  
Dear America,Good luck on your IQ test today.Sincerely, Britain, who failed their IQ test with Brexit.#Election2016 
[internal dialogue] "He just can't win." "That's what you said about Brexit..." 
Good of Nigel Farage to warn us of the unrest in the streets he is concerned about/organising ahead of the Supreme Court-Brexit hearing. 
Where do I sign? #EU #Brexit  
Government given go-ahead to challenge Brexit ruling 
Question to Priti Patel, the Queen of lies:What should be the penalty 4 MPs caught deliberately lying about #Brexit outcomes?@patel4witham 
Since June 23rd NO ONE buys remain BS. #EU is clearly in trouble and UK economy holds well.We can #brexit safely! 
Leaving our #DontDoABrexit outside where @BorisJohnson lived and lied to us all during Brexit. Feels appropriate. #ElectionDay #GoVote 
It baffles me how black people can vote for Trump? But then I'm in disbelief that Asian immigrants voted for Brexit. 
I'm too afraid to go to sleep. The last time I slept through an election Brexit happened. Plse.  Whoever is out there. We can't Trump 
Dominic Raab: 'What you're allowing is die hard remainers to try and frustrate the referendum.' #ChangeBritain 
The day has come! It's time for America to have their Brexit moment and elected @realDonaldTrump Pod one  
In this weeks @Independent "Waah we must eat less sugary food to fight obesity""Waah Toblerones are too small now cos of Brexit" 
The Leave campaign could face prosecution for lying to you about Brexit  via @thecanarysays 
Hey America, don't make the same mistake we did with brexit. Your vote counts, use it. 
Please don't use that word tonight "@MMFlint: The "Brexit" states. It's up to you. #Hillary ” 
What the hell is a Brexit state?  
First positive idea I've seen come out of the #EU since the #Brexit vote. Might not fly, but a very encouraging start.  
'#Italy must obey!'#Juncker forgets #EU is a partership and not his doctatorship.#EU is sick.We must #Brexit! 
Vegas Oddsmaker Predicts Brexit-like Victory for Trump I highly recommend you read this...It's spot on 
Just one of the freedoms we will lose post-#Brexit says @DenisMacShane 
Cameron adviser:"Brexit vote *was* about Single Market. We spent months trying to hang that round Leave's neck"  
George Soros Admits #Brexit Marks the Start of his Globalist New World Order Crumbling  #Trump2016 #TrumpTrain #MAGA 
BREAKING NEWS Tim Farron lets TRUTH slip: There IS a secret plan to KEEP Britain in the EU  I DARE YOU TO TRY TRAITOR 
neither does it address sanitation issues,malnutrition, Brexit,American election and making of puttu. 
Florida wins the prize for the country's most egregiously misleading referendum:  
Asking the British public on their opinion on #ElectionDay ..mate we're still not even over #Harambe and #brexit  
Calm in the face of adversity, determination when presented w/ opportunity, magnaminity in victory. Brexit will be a magnificent revolution. 
The "Brexit" states. It's up to you. #Hillary 
So it's true, the #Toblerone gap is as fat as the lies spread by leave campaign..#TobleroneGate #brexit  
Day 2 of our cross-Parliament #Brexit campaign. A question a day, in both Parliaments, until we have clarity.  
Labour’s Irrelevance to Brexit Britain  
I want this. Yes please. Those 17 million-odd people didn't speak for me. I want to be part of the union. Not interested in being Brexit.  
ps at least Trump hasn't jacked up the price of crisps by 10% on some spurious Brexit excuse.  
#UK Surpreme Court ruling is the first of many hurdles in the road to #Brexit, said academic expert on politics  
please dont pull a brexit and vote for trump as a joke because you "think he wont win" 
No this is absolutely outrageous, I blame Brexit for fuck sake pic.twitter.com/RrLHsigB1z 
are the brexit related to the deplorables 
The idea that a government should take any of our rights away by executive fiat should be met with revulsion by every Briton#Remain #Brexit 
The UK's industrial production has fallen since the Brexit vote  
Good to meet with @DavidDavisMP to put forward London’s case on #Brexit & why we must have a voice in the negotiations. 
#JayneAdye of @GetBritainOut: how is this discrimination against Leavers!? Brexit discriminates against Remainers!  
Fascinating idea. Like having two Britains, one in the EU, one out. Call it Schrodinger's Brexit.  
4.5 months after opinion poll:#StillInEUA50 uninvokedHMG can't invokeHMG has no planSco, NI, Gibraltar resolutely against Brexit 
The people who would block #Brexit - their history of ignoring the people should speak volumes  
Press Statement on today's developments on our #Right2Water referendum bill. This is a win for people power.  
If you're young and registered to vote, please go out and vote today, this is exactly what happened w Brexit. I will buy you all chai lattes 
You already messed up your country through #brexit. Leave us along and #myob 
i made sure to say how beneficial brexit has been for me as an american bc the £ is so weak & she was like exactly! it's great! 
"I'm old enough to remember ramping into Brexit and opening the next day limit down."-17 yr old hedge fund managers@RampCapitalLLC $SPY 
Orban fails again to have Hungary shirk its EU obligations to asylum seekers--first by referendum, now in parliament  
We celebrate our only Brexit on 7/4   
Brexit boost as key REMAINER calls on Theresa May to 'get cracking' with Article 50  
This is brutal. Bloomberg's verdict on Mrs May's India trip. Perhaps Brexit reality starts to dawn.  
Love the yelps of outrage from the Brexit crew here  
The told us that there would be all this extra money to spend. The reality is it was all one big fat lie #Brexit  
It clearly says in Tory 2015 Manifesto they want to safeguard British interests inside Single Market #brexit  
Getting those worrying Brexit vibes.... hope I'm wrong but I think polling radically underestimates the mobilising power of unfocussed rage 
USA Be warned! #Merkel has completely destroyed Europe. Don't let #Hillary do the same to USA.Vote #TRUMP #DrainTheSwamp #Brexit  
"O little crowd of Brexit men, we still can see thee lie." #Article50Carols 
Brexit Bunglers Blame Everyone But Themselves For Their Mess  via @HuffPostUKPol 
Exactly the same with Brexit in the UK. Remainers compared Brexiters to Hitler. Brexit ended up winning...  
NIGEL FARAGE: “It Feels Like Brexit Day to Me” (VIDEO)  
Brexiters outraged because Britons might be given the option of escaping the #Brexit prison #Remain #Brexit #YesEU 
Mondelez, maker of Toblerone: "The changes have nothing to do with Brexit". Why let small things like facts get in way of a wee dig, Faisal?  
So want to go on the #brexit rally but so scared for my safety especially with London being pro-remain & how aggressive they're being online 
Excellent! But #Brexit'ers are outraged, seemingly because it 'discriminates' against them because they wouldn't want to use it!#Remain 
Um, we already made our grand Brexit, thanks.  
READ: The Prime Minister on why she will not allow the British people's vote for Brexit to be sabotaged:  
IF #Trump wins the race to be #POTUS it will be #Brexit X10#ElectionDay #USADecides #DonaldTrump #BrexiBritain #USElection2016 
Polish professionals in London are considering their future after feeling unwelcome following the Brexit vote  
I'm back in the pub I was in for 48 hrs without sleep when Brexit happened. And we know how well I kept it together then. Fingers crossed. 
All them Brexit jokes we had and we finna blow a 3-1 lead as a nation.  
Brexit may be final straw for some couples, say divorce lawyers  
Brexit was a joke that ended up being even less funny than a new Adam Sandler movie. 
dear america, we thought it would be a fun joke to vote brexit and now we all want to die. take this a bit seriously. sincerely, britain 
Daily Mail's BREXIT BONUS: people are going into work sick for fear of losing their jobs due to Brexit. WHAT A BONUS  
Hey @Toblerone - I've got a #logo tweak suggestion for you, Maybe will save on ink when printing the logo? #Toblerone #brexit #TobleroneGate 
NIGEL FARAGE: “It Feels Like Brexit Day to Me” (VIDEO)  via @gatewaypundit 
Theresa May already has a conviction for contempt of court so no surprise she's bungling Brexit. Don't blame judges. 
'EU WILL NOT SURVIVE’ – Juncker’s right-hand man admits DEFEAT after Brexit  
Why are Leave voters complaining? They don't want to be EU citizens! #Brexit #Ukip 
Brexit campaigners react with anger at proposals to let individual Brits choose to keep EU citizenship  
Pfizer denies Brexit link to two UK site closures   
New post | ‘Brexit in the High Court’ — today's Law in Action on @BBCRadio4 with @JoshuaRozenberg, @CSBarnard24 & me  
Another Brexit reality check: UK exports more to Belgium than India, Russia, Brazil, South Africa combined.  
And suddenly, no-one will admit they voted for Brexit. Form an orderly queue, please.. 
first the brexit, then marmite prices souring, now the tobelerone changing! what's next, walkers crisps get rid of cheese and onion  
.@theresa_may sticks to the "Brexit means Brexit" script, whether on the single market, or that £350m for the NHS  
"We are hoping for our own Brexit - to follow your example" Trump canvasser tells me at #Election2016 polling place in Stafford Virginia 
Yet Obama admin supports govt "dialogue" to delay recall referendum to next year. That's what Cuba wants 2.  
ok, post-brexit toberlone is a real thing  
Is the new #Toblerone design a metaphor for Brexit? One Vogue editor seems to think so:  
Brexit campaigners argue it would discriminate against Leave voters. Well that's just tough I'm afraid. Count me in.. 
"We three Brexit Ministers are"Wrecking British trade from afar"Nation sovereign, anti-foreign"Failing to find a star." #Article50Carols 
The Daily Mail wrote a 'positive' story about Brexit. James O'Brien destroyed it in less than two minutes   
Signed, Brexit + Ford Nation.  
Scotland will apply to Supreme Court to intervene against UK Government as it tries to overturn Brexit court ruling  
Calling himself "Mr. Brexit," Trump suggests he'll pull off a win that will shock the world. What do Britons think?  
Brexit is a boon for business, says Primark owner:  
The chances of Donald Trump winning are the exact same as they were for Brexit  
We can change Atlanta for decades to come. Vote YES on the transportation and Marta referendum. The most pressing issue of our time.  
When do I get to vote on the taco truck on every corner referendum? 
'Here is why I think that a post-Brexit world is an opportunity for the UK' @gerardgrech:  
NIGEL FARAGE: It Feels Like Brexit Day to Me (VIDEO)  via @gatewaypundit 
BREXIT STATESREXITSTATESMichael Moore was right.  
Is Brexit now just a general term for shitting your own bed?  
James O'Brien makes short work of this Daily Mail “good news” article about Brexit.  
Brexit Vs US Election Odds: Then And Now  
Part of my speech to Parliament:The choice facing the UK in a post-Brexit world - a race to the bottom,or the top on jobs,rights and skills?  
Scotland backs legal case against British government's plan to begin Brexit process without parliament's approval  
I oppose Nigel Farage & UKIP but in a democracy they have a right to march in protest against the Brexit judges. Defend the right to protest 
We have Cameron, Osborne, Gove + Johnson all on tape during referendum saying Vote Leave = vote to leave single market. They're categorical  
US elections are like Brexit in the sense that the buffoon driving the ruckus will soon be consigned to history. #Nigel #Donald 
After Toblerone, more shocks as Stonehenge suffers from Brexit effect.  
In England. Brits horrifyingly asking me how a President Trump is possible, but then I remind them of Brexit and they look at the floor. 
My cartoon - Justice Secretary Liz Truss, who isn’t a lawyer/expert, criticised for not giving proper support to under fire #Brexit judges  
Vegas Oddsmaker Predicts Brexit-like Victory for Trump - Breitbart  
On the night of the BREXIT result Nigel Farage thought he had lost.It was only when the first results came in we realised there was a BREXIT 
Vegas Oddsmaker Predicts Brexit-Like Win for Donald Trump  
Gosh today reminds me of Brexit.....and we all know how that went.  #ElectionDay 
Dangerous game from Sturgeon. If courts & UK Parliament can prevent Brexit they can equally prevent independence 
Dear Americans, the English economy is currently tanking after Brexit, a vote won by a 1% margin. Every vote counts.#VoteHillary pic.twitter.com/LzcHWHuejb 
Brexit Blackpool To Government: Get On With It!  
Brexit "uncertainty" means London's financial firms have stopped hiring, Adecco says  
Three months ago I was laughing at England for Brexit and...here we are. God bless America.  
BREXIT DEBACLE: Nicola Sturgeon, wades in saying Scottish Parliament must consent before Article 50 is triggered.   
Meanwhile, in the Brexit planning offices...  
Some people asking what I mean by 'don't fuck it up'. Well...Don't Brexit it.Don't Trump it.Don't do what we did.Don't fuck it up. 
Is another Brexit about to happen? UK bookie says Trump has the same odds:  
Lloyd's boss urges Theresa May to 'get cracking' with #Brexit! Quite rightly - what we waiting for! 
Public referendum is a bad idea. My hot dog will not be subject to the tyranny of the masses. (Unless the masses agree with me.)  
With all the cynicism & fear over #Election2016& Brexit, it's so, so refreshing for human rights & justice to beat racist bureaucracy.  
By George, #FiveGo straight to the top of the charts! Five On Brexit Island is No.1 and Five Go On A Strategy Away Day is at No.9 - Topping!  
My favourite thing to come out of this year is the fantastic irony of people liking Farage and voting for Brexit and hating Trump.  
Let's wait and see what happens tonight meanwhile huffington post hasn't got a clue how Brexit was won ! @owenjbennett 
UK bookmaker: Trump win has same odds as Brexit did  
UK courts have upheld the power of UK Parliament. #Brexit people, who wanted UK courts and UK Parliament to have power, object. The irony. 
I know folks that laughed, said Brexit wouldn't happen and didn't bother to vote. America, VOTE! 
Nicola Sturgeon on the Scottish Government's intervention in the Brexit Article 50 appeal.  
.@GerryAdamsSF very angsty in #Dáil when SF challenged on #Brexit vote in Westminster 
Donald Trump's Really Big Brexit Flip-Flop.  
More price hike warnings - poorest to be most affected by Brexit uncertainty  
Folks that voted for Brexit might laugh at us in HD by midnight. 
"nearly a quarter of Europeans feel no longer welcome in the UK & a fifth plan to leave within two years" #Brexit -  
Even though The Crown was commissioned and recorded *before* the Brexit vote? How does that work then?   
Congratulation @JoanCollinsTD on attaining sufficient support for her bill for Referendum on public ownership of water.  So important  
Be wary of promises candidates make coming up to election. UK was promised £350 million in NHS funding post Brexit. 12 hours to backpedal. 
The Crown is pointless pomp designed to help take our minds off our Brexit circumstances, says  @PennyRed 
Is another Brexit about to happen? UK bookie says Trump has the same odds:  
#USElections2016 is a referendum on Trumpism & hate.   vi 
Echoes of the BBC's performance on Brexit economics here in this critique of US media's inability to handle Trump:  
POLLS MEAN NOTHING. BREXIT DEFEATED THE POLLS. AMERICA IT IS NOW YOUR CHANCE TO BEAT THE MEDIA, THE CORRUPTION AND THE ESTABLISHMENT 
Government refuses to guarantee workers' rights after Brexit  
It's Finally #electionday  Time to #draintheswamp #Brexit USA #WakeUpAmerica#Trump Warriors PREPARE FOR GLORY 
Italy’s referendum threatens the latest emergency recapitalization of the world's oldest bank. By @jmackin2   
The English economy is currently tanking after Brexit, a vote won by a 1% margin. Don't see your candidate lose because you didn't vote. 
SEND THEM TO THE BIG HOUSE: This election is a referendum on thirty years of lies, theft & corruption by the #ClintonCrimeFamily 
I'll be speaking in this #Brexit Health debate today in @ScotParl about the importance of multicultural staff in our #NHS @theSNP 
Read 6/7 VG pieces on why Court Brexit ruling was wrong, but this fm @ProfMarkElliott is superb in clarity & cogency 
Seriously, vote. We have a national referendum against racism, misogyny, xenophobia and anti-intellectualism. That's a bargain for one vote 
If we get #trump in, I pledge as your American friend across the Atlantic to make sure you get the #brexit YOU ALL VOTED FOR! #maga #maga3x 
LIVE BLOG: Top UK bookmaker says Trump odds to win are the same as Brexit's  #FoxNews2016 #Election2016 
Scotland's government will join the Brexit challenge at the Supreme Court  
First Brexit, then Trump vs Clinton - now Toblerone increases the gap between triangles#WeAreAllScrewed#DailyMailImplodes 
Italy Referendum: Dec. 4Austria presidential election: Dec. 4Brexit appeal hearing: Dec. 5-8 
Today is the day, don't brexit up. 
Vegas Oddsmaker Predicts Brexit-Like Win for Donald Trump  
Don't miss @ProfMarkElliott & @CSBarnard24 talking 'Brexit in the High Court' on @JoshuaRozenberg's @BBCRadio4 Law in Action at 4pm today! 
First #Tolberone now Chocolate Orange to be renamed as Chocolate Satsuma in new #brexit resizing shock!  
BREAKING: Supreme Court to hear UK govt #Brexit appeal in December  
Date set for Government appeal against High Court's Brexit ruling  
UK industrial output falls in three months since Brexit vote  via @FT 
Woohoo Five On Brexit Island is NUMBER ONE!!!! Congratulations @bruno_vincent!!!! #FiveGo 
We staged our own #Brexit in 1775-83 to get away from idiots like you.  
Government appeal against ruling that MPs must approve start of Brexit to be heard in Supreme Court from 5 December  
Trump means TrumpClinton means ClintonBrexit means BrexitBeans means Heinz #PrimeMinister #Election2016 
Trump: US vote will be Brexit-plus-plus-plus. Trump compares his US vote to a supersized Brexit. #Election2016 
#BREAKING Supreme Court says to hear UK government Brexit appeal December 5-8 
All 11 Supreme Court justices will hear Brexit appeal, listed from 5th-8th December, after Lords Neuberger, Mance and Kerr gave permission. 
LIVE BLOG: UK's Nigel Farage hopes for 'Brexit day in the US'  #Election2016 #FoxNews2016 
Given that the USA:Isn't BritainIsn't in the EU Isn't having a referendum on membership of itNO  
Brexit: the government has been granted formal permission to appeal to the Supreme Court. Hearing confirmed for four days: 5 to 8 December. 
Article 50 #Brexit case: UKSC formally grants Government permission to appeal and lists case for hearing 5-8 Dec  
We did Brexit 240 years ago to get away from yobs like you.  
James O'Brien Takes Apart Daily Mail's "Brexit Bonus" @LBC 
.@ScotGov will intervene in the #Brexit court case to ensure the interests of Scotland are respected. Get the facts:  
July 4, 1776 was our Brexit day you insufferable twit.  
.@Nigel_Farage Dont think so. The American Brexit was in 1776. 
Thumb sized gaps in the #Toblerone. Next will be single finger KitKats and instead of Buttons they'll be called Pinheads. Blame Brexit. 
The Daily Mail wrote a 'positive' story about Brexit. James O'Brien destroyed it in less than two minutes  
The Brexit Toblerone sums up 2016: more troughs than peaks | Rebecca Nicholson  
It's the Monster Vote which won for Brexit and for Reagan. Both were down in polls. Pollsters can't gauge the Monster Vote.  Trump Wins.  
So @sajidjavid in fact attacked conduct of those challenging referendum in the courts as "unacceptable" not judges. Reasonable?  
Dear America,Good luck on your IQ test today.Sincerely, Britain, who failed their IQ test with Brexit.#Election2016 
On behalf of America, bite us.  RT @Nigel_Farage: Is this Brexit day in the US? I hope so. 
Just before the Brexit results were announced, I could’ve got 7× odds on the UK not leaving.Don’t trust polls or betting markets. Vote.  
We already had Brexit day. It was George Washington wot won it.  
Visa curbs will kill of courses, cut educational exports, reduce British influence & damage trade#Remain #Brexit 
#TunnelVision of the UK Gov's negotiating strategy = #Brexit Shambles. They seem to have forgotten that "you can't have ur cake and eat it"  
i mainly want hrc to win very badly today so i can be smug and condescending to our friends in the uk about this whole "brexit" thing still 
Nigel: Brexit in the US has already happened. On July 4th 1776.  
Keep it up NF, Brexit will soon be global shorthand for self-inflicted injury.  
For Deutsche Bank, This Is The "Brexit Panic" Signal In Today's Election  
Farage just tweeted he hopes today is Brexit Day for the US. Isn't that 4th July.Also, why won't he just go away? 
One useful side effect of the US election and the Brexit referendum is seeing which of your friends keep it classy and who can turn nasty. 
Chairman of Lloyd’s of London urges PM Theresa May to “get cracking” with Brexit for the sake of business certainty.  
I'm pretty sure Brexit Day in the U.S. was in Summer 1776. 
No, Brexit day was 4th of July 1776.  
Perfect metaphor for Brexit. Self-hating Brits voted for reduced living standards as way to punish minorities. LOL   
If we are going to get a referendum on our #Right2Water from my bill may I suggest a twofer and go for #RepealThe8th on the same day. 
Brexit is not a word so no. 
BREXIT ON STEROIDS AS TRUMP TAKES EARLY LEAD IN BLUE NH 
Is this Brexit day in the US? I hope so. 
BREAKING: Fianna Fáil is to support @JoanCollinsTD's referendum bill to hold a referendum on the public ownership of the water network 
What could possibly go wrong?#EU-Canada trade deal on rocks AGAIN as #Holland demands its own #referendum on #CETA 
Increased exchange rates we'll take. We'll even pay more for our iPhones. But don't you DARE mess with our chocolate #Brexit  #Toblerone 
Jacob Rees-Mogg praising a part of the British press which is relentlessly attacking the very foundations of our freedom & democracy#Brexit  
Juncker: 'No Brexit war...but..' Foxtrot Oscar Mr Juncker. See how you get on without a trade deal with the UK.  
Be fantastic scenes on here if Trump gets elected and this Brexit goes through. There'll be smacked arses & faux outrage for weeks. 
#Brexit genius picks up #ukip policy and runs with it, rather than letting Theresa May nick it and water it down   
While we're all distracted by Brexit and the US election, Foodbank use soars to its highest level in 12 years:   
At the border on the Dublin/Belfast road - first contraband shipment of proper #Toblerone already intercepted #Brexit  
Brexit means Brexit  
Brexit has been a political car crash. Can US avoid a similar outcome tonight? Make sure your seat belt is on while you watch the results  
Dear America. Learn from Brexit. Vote. Don't protest vote. Vote seriously and with honesty. Thank you. 
The Brexit Toblerone sums up 2016: more troughs than peaks | Rebecca Nicholson  
If General Election forced by legal crisis: 1. All Cons MP candidates should have to support Brexit 2. Lords Reform must be in manifesto 
The working class are the backbone of a country If you don't vote for change u will never get change 
The Daily Mail printed a “good news” article about Brexit. @mrjamesob takes just 90 seconds to shoot it down  
Theresa May says Britain's economy is strong, after warnings of a £25 billion hole  
BREXIT: Theresa May hails a 'world of opportunity' outside the EU as she visits factory in India funded by the EU. 
There's been a lot in the news these past few days about #Brexit. Here are 3 facts about what's happening...  
Ever-vigilant the unsleeping BBC News Dept. watches for signs that Brexit has bad consequences. Good consequences? Hey they're not in PR.  
Polish professionals consider their future after Brexit vote --> important piece by @JoshuaChaffin  cc: @AmberRudd_MP 
Show this chart to anyone who says Brexit is the 'will of the British people'  
Most eyes and ears on USA elections so the SNP release their (doomed to failure) brexit squirrel, what a bunch of megalomaniacs  
Germany is confident it can turn Berlin into the start-up capital of Europe after Brexit  
Nick Clegg is spot on: now 'it’s Parliament and the people versus the Brexit establishment' - 'a role reversal'. 
'Hard' Brexit could spell disaster for UK tourism  
Severe #Brexit side effects are already obvious! #europe #Toblerone #TobleroneGate 
Once again, David Davis has confirmed that there will be no second referendum. MPs must #RespectTheResult 
Scotland Says It Will Intervene in U.K. Government's Brexit Appeal  
.@ScotTories Brexit advisory group in Brussels to listen to voices across politics and industry @ConMEPs 
Yeah. The guy who couldn't even BREXIT Atlantc City without fucking over every working class person within arms reach. #Fixin 
We all know how this is going to go:1 Holyrood wants involved2 Westminster will say no3 Brexit proceeds as Westminster wants4 indyref2  
RETWEET If you agree that Politicians should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum and get on with it! 
N Ireland "UNPRECEDENTED step towards having a FAILED legal challenge to Brexit referred DIRECTLY to Supreme Court" 
#Election2016 has begun and echoes of @Brexit are in the air  
Blogged: the opportunity cost of Brexit  Why intelligent Tories should most regret Brexit 
If Britain wants to be an Atlantic Singapore it will have to be open to to free trade, to international capital -- and to immigrants#Brexit  
Trump said "call me Mr Brexit". I think that's because even if he wins, those who voted for him would be full of regret too. 
Without being part of a large trading block it seems our main bargaining tools are subsidising companies & handing out visas #Brexit 
Grievance monger Sturgeon continues to squander our money in attempts to bring down the government. #SNPGTF #Brexit 
Theresa May 'DOES have the mandate to carry out a hard Brexit' says former Cameron aide  
Easing immigration access to Indian students & professionals would bring money into Britain. But #Brexit Britain hates immigrants so... 
Hey America. Don't think Donald Trump can't win this election. We didn't think Brexit would win in the UK and it did, now look at us. 
It's worrying our Prime Minister has such a poor grasp of how many industries depend on migrants in the UK  #brexit 
If you, like me, are sick of the attacks on democracy, join the campaign to demand that the #Brexit vote is upheld:  
The government should come clean and put the basic terms of its Brexit plan to the Commons for scrutiny.  
Muddled May: To grow trade with India, UK must stop raising walls against Indian students & professionals #Brexit 
"Ireland Inc. has this message for May's government: When it comes to Brexit, you DON'T KNOW what you're doing" 
Nicola Sturgeon just launched an ambush that could derail Theresa May's Brexit plan  
Could the latest casualty of Brexit be Toblerone's famous chocolate triangles?  
A vote for Brexit was a vote for division. You have won a divided country Mrs May @theresa_may. Your actions serve only to deepen the divide 
Can we take Nicola Sturgeon to court for ignoring #IndyRef? It was a sold as a "once in a generation" referendum, not a series of them. 
Yes we forget Murdoch is the godfather of Brexit and Trump. Hard to think of one individual who has done more damage than him.  
This is what we need in the United Kingdom. A centrist party. #brexit  
Brexit should not be used as an excuse to continue cutting our vital services and push people further into poverty  
Scotland will intervene in Brexit case, Sturgeon says  
RETWEET: Politicians should get on with it! #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
Tories on Brexit: "Britain is open for business"What they really mean: "Britain is for sale"  
It’s Election Day! VOTE. MPS has a referendum renewal question on the ballot. Learn more:  
Important contribution from @labourlewis in Parliament yesterday on Brexit and employment rights, and the choice facing Brexit Britain  
This SKY headline is wrong, #SNP, **not** Scotland, will apply to Supreme Court to overturn Brexit court ruling  
And that 'My vote doesn't matter so whatever' talk is how Brexit happened. Don't let anyone tell you your voice doesn't matter. 
Scottish & Welsh Governments both planning to challenge Tories in court over chaotic Brexit process. Uncharted territory for UK constitution 
BREAKING: Theresa May to stop freedom of movement for Scots into England unless they stop interfering with Brexit. 
The British people now want politicians to end the uncertainty and get on with securing the best Brexit deal for Britain #ChangeBritain 
BREAKING: @scotgov to seek to intervene against the UK government's appeal over the triggering of #Brexit Article 50  
Don't blame #Toblerone. #Brexit made imported foods (ie chocolate) 18% more expensiveWe warned you. You said it was a lie. It wasn't. 
Scotland's top law officer is applying to the Supreme Court to try to stop the UK Government appealing against the #Brexit court ruling  
Sturgeon says Lord Advocate will apply to intervene in Brexit court case. This will likely annoy the living hell out of unionist Brexiters. 
"The democratic wishes of the people of Scotland and the national Parliament of Scotland cannot be brushed aside" -  @ScotGovFM #brexit 
So..things just got a bit stickier for HMG over Brexit - as Scot Parliament seeks a vote on Article 50 
Brexit Bunglers Blame Everyone But Themselves For Their Mess -  Politics 
Breaking: Scottish Government will seek to join Supreme Court case on triggering Brexit Article 50 to defend Scottish interests. 
wtf has happened to Toblerone, no longer resembles the beautiful Swiss mountains at all, I blame #brexit   
Scot Gov confirm they will join legal action over triggering of Article 50 #brexit 
Our #GDT report explains how the #USElection #Brexit & European elections in 2017 impacted gold demand last quarter:  
Theresa May tears into Remoaners and tells those who didn’t want Brexit to stop fighting the EU campaign  
We rich, fatuous, entitled London fuckers whine about Brexit, but this is where it'll actually hurt: Brexittania.  
A letter in today's Edinburgh Evening News: Nicola misrepresents EU referendum vote  
USA, take it from a post-Brexit Brit. You need to pause, take a breath, and have a dispassionate look at your choices. 
No matter what polls say, remember Reagan was 30 points behind & won!Brexit had a 20% chance,they won!Get out & Vote Trump! #ElectionDay 
Politics: "We've just got to lick UK & EU's holes & hope for the best" - Taoiseach reveals Brexit strategy 
Clinton on Corbyn but could have been on Farage.Sad the Coalition and Tories did so little. Tragic Brexit removes the ability to do more.  
He was right about #brexit and has now made his Election2016 prediction. Meet Boots, the psychic Scottish goat.  
Ms Sturgeon says this is "not an attempt to veto" Brexit process; but Theresa May "needs to listen to the will of the people of Scotland" 
The cost of #brexit keeps rising:  
Nicola Sturgeon confirms Lord Advocate will apply to intervene in Brexit court case. Holyrood should then have say.  
FM @NicolaSturgeon confirms the Scottish Government WILL intervene in the Article 50 legal case #Brexit @LBC 
.@NicolaSturgeon says @Nissan appears to have more insight into @theresa_may #Brexit thinking than govts of Scotland, Wales, NI 
Oh god. Look what Brexit has done to Polos :(  
SHAME OF THE NATION: Fury as unpatriotic remoaner Nick Clegg claims some people want to stay in the UK despite near 110% support for Brexit. 
PM also blanked me on the 350m going to the NHS or whether any money would be going to the NHS as a result of Brexit. 
On Law in Action, R4, at 4pm, Brexit for beginners with @CSBarnard24 and @ProfMarkElliott, recorded at @TrinCollCam. 
It's true, once 2016 ends, David Bowie comes back to life, Brexit ends, and Lula and Obama are both president again, Brazil is back to boom 
losing Brexit case when she cld have gone to Commons in 1st place & got A50 authorisation. Quite a list for someone who just entered No10. 
Meeting with Oni Banurji the owner of the Roz Ana in Kingston. Discussing Brexit and how it risks damaging the curry industry  
Angry mob to replace rule of law in Brexit Britain if Leave campaign has its way.  
UK search interest in @Toblerone #Toblerone has surpassed UK search interest in #Brexit today:  
By tolerating perpetual Brexit briefings she looks weak. That sense confirmed by Heathrow free vote, allowing Goldsmith to stand unopposed. 
Berlin claims first post-Brexit successes: five small start-ups relocate from London.  
If the referendum had been a general election, the Leave Party would have a majority of 166 seats #RespectTheResult 
#brexit #trump and now this. World is fooked . 
For those asking questions about UK tech post-Brexit - pls watch the world's smartest Internet investor in last 25 years make their move  
Listen to #tech reporter @katerussell discuss why creativity is important to the UK #Brexit @techdigital_CE #EnglandisCreative 
Brexit trade successvia @TheCanaryOTPTheresa May secures free hotel towels during Indian trade visit 
If we want to leave EU, we'd need a specific referendum w single market option, implemented to a realistic timetable w economic safeguards. 
I keep thinking back to the pricks who insisted to me all through the referendum that the world would be queuing up to strike FTAs   
Worrying briefing from @RussellGroup on #Brexit impact on UK universities including @UniofExeter. Already losing staff, students & funding. 
Thomas Zink, IDC Financial Insights, gives an insight to European #banking strategies following #Brexit  
If you're gonna complain about rising food prices, please make clear which way you voted in the referendum, so I know whether to laugh 
Morning, America! Hey, did you know, on the morning of the Brexit vote many people took it as read that Remain would win & so didn't vote... 
Our #PwC people are human beings first not just employees. Acknowledge uncertainty, be honest & give people a voice @LauraHintonPwC #brexit  
Your Toblerone Brexit jokes are not funny since Toblerone is Swiss, and Switzerland are not in the EU. Thanks for your time 
May plays down IFS Brexit warnings, saying 'fundamentals of economy are very strong' - Politics live  
ALRIGHT AMERICA, LETS NOT PULL A BREXIT TODAY 
but if you were to vote in that referendum, what would your vote be?Yun lang naman ang tanong. Share mo lang diba 
Delicious. Hannah Black (@nanpansky) on Brexit, racism, and the fantasy of white working class ignorance <3  
So, Brexit is going to cost us £480m a week in terms of our national borrowing. Put that on a bus and smoke it.  
SHOCKER! In response to a BBC leading question, spokeswoman for Toblerone makers Mondelez "This change wasn't done as a result of Brexit." 
Leicester won PL, UK voted brexit, Portugal won euros, Cops killing on camera and winning the case and you lot think trump can't win? LOL 
I'm so excited today! Its the World Idiocy championship final. The UKs ahead with a Brexit, but America has a Trump Card...#Election2016 
Keep thinking "Trump won't win, he just CAN'T." Then remember I thought that about Brexit and need a stiff drink. #Election2016 
Theresa May says Brexit opens up a whole world of possibilities. Yes like doing more trade with tyrannies and falling into greater debt 
Rumours circulating that Double Deckers may become Single Deckers after Article 50. #Brexit  
How's that Brexit going then? We've done a new Private Eye. On sale everywhere tomorrow!  
Brexit wasn't a problem... until nowRIP #Toblerone 
Man in front of me at Starbucks just ordered a 'dirty Early Grey'. Tea w shot of coffee in it. First Brexit, then ? Trump. Now this. Lordy. 
UK Govt to Appeal Brexit Ruling within Days  
Incredible, so much for the myth that the Tories are the guardian's of the British constitution and "common-sense" #brexit  
I blame brexit for ruining the toblerone 
Move on and accept Brexit, Theresa May tells embattled Remainers   
Without the votes of racists and xenophobes #Leave would have lost.Why are we allowing such bigots to control our destiny?#Remain #Brexit 
Referendum on Toblerone imminent. 
Woke up at 4:30 with dread as I realized today is the day. But soon I will vote. A referendum on my country. For now, we still have a say. 
ICYMI: cross party MPs call on the Government to present a plan for #Brexit negotiation before they triggering Article 50  
Dear America,We're proud of Brexit! The way u vote is none of our business-but we're thinking of you!Your British friends #ElectionDay  
Brexit means shrinking economyBrexit means less tax paidBrexit means cuts in public servicesBrexit means etc. 
I Tweeted it at the time as evidence many Leavers saw referendum as merely one battle in a long war. Double standard  
British tweeters, don't forget to tell the Americans how to vote. They'll value the opinions from a nation that voted for Brexit. 
This Toblerone reshape will be the spark that ignites the rewolution. #EnoughIsEnough #NothingIsSacred #Brexit 
A 41% increase in racist hate crime post-Brexit but it's overpriced (and rank) Christmas chocolate pushing the British public over the edge. 
IFS says Brexit means austerity likely to continue into next decade - Politics live  
After a year that brought us Brexit & #Election2016, what can we expect of the future? @OwenJones84 predicts all:  
Mayor of Lisbon just gave a panicked and impassioned speech about diversity, Brexit and the US election at #WebSummit forum 
UK... What have you done??? #Brexit #Toblerone 
Just proves that EU membership doesn't hinder UK's trade outside EU. Quite the contrary. #brexit #brexitshambles 
Kids: We'd like to live on a planet where everyone gets along with everyone as best they can.Parents: Too bad. Here's Trump and Brexit. 
On Uber, Brexit, Stiglitz and Postcapitalism - Italian subtitles -  
Remember how on the day of brexit no one thought it would happen? Get the fuck out and VOTE because Trump supporters will be. #ImWithHer 
@RealVisionTV will soon release my in-depth interview w Prof Onida frmr Head of The Constitutional Court in Italy on the upcoming Referendum  
Donald Trump says the US presidential election will be "Brexit, plus, plus, plus"  
Brexit person on FB saying that the Toblerone news is "not linked to Brexit, it's the bad exchange rate".This is what we are dealing with. 
Million Judge March to descend on home of Nigel Farage  #Brexit #Ukip #Euref 
It would be utterly irresponsible to initiate the #Article50 process without being certain whether it is revocable.#Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
CPS fails to investigate honour killings but interferes in Referendum; what of Remain Lies?  
Theresa May’s India trip reveals much about who will matter in post-Brexit Britain | Priyamvada Gopal  
#Toblerone bars are shrinking and people are really, really upset  pic.twitter.com/OLSW1hbdY2 
Before triggering #Article50 or even debating it in parliament it is absolutely necessary to determine whether Art50 is revocable#Brexit. 
BREAKING - Theresa May urges unemployed to make most of post-Brexit opportunities by filling gaps in #Toblerone. More soon ...#eatthepoor 
Toblerone capitalise on #Brexit exchange rates by bringing out the 'mountain finish' #TdF special edition. 
Parliament gave our people the right to vote in a referendum. Nothing understood by the people gives the high court the right to interfere. 
.@AtomSiraullo referendum has been my stand for many years. Hasn't changed thru 3 presidents/administrations 
My head tells me Hillary will win. But post-Brexit, my nerves are at maximum jitter levels #Election2016 
First Orbán fails to convince voters with his anti-refugee referendum. Now he's failed in parliament too. Time to give up on hate, Viktor.  
If #Brexit can do this to our humble #Toblerone IMAGINE what Trump will do to the U.S. Make the right choice America! #Election2016 
Brexit latest @john3ners @WomenDefyUKIP @SLATUKIP 
Brexit-Trump-Le Pen: The three pronged challenge to enlightenment values. 
The detoxification of Trump/Brexit ideologies re race, immigration and even gender via economic analysis has been staggering. 
So sad what #Brexit did to our #Toblerone, now looks like a bicycle stand.#WeWantOurTobleroneBack. #BringBackOurToblerone @Toblerone 
Judges entitled to rule v government on Brexit but poor government case meant they got it wrong. My Times col (£)  
People are boycotting Walkers crisps after Brexit price rise  
Stay sane, America. Don't go all Brexit on the world. 
You've been asked, folks, by our good friends in the UK who recently totally f'd up #Brexit.Don't vote for the fascist racist orange dude.  
Britain's pro-Brexit fishing industry now feels 'betrayed' by Brexit proposals  
Toblerone swears this perfect metaphor for Brexit has nothing to do with Brexit  
With Trump y'all thinking 'people can't be so stupid to vote for him' yet here over half of the population voted for Brexit 
(As a European with friends that said 'I won't vote in the UK/EU referendum, it'll be fine) 
First Brexit, now this #Toblerone 
Oh come on >>>@faisalislam Mars Bars have been shrinking ...AND going up in price for decades...Is that the fault of #Brexit ?Pfft 
Whether US likes or not Brexit is the future model. Globalisation has fatigued. Zero interest points to the euthenasia of the rentier.  
Just imagine if Brexit turns out to be the solution to the obesity crisis.  
Just when we'd all moved on from Marmitegate, now there's big news about #Toblerone: 
Aye, you flex your Brexit muscle, pal..by not buying a bar of chocolate.  
Brexit mob can't have their choc and eat it  
... 4/5 Toblerone 28% Cocoa - cocoa prices reached 39y high of £2500/ton nine (in £ - not other currencies) after post referendum £ slide  
Post-Brexit  
Very nice to meet @thatginamiller and discuss all things Brexit for @BritishGQ Facebook page 
On @BBCRadio4 Law in Action today at 4pm, @CSBarnard24 and I will discuss 'Brexit: What Next?' with @JoshuaRozenberg  
Toblerone cut its 170g bars to 150g and its 400g bars to 360g only in UK after post Brexit £ slide forced up costs  
2016 summed up:1st quarter, everyone dies2nd quarter, Brexit3rd quarter, they take away our baking show4th quarter, #Toblerone shrinks 
Remember. 10% less #Toblerone per bar is an 11.1% price rise. #Brexit  
If Trump loses, Brexit will have been the high-water mark of this nativist retreat. If he wins, it was just a prologue. 
Brexit is ruining everything  
“ . a foretaste of the way big business will deal with the government in Brexit Britain. First the threat, then . .”  
Toblerone bars are now full of *air*thanks to a weak £ and #Brexit 
But on the bright side this new post-Brexit #Toblerone can be used to stop high speed chases on Brit Cops. 
£25bn Brexit black hole no excuse to extend austerity, says McDonnell  
A vote for Sarah Olney and the Liberal Democrats, is a vote against hard Brexit @sarahjolney1 @NicolaHorlick 
Brexit just got real. Via @markcjgreenwood #toblerone 
This is the most convincing before/after argument against Brexit ever  
America, don't make the same mistake Britain did with 28% not voting & complaining about #Brexit after! Make your vote count  #Election2016 
Kate Hoey: Labour Faces Electoral Suicide If It Doesn’t Accept Brexit  
Italy’s referendum threatens the latest emergency recapitalization of the world's oldest bank. By @jmackin2   
The most depressing aspect of 2016 was the normalisation of racist rhetoric here in the UK and in the USA. What now? #Election2016 #brexit 
This bullshit right here is a symptom of and a metaphor for Brexit. pic.twitter.com/egJPtC5jM4 
For a thoughtful, reasoned analysis contending that the Brexit ruling was wrong, see this by @MelanieLatest (£) 
On Eurostar heading back for 2nd meeting of #Brexit Select Committee fortified by goodwill & support in Brussels for #ScotlandInEurope 
The fight for Brexit is a fight for democracy  
Govt refuses to guarantee workers' rights after Brexit - as many #ukemplaw experts have been saying since #EUref.  
Brexit vs US electionpound vs Dow Jones  
Ah - Theresa May says 'I'm a representative not a delegate' & won't vote in accordance with her constituents' Remain majority on #Brexit!  
Great Private Eye cover - Brexit Latest  
Hey, America. It's us, post-Brexit Britain. This is like the worst hangover ever, and it won't go away. Don't be like us. Don't fuck this up 
1/2 Just putting this out there; I reckon right time for demo on Brexit will be if/when MPs mess with it, not at start of Supreme Court case 
Brexit ruining our Toblerones now  
Within 24 hours the UK will know if it  retains the title of 'most stupid country 2016' or not....#Brexit #USElections2016 
Leave.EU making a clear threat to intimidate the Supreme Court. Surely this is a matter for criminal prosecution. #Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
Bloody Brexit look what's it's done to Toblerone #brexit #toblerone #outrage 
#Cambridge MP committed to keeping UK access to #EU medicine access schemes. That's one more voice against #Brexit madness. @Scientists4EU 
This piece by me on judges and Brexit is bloody well written and good  
The Brexit vote was, to my mind, just one manifestation of the expected resistance to market fundamentalism - by me 
Can we just change the UK passport colour to blue, and tell the morons we've exited? They don't fact check anything anyway... #brexit 
Government refuses to guarantee workers' rights after Brexit  
The Brexit visual aid that speaks more eloquently than a thousand words  
Theresa May's government doesn't have a clue about a Brexit strategy, Irish executives say  
Seems strange that you were happy for parliament to delegate its sovereignty to Brussels but not to the people in a referendum  
This is an interesting move re the rights of us real European citizens should #Brexit succeed in depriving us of our valuable Treaty rights  
Excellent post on parliamentary control of Brexit talks by Jeff King via @ukclaExplains why prior control essential  
#toblerone #brexit I told you that leaving the EU would have serious consequences. Now I' m really upset.  
First Brexit & Now ThisToblerone triangle change upsets fans  
52% voted for Brexit. They didn't vote for Brexit "regardless" or "at any cost". Just like 48% didn't vote for EU "forever regardless" /8 
How #ElectionDay result may shape British politics - plus the rest of Tuesday's Brexit news  
William Hague advises @theresa_may to start preparing for early general election as Plan B if Parliament ties her Brexit hands. @Telegraph 
When @realDonaldTrump says there's going to be another #brexit he means he's planning to encourage a sense of entitlement in angry white men 
Has anyone compared the cost and broadcast hours by the #BBC between US election and the referendum? Which will have a longer effect on UK? 
Brexit secretary's own advisor says Brexit is a 'dead weight' that carries a 'permanent cost' of 1.2% UK GDP  
Why might the Party of Brexit and super-rich not want low rates of corporation tax to determine tax haven status?  
Patrick O’Flynn MEP: I fear we’ll be stuck with an atmosphere of distrust until the day that Brexit finally happens  
As the Autumn Statement approaches, Hammond faces £25bn Brexit fallout according to @TheIFS  My Economics Blog 
Dear Leave.EU, you seem to have gotten democracy confused with mob rule.  #Brexit #LeaveEU 
May's India trip shows the ultimate failure of the Brexit project  via @politics_co_uk 
Labour shadow Brexit secretary Keir Starmer pockets £125,000 from law firm derailing Britain’s EU exit.  
Philip Hammond faces £25 billion hole in public finances after Brexit vote, @TheIFS says  
#destructivebrexit Those MPs who fear Brexit should refuse to vote for it | Hugh Muir  
Brexit, if enacted, would undo the life's work of one of the judges who gave the Article 50 ruling. That is an uneasy position. 
Lack of growth after #Brexit could cost the UK economy £25bn, the Institute for Fiscal Studies says  
Prosecutors examine claim the Brexit campaign was so misleading it broke the law  
I feel this argument was missing from the Referendum campaign  
Dear my American friends - learn from your cousins over the pond. Brexit happened to us - if you don't want President Trump get out and vote 
Ongoing economic uncertainty, such as the #USElection & #Brexit, led to a 44% YOY climb in investment demand. #GDT  
brexit is ruthless  
The govt should come clean & answer basic questions about its Brexit approach: PM trying to avoid scrutiny at moment  
In Brexit Britain there will be no benefit caps for the multinationals. My col  
The same people that put money on the Brexit outcome are also betting on Trump to emerge as the new U.S. president:  
“PM must give cast-iron guarantee workers' rights will be protected during #Brexit negotiations.” says @Tim_Roache 
IFS warnings serious.  Will the poorest have to pay the price for Brexit? Or will the warnings be dismissed in anger against "experts"? 
Farage fought for Brexit & led us to victory.We're never going to let undemocratic remainers overrule us in the corrupt courts & Parliament  
Brexit: The Slimmers Friend...#toblerone #weightwatchers 
Ministers consider 'fast-tracking' Brexit approval through parliament. Just DO IT!  
Please don't sit out the election! And if you're considering a protest vote...just use Brexit as a cautionary tale against protest votes.  
Don't Brexit me, bro. 
Banks, brokers gird for Brexit-style tumult following Tuesday's election  by @ozoran and @sumeet_chat #Election2016 
Westfield ranked #1 small city mainly due to schools. Please support our referendum to fund the schools! #VoteYes!!! 
Anyone know if Willie met on another airplane with Lynch?  Wouldn't surprise me. Brexit her Butt. #tcot #ccot #gop #maga pic.twitter.com/L3gonK3JWH 
 The horse feathers of brexit negotiations. India demands "free movement" of it's workers. Hilarious. 
"I did not see it as possible" *now*. But if Brexit tanks the economy?  
The problem with democracy is... 'Stupid People Vote' #Trump #Brexit #BoatyMcBoatface 
Post-Brexit Britain feels divided. Investors don't like divided countries. Britons, beware  via @BV 
In Brexit Britain there will be no benefit caps for the multinationals | Aditya Chakrabortty  
The same Brits who were angered by Americans giving them advice on #Brexit are now happily and emphatically telling Americans how to vote 
This election is a referendum on hate.  
A bunch of twatting British left wing champagne socialists threatened to do the same if we voted for Brexit, they never keep their word.  
.@realDonaldTrump is using @Nigel_Farage's #Brexit tactics and they might just help him win #USElection2016 
Nicola Sturgeon loses £10BILLION trade deal with China dubbed ‘Scottish shambles’  
UK public finances to be '£25bn worse off' by 2020. good stuff this Brexit.  
National debt now a staggering 83% of GDP, inflation rising, £ falling. Perfect time to gamble all on Brexit. Not.  
Notice most of those who are supporting Hillary Clinton are young people who has no real life experience Brainwashed by the Establishment 
Theresa May turns to cricket to win Indian support in Brexit standoff  
From Brexit to Hexit 
Keep remembering the night of Brexit and the slow slide from hope to horror. Wishing you my best America.  You can do this!  
Theresa May 'DOES have the mandate to carry out a hard Brexit' says former Cameron aide  
Ryanair has taken a hit from Brexit. Yet its good results have taken investors and analysts by surprise  
I'm British and I can tell you, we don't need either. Brexit crashed the economy & normalized hate. 
"If you want Hillary to do her exit, you got to go out and vote your Brexit."--Diamond 
Brexit was a working class retaliation. You ignore people 4 too long & they will eventually rise up!USA is Next! #ElectionFinalThoughts 
Brexit happened because people thought their vote didn't matter, please don't take orange hitler for granted, he can still win if u let him 
But how do Tom Brady and Bill Belichick feel about Brexit? 
.@JohnKingCNN: Technical analysts say polls do not indicate a “Brexit situation”  
Will this election be an #AmericanBrexit? #ImVotingBecause #MAGAX3 #BenGarrison #cartoons at  #brexit  
That is how Brexit happened. People did not vote and many who did get caught up in the popular movement, regreted voting to leave.  
Vote Trump Vote Trump November 8 Remember #Brexit the media said Impossible But Brexit Won so will #Trump 
@happykt It's shitty, since they still take your taxes.  And you can't even vote against Brexit! 
Need to introduce the Swiss Stupider Man to #WWEGlasgow traditional treats... Buckfast, deep fried Mars bars, & Brexit shame... #RAW #Shame 
The embarrassment that is Brexit happened. The monumental fuck up that is President Trump could happen too. This Brit, urges you to vote! 
I remember the Americans on the TL the night of Brexit and how much they took the piss. We should do the same uno 
USD/JPY Looks ‘Eerily’ Like It Did Before Brexit Vote: Nomura 
America is about to have a referendum on its soul. My story on today and tomorrow:  
AMERICA PLEASE DO THE RIGHT THING DONT SIT BACK & THINK THAT OTHERS WILL DO THE RIGHT THING PLEASE GO OUT & VOTE DONT LET THIS BE OUR BREXIT 
This election is a referendum on hate  
Credit Suisse upgrdes Tata Motors to Outperfrm,raises targt to 720 vs 510 earlier,15% post brexit pound depr to cause 50% rise in EBITDA/car 
Pluralism is on referendum tomorrow. Don't stay silent...go vote! #ImWitHer 
Enjoy your voting tomorrow US people. Vote wisely and don't end up on Wednesday morning with a Brexit-style hangover. 
Americans should make sure they vote ... don't make the same mistakes some Brits did when they thought Brexit was a joke & didn't vote  
@OrganicRanchers Many of us Brits are with you good Trump supporters. We also worked hard against the lying elite for our Brexit. Go for it. 
Is The App That Pumped Up Brexit Actually Trump’s Secret Weapon?  
The HuffPost Pollster average of Brexit was 45.8 remain, 45.3 Leave. The polls were inconclusive  
MSM hate TRUMP but all their wishful thinking wont affect the outcome we saw this ref BREXIT 
If HRC the Scumhag is doing so well, why is she traveling in states that Barry won twice??? Brexit her Butt. #tcot #ccot #gop #maga pic.twitter.com/NYNmG9hbDJ 
EU Referendum: basically flawed, carelessly designed, badly executed as no real plan + 'the will of the people' is a farcical, divisive sham  
Wayne Allyn Root - Trump Will Win With Brexit-Like Surprise  #Election2016 #Michigan #Ohio #Pennsylvania #Wisconsin 
7 USC §7485(e)(2) makes it a federal crime for a member of the US Popcorn Board to reveal how someone voted in a popcorn referendum. 
Tomorrow is a referendum on intelligence. I wish it weren't, but it is. Vote smart... I trust you. #NeverEverEverTrump 
Brexit means Brexit means ignoring new information and ploughing on regardless  
UK's housing sector expected to weather the storm of Brexit process   
Polls, bookies, markets all told us on voting day that Remain had won. Brexit won. Don't be complacent US. Vote. Make sure your friends vote 
Trump has compared the election to Brexit, and he's right - he's constantly lied to win and if people vote for him they'll likely regret it. 
Going to take decades. But one day the country will come to its senses. Sensible politicians and citizens will clean up the #Brexit mess 
Trump pledges jobs, security; Clinton panders in final push. Brexit her Butt. Vote DJT. #tcot #ccot #gop #maga  
Contractors detail how HRC and her team ignored security rules. Brexit the pathetic Skank. #tcot #ccot #gop #maga 
if any good can come from brexit then pls let it be americans realising that their vote DOES matter so please for the love of god use it 
David Attenborough on Planet Earth II, Brexit and the future of humanity  
What a surprise @EmilyThornberry voted in favour of the EU Referendum Bill 2015 which passed mandate to people to decide! #TheAgenda 
Farage organising a 'march for Brexit'  Too much of this, short term memory wrecked..  
Reports that Theresa May's government advised they will likely lose Article 50 case in Supreme Court driving rush to legislate Brexit. 
“Carbon tax is theft!” Alberta Wide Rally in #Calgary, demanding referendum @ilikerox —  | #ABleg #yyc 
6) 2016 is a referendum on the status quo: Obamacare, trade deals that gut the middle class, high taxes, etc.The status quo isn't working.  
Trump is using Farage's Brexit tactics and they might just get him into the White House  
Brexit was behind 10 points on the exit polls. Everybody remember that. 
Here is a simple illustration of @theresa_may's #Brexit plan.  
Returning Brexit - it doesn't work as advertised.What an utterly brilliant video!  
If Brexiteers were mis-sold PPI, did they blame those who sold it, or the media & legal folk that pointed it out? Same issue with Brexit. 
In assessing corporate "winners & losers" from #Brexit ,here's the @FT on sectorial impact of #Sterling depreciation 
Response in the Lords from @nickbaines to today's Government statement on #Brexit  
Dear Murica: Please don't pull a brexit.Thanks, World. 
i genuinely think trump is gonna get it, can't trust democracy since brexit and honey g smh 
I support a referendum to prevent privatisation of our water system. Will you join me? #CBlive #vinb  via @UpliftIRL 
Please vote tomorrow!!! I know people who said 'I didn't think my vote would matter' or 'I didn't think we'd ACTUALLY leave' about Brexit  
PLEASE don't assume #Hillary victory is guaranteed...we made that mistake with Brexit. Go out and TAKE IT! #nevertrump 
A top judge warns that reversing the court ruling on Brexit would be seen as a victory for demonstrators.  
#ImVotingBecause my emergency backup country voted for Brexit 
This is bad ass. Americans sick of a politically corrupt system, about to be heard in a world wide reaching way. Brexit on steroids!  
For clarity, here are the full details of Labour's Brexit strategy.  
The world is watching: Few are taking #ElectionDay for granted following Brexit  | Getty 
'May could not call an election about Brexit without being more specific about what she thinks Brexit should mean' & Tory divisions exposed  
#Brexit is no longer the property of the people. It’s been handed over to a political class largely hostile to it.  
We keep on being told we must respect the decision of the nation on Brexit. I will, and my priority will always be my nation of Scotland. 
Honestly think Trump is gonna win. Like Brexit leavers, the trump voters will have been quiet in polling due to stigma, very interesting. 
I wonder how much power the "I wonder what will happen if we do it" vote will have. Pretty sure it gave a significant push to brexit. 
We were asked if we wanted to leave the EU, we weren't asked if  we wanted to ask parliament if they wanted to leave the EU #brexit 
Come on USA don't vote for haters & the angry...the Farages and TrumpsYou need to UnClog the Crap in the 'Western' U-bend after Brexit  
The only bit about Brexit I am happy about is Britain no longer stopping Europe's push for tax transparency.  
Government refuses to guarantee workers' rights after Brexit  
Just a reminder that the final #Brexit polls showed a 10 point advantage to the Remain vote.#ElectionFinalThoughts 
Something Nigel Farage said about Brexit in May is coming back to haunt him - again  
Of all the things this Gov't is getting wrong with its narrow minded Brexit closing down our trade in international students is the worst. 
Something quite chilling about reading Eve of Brexit tweets.  
.Be of good cheer #Patriots! We are on the eve of our #Brexit moment. #MAGA #ElectionFinalThoughts #Election2016  
Some idiots actually voted for Brexit as "a laugh" because they thought it couldn't possibly happen, don't play yourself Americans. 
ppl who aren't gonna vote tomorrow bc theyre certain hillary will win:like, did u fuckin sleep thru brexit or what 
Every time I slip into "Nah, Hilary's got this", I remember Brexit, and l immediately sit up straight. 
Deutschland! The #wikileaks show how #Hillary is sneering at your ignorance. Because #Merkel is DESTROYING you, with eyes wide open!#Brexit  
What chance does UK Govt have to get a good deal from the EU27 countries when they can't even make a convincing case for Brexit at home?  
The People Have Spoken? We Don't Give A Damn - The David Icke Videocast  #Brexit 
'The customer is always right' is no way to run a country. The mob's endorsement has not suddenly made Brexit a good idea and MPs know it. 
Former attorney general Dominic Grieve hits out at government’s response to Brexit criticism of judges  
You have a warped understanding of what democracy means when you sanction Brexit on the whim of 17million over the rest of us. #shameful 
Jacob Rees-Mogg defends the press over Brexit ruling  
Trump is using Farage's Brexit tactics and they might just get him into the White House  
SNP MP votes against #Brexit sends a powerful signal to #EU negotiator @GuyVerhofstadt that Scotland voted remain, and means to stay in EU. 
Tuesday's Daily Telegraph:'It's gonna be Brexit plus plus plus' CPS 'afraid to tackle honour crimes'#tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Jacob Rees-Mogg praises 'magnificent' press after row over High Court's Brexit judgment  
We are on opposite sides on Brexit but @michaelgove is right on judiciary and free press 
This is why I can't accept the referendum result. As I wrote at the time, the Leave campaign was a slew of lies: 
Excellent piece by @IanDunt "May's India trip shows the ultimate failure of the Brexit project"  
Donald Trump says the presidential election will be "Brexit Plus Plus Plus"  
NIGEL FARAGE: Brexit has been HIJACKED and now only Ukip can save us  
I wrote this before UK's referendum to explain why doubters should vote Remain. It's also why you should vote Clinton #ElectionFinalThoughts 
What no Remainer will publicly say: they want a second referendum because they hope their Brexit fearmongering has beaten down the populace.  
Will the government be getting prosecuted for its Brexit booklet & #projectfear  
Farage to lead 100,000-strong march on Supreme Court on day of historic Brexit court hearing  via @telegraphnews 
17 silks from @1CrownOfficeRow tell @trussliz they are "dismayed" by her "inadequate defence" of the Brexit judges.  
"A referendum on hate:" @DavidCornDC's closing argument about this campaign, and the 40 years that led up to it. 
Immigration drove Brexit vote and now has derailed UK's trade deal w/ India  
Please go make the right decision tomorrow America, don't fuck up like we did with Brexit. This isn't just about America it's the world. 
UK, we - The Netherlands - want to #Nexit your #Brexit. Keep up your fight for freedom and for you Beautiful Nation.#DrainTheSwamp #Trump 
EU links of Supreme Court judges who will rule on Brexit @MailOnline #Brexit 
Brexit the Disaster that just keeps on giving @antibrexcartoon @Scientists4EU 
Trump's Brexit comparisons continue to make no sense  
If the press-barons, Farage & co behave like this to the judges, how will they bully & vilify any MPs who don't do what they want on Brexit? 
Fmr top judge Lord Judge says there is danger if Supreme Court reverses Brexit decision it will be seen as "victory for the demonstrators" 
.@JohnHalligan going to oppose the Bill he signed for a Referendum on the public ownership of our water....unreal @JoanCollinsTD #vinb 
Via @DavidCornDC: This Election Is a Referendum on Hate  #Clinton #Trump #p2 
Fmr Lord Chief Justice Lord Judge tells us tonight Liz Truss's support for judges over Brexit decision was "a little too late and not a lot" 
Last night's Senate result will ensure the next federal election will be a referendum on #marriageequality. LNP will be flogged. #auspol 
"I expect to be able to trigger Article 50 by the end of March next year", @theresa_may tells @BBCSimonJack #Brexit  
I was on @RTUKnews this evening talking about @Nigel_Farage's Dec 5th #Brexit rally. I urge you all to join us!  
No change in rights for Irish citizens in UK post-Brexit, says David Davis 
Mr Starmer, if you want to know the government's basic approach on #Brexit, don't ask David Davis - ask Nissan. 
Meanwhile our government continues to behave as if it believes we can have our cake and eat it. #Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
Remember when remainers warned that Brexit would lead to reduced worker's rights. Here's the govt doing just that.  
Shadow foreign sec @EmilyThornberry says @Nigel_Farage wants to influence the Supreme Court when it hears Brexit appeal #TheAgenda 
It wasn't a great day for Theresa May in India. Here are details of her double setback  
If true, when is Salmond going to be investigated for the lies in his referendum White paper?  
Probably won't get anywhere but the EU Referendum faces a legal challenge  an interesting story whatever your view 
Something Nigel Farage said about Brexit in May is coming back to haunt him - again  
Leaving the EU single market was “the instruction from the referendum,” says a former adviser to David Cameron  
60% in Manchester voted #Remain UKIP has little support in Didsbury West. Will @JeffSmithetc represent his constituents in a Brexit vote?  
EU's promise to PUNISH Britain for Brexit will 'force London and Moscow closer' as UK debates trade deal with RUSSIA  
.@DavidDavisMP chose not to understand my Q. There are many people on all sides of #Brexit debate who are very unhappy w/ Govt’s behaviour  
As predicted, #Brexit uncertainty will curtail investment leaving Britain poorly equipped for the challenges ahead. #Remain #YesEU 
Not just Farage. John Redwood freely declared in May that if Remain won the referendum, Leave wouldn't accept it.  
Labour shadow Brexit secretary Keir Starmer pockets £125,000 from law firm derailing Britain's EU exit  
Trump: "Tomorrow's going to be a very historic day. I think it's going to be a Brexit plus plus plus."  
#Brexit: Meanwhile, Swiss MPs vote on immigration control vs access to EU Single Market, followed by 2nd referendum  
It was Brexit times 50 last night  
"It's gonna be a Brexit Plus Plus Plus" -- Trump on the election tomorrow 
READ: Theresa May is clear that her Brexit plans have not changed, Article 50 will be triggered by the end of March. 
(Free) Brexit raises the stakes for the EU's remaining 27 members, writes Europe editor Tony Barber. Do you agree?  
Mentions of "Trump" in conjunction with "Brexit" proliferate as forecasters seek a hedge  
Holyrood magazine has published a painfully inaccurate piece about the Art 50 Brexit case. Some examples --> 
#Brexit supporters need to get into their heads that the freer the trade the more there is intrusion into our domestic policies.#Remain 
The UK's post Brexit hustling for trade with the Commonwealth always makes me think of the Empire Marketing Board.  
CPS considers complaint that Leave campaigns 'misled' EU referendum voters  via @telegraphnews 
Brexit Britain is praying for a Trump win tomorrow. Get your friends, family & neighbours out. Make this happen!  
Read the full FM @NicolaSturgeon speech tonight on Brexit and the economy to @SPERIshefuni at 
I am so annoyed with those who claim we must accept the result of the Referendum.  A Message to them:  No, Nay, Never  
thanks for ruining Christmas Brexit  
Former attorney general Dominic Grieve hits out at government’s response to Brexit criticism of judges  
Last week Boris said Brexit would be a "Titanic success". "Neeeear, faaaar, whereeeeever you aaaare......etc". @Scientists4EU @Remainin_EU 
Prosecutors examine claim the Brexit campaign was so misleading it broke the law -  #bbcnews 
There is no such thing as "a Brexit that works for Britain". You're welcome.  
Big flaw with a 2nd ref is it wld give EU every incentive to give UK a poor deal, so voters wld reject #Brexit  
Vegas Oddsmaker Predicts Brexit-like Victory for Trump  
Brexit has been a destructive force. It continues to destroy and undermine the UK's geopolitical economy. Many MPs are living in denial. 
(2) - time for a new alignment in U.K. politics to defeat #Brexit & marginalise the irrationalism on both right & left. 
These front pages are warning shots to straighten the spine of any MP or judge who don't yield to Brexit fanatics: pic.twitter.com/7xd3BKFTbb 
#sturgeonSPERI FM rightly identifies short campaign as huge European referendum problem. Cameron's responsibility. 
Not stupid but naive if you are on the left and voted to leave considering that a Tory gov't made the #Euref and will do #Brexit negotiating  
To go through with #Brexit would be to reward the criminal politics of hate, abuse & violence. #Brexit must be stopped. #Remain #YesEU 
India, a great new trade opportunity for #Brexit Britain, but oops that would mean loosening immigration controls... oh well.. #Remain 
On Law in Action tomorrow, Brexit: What Next? with @CSBarnard24 and @ProfMarkElliott. Radio 4, 4pm. @BBC_CurrAff No prior knowledge required 
"When I came to live here five years ago, the word ‘foreigner’ felt so different from how it does today" #Brexit  
in 100 years some kid is gonna be weighing up Brexit and Trump's presidency as factors in some world disaster in GCSE history for 25 marks 
Were you misled by EU referendum campaigners? 
When it comes to Brexit we should abide by the people's will but we must remember that will was created mostly by outright lies #DavidDavis 
The one who called Brexit a "victory", said US should support Assad, panders on vaccines & thinks Fed can cancel pvt debt? No. @adamholwerda 
Finally brexit produces a positive...  
So if the CPS find that Leave lied (who knew eh?), will that make the referendum null and void?  
Banks gird for Brexit-style tumult following U.S election  
Very lucid analysis of Brexit - why it happened and consequences by Professor Anne Deighton  
I'm genuinely scared for the outcome of the US election because the last time I thought common sense would prevail, Brexit fucking happened 
Brexit Secretary David Davis has insists Brexit will be triggered by April  
@JohnHalligan physically signed my bill for a referendum on water privatisation when I asked him. What's changed?  
Today I have been assured that tomorrow is just like:-Brexit-Y2K-WWII-Civil War-Bush/Gore recount-Every other presidential election 
Spread the word: "VEGAS ODDSMAKER PREDICTS BREXIT VICTORY FOR TRUMP" 
International: Theresa May to use Ouija board to seek out advice on Brexit from Margaret Thatcher 
Theresa May: Scotland being "consulted" on Brexit. Nicola Sturgeon: no we're not..  
From day 1 to election day I've always predicted this is our Brexit. My final prediction: 
FM: nothing about Brexit is straightforward but staying in  single market is consensus position. 
The dispute over the correct plural of "referendum" will tear our society apart.This is why there *must never* be another referendum. 
The Brexit Secretary didn't even attempt to answer my question today. The Government should get on & introduce legislation.  
Any second referendum should be opposed, because the divisions over Brexit will be as nothing to the "referenda" vs "refrendums" issue.  
In proportion to ever receding expectation of getting straight answer from Govt on #Article50 or any other idea of what #Brexit looks like  
I think about how shit brexit is, then I remember at least there's no chance Donald Trump could be running my country and I feel better 
#SturgeonSPERI Nicola rightly says there is strong evidence of a referendum majority for staying in single market. #Brexit 
BREXIT  
The whole approach is based on misplaced confidence. Why should any nation trust another that just dumps Treaty commitments? #Brexit  
All Brexit politicians outstanding in Parl. today, smug smirk wiped off #Cleggers face, not as chipper as b4, was he!  @borisjohnson #Brexit  
If Trump wins, USA + post-BREXIT UK might together be strong enough to turn the tide of globalism. If not, we may be heading for Armageddon. 
No excuse for Halligan's refusal to support a referendum on public ownership of water services - @davidcullinane 
David Davis and the current crop of ill informed parliament Brexiteers should have re-appropriation of their salaries to the NHS or benefits  
New Bill supported by 39 TDs – including Sinn Féin, AAA/PBP, Independents – calls for referendum on water ownership  
IndiaHandled well we can:1 Ramp up trade2 Welcome skilled workers & wealth creators3 Remove overstayersThat bloody #Brexit eh? 
Retweet if you believe @nick_clegg should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum  
It's seven weeks until Christmas so it's a good time to start preparing detailed rebuttals to your elderly relatives' Brexit arguments. 
Donald Trump says the US election will be "Brexit-plus-plus-plus"  
How might one 'respect' the #EURef result, a slender majority for a ragbag of proposals incompatible with reality & with each other?#Brexit 
I'm A Celebrity is the ultimate Brexit voters' show | @gracedent 
Brexit will still be triggered by April 2017, says David Davis  
Prosecutors examine claim the Brexit campaign was so misleading it broke the law  
"The body is more a place than an object for me" – Antony Gormley RA on finding his subject, education and Brexit:  
Election'16 graph from tweets on Nov1&2 shows Brexit-like polarization w/advantage Trump on Twitter. Analyzing data after FBI clearance now  
Crown prosecutors consider complaint against Brexit referendum campaigns. Are we to be criminalised for voting LEAVE  
@DavidDavisMP You're banging on in your speech about how brexit was binding. But it is advisory, it's not binding at all. Courts agree. You? 
Today's nonsensical bollocks-speak: "Businesses that prosper under Brexit will be those best at dealing with DYNAMIC UNCERTAINTY" #bbcpm 
Everyone I've spoken to in Australia is pretty scared and sees this election as a referendum on humanity.No pressure, America. 
Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP promises to stick to Brexit timetable as he sets out the Government's response to the High Court decision.  
Tomorrow is the final of the Moron Nation championship. Does Brexit clinch it for the UK, or will the US regain the title? 
One in FOUR companies putting investment on hold due to #brexit brexit is a car crash for business and a car crash for the economy. 
Prince Andrew accused of meddling as he suggests #Brexit & Donald Trump could "tear things apart."  
Glad to have backing of top businesswoman @NicolaHorlick. A vote for @LibDems is a vote against hard Brexit  
Remember: Brexit is the name of the monster not the crazed fools who created it. 
I think Brexit has shown the lack of skills our politicians actually have. They’ve been raised on a diet of junk politics. 
Brexit is irrational. You can't reason with it because it has no intellect behind it. Brexit is nothing but a gut reaction. 
Brexit as a divorce..  
Stark reality of post #brexit trade hits PM on 1st day in India. Increased visas for Indian students conceded already. 
If the press-barons, Farage & co behave like this to the judges, how will they bully & vilify MPs who don't do what they want on Brexit? 
Secretary of State for #Brexit calls Scotland "a small group" as he dismisses the votes of the Scottish electorate. 
Glad to have backing of top businesswoman @NicolaHorlick. A vote for @LibDems is a vote for against hard Brexit 
Jeremy Paxman finally gets to say what he thinks of David Cameron and Brexit…and it’s not pretty [VIDEO]  #brexit 
BREXIT: Theresa May is "clear" that EU exit talks will start in March unless it turns out "incompetence' has made her act "illegally" again. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg praises 'magnificent' press after row over High Court's Brexit judgment  
Breathtaking hypocrisy from David Davis, telling Remainers to respect referendum result while appealing High Court decision. 
So THIS is what Britons felt the day before Brexit 
She's clear. And a few weeks ago she was clear she didn't need to consult parliament. And she's also clear about her Brexit plans.  
As some parts of America are still deciding who to vote for, let me just leave this (what I saw post Brexit) right here .. Now ponder !!  
Does this mean I'm safe to go to bed at 2 without waking up to Brexit Breakfast? Doubt I'll make it that late tbh  
If the referendum had been a general election, the Leave Party would have a majority of 166 seats #RespectTheResult 
How disgusting that 6 months on we are still having 2 fight 4 #Brexit. We will not forget the traitor MPs names!  
The Government is steering us off a cliff with Brexit - but that's fine, because it's the 'will of the people'  
We have prisoners for mannequins, and Brexit for dummies. 
Labour will be pressing for a Brexit that works for Britain, putting jobs, living standards and the economy first.  
Ahead of Brexit, some banks quietly shift M&A bankers to Frankfurt:  
16. If there is to be Brexit, the government needs to start taking it far more seriously.  This is kid-like politics./Ends. 
DAVID DAVIS: "If Brexit fails to bring every frustrated Leave voter the utopia they've been promised then it's the fault of opposition MPs." 
Liam Fox pledged to spend £350m more a week on the NHS after Brexit. Make him keep his promise  
Here is the link to David Davis Bill I mentioned on use of prerogative by Executive -  @faisalislam #Brexit 
Government refuses to guarantee workers' rights after Brexit  
I’ve no doubt American backlash politics shape the Trump phenomenon. But, that doesn’t explain Le Pen, Brexit, AfD, PiS, Orban, etc. 
Prime Minister @theresa_may is visiting India to pave the way for the UK's first major post-Brexit trade deal.  
Take your troubled mind off Trump and Brexit with 88 of the very best quotes about bicycles and cycling.  
Fully support @DavidDavisMP saying referendum decision to leave 'must be respected and delivered'. No question. See  
Harry Potter and the ongoing, tedious bickering about the EU Referendum#MakeAFilmBritish 
The US election is making Brexit seem like a mild disagreement between two old ladies about whether it's jam first or cream first on a scone 
Why do MPs keep saying the referendum result was overwhelming? Can't help but feel if remain had won, that wouldn't be the narrative. 
Interesting to note his increased discomfort. He is a useful bellweather of sane Tory anxiety on Brexit. 
Andrew Tyrie (very sensible on Brexit) wants details on customs union, access to single market and passporting. 
Sinn Féin joins 39 @Right2WaterIRL TDs in call for referendum to enshrine public ownership of water in Constitution   
"May's India trip shows the ultimate failure of the #Brexit project" - @IanDunt 
Nigel Farage plans to head 100,000-strong march on Supreme Court to protest Brexit ruling    
Quite simply we're a home for those annoyed with the Tory Brexit Gov't and put off by Corbyn - our family is growing  
Brexit Secretary David Davis: There will be no second referendum on EU membership  
@pastormarkburns Join the Trump movement..First Brexit..then Baracksit. TY Pastor Mark. Martin Luther King would have been proud of you. 
take it from someone who experienced brexit, people regretted not having their say or not voting thinking their vote didn't matter. IT DOES. 
Shame on all of those who voted NO in the Metro Vancouver Transit Referendum over a year and a half ago. Things have only gotten worse.  
Order your copy of "The Bad Boys of Brexit" by Arron Banks today! It's a must read.   or pic.twitter.com/r2e91XWqe3 
I didn't vote for the Tories.I didn't vote for Theresa May..I didn't vote for Brexit.So; piss off with that bullshit. pic.twitter.com/APwF10cCYB 
And on he goes about MPs "thwarting mandate" of Brexit. The same hysterical, witch hunt, imbecilic bloody nonsense. 
"A complaint Leave campaigners MISLED voters during EU referendum is being considered by Crown Prosecution Service" 
Any sincere Brexiteers must realise this bull-headed refusal to make contingency planning makes Brexit less likely. 
The thought of the Brexit rabble-rouser in the Lords has invited horror and ridicule  
Davis playing same game as Mail and No.10: Pretending a complex case on the appropriate limit of the prerogative was about stopping Brexit. 
Brilliant work by @StephenGethins to uncover Bill sponsored by current #Brexit secretary that would have abolished "royal prerogative". 
Today we launched our cross-Parliament #Brexit campaign to get answers for Wales. A question a day, in both Parliaments until we get clarity  
Dear America, please don't make the same mistake with Trump that we did with Brexit - @ianmiddletonx blogs  
David Davies gets up and makes a second #Brexit statement just more Punch and Judy in "answer" to @Keir_Starmer. No information. No debate 
We won't vote down Article 50, Labour's Brexit spokesman Keir Starmer tells MPs  
That #brexit minister David Davis attacks the opposition rather than explain the UK's negotiating position confirms the weakness of his case 
Davis jeers at those who did not like result of first referendum and so want another go.Just minutes after he announces an appeal... 
CPS examining claims Vote Leave and Leave.EU misled Brexit voters:  
By confirming the UK Govt will use perogative powers & by-pass Parliament for a damaging #brexit tells us they still don't have a plan. 
.@Keir_Starmer points out Government doesn't have a plan if they lose their High Ct appeal. They learned nothing from the referendum #brexit 
Keir Starmer condemns press attacks on judges as "enemies of the people" for Brexit ruling and criticises Truss for failing to defend them 
Davis: "The referendum result must be respected and delivered. No attempts to remain inside the EU. No 2nd referendum" 
Plot to keep Britain IN the EU: Lord Hain warns of Brussels plan to reverse Brexit vote  
We need No #Brexit. Come on Labour, shape up.  
The Brexit dilemma: Any meaningful trade deal involves giving up some sovereignty  
Military officers 'afraid' High Court ruling on #Brexit could set "precedent that hinders future wars"  
The markets did the same before Brexit thinking Brexit won't happen. And they had it completely wrong.  
David Davis is about to make another #Brexit statement in the Commons. Buy your Euros and Dollars NOW!! #thisisnotadrill 
Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit plan is sensible – we need a People's Brexit  
Farage wants to march on the Supreme Court with 100,000 Brexit voters. This is James O’Brien’s scathing reaction  
EU's chief Brexit negotiator lays out EU's strategy. Hard Brexit it is, then. We're doomed!  
Oh great Prince Andrew-  the man who knows nothing about anything - says #Brexit could tear us apart 
But the thing is, Jeremy, no kind of Brexit that works for Britain. All you want is a say on which route we take driving off the cliff.  
You know what reminds me of Brexit?The time Britain voted to leave the European Union. 
Just registered to become an organ donor, a decision which I'm at peace with. Unless they hand my heart over to someone who voted Brexit. 
If Theresa May lives up to her powerful rhetoric and has the will to see Brexit through, then she will triumph  
Last week's High Court action wasnt about parliamentary sovereignty it was about blocking #Brexit and it won't work   
Needless to say, but this election is actually a referendum on sanity and decency: If you vote for @realDonaldTrump, you are fucking insane. 
She's right. No referendum is binding in the UK because Parliament is sovereign. 'The people' ≡ Parliament in UK.  
And yet Liberals say a national referendum on electoral reform is a bad idea....  
If MPs are to decide on triggering Brexit, it'd help if they knew what they're talking about, says @TheScepticIsle  
There is actually a very good argument for a Fast #Brexit - @Nigel_Farage and his Kipper MEPs will lose their salaries quicker #SilverLining 
Germans didn't get a 2nd chance in 1933; Britain doesn't get a #Brexit do-over in 2016, and nothing will undo a President Trump. Just #GOTV! 
In case he's forgotten. Farage viewed narrow #Brexit defeat as 'unfinished business' & promised  fight for a rerun.  
On trade, regulation & immigration, May's India trip shows why Brexit is so self-harming to the UK  
With a referendum, you have a clear, legitimate process run by Elections Canada. Who’s running this “questionnaire?” Who’s counting them? 
The poisonous US election coverage has at least given us some kind of break from the poisonous Brexit coverage. What now? What now? 
The whole article by Brendan O'Neill is brilliant: Brexit & the fight for democracy.  
Wasn't a big fear about referendum concern of "misinformation" and "bias"? So naturally these govt mailers will be 100% objective, yes?  
MPs should ask themselves what will happen when an infuriated majority turns on them for dragging them into a failed #Brexit. 
The people vote #Brexit & the rich get richer. Luxury brands top tables of companies benefitting from in £. @FT 
Think of the nastiness unleashed in the UK by the Brexit vote. Add gun ownership and imagine the US after a Trump victory. 
'Extremely questionable, if not illegal behavior' outside polling station. Brexit HRC. #tcot #ccot #gop #maga 
At last hope that shameless #Brexit lies & liars will be called out. If CPS finds a case to answer we need 2nd vote  
If households aren't £4,300 worse off by 2030, do @George_Osborne & his Treasury officials then go to jail? #Brexit  
Brexit means what? Oxford Economics assesses the chances of various outcomes....  
So first major test for Liz Truss Prison crisisRiots at HMP Bedford 2 escape from HMP PentonvilleFailure to uphold oath #brexit  
Excellent post by Barber & King on the reaction to the Brexit judgment - and this point can't be emphasised enough:   
Apparently, the judge halting brexit is the same one keeping Marine A, Sgt Blackman in prison 
Ahead of Brexit, some banks quietly shift M&A bankers to Frankfurt:  
That awkward moment when racists who backed Brexit find out there'll be less immigration from Europe & more from India... @malcolmcameron7 
Government 'Planning to Rush Brexit Bill Through Parliament'  
Pollsters are going to look even worse after this election than they did after 2014 and Brexit. 
Would appear Irish Gov had more contingency plans before #Brexit vote than UK Gov. And now seem to be more prepared.  
Labour's Keir Starmer rips Brexit wide open by calling for special deal for Scotland. Labour/SNP informal alliance?   
After the Brexit vote, my pride in taking British citizenship is fading | Fran Lawther  
CPS considers complaint that leave campaigns misled voters This could be big.#Brexit 
Readers have shared hundreds of ideas for guiding the UK through Brexit. Here are some of the most compelling  
The start of political accountability. CPS considers complaint that leave campaigns misled voters. #brexitjustice  
The people have spoken on #EURef. My question to all those politicians threatening to block #Brexit: are you a democrat or an autocrat?  
"UK PM Theresa May played the prerogative powers card to gain political advantage and push for a 'softer' #Brexit."  
Judges can't overturn the outcome of the Referendum because the outcome of the Referendum has no legal effect.  
The fight for #Brexit is a fight for democracy, writes Brendan O'Neill  
Turns out there is a law to prevent misleading campaigns like #Brexit: "undue influence" from false claims of fact  
Donald Trump says the US election will be "Brexit-plus-plus-plus"  
If an estate agent offered you the holiday of a lifetime at a bargain price, you'd check the small print  #brexit 
Voters get to hold accountable general election liars. But who delivers accountability in a Referendum?  
It's important that we look to the interests of the 48% people who didn't vote for #Brexit. My thoughts:  
Leavers - you were warned! Doubts cast on Theresa May's pledge to protect workers' rights post-Brexit  
HRC has been lying her whole miserable life. She has no legal, ethical or moral compass. Brexit her Butt. #tcot #ccot #gop #maga pic.twitter.com/AWhA0Ocx4W 
I keep getting these fleeting moments where I forget about Donald Trump and Nigel Farage and Brexit. And then I remember.  
Transparency needed in PM's Brexit plans writes @Ed_Miliband. We must put jobs, living standards and economy first 
Anti-Brexit parties would win 150 fewer seats than pro-Leave parties at a general election, analysis suggests:  
Prices are going up because of Brexit - the Government's response is cutting struggling families' income even more  
The one to watch: Crown Prosecution considers complaint whether "Vote Leave" campaigners misled voters on Brexit.  
The political suicide will be of those forcing an irreversible #Brexit against a growing #Remain majority. #YesEU 
"Brexit times billions, Brexit plus a set of steak knives, Brexit with the internal consistency of a drug dealer who uses his own product."  
#WATOCobra beer boss reveals 'appalling' racism faced since 'wretched' Brexit vote  via @HuffPostUK 
Who voted #Brexit with NO control of borders an NO permission to make trade treaties???  Huh???  
After the Brexit vote, my pride in taking British citizenship is fading | Fran Lawther  
This from @zoesqwilliams is right: remainers need to stop calling for 2nd ref, start work on a progressive Brexit  
Post #Brexit, the UK experienced a surge in hate crimes. If Trump wins, the same will happen in the USA. When the right wins, people die. 
HOLD ON TO YOUR HATS! Interesting blog on #brexit related political dynamics by Sir Julian Priestley: 
What Brexit really means for the Euro:  
Dominic Raab: 'What you're allowing is die hard remainers to try and frustrate the referendum.' #ChangeBritain 
Brexit: CPS considers complaint that leave campaigns misled voters  
Government already drafting Brexit Article 50 bill. Why wait until Spring next Year?  
So much common sense from this lady Unlike the head in the clouds Labour leaders she recognises most Labour constituencies voted for BrExit  
BREXIT: I just… I mean… what do you do with these people…?  
Ahead of Brexit, some banks quietly shift M&A bankers to Frankfurt  
In 2.5hrs time UK Govt announcement on Brexit article 50 process 
Martin McGuinness ‘refuses to rule out Sinn Fein taking Westminster seats for first time to block Brexit’:  
A long read, but compelling in its critique of last week's Art 50 Brexit case  
High Court isn't blocking #brexit but saying that parliament must pass new law before Article 50 is activated  
Tomorrow is a referendum on Hillary & Washington's culture of corruption. Every forgotten man & woman can send a message #DrainTheSwamp 
Like NBC/WSJ, latest ABC/WP track shows Trump @53% of whites-exact same % as voted to leave in UK #brexit  
Another controversial Brexit court case in pipeline. CPS considering complaint that leave campaigns misled voters  
READ: The Prime Minister on why she will not allow the British people's vote for Brexit to be sabotaged:  
'People need and deserve answers' @LeanneWood calls for clarity on #Brexit from both UK and Welsh governments 
#brexit I've put in a freedom of information request to PM to state the daily administrative cost of brexit. I'll let you know how I get on 
Another Brexit legal case in the works - complaint suggests @vote_leave & @LeaveEUOfficial misled voters on campaign  
AMERICA IS JUST ONE DAY AWAY FROM HAVING ITS OWN BREXIT WHERE THE PEOPLE RESTORE JUSTICE FROM THE CORRUPT LEADERS AND MEDIA.#VoteTrump  
Brexit: CPS considers complaint that leave campaigns misled voters  
Good piece here - advocating a second referendum, at the end of the negotiations.  
Must-read op-ed by #Atlanta Mayor @KasimReed: #Vote 'YES' for city's transportation referendum and MARTA expansion. #MARTAMeansBusiness 
I thought David Cameron lacked judgement but after theresa_may put these 3 in charge of brexit i don't know. #bbcdp 
Defeat for Clinton would now require Brexit/election-style polling disaster (so it's possible). 
CBA condemn appalling & highly personal abuse unreservedly, as an attack on Judges is an attack on the rule of law itself. #brexit @ffgqc 
Farage plans to head 100,000-strong march on Supreme Court to protest #Brexit ruling  
If the establishment betray the British people on Brexit then we will see huge political anger.  
The British legal profession and the banks are in cahoots with the EU. How stupid it is to let them have an opinion on #Brexit 
Seems a lot of commentators are waking up to the significant Brexit bargaining chip that is the UK's defence and security capability 
Happy pre-Election day! To #win two current affairs books on #Brexit and #HillaryClinton, #follow and #RTtoWin #usaelections2016 #giveaway 
This was a referendum on white supremacy. A primal scream of the white man's fear of a browner America. #ElectionFinalThoughts 
Farage to lead 100,000-strong march on Supreme Court on day of historic Brexit court hearing  
Javid and Truss under fire over Brexit ruling:  
After 1975 Referendum, I don't recall those still opposed being called Traitors or #enemiesofthepeople.  Why the Brexiteer intolerance now? 
Leavers know the Art 50 ruling is about protecting Parl'y sovereignty not stopping Brexit. But it doesn't hurt to whip up the mob does it? 
Trump predicts 'Brexit plus plus plus'  
Funny how Farage encourages Brexit voters to take to the streets, yet branded protesters that interrupted his pub lunch last year as 'scum'. 
Brexit means the end of free movement for poor people. It does’t and won’t apply to rich people. #bbcdp 
Here I am on @RT_com before the haircut talking Brexit  via @youtube 
Brexit  want all laws to be made in parliament but don't want parliament to have a say on Europe. hypocrites. #brexit #bbcdp 
Remember how the pound rallied just before the referendum because markets thought UK would not vote for Brexit? 
Ahead of Brexit, some banks quietly shift M&A bankers to Frankfurt  
After he stated that a #Brexit vote will increase costs. See how it works?   
"#Brexit Means What The British Parliament Says"?Like F**K it is!We knew EXACTLY what we voted for! 
But our post-Brexit sunlit uplands will be founded on tea! What do you mean, we don't grow it? We will soon have our Empire back, won't we?  
"This is no longer just about Brexit. This is about how Britain wants to be governed":  
PM declares 'people have spoken' after some MPs bid to block Brexit unless free movement can continue @MailOnline 
Brexit deal should include special arrangements for Scotland, Wales and Northern Ireland, says Starmer -  
Anyone saying because of Brexit  ruling we should look to America and elect judges is a bloody idiot. 
"to suggest that the Russians have produced Donald Trump, that the Russians have engineered Brexit, is ridiculous" 
Brexit challenger Gina Miller refused to reveal cost of her High Court fight when pressed by @juliaHB1. Listen below 
Nigel Farage ‘to lead 100,000-strong march to Supreme Court on day of Brexit appeal'  #Brexit  
#Brexit will be a TOWERING INFERNO of an achievement. The latest from @gregmoodie. 
The past week on Twitter has really revealed the similarities between many #Brexit supporters and those supporting #DonaldTrump. Uncanny. 
MPs should answer one question, "Is the Brexit deal better than what we have?". If it's not, #nobrexit 
‘hey americ—‘ *remembers we voted for brexit literally four months ago* ‘actually lads, you do you’ 
Listen up MP's & do your duty.Parliament may soon have to face up to its responsibility on Brexit  via @BV 
Govt already drafting Brexit trigger bill   
Kate Hoey: Labour Faces Electoral Suicide If It Doesn’t Accept Brexit  via @heatstreet 
If May wins the next general election will she declare that the people have spoken and there will be no further elections?#Brexit #Remain 
"Could Michigan be like Brexit?" asks the host on MSNBC. Americans really aren't 100% certain how to use "Brexit" but they love using it.  
It will be the feeling of Brexit x14.  And I was euphoric on the night of Brexit.  
Join us Fri 18 Nov from 8-9.30am as we discuss the impact of Brexit & hear from @EUDebateNI  All are welcome #socent #thirdsector #Brexit  
Brexit and the future of the European Idea  -  
Racists voting Brexit only to find out this will mean more immigration from India be like  
in May he said..."In a 52-48 referendum, this would be unfinished business by a long way". Shouldn't be surprised we feel the same now.  
So much for those Brexit claims that foreigners will rush to deal with an economy & nation of our size & strength  
Tories will USE the confusion & chaos over #Brexit to slip through unspeakable social policies#sleightofhand*A good time to bury bad news* 
Here is a leaver working hard to prove that all #Brexit supporters are brainless morons.#Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
DIGNIFIED: The Mail call Gina Miller a ‘Brexit wrecker nemesis.’ Readers call her a ’traitor to the UK.‘Job done.  
Theresa May's India trip shows why Brexit will be a failure in the short, medium and long-term  
Attorney general defends judges criticised over Brexit ruling  
Is Prince Andrew an “enemy of the people” now? As he battles against Brexit 
Echoes of my Brexit polling in this question on differences in attitude between Democrats and Republicans:  
BBC, why do you never discuss this, the advisory nature of the referendum @BBCNews @BBCr4today @BBCPM @bbctrust 
Ooh, I don't know, how about BECAUSE THEY DIDN'T FRUSTRATE ANY REFERENDUM OR ANY MANIFESTO COMMITMENT READ THE JUDGMENT YOU DERANGED FOOL.  
Gov't preparing a Brexit bill in preparation for its inevitable defeat in the Supreme Court. 
Dominic Grieve on the Brexit court ruling: our government is feeding the view that politicians act without principle  
The subject of Lords Reform looks set to rear its head again in the debate over Brexit.  
Are referendums, like the one we had on Brexit, a tool of fascism – or the will of the people? Me for @IndyVoices 
.@SuzanneEvans1 @HuffPostUK judges aren't frustrating the referendum just setting out the legal position. Save your ire for MPs who block it 
Scotland ‘expected’ to join Brexit legal challenge in fight against May triggering Article 50 #brexit #europr #uk 
I don't buy the line that we should keep our cards close to our chest.  Brexit is not like haggling on ebay over Wombles memorabilia. 
Nigel Farage threatens to lead 100,000-strong march on day of Brexit appeal ruling  
This is the sort of realistic & responsible approach needed #Brexit  
Terrific @KateHoeyMP article at @heatstreet."Labour faces electoral suicide it it doesn't accept Brexit"Deservedly 
I still don't understand why so many British people want to be governed by Germany and a mafia/Union which doesn't ever consult them #brexit 
Cautionary tale, America. Brexit is a disaster, and tyrannical dictators throw opponents in jail.   
#JohnLewis 2016 pitchChristmas daySad musicSnow outsideOld lady counts penniesSits at dinner tableno food"brexit" in big letters 
The Brexit ref. Isn't binding and may never happen, but inflation is real, here now, and increasing British poverty. #GoodJobNigel.  
A glimpse at Brexit Britain's more efficient judicial system.  
Brexit voters agree Parliament shouldn't vote on details of Brexit, and that all future detail and nuance should be outlawed in UK. 2016.  
Govt already drafting Brexit trigger bill - Sky News  
All indications are that post-Brexit UK will have to *relax* immigration rules to do free trade deals. The universe has a sense of humour. 
My paper for European Constitutional Law Rev, on Brexit as a challenge for & of the UK constitution, now up online  
I'm guessing that whoever lives in this house was pro Brexit or dyslexic, or possibly both.  
Attorney General defends Judges criticised over Brexit ruling & he deserves our thanks for that  
Let's have a new referendum. Q: "Do you want to pay more tax, or less?" People would vote "less". UK would soon go bankrupt. Mob rule sucks. 
May Lays Groundwork for Post-Brexit India Trade Deal  
Farage:  "I've had years of hate mobs – taxpayer-funded hate mobs – chasing me around Britain"Farage is a tax-payer funded hate mob#Brexit 
Nigel Farage to lead a 100,000-strong march on the Supreme Court on the day of the historic #Brexit court hearing  
Brandis fails to say that Ireland needed a referendum, Australia does not need to have a plebiscite or referendum for #marriageequality 
FUN FACT: We fully understand how the High Court process works; we just call it a Brexit Betrayal because it gets you angry.  
"Here's what Mr Tiernan Brady, a gay man, said about the Irish referendum," Brandis says. (Brady is against the plebiscite) 
Brexit could turn London into a 'freewheeling hub for emerging-market finance – a sort of Singapore on steroids' — The Economist. pic.twitter.com/D1xWGH3XDZ 
It's almost like brexit was never *actually* about "sovereignty". 
Govt already drafting Brexit trigger bill   
Funny watching the likes of Iain Martin furiously back-pedal from the Brexit fiasco they helped create:  
Donald Trump says the US election will be "Brexit-plus-plus-plus"  
Labour demands for Theresa May to reveal Brexit negotiation strategy before triggering Article 50 are 'foolish'  
Ex-Tory chairman Lord Patten calls for Sajid Javid to be sacked for attack on Brexit judges -  
Germany can't afford to have tariffs slapped on its car-makers' exports to the UK post-Brexit. We're Germany's #1 car export market! 
READ Impact of #Brexit on Ireland paper by @ESRIDublin & Dept. of Finance  
Nigel Farage warns there could be riots if Brexit is blocked  
Trump & Brexit Brigands share the same dirty tactics by me with another fab @MartinRowson cartoon 
Awful scaremongering from Nigel Farage trying to blame others for the fact he has no plan for #Brexit  
Nigel Farage is set to lead a 100,000-strong march through London on the day of the Supreme Court Brexit battle.  
NIGEL FARAGE: “I concede that the referendum was only advisory, so my next campaign will be for a referendum to make referendums legal.” 
Ryanair CEO Michael O'Leary is pessimistic about business in Britain after Brexit  
'£350m for the NHS' swayed disabled voters in EU referendum | Article, News | News | UNISON National  
Brexit at Tiffany's #MakeAFilmBritish 
Prices are going up because of Brexit - the Government's response is cutting struggling families' income even more  
I now have pretty much no idea what #Labour's A50 #Brexit position is. To be fair, the gov's not too clear either. 
I think Nigel Farage 'fears' riots in the same way I fear a lovely carbonara after a hard day's work. #Brexit #Article50 
India wants its students to be educated abroad, a great opportunity for UK exports, influence & trade which May is throwing away.#Brexit 
OMW to London for the first time, lets see what brexit has to offer 󾓪 󾓪 
I see UKIP's Suzanne Evans is going down the fascist Hitler route of judiciary. We just want the ones who'll do what we tell them. #Brexit 
"Brexit is like the creation of the universe. We have had the first half hour of all the chaos and explosions..."  
Freedom of Movement, Austerity, Labour and MPs votes on Brexit  
Brexit was one of top 10 current affairs topics which Britons confessed to knowing least about.No comment needed! 
Brexit is scarier than President Trump for this $51 billion bond fund manager  
Let me make this clear. For the foreseeable future I am only voting for candidates who will oppose Brexit in any form; party doesn't matter.  
Ministers in Westminster can't simply strip citizens of their European rights: @PeatWorrier on #Brexit and the law  
Methinks..problem for Labour in taking nuclear option off table over Article 50 is they lose leverage over Govt to get concessions on Brexit 
"Judges should be subject to some sort of democratic control" says @SuzanneEvans1 on Brexit ruling  
In today's @timesredbox - @Plaid_Cymru & our aim to get answers on the plans for #Brexit from governments on both ends of the M4.  
Renzi’s bid to overhaul Italy's constitution could go awry in the Dec. 4 referendum. @Simon_Nixon on the risks:   
Cobra Beer Boss Blasts Theresa May's 'Illiterate' Immigration Target, And Speaks Of 'Appalling' Post-Brexit Racism  
We will never back a Brexit deal that is bad for Wales, says @LeanneWood for today's Red Box  
Nigel Farage tells LBC that companies putting prices up because of Brexit are "a bloody rip-off”. 
Calling your self democratic state & proving it practically are two different things. #India must hold common referendum in occupied Kashmir 
love to see future Irish Brexit events hosted in Dundalk, Monaghan, Cavan, or Donegal. Border counties need a spotlight #irishtimesbrexit 
Democratic accountability = sovereign Parliament(not PM with monarchical powers) deciding Brexit timing & terms after people set principle  
Man up Iain. You wanted Brexit. Enjoy what your vote has achieved!  Brown ale times ahead  
If you want the disabled to be robbed and 60 year old women robbed,and lied to about a referendum.... Vote Tory at the next election 
Credit where it's due: Anna Soubry is playing a blinder in this row over Brexit & gutter press attacks on judges & the role of parliament.  
#Brexit is irreversible, whereas if #Leave had lost they could have tried again in a few years time. #Remain 
Housing immigrants before our brave soldiers is a betrayal of this government and the other lot 
One problem with not having a threshold provision is that a small referendum majority can rapidly become a minority.#Remain #Brexit #YesEU 
I'd be much more confident that America will do the right thing tomorrow if we hadn't had the whole brexit debacle 
Suzanne Evans is a mendacious rabble-rousing populist #BBCR4today  Keir Starmer is impressive & sounds like a genuine statesman. #Brexit 
Keir Starmer given tougher time on @BBCr4today about Labour position on Brexit than Suzanne Evans for suggesting judges corrupt. Bizarre. 
There's the 52% & there's the 48% but any responsible Govt. needs to act for the 100% @Keir_Starmer spot on #r4today #Brexit 
"As the facts about the consequences of #Brexit become clear, so majority opinion will change" says Will Hutton: 
After all the lies by the Tory Party on the referendum, the country needs a General Election lets show them what we think of liars 
Senior bishop says right-wing press coverage of Brexit judges is 'like something from Nazi Germany'         
Labour accepts Govt has a mandate to leave EU?How is that? The 37% in green are a majority? Advisory referendum, people changing minds...  
"There is no mandate" for the plan to leave says Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer 
Nigel Farage forced to admit that the EU referendum was only 'advisory'          
Suzanne Evans @UKIP is either telling lies or hasn't read the judgement. Judges most certainly NOT trying to thwart/undermine Brexit 
@Ironwand I wish we had thought of this trick during the Brexit Campaign40 posters were vandalised in my constituency alone! 
Suzanne Evans suggested democratic control over judges. Also suggested the judges have derailed Brexit. Hilarious. 
European commission to examine terms of UK's deal with Nissan.Tell them to F off. Deal only applies upon Brexit 
Walkers hikes crisps prices 10%  'because of Brexit' - despite using BRITISH potatoes. Boycott them!  
Damian Green says govt's task re Brexit is to "make a success of the hand dealt to us by the British public". Not a ringing endorsement... 
With Brexit we’re playing roulette with the UK’s future. But will we win? | George Walden  
You only have to scratch away at the thin layer of BS to see what to expect from politicians during this #Brexit process.#Article50 
Ryanair boss Michael O'Leary @BBCBreakfast: "it's pretty clear the British government hasn't a clue what Brexit looks like." 
.@SarahLudford on #r4today: Govt must come forward with clear plan on Single Market. A hard Brexit isn't in the interest of the country 
I don't often say that but well played #India .. A big middle finger to nationalist insular pro #Brexit brits  
Anger over 'Brexit judges' headlines is just another scare tactic to derail Leave vote  
Trump: US vote will be Brexit-plus-plus-plus  
Nigel Farage forced to admit that the EU referendum was only 'advisory'         
Great that Theresa May not going to back down one inch on Brexit & immigration controls. #trusttheresa 
Nigel Farage to lead 100,000-march on Supreme Court on day of historic Brexit court hearing. Make it a million!  
Brits are longing for deals with the 'Commonwealth' since the Brexit vote. Nostalgia for Empire as the British PM travels to India. 
Donald Trump and the Brexit Brigands use the same weapons of mass deception  
I DON'T BELIEVE POLITICIANS.No matter how many of them assure us that Brexit will not be blocked.#Brexit #LeaveEU 
EU links of Supreme Court  judges who rule on Brexit impact. The EU tendrils have spread across the establishment!  
This is the reason why "Hard Brexit" position may not succeed: its supporters seek to undermine the institutions they need for it to thrive. 
So true. Energies spent mourning Brexit would be better focussed on ensuring we keep the good things the EU gave us  
Theresa May will call a general election if Brexit stalls, Jeremy Hunt has hinted 
My cartoon - Justice Sec Liz Truss, not a lawyer/expert, is criticised for not giving proper support to under fire #Brexit judges #r4Today 
Rush Brexit through parliament, May urged.If a difficult job is worth doing, it's worth doing badly,secretly & fast  
The EU Parliament's main Brexit negotiator told us why the deal Britain wants makes no sense  
9M Taxpayer-funded leaflet 
Nigel Farage ‘to lead 100,000-strong march to Supreme Court on day of Brexit appeal'  
Gina Miller @gmb on her court battle 'it's not about stopping Brexit, it's a point of law. It's about preserving our sovereign parliament' 
Price of 20 Unilever products up by average of 5.7% since Brexit vote  
But Brexit isn't being blocked, as Trump Mini Me Farage knows.He's a one trick "Betrayal "pony , nothing constructive to say 
Senior bishop says right-wing press coverage of Brexit judges is 'like something from Nazi Germany'      
Gina Miller - the woman who took the government to court over Brexit & won - is joining us on @GMB shortly to explain why she did it 
Nigel Farage forced to admit that the EU referendum was only 'advisory'      
@ArvindKejriwal is asking for my opinion on pollution, why didn't he ask or have referendum on Rs 1 cr given to Ram Kishan Grewal's family?  
......he does know how terrible Brexit is though, right?  
Daily Mail's latest insult: #feminist. Thanks @jk_rowling @Tara_Hewitt @redskyatnight whose #Brexit tweets feature  
You know when the Government isn't on your side 
Trump is simultaneously saying he's winning in the polls, and that his victory will shock people Brexit-style. 
Trump at rally in Leesburg, Virginia: "This is going to be Brexit times 50"  
It was Brexit plus plus plus in Michigan but only Brexit plus in Minnesota. The later in the day, the more Brexit it gets?  
Donald Trump's latest election prediction: "This is going to be Brexit times 50." 
Trump now says the election will be Brexit times 50!!!!! 
'Disregarded ethics guidelines': HRC document raised issues with China Expo. Brexit HRC. #tcot #ccot #gop #maga  
I will be Brexit-plus-plus! Biggest market crash the world has ever seen!  
Some brief thoughts inspired (if that's the right word) by Sunday's #brexit machinations, please share:  
I will say this for Donald Trump: No one has done more to make less educated white males aware of the significance of Brexit. 
Theresa May must take Brexit decision to Parliament “because we do not live in a tin-pot dictatorship.” -Gina Miller  
Don't be fooled, Election 2016 is no #Brexit referendum(The market hedged ahead of the event this time) $SPX $SPY 
"It's going to be Brexit plus, plus, plus." @realDonaldTrump #Campaign2016 #Pennsylvania #FinalWeekend 
How does that compare to Brexit times 10?  
Trump, predicting victory on Tuesday, says “it will be called Brexit plus, plus, plus.” 
Narrative Machine analysis: complacency re: Trump win low, sentiment almost neutral. This ain't Brexit. Ref:  
Brexit bad news from New York's Algonquin Bar. Glass of J Walker Black now costs £18. :-( Forced to drink American. Sad, as Trump would say. 
Marine Le Pen on Brexit, burkinis, and Trump.  
We won't tell you how to vote in the US elections, UK referendum, or Eurovision. We just want people to agree about bisexuality & biphobia. 
I Know What You Did Last Brexit #MakeAFilmBritish 
.@davidakin No need for #Trudeau govt to do this. #CPC MPs already received 81K Cdns' responses on #electoralreform. 91% want #referendum!  
A Referendum on the Failure of the Progressive Era - Part I: Progressives Pervert Our Constitution  @TedAbram1 
A #BREXIT HEADLINE: "Brexit: A GLORIOUS Victory! The GLOBALISTS have been DEFEATED and they are FURIOUS! " Let's have our own BREXIT 11/8!  
Voting for @realdonaldtrump will be like brexit on steroids! 
The subpar take home exam version of a referendum. No substitute for the real thing #cdnpoli #electoralreform #erre 
Trump in Michigan tonight: "We're going to go on Tuesday, and we're going to win like they've never seen. This is going to be Brexit-plus." 
Nigel Farage marching alongside a 100000 Brexit mob. Finally we have a use for Boris' water cannons #brexitshambles 
Theresa May must take Brexit decision to Parliament “because we do not live in a tin-pot dictatorship.” -Gina Miller  
Neither does Trump, since still has no fucking clue what Brexit is.  
remember when uk citizens slacked off voting cause brexit seemed impossible, but then it happened? don't let that repeat on tues #govote 
Senior academic @katejjeffery @ucl in plea to MPs on Brexit vote: End "highjacking of democratic process"Remain "biggest" of 3 vote groups  
While I'm at it, I'm afraid there's nothing "liberal" about demanding the Referendum result is ignored either. 
Venezuela's economy is down 20%, inflation surges, basic goods are missing, but Maduro resists recall referendum.  
Trump repeats a new favorite line. "This is going to be Brexit plus. They don't know what's coming." 
Trump says Election Day is going to be "Brexit Plus." This is a reduction from when he said it would be Brexit times 10 the other day. 
Theresa May will call a general election if Brexit stalls, Jeremy Hunt hints   
LET'S GO!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! @UKIP @Nigel_Farage @UKIPBroxtowe @ukipmeps @RaheemKassam @UKIPWales #UK #London #brexit  
Government to respond to High Court Brexit ruling  
Brexit advocate Farage warns there could be riots if EU exit is blocked  
Nothing progressive, socialist or "left wing" about dismissing 52% of population as "xenophobes" & demanding Referendum result is ignored. 
And then there's the small matter of the referendum being advisory,which every MP knew as they voted for it  
My current investment strategy is hope #Brexit doesn't happen so the £ increases in value before I deposit this bad boy to the bank  
"This Ain't Another Brexit" Traders Scramble To Hedge A Trump Victory  
.@theresa_may has defended the judiciary and the press after the row over headlines attacking the #Brexit ruling  
Britain will be there! Nigel Farage ‘to lead 100,000-strong march to Supreme Court on day of Brexit appeal'  
Time for a replay of the battle of Cable Street, or better to give Farage a length of rope...?#Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
Daily Mail has reported that Prince Andrew told a group of financiers that Brexit would tear us apart (sorry no link - avoiding DM clicks) 
High Court Brexit case in a nutshell.  
Theresa May refuses to back down on Brexit immigration controls  
Brexit flashbacks are haunting traders as they brace for the US election  
Comey's latest decision means USA is truly BANANA REPUBLIC! We have 1 #BREXIT MOMENT to take USA back. #Hillary is #AbovetheLaw. #VoteTrump. 
Please share: ‘Unforgivable’ Cameron put Tory Party before UK with referendum, says Paxman…  
almost like there's only one candidate who wouldn't send us spiraling into a Brexit-sized economic collapse  
The EU referendum has revealed some paradoxes of democratic legitimacy  
Farage's idea of a march on the Supreme Court on the day of the Brexit ruling is despicable. Intimidation tactics have no place in the UK. 
It's no wonder people are becoming polarised by Brexit debate when each side is abusive to the other 
Honestly, both Brexit and the U.S. Election have demonstrated how many utter fuckwits are somehow holding positions of power. 
Farage to lead 100k-strong march on Supreme Court on day of #Brexit appealHow very 1930s... via @telegraphnews 
Nigel Farage to lead 100,000-strong march on Supreme Court on day of historic Brexit court hearing - The Telegraph  
May knows she cannot be PM of a country that gets poorer. Pure but poor may do for Brexit fanatics not for a serious PM  
This is #SouthYemen @OSESGY saying no to deadly unity with north Yemen, no to endless repression and thievery. They deserve a referendum.  
"#Brexit incites white supremacists?" Oh dear...  
This is how the U.K. got Brexit. Which the vast majority now deeply regret.  
america saw britain destroying themselves with brexit and decided to fuck themselves over too get you a friend like america 
Nigel Farage to lead 100,000-strong march on Supreme Court on day of historic Brexit court hearing  
Who's being unhinged about Brexit?  
This week's High Court action wasnt about Parliamentary sovereignty it was about blocking #Brexit But it wont work  
#Brexit: Walkers crisps and raise price?They can take their crisps + #Lineker for all I care and shove it!I'm OUT! 
How racism and immigration gave us Trump, Brexit, and a whole new kind of politics  
So many reasons for so many to be fearful. Brexit in the UK has incited white supremacists around the world. This is not academic.  
In many ways campaign ends how it started: Outsider vs. Insider. Change vs. Status quo. But it's now a referendum on Hillary. #DrainTheSwamp 
#MakeAFilmBritish The Shawshank Referendum 
Sir Christopher, a former foreign office negotiator, says PM talking openly on Brexit plans would be 'gold dust for negotiating adversary' 
The taxpayers pay the wages of car workers. The company keeps the profit. May’s brilliant Brexit deal with Nissan. 
Senior bishop says right-wing press coverage of Brexit judges is 'like something from Nazi Germany'. Was the press treatment fair? #IanOnLBC 
even  if  you  are  confident  hillary  is  going  to  win  you  still  have  to  vote don't  let  brexit  happen  again  
THE TIMES FRONT PAGE: 'Rush Brexit through parliament, May urged' #skypapers 
#TheresaMay now says on #bbcnews that she wants trade WITHIN the single market. Fox won't be happy. Govt divisions on #brexit continue. 
Nigel Farage's march on the Supreme Court exclusive picture preview. #brexit  
I've cited a lot of the excellent writing on #Brexit ruling hysteria here, incl @Prof_Phillipson @BarristerSecret  
My cartoon - Justice Sec Liz Truss, not a lawyer/expert, criticised for not giving proper support to under fire #Brexit judges #BBC1News 
Ruth Lea: Under Theresa May, Brexit Britain will clearly be leaving both the Single Market and the Customs Union  
I give you Britain's right wing; they're proud to be Boorish. #brexit  
My son said his first word, today.“Brexit”Or something that sounded like that.  He mumbled it, sheepishly.#thankyou2016 
What's funnier by the time #Brexiteers boycott all the products that rise in price, they'll all starve to death and miss the next referendum  
EXC Nigel Farage to lead 100,000-strong march on Supreme Court on day of historic Brexit court hearing  @telegraph 
Pre-#EU Ref', Germany reject UK proposal to block paying benefits to migrants for 5 yearsPost-EU Referendum, Germany implementing same rule 
The People Have Spoken? We Don't Give A Damn - The David Icke Videocast/...  #Brexit 
Full list of Remain MPs who could block a Brexit by voting Article 50 down  
Terrific deconstruction of the Brexit High Court decision by @ProfTomkins 
Trump and Brexit are not the start of a new era. They are the ugly, angry end of the old one. In US, as in UK, the future is cosmopolitan.  
Delusion: brexit means brexit and we will get the best deal for the UKReality: No brexit plan exists  
Just saw Stewart Lee in Newcastle. Loudest applause for: "It's not true only a load of racists voted Brexit. They were also a load of c***s" 
Please @rickygervais @GaryLineker & @jk_rowling get together and start cross/non party campaign to save  from Brexit & trumpism 
If you believe as I do that we are better off in the EU and hate what #Brexit is doing to us all then support @timfarron and the @LibDems. 
Cobra beer boss Lord Karan Bilimoria reveals 'appalling' racism faced since 'wretched' Brexit vote  
‘People voted for us to leave the EU’ @theresa_may insists she will honour Brexit  
British Prime Minister pens column maintaining that Brexit will happen  
'What part of LEAVE don't you understand?' Farage DESTROYS Brexit court ruling campaigner  
The demagogic right - smashing checks & balances in the name of “the people” #Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
Language matters: whether you're talking economics, science, Brexit or Trump, words signal many things  #SciComm 
Brexit 2.0 coming Tuesday 
Cobra Beer Boss Blasts Theresa May's 'Illiterate' Immigration Target, And Speaks Of 'Appalling' Post-Brexit Racism  
Theresa May turns a blind eye to #Brexit press rhetoric that is attacking the foundations of British democracy. 
But Farage  himself said a 52/48% win for Remain would require a second referendum, the old fraud  
Visa issues could overshadow Theresa May's attempts to secure the UK's first post-Brexit trade deal in India.  
Walkers crisps are getting more expensive - and they're blaming Brexit  
.@BenPBradshaw: If Govt Bill for invoking A50 is for destructive hard Brexit I would support amendment insisting on staying in Single Market  
Nigel Farage warns there could be riots if Brexit is blocked  
Unscrupulous politicians & papers are trying to use the threat of violence to force through #BrexitAll the more reason to stop it!#Remain 
The world today. #Election2016 #Brexit #EverythingReally 
You are misguided. No clear mandate for #Brexit in a referendum swung on lies. Please show some backbone! 
No Agenda Episode 875 - "No Brexit For You"  
"Prominent Brexiteers seems to want only to confirm the suspicion that they are simply bonkers" #Brexit 
Iceberg-sized gaffe: #Brexit will be a ‘Titanic success' - British FM Boris Johnson  
Brexit, Ed Balls, Boaty McBoatFace, Honey G. All proof that we can't be trusted to vote for anything  #XFactor #XFactorResults 
Who or what is this 'ruling elite' that @nigel_farage keeps claiming is trying to block #Brexit? Rich bankers? Monarchy? Hedge funders? 
Brexit means Brexit. But no one said it wouldn't be in 100 years time. RT @Law_and_policy: "Long Brexit"  
Oliver Letwin: Cameron had no choice but to promise the EU referendum. Politics Home interview with @MLeftly  
Brexit and Honey G are the reasons why our country cannot be trusted with anything these days #XFactor 
Ex-Tory chairman Lord Patten calls for Sajid Javid to be sacked for attack on Brexit judges -  
Honey G and Brexit.2 reasons why the people of the UK shouldn't be allowed to vote.#XFactor 
Official @PoliticalCow projection of the Presidential election - #Brexit style revolution. #ElectionNight 
Theresa May seems incapable of distinguishing criticism of legal decision from incitement of hatred toward the judges #Article50 #brexit @FT 
Senior bishop says right-wing press coverage of Brexit judges is 'like something from Nazi Germany'      
Does anyone remember voting to open the borders and bring an end to our culture & civilization?No me neither.#DrainTheSwamp #Brexit #Trump 
Four of #SupremeCourt #judges who will decide whether #TheresaMay can trigger #Brexit have previous links to #EU 
Noddy Holder says he's not going to yell "IT'S CHRISTMAS!" as much this year because of Brexit. 
Outrage about foreign ships lurking in London & taking all our stuff off to Europe. Things that are well Brexit: the Derby Mercury in 1740  
Nigel Farage forced to admit that the EU referendum was only 'advisory'     
Brexit? That no when a fat lassie sits on a chair an she brexit 
But triggering A50 without a plan for Brexit is like starting on a round the world trip without tickets, passport or a map  
British fisherman will catch hundreds of thousands of tonnes more fish after Brexit:   
Nigel Farage: Brexit betrayal will lead to 'political anger the likes of which none of us have ever witnessed'.  
Martin Rowson on the government's Brexit plans – cartoon  
Boycotting @walkers_crisps using Brexit as an excuse to increase prices, either that or having been telling fibs about using UK spuds 
'What part of LEAVE don't you understand?' Farage DESTROYS Brexit court ruling campaigner  
Support for EU exit and implementing Article 50 booms after 'Brexit betrayal' court ruling  
The High Court judgement was nothing to to with Brexit ( for or against) but about parliament vs royal prerogative, just like Chares I  
The MSM told us Conservatives could NOT win in 2015. They did. The MSM said we would not vote #Brexit. We did.Now they say Trump can't win 
My cartoon - Justice Secretary Liz Truss, who’s not a lawyer, is criticised for not giving proper support to under fire #Brexit judges  
Absolutely correct and country needs to know what Britain's future means under Brexit and whether people want that or not  
Theresa May appeals against the High Court setting out, she says, "strong legal arguments", but doesn't give anyAs mysterious as Brexit pic.twitter.com/CLOj0UPKFr 
Homophobic attacks have increased by 147% in the three months after the Brexit vote  
Cautionary tale: the first time I believed Brexit could happen was when it happened. Be better than Great (Britain), America. 
Theresa May must take Brexit decision to Parliament “because we do not live in a tin-pot dictatorship.” -Gina Miller  
Trump down two nationally and within margin of error where he needs to win. Last Brexit poll had Remain up 2% with leave winning by 2.5% 
From the House of Commons library briefing paper 07212 on what the #EUreferendum could and couldn't do. #Brexit  
 be warned, the media will make you think you've lost with pro Clinton rhetoric & low poll % 4 #Trump. Don't worry they did same 4 #Brexit 
absolutely. Did anyone see Maastricht & Lisbon treaty ratification in manifesto's yet sovereignty handed over to EU  @Susanta80092841  
Corbyn: We'll force May to accept our Brexit red linesWatson: We'll agree to Article 50 anywayLabour. What a mess.  
'What part of LEAVE don't you understand?' Farage DESTROYS Brexit court ruling campaigner  
It would be in everyone's interests for the Tory Government to remove international students from immigration targets. #Brexit  
Democracy is about more than casting votes - my @theipaper column on Brexit delusions & an increasingly-toxic debate  
He is wrong. Brexit is simple, a complete exit from the EU and all of its institutions. That is what LEAVE means.  
I've written a basic law lesson to explain why the #brexit referendum was not binding. This is why parliament still has the power to decide.  
BREXIT: I’ve always regarded Mail readers as selfish, wilfully ignorant racists but I was wrong; they’re far worse.  
Is Theresa May playing a complex game with the ultimate goal of delivering a soft #Brexit? 
Judges only confirmed what Cameron had made clear: that EU referendum was advisory. Column on Enemies of the People.  
Walkers crisps are getting more expensive - and they're blaming Brexit  
Referendums and Europe..  #brexit  
If judges can frustrate a referendum outcome, why not travel faster than the speed of light? @Law_and_policy 
Time was, even senior Tories would have ignored far-right racists. Now they're keen to keep them happy over Brexit (see the guy's timeline):  
'Let's be absolutely clear,' Its quite Binary. the Referendum was only advisory... under article 140 of the referendums act, 17m hoodwinked 
And at least 66% of UK journalists who've been nowhere near the City of London believe it won't remain Europe's financial hub post-Brexit  
I remember the shock in the UK post-Brexit. Many thought Remain would still win so voted Leave to 'make a point.' Plz remember this on Tues. 
Brexit blamed for higher crisp prices  
A lawyer's writ runs as far with a sunken soufflé as a non-binding Referendum. 
A simple clause from @murrisonMP or other MP would have made referendum legally binding.But they didn't bother, and now blame judges. 
almost asked for a brexit instead of a biscuit 
Indeed. I have argued something similar for Brexit.  
If MPs can make a referendum legally binding then they should have done so, and not blame the judges when they didn't.  
Brexit was won as people had belief in the strength of the UK to stand up Trump is a VOTE of hope, optimism and change that America needs. 
I helped build a coalition that passed a referendum to get money out of politics in MA. The Democratic legislature repealed it right away. 
Fascinating fact: the reason there is no legal remedy for Brexit lies is that the Referendum has no legal effect.  
Dear America, if you don't know about #Brexit pls google it. Many who voted for it are regretting after seeing their country's economy tank. 
Hmmmm.. I guess I'm assuming a degree of rational behaviour ie Brexit voters not wanting bad things to happen to them?   
Our EU referendum summed up.#WeWozRobbed #ShitehawkJudges pic.twitter.com/vf1JmoasvQ 
Theresa May & her Brexit ministers fail to understand that we are a divided country, very acutely divided, & that needs inclusive governance  
Senior bishop says right-wing press coverage of Brexit judges is 'like something from Nazi Germany'     
Great #Brexit news: #Walkers and Birds Eye set to raise prices as £ weakens. Hurrah!Brexit'ers must be so proud! 
Since I'll be out of the country, Tuesday is a referendum on whether people want Tim Graham to remain in Europe. Vote with your hearts. 
They didn't "frustrate a referendum outcome" they "interpreted the law." That's what judges do  
If the #EUref were held today.How would you VOTE?Please RETWEET this #Brexit #poll 
72% of UK bankers believe the City of London will remain Europe's financial hub after Brexit.(Synechron)  
BBC News - Arlene Foster accused of treating Brexit forum with 'disdain'  
I applaud your Brexit coverage and today's superb editorial. Thanks for having the guts, @jnmulholland. Keep it up! 
We might have just overestimated our own importance....#Brexit #IndiaTradeDeal 
'What part of LEAVE don't you understand?' Farage DESTROYS Brexit court ruling campaigner  
May 'foolish to bulldoze ahead' on Brexit says Mike Russell - BBC News  
So Farage wants constitutional change now? He's probably hit peak fascism. Next step dictator. #Ukip #Brexit 
Rather little, rather late: Theresa May backs judges' independence after Brexit ruling  
May insists Brexit won't be blocked by judges or lawmakers amid a growing political schism  
Oh boy, the PM is in for a shock if she thinks her answers to #Brexit can be found in India #TinPotTheresa 
I am beginning to believe MP's ARE too stupid to have a vote on the Brexit deal...  
Despite the hysteria whipped up in Westminster at shock High Court verdict, Brexit still means Brexit, electorate won't let Remoaners delay. 
'Brexit is a process - not a binary decision any more.' @StigAbell calls for calm after the high court ruling outcry. 
That this is a story shows how #Brexit is undermining our normal values.  
Shouldn't be a problem either, I'm told most Brexit voters were all for more Commonwealth immigration.  
Ed Miliband is wrong. There is no 'clear mandate' for #Brexit. There is no mandate at all, clear or muddy. 
Ex-Tory chairman Lord Patten calls for Sajid Javid to be sacked for attack on Brexit judges -  pic.twitter.com/H1A0sfCUKY 
Great analogy !! We didn't tell the Europeans which beaches then so why should we now???? #Brexit  
Remember Brexit? we're still living it over here, listen to Bernie folks!  
HRC wants to restore the honor and dignity that her "husband" brought to the White House. Brexit her Butt. #tcot #ccot #gop #maga pic.twitter.com/qLwGnDmlg3 
New Dutch Referendum Looms Targeting EU-Canada Trade Pact  
Theresa May says she values judiciary's independence but government has "strong arguments" to appeal Brexit ruling  
Theresa May says she believes in independence of judiciary and values freedom of press after high court Brexit ruling attacked in newspapers 
My prediction is that Corbyn will do everything he can to facilitate a general election in which May wins an overwhelming #Brexit majority 
How Brexit is a win for Putin  
Hmm. Is a narrow vote for Brexit, induced by a prominent broken promise ('£350m for the NHS'), a "clear" mandate?  
Big Soda hired the media firm that ran the Brexit campaign to try and stop soda tax measures in the Bay Area.  
Video of Wole Soyinka at Ertegun House, discussing Brexit, Trump, Bob Dylan pan-Africanism & Nigerian politics  
Also American friends, I went to bed being told there was NO WAY Brexit was gonna happen. Learn from us. Vote.  
Senior Judges Linked to Pro-EU Group Whose Boss Called for MPs to Block Brexit  
U.K. political parties draw new Brexit battle lines   
"When I came to live here five years ago, the word ‘foreigner’ felt so different from how it does today". #Brexit  
Theresa May defends media after Brexit judges attack  
Sunday evening read: @LawSocPresident talks to @BBCNews on what #Brexit means for the legal sector:  
Al referendum #IoDicoNo, in musica! 
Nigel Farage forced to admit that the EU referendum was only 'advisory'      
We WON'T block Brexit' Corbyn humiliated as Tom Watson says 'British people have spoken'  
Trump and Brexit. Trump and Brexit. Trump and Brexit. All day everyday. And then, hopefully, extinction. 
Is this same J Hunt who argued 4 days after referendum we had to remain in single market?   
Perhaps a little reminder of the text approved by #Labour party conference on #brexit would be helpful :  
Liverpool opens Brexit Britain’s ‘link to the world’  via @FT 
"We voted for no ruin but we accept that ruin must now happen based on a non-binding referendum on an issue voters were lied to about" 
Farage would love Brexit to be obstructed. He could climb on a tank and make speeches. They'd call it the Golf Club Uprising. 
Pro-EU MPs aiming for "soft Brexit" when *any* Brexit is disastrous, wtf are you doing? Ref was non-binding, WE DON'T HAVE TO DO THIS FFS 
BREAKING: Royal family to relocate to Dublin in wake of Brexit. 'We shall stay with that little Michael D chap until we find proper digs.' 
'What part of LEAVE don't you understand?' Farage DESTROYS Brexit court ruling campaigner  
ITAL-EXIT? Europhile Renzi facing crisis as critics round on him before crucial referendum  
Willy Wonka has a little question for @Nigel_Farage @theresa_may and all the hard-Brexit dimwits and hard-right maniacs out there  
Comforting words from Mrs May on Brexit again today, but as Elvis once sang - a little less conversation a little more action please. 
Theresa May Should Have Sacked Sajid Javid For Criticising Brexit Court Ruling - Lord Patten  
A $17 billion investment bank pulled every penny out of Britain because of Brexit vote  
Gina Miller has spoken out over the abuse she has sufered since the Brexit legal challenge  
These companies that have hiked their prices 'because of Brexit' are just greedy f**kers & should be ashamed of themselves. #Brexit  
Famous Five on Brexit Island! Brilliant parody of tory pensioners' pining for the insular 1950s lol  
Be afraid be very afraid Jeremy corbyn has threatened to block brexit if we don't continue to flood Britain with his terrorist friends.LOL 
Violent threats to Gina Miller, inc of acid attack, result from extreme toxicity poisoning Brexit debate, via @ftfm. 
UK PM May: Government will deliver on Brexit despite a court ruling  
Tomorrow's @ScotNational strip 'May Day, May Day!' has a disaster theme. Bawjaws & Brexit Davis get the ball rolling. 1st of 2 previews.  
Clean sheets are for virgins and hard brexit supporters 
Mrs May reveals her secret plan to replace the currency post #Brexit (D.Adams R.I.P)  
Careful Nicola. If courts & Westminster can thwart Brexit  vote they can just as easily thwart an independence vote 
Kristallnacht, Germany, 1938: 'popular' Nazi riots to silence opposition. UK 2016: Nigel Farage threatens riots to enforce 'people's Brexit'  
Nigel Farage forced to admit that the EU referendum was only 'advisory'    
Senior bishop says right-wing press coverage of Brexit judges is 'like something from Nazi Germany'    
"This is no longer just about Brexit. This is about how Britain wants to be governed":  
Meanwhile, we’re a bit distracted over here, but am I right to think that the UK won’t Brexit after all? 
The people have made their choice. Theresa May tells Brexit critics as she vows to battle courts  via @telegraphnews 
'She is vile' Outrage as 'disgusting' NHS worker hopes children of Brexit voters fall ill  
Commons Speaker John Bercow holds the key to #Brexit deadlock. An old constriction law means he can push through #Brexit without MP's vote.  
November 23rd Brexit rally - the chance for all patriots and freedom lovers to be seen and heard. Parliament square ' please attend. Retweet 
"TREXIT." Remember I told you this is our Brexit.  
Labour byelection candidate would vote against Brexit bill  
We talked to Murdoc, founder of @gorillaz, about booze, Brexit and Ringo  
Trump leads with male, white, over-64 and degree-less voters. As with Brexit, their turnout is the real key.  
No surprise to us. All the admins at Jewish Voice received plenty of tweets about a Anti-Brexit Jewish Conspiracy  
Today's update: May v. Corbyn - Leave v. Remain AND reinforcing ties with India, good for Business, good for Brexit 
Contempt for the judiciary and reference to threats of violence; elements of the Conservative party sounding like Mafiosi#Brexit #Remain 
EU Referendum: basically flawed, carelessly designed, no real plan, and badly executed; and 'the will of the people' is farcical & divisive  
So much ignorance about the High Court ruling. Nigel Farage drove the Referendum but can't seen to grasp parliamentary sovereignty, #Marr 
Farage has no rational arguments for Brexit but now, under pressure, he produces what he thinks is his trump card - public unrest & violence  
BREXIT: We’re so appalled that the Justice Minister BACKS parliamentary sovereignty we capitalise it. Cue the hate.  
White riot: How racism and immigration gave us Trump, Brexit, and a whole new kind of politics  via @voxdotcom 
Politicians need to #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum. They are representatives of the people. #Democracy 
Jeremy Hunt says forcing May to reveal Brexit strategy would damage economy – video  
Nicola Sturgeon: David Cameron told me not to be silly when I warned he could lose Brexit vote.  
A People's Brexit was always only advisory however 52% of idiots never realised that ... 17m idiots fooled by the Tory Party 
If the threat of violence is seen to produce political advantage then British democracy is on the road to destruction.#Remain #Brexit 
Why not view this Tory MP's talk of a threat of violence as an attempt to force #Brexit through intimidation #Remain 
Note to Brexiteers: judgements are legally binding; referendum only advisory. It's not remainers who can't accept results. #nobrexit 
Bored with:BrexitClintonTrumpCorbynFarageTasteless cheeseCold windsDead armadillosChristmas advertsLeaves on my carLists 
Tories new proposals to be fitted in classrooms and work spaces.#Marr  #Brexit #indyref2 
Everybody is angry about Brexit. @StigAbell had an solution to the problem. Tune in:  
Ex-Tory chairman Lord Patten calls for Sajid Javid to be sacked for attack on Brexit judges -  
Could you send me a new enemy of the people badge, b/c the one given to me during the reign of Thatcher now looks a bit tatty?  #brexit  
@Bonn1eGreer The Madding Crowd would calm if press published the clear terms of the Referendum Bill 2015 -16 (unnecessary mass hysteria)  
VIDEO of my full interview on @daily_politics today on independent judiciary, Liz Truss, Article 50, Brexit & more:  
Brexit supporter James Dyson wants looser immigration rules... but just in his own industry   
Didn’t it sink?! Brexit will be a ‘Titanic success' - British FM Boris Johnson  
Would you boycott Walkers Crisps? Please retweet for bigger result #brexit 
The current media debate over #Brexit is shifting its x-axis from the UKIP minority to the British First far right fringe. 
Exposed by #Wikileaks: the establishment knows that Muslim migrants will lead to misery for years to come. It's the plan.#Brexit #Nexit 
A Reader Refers Us To Englishman Pat Condell On Brexit, The Trump Election, And “America’s Moment Of Truth”  
.@rickygervais @davecl42 Brexit introduced us to a new phenomenon: the sore winner. (They won the referendum but are afraid they fucked up.) 
If you think the High Court interfered with democracy with its Brexit ruling, you don't understand how Britain works  
#BrexitIt's there in black and white. Sorry folks, we've all been manipulated into this strife... I wonder if there's a reason for it?  
To find your brexit name, just take your normal name and add “is worse off” to it 
It's one thing for turkeys to vote for Christmas, but it's quite something else for them to still want it whilst being stuffed. #brexit 
Exposed! This isn't staged at all, the same girl just happens to be rescued three times, diff location and time. MSM would not lie!#Brexit  
BREXIT #shambles  
Brexit: "will of the people" is misunderstood and a misrepresented concept; more genuine description = 'majority of electorate' who voted. 
Residents in the Bay Area are voting on a referendum that would impose penny-per-ounce taxes on sugary drinks  
So that we all know what is your case that they have frustrated the referendum outcome. Clearly please. So we can understand  
Me on @LBC at 3pm: EVERYONE IS SHOUTING ABOUT BREXIT AGAIN! Judges aren't enemies; Brexiteers don't want anarchy. It'll be OK, won't it? 
We in Ireland know all about referendum results being undermined and overturned. 
.@NicolaSturgeon: the UK government must respect devolved nations on #Brexit.  
WATCH: Farage Tells Anti-Brexit Activist 'What Part of 'Leave' Don't You Understand?'  
Corbyn has offered comprehensive and constructive opposition to the Brexit fiasco. The media have decided to ignore it. Astonishing! 
Brilliant summary of the Remain position by @SamWhiteTky Must read #Art50 #Brexit  
Full list of Remain MPs who could block a Brexit by voting Article 50 down  via @IBTimesUK 
The High Court Brexit ruling and 'transnational rights'Great analysis of a key issue by @franstrumia:  
Ok you can have Marmite, you can even have iPhones, but don't be touching my crisps, Brexit!  
The EU, particularly Germany is scared of how massive UK will be Post #Brexit. The bulldog is going to growl again.   
Corbyn playing hardball safeguarding interests of ordinary families, workers, consumers, R&D & environment!! #Brexit  
This government & the #Brexit press are far greater threats to parliamentary sovereignty & the rule of law than the EU could ever be#Remain 
Do you remember when you said if Remain won with 52% you’d call for a 2nd referendum? I do. 
HRC lacks the judgment, temperament and common sense to be in charge of national security. Brexit. #tcot #ccot #gop #maga 
Like Trump #nigelfarage is a dangerous con artist who threatens civil society and democracy. #brexit  
Love it! Corbyn to force PM into GE in Spring unless she caves into #Labour Brexit demands on trade & worker rights  
If Brexit has taught me anything, it's how many non-entity MPs have Twitter accounts and views a 10 year old would find idiotic  
Has Nigel Farage been awarded some significant role in #brexit as I do not remember the referendum giving it 2him  
"What part of leave don't you understand?" - @Nigel_Farage vs woman behind #Brexit court case, Gina Miller #Marr 
Senior bishop says right-wing press coverage of Brexit judges is 'like something from Nazi Germany'  
Wait... My fish finger sandwiches are potentially going to cost upwards of 10% more? Can we stay in please? #Brexit  
The Observer view on the high court ruling on Brexit and parliament | Observer editorial  
Anger as Walkers increases price of crisps by 10% following post-Brexit slump in the pound  
Blimey! As May sets out to woo India, Cobra magnate @Lord_Bilimoria utterly withering about her, the Government and Brexit just now on #WATO 
Informing citizens about #Brexit plans isn't like giving up the DDay invasion plans it is just being an open govt.  
If you're obsessed by the #Brexit debate, come hear @JolyonMaugham @IanDunt and others discuss at the @BylineFest 
Parliament delegated the decision to the public in a referendum. For pro euro judges to pass it back to a "remain parliament" is a disgrace  
Analysis: Anti-Brexit Parties Could Lose 150 Seats at a General Election  
Word to the wise. #NeverTrump #Brexit  
#Brexit/eers devastated #India wants big increase in visas for trade deal! Free Movement or No Deal? Sound familiar? 
'Only a second referendum on Brexit can fix our democracy'   
Tory peer calls for Sajid Javid to be sacked for slamming Brexit judges 
The Leave campaign vs The experts pre EU referendumThe lies clear for all to see#Brexit #Article50 #Marr #bbcsp 
Theresa May should have SACKED the Cabinet minister who criticised judges on Brexit - says senior Tory 
I think this is fast turning into 'Brexit has jeopardised'... Brexit is jeopardizing Britain's intellectual legacy  
RETWEET if you agree MPs should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum and not seek to frustrate the result  
To claim High Court judges have "tried to stop Brexit" you must either be genuinely stupid or genuinely intent on inflaming the stupid. 
Dominic Raab: 'What you're allowing is die hard remainers to try and frustrate the referendum.'  
Theresa May warns MPs and peers to 'accept what the people decided' on Brexit  
Sajid Javid on #bbcqt criticised those who brought the Brexit court case, not the judges. But Patten thinks he did.  
Tory Cabinet minister shdve bn sacked for his reaction to #Brexit court ruling - says former Tory Cabinet minister  
Nigel Farage goes to war with Gina Miller live on the BBC, and loses…spectacularly [VIDEO]  #Marr #MarrShow #Brexit 
Remember.@UKLabour would NOT have given us an EU referendum.Now, they'll try to SUBVERT the decision of the people.Truly anti-British.  
6. So there should be a new election, with diff. versions of Brexit put to people & new govt implementing version w/ maj support in new parl 
Gina Miller has spoken out over the abuse she has sufered since the Brexit legal challenge  
Why the Brexit judges were right - Me for The Observer.  
The only thing worse than a Trump win is a Brexit-style mass Google search of "What is a Donald Trump?" a day after the election. 
PM "bulldozing ahead" after High Court ruling "foolish indeed" - Brexit Minister Mike Russell tells @Sun_Pol_Scot 
The good news, people, is that my team of legal eagles have concluded that the judgement of the High Court on #Brexit is 'absolute rubbish'. 
There is a disturbing prevalence of contempt for the rule of law among Tory MPs; a stance condemned by Thatcher#Remain #Brexit  
In 2011 the LDs made damn sure in Bill that AV would be implemented if referendum won. More fool on Brexiteers for failing to do same. 
.@walkers_crisps claim to use British potatoes to make their crisps here in Britain yet blaming #Brexit for price hikes. Pure fat cat greed 
My unshakeable predetermined views, moral certainty and limited grasp of constitutional law are of great assistance in this Brexit debate. 
#bbcsp  It seems to me we're still where we were in July on the #brexit dilemmas and choices facing Britain:  
I won't vote to block Article 50 & as @tom_watson has made clear nor will #Labour. #brexit  
65% of Labour voters voted against Brexit. How about standing up for your own team and blocking A50? 
Judges upheld rule of law, sovereignty of Parliament over arbitrary executive power. Nothing on #Brexit. Every citizen should applaud.#marr 
May has vowed to carry out Brexit "in full" despite the High Court ruling on leaving the EU, but will she have to call a General Election?  
'Brexit' is a stupid, made up word-No need to abbreviate important historical events. Battle of Hastings- Bastings. Fire of London-Fundon... 
Hard Brexit through a PM unelected by her party, without parliamentary approval, would be a national disgrace 
We have less than 1000 days until the national elections – which will be a public referendum on Zuma and his ANC #DAPresser 
No such thing as a “Brexit that works for Britain”. 
I wish you would block Article 50 - more people NOW want to remain than leave & #Brexit is the death knell of the UK @jeremycorbyn 
This is the impact of Brexit on 16 Londoners  
There must be transparency and accountability on Brexit terms. We won't block Article 50 but will fight for a Brexit that works for Britain 
#TinPotTheresa says government is 'getting on with Brexit'... in secret, with no scrutiny or accountability  
Regarding #Brexit:Sent to me by an old friend via Farcebook.  
"We can't ask around for the answer until we get the one we want.” @KTHopkins' message for the Brexit ruling judges.  
WATCH: FULL Nigel Farage v Gina Miller Clash Over Brexit [VIDEO]  
'What part of LEAVE don't you understand?'#Farage,#Brexit meaning they got fine.It is DEMOCRACY they don't get! 
Nigel Farage Forced To Admit EU Referendum Not Legally Binding Under Current Law #Brexit #Ukip 
This equates to approximately 3000000 leave voters and 400000 remain voters having changed their minds since the referendum  
Well no, as now MPs can gauge constituent opinion once we know exactly what it will entail, as many voted not knowing what brexit would mean  
A sitting MP misrepresents A50 legal case, fuels distrust of judiciary, paranoia over Brexit & future elections WTF?  
Nigel Farage did say a 52:48 result would justify a 2nd referendum...  
Time for a new political slogan, "Brexit Means Shambles" 
If judges can frustrate a referendum outcome, why can't they sellotape wings to dogs and call them birds?  
Corbyn steps up on Single Market.Thanks to court decision, a wall can be built against hard Brexit: 
End result=1/6th of leave voters regret their vote when only 1/44th of remain voters do-why is May being so stubborn that Brexit must happen  
Gina Miller: Brexit ruling prevents UK from being a 'tin-pot dictatorship'  Good lass! Well done. 
Show this chart to anyone who says Brexit is the 'will of the British people'  
BTW #BREXIT 'fury' at judges unacceptable and ridiculous. No-ones holding anything up. We are leaving the EU, whilst following due process. 
Leave.EU has discovered a video of European Institute of Law President (of Justice Thomas fame) calling for MPs to block Brexit#StopTheRot 
Somebody challenge Tom Watson for Deputy Leader? He makes us look bad. I thought Corbyn nailed it on Brexit this week. All undone now by TW 
Why accept lies written on the side of a bus? MPs have a duty to challenge Brexit!  
Clear marginal mandate for Brexit on the basis of monumental lies - £350M a week to NHS! No Democracy anymore 
Incredibly unhelpful that Corbyn rules out 2nd referendum. Could have used A50 bill to set conditions for it, ie on economic tests in 2018. 
Leavers & Remainers should accept 2 facts: clear mandate for Brexit but no mandate for form of Brexit which is where Parliament comes in. 
Theresa May's attack on foreign students could damage post-Brexit trade with India  
Bang. Remainers, there goes your best economic argument. Just there. Right there. #ukip #brexit  
Not every Brexit voter is a foaming bloody maniac but every foaming bloody maniac is a Brexit voter.  
Maybe we should have a referendum about whether the UK should be a democracy. Or would the government would still miss the irony? 
Tired of tories weaponising "the british people" every time someone questions what Brexit means. We voted for "what" not "how" #marr  
Watch: Nigel Farage forced to admit the EU referendum was only 'advisory', not binding. 
What is wrong with "Tom Watson"? Corbyn puts Labour on the front foot with a #Brexit plan and he slaps it down. We can't afford Watson 
Michael Forsyth claims Leave had an "overwhelming " majority in the Referendum. Not true- it was a close vote in a flawed franchise! 
"We feel like our votes counted for nothing." @KTHopkins is VERY angry at the Brexit ruling judges.  
Al referendum #IoDicoNo, in musica!  
#bbcsp Referendum made no choice on what kind of #brexit (stay in market? in agencies? What trade deal?).For Parliament,not govt,to decide! 
The language of 1930s fascism is fast becoming the language of choice for the Brexit camp! Irresponsible and divisive. 
This is exactly why I voted REMAIN a "tinpot dictatorship" having free reign over #Brexit Thank you Gina Miller #marr 
Most bankers think London will remain Europe's main financial hub after Brexit, poll finds  
NEW: Ex-Tory chairman Lord Patten calls for Sajid Javid to be sacked for attack on Brexit judges -  
.@theresa_may article falsely claims anyone who wants Brexit scrutiny wants to reverse result because no plausible, real argument against it 
Corbyn's 'Brexit ultimatum' is functionally identical to May's existing position. What a total waste of time.  
Nigel Farages concede to Gina Miller she has a point that the EU referendum was only 'advisory' under current law.  
Brexit ruling 'stopped Government acting like tin-pot dictatorship' 
Nigel Farage warns of RIOTS on UK streets if MPs block Brexit  
Nick Clegg branded undemocratic as he plans to use unelected Peers to water down Brexit  #Brexit  
Brexiteers are never going to give up, we won the EU referendum & remainers including MP's will never reverse the vote or shout us down  
With Farage on #Marr (again) it's worth re-reading @PhilipPullman's analysis of the thousand causes of #Brexit.  
 @Nigel_Farage concedes referendum was advisory. Parliament must always be sovereign. 
.@MhairiBlack calls out an 'incredible lack of leadership' on #Brexit & says devolved administrations have been treated appallingly  
Show this chart to anyone who says Brexit is the 'will of the British people'  
Farage actually agrees that the `Brexit referendum was only advisory.  Yet still threatens public disorder.  
Labour to block Theresa May from triggering Article 50 unless she meets party's "Brexit bottom line", Corbyn says  
Bring on Election in Spring unite forge a progressive alliance defeat Tories stop lurch to Far Right Brexit  #bbcdp 
"We are no further forward in understanding what #Brexit actually means" says @MhairiBlack on @pestononsunday 
Progressives still knocking Corbyn's Labour: sure, there are reasons to do so, but this position is basically now facilitating a hard Brexit 
No we really don't. They did not try to stop #Brexit: the remedy is out of their hands: and those who oppose them may not be peaceful.  
Gina Miller: Brexit ruling prevents UK from being a 'tin-pot dictatorship'  
@notgivinguponeu I think a lot of people who didn't get a say get forgotten when "the British people voted for Brexit" is repeatedly used.  
Mrs May defies High Court judgment; demands Parliament waive its right to scrutinise her brexit.FT reader comment: 
The chaos & zero planning for Brexit shows just how incompetent Cam/Osb government was. Now May is set to out do him for blundering!  
Trying to explain Brexit to the rest of the world...  
The People Have Spoken? We Don't Give A Damn:  #Brexit #Ginamiller #politicalclass #Davidicke 
Brexit judgment reinforces the supremacy of parliament  
The Jun 23 #Brexit vote was for a rag bag of incompatible proposals, fantasies and lies. No majority for any real practical #Brexit#Remain 
Lord Patten criticises @sajidjavid and newspaper editors over their reaction to the High Court decision on #Brexit.  
Does the lack of a debate mean the Treaty of Lisbon that Gordon Brown signed in 2007 is illegal? #Brexit 
Brexit press reflects great British freedom to be nasty  
Comparison of how constituencies voted and where their MP's stood on #Brexit.  
The referendum result must be respected. Leave means Leave: out of the single market. #Brexit  
Haha. Poll on  says the UK would be "dumber" after Brexit because, somehow, EU academic would leave the UK universities. Mad stuff. 
POLITICS: Boris Johnson backtracks on ‘titanic success’ statement; claims Brexit will be ‘a Pyrrhic victory for the ages’ instead. 
snp mp brexit stories are to try and split the yes movement 
Never in the #history of #Europe have political rulers opened borders to floods of people with hostile intent#EU.#DrainTheSwamp #Brexit  
Theresa May says she will "get on with the job" and carry out Brexit "in full" despite the Article 50 ruling.  
Leader of the House @DLidington says that even if the referendum wasn't legally binding, it was politically binding.  
Who are the real enemies of the people. My column on the Brexit boorach.  
They didn't try to stop #brexit you ignorant horror. They pointed out that UNDER EXISTING LAW, PARLIAMENT IS SOVEREIGN.Where do you live?  
.@Jeremy_Hunt: general election 'last thing' government & British people want #Brexit #Marr 
I'm live on @daily_politics 11am discussing Liz Truss, judicial independence, Article 50 & Brexit with @Jo_Coburn 
If anyone wants to read some RATIONAL criticisms of the Brexit judgment (arguments exist both ways), see this:  
With help from @FullFact, here is @ITVAllegra's comparison of how constituencies voted and where their MP's stood on #Brexit.  
'They've Cancelled Brexit' should become a hit record. Can one of you music biz types make that happen?  
Excellent piece - The Observer view on the high court ruling on Brexit and parliament | Observer editorial  
Business schools fear Brexit could mess up one of the world's hottest MBA markets  
It's #ShakespeareSunday. Did you know Shakespeare coined over 400 words including: hashtag, brexit, spork, facepalm, lego, magimix & yolo. 
May: I won't allow Remain supporters to tie my hands in Brexit negotiations  
Contagion begins of #MarmiteGate price rises: Walkers crisps up 10%, Birds Eye chicken nuggets up 12.5% in #Brexit Britain 
I've voted Tory for most of my life, but now I see a party recycling significant chunks of fascist ideology. #Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
Damage to our democracy will be worse if parliament blocks Brexit says @Jeremy_Hunt #marr 
.@UKIP leader @Nigel_Farage versus the woman behind #Brexit court case, Gina Miller #Marr 
The last thing we want is a Parliament full of Remainers trying to overturn the referendum and turn Brexit into a dog's breakfast.  
Extraordinary for the Govt's position to be that EU Parliament will vote on UK's Brexit but UK Parliament will not.  
Why the Brexit judges were right | Iain Martin  
A general election is a legally binding process. The referendum is not. But you don't seem to understand the case. 
I like Alex Neil a lot but I'm going to say why I think he is wrong on Brexit & I believe my view reflects that of the overwhelming > 
Hunt on #marr: "damage to the fabric of our democracy would be far, far worse" if people thought "establishment trying to unpick" Brexit 
Labour could block Brexit by voting against Article 50 over single market demands. Call their bluff. #Article50now 
What sort of country has Brexit mutated us into?  
#Marr@Nigel_Farage called for peaceful protest if #Brexit does not happen.A perfectly reasonable stance.Did not mention insurrection.  
We should never have a referendum on anything. Ever again. Keep the voting to general elections and dancing competitions. #Marr 
.@Nigel_Farage warns of 'political anger likes of which we've never seen' if #Brexit halted 
very worrying the PM didn't even read the guidance MPs were given when voting on the referendum bill  
Attacks on judiciary as 'enemies of the people',scapegoating migrants and minorities, holding a referendum/plebiscite - what could go wrong? 
The government made a clear manifesto pledge to implement the will of the British people regarding the EU Referendum.#Brexit #Marr 
Brexit betrayal will lead to 'political anger' says @Nigel_Farage #marr 
Brexiteers said trade with India would improve after Brexit. They couldn't have been more wrong  
Gina Miller: Brexit will be ‘a disaster’ for UK funds  
.@thatginamiller on abuse she's received since her #Brexit court case #marr  
Walker's blame Brexit as they hike crisps price by 10% - they should use British spuds ......... oh wait, they do !  
We in the U.K. do not a lecture from James Rubin on BBC re BREXIT content. The US has shown this country scant friendship in recent years! 
My cartoon - Justice Secretary Liz Truss - who is not a lawyer - criticised for not giving proper support to under fire #Brexit judges  
The Observer not holding back on "sleaze-peddlers" the Daily Mail and other papers attacking judges over Brexit ruling:  
#GinaMiller on #Marr is wholly transparent. Simply an elite using money to try and buy her own referendum result. A sad sad woman - move on 
So the #Brexit story has become about #GinaMiller, her demands, her life, her troubles? What a surprise! Another wannabe #celebrity. #marr 
BREXIT: We confuse food prices,shareholders and exchange rates to undermine a vocal critic of our editorial line.  
Only in the post Brexit insanity is it seen as more democratic to use royal prerogative rather than have parliamentary vote. #marr 
Not only not a single Labour Guest on #marr but not a single mention of Corbyn's massive Brexit statement on the news.. Is this a joke? 
#marr show has Farage vs Gina Miller. Here's our profile of the woman who took the govmt to court over #Brexit  
Sunday morning Full Brexit anyone?#Brexit#FullBrexit#SundayBreakfast 
EU: "We'll check Nissan deal meets state aid rules". No guys. You don't get it. After Brexit, we won't be subject to your rules. 
If we had a fully democratic House of Commons there would be 80 UKIP MPs sitting in it. Which might concentrate minds on Brexit #justsaying 
This Brexit thing is all going just tickety-boo.  
Don't moan that the Referendum has gone wrong. It was always a foolish short cut:  
Brexit: Jeremy Corbyn says Labour could block Article 50  
#Brexit was not about the people taking back control it was about rich exiled tax avoiding press barons holding on to it. 
A $17 billion investment bank pulled every penny out of Britain because of Brexit vote  
Price rises due to falling pound, not being matched by wage rises since #Brexit. Worth it to "take back control".@newsundayherald 
The Observer's editorial on the Brexit judgment is really rather excellent:  
Theresa May fires a warning shot across Parliament's bows over Brexit as she heads off on a trade mission to India  
Absolutely agree with @labourlewis here, people voted to leave the EU not for another Tory omnishambles...#Brexit  
My poll showing that people are prepared to change party loyalties to block #brexit. Hope that is true in #richmond 
The Observer certainly not pulling its punches over Brexit coverage in some papers in recent days...  
Brexit: lawyers confront Liz Truss over ‘dangerous’ abuse of judges  
Let's have a general election and #DrainTheSwamp of Westminster #Brexit  
Imagine Labour going into an election having blocked Brexit in order to defend right of unlimited free movement. Electoral carnage. 
The Observer view on the high court ruling on Brexit and parliament | Observer editorial  
Show this chart to anyone who says Brexit is the 'will of the British people'  
I guess I begin to lean to 2nd referendum. We've had one on principle. Lets go ahead & negotiate detail and take final vote when we KNOW 
#UK Poll: What's your priority? #Brexit #Pound #Sterling #Inflation #EU #Snap #Election #Marr  #SundayBreakfast #ShakespeareSunday 
C'mon off your Brexit emotional high & Engage brain. 
Ukip page points finger at jewish conspiracy against brexit. We've been here before.  
Marvellous editorial. If you have to read one piece on the state of our #Brexit country... 
Gina Miller: Brexit will be ‘a disaster’  
Our unthinking complacency on democracy is scary. 52/48 majority in non binding referendum on motion whose details NO ONE understood is MESS 
‘Italian referendum more about public support for PM Renzi than constitutional reform’ (Op-Edge)  
"Democracy is when the people control the Government" ... Inspirational words from the beautiful Aung San Suu Kyi.#Brexit #LeaveEU #EUref 
I suggest we boycott Walkers and anyone else who exploits Brexit for their own gain:  
WAKE UPSomething is terribly wrong.The lies, deceit, oppression and treachery by the establishment is revolting.#Brexit #Trump 
Does anyone remember voting to open the borders and bring an end to our culture & civilization?No me neither.#DrainTheSwamp #Brexit #Trump 
Britain's economy is like Wile E. Coyote, according to a top Irish banker  
Just for fun, I read the 2015 Referendum Act, turns out it says absolutely nothing about what happens after the poll  
While everyone was in hysterics over Brexit this week, 240 people died in the Mediterranean  
Jeremy Paxman launches stunning take down of David Cameron over Brexit  
Brexit high court decision means nothing has been ruled out  
Jeremy Corbyn says he will only accept Brexit on MY terms BLATANT COMMIE! NO CORBYN BREXIT IS ON THE PEOPLES TERMS  
Show this chart to anyone who says Brexit is the 'will of the British people'  
Now Walker's blame Brexit as they hike crisps price by 10%Only way is Walk Away, boycott them!  
A second referendum on Brexit is the democratic option  
Brexit legal challenger speaks on why she walked out on EU-hating exShe sounds a disaster!  
@solange_lebourg  May's efforts to implement #Brexit have so far been a fiasco, and she wants a free hand to carry on like this? 
Britain’s curry houses voted for Brexit and now massively regret it  
Brexit judgment reinforces the supremacy of parliament  
Those who claim Brexit court case is irrelevant are clearly wrong: MPs will rely on it to scupper the Euro referendum  
Bankers threaten to move from London to continental Europe post-Brexit  
I am a thick uneducated racist old bloke who voted brexit. 
I don't wanna vote for any of these people :(Oh wait, I'm British... We have our own circus in town #Brexit #PresidentialElection 
Residents in the Bay Area will vote on a referendum that would impose penny-per-ounce taxes on sugary drinks  
Where WILL EU find the cash? Tax rises or budget cuts needed to plug Brexit black hole  
New Dutch referendum looms targeting EU-Canada pact  
Parliament must accept Brexit vote was legitimate: UK PM May  
US SPECIAL – The Establishment won’t give us Brexit, we need to get on streets and protest! Pod 3 - #FreeSpeech 
from Dominic Lawson in @thesundaytimes the clearest statement I've read about why the anti-Brexit court opinion is obviously nuts:  
Walkers jacks up crisp prices blaming #Brexit despite them being made in UK with British potatoes  
My response to someone insisting my support of the People's Challenge on Brexit is subverting democracy in favour of some select 'elite'.  
Theresa May says the government needs to deliver Brexit, because the people "have made their choice".  
ReadTech boom at risk as 250 out of 300 firms line up for rush into Europe  #fintech #Brexit @thisismoney 
#Brexit command center.   
Brexit, but for your social graph. 
Prime Minister warns over tying her hands in Brexit negotiationsWe must back Mrs May over BrexitShe must deliver  
EU referendum referred Leave or Remain question to entire electorate. The outcome was in no way a 'victory' but a decision that split the UK 
Fantastic must read The Observer view on the high court ruling on Brexit and parliament | Observer editorial  
UK PM May seeks to boost trade ties with India before Brexit  
If I hear this venom filled woman say the “will of the people again”  It was NOT the will of the people and she knows it #brexit on lies  
Uncertainty due to Brexit making the UK the subject of concerns usually reserved for emerging markets : , by @PIIE 
The Observer editorial calls the Brexit press "the lie factories of Fleet Street"  
#Brexit #Art50 Wonderfully eloquent open letter - Lord Bingham's son writes to @TrussLiz. #wheresliztruss  
#Britain must reject the #EU#WeWantOurCountryBack#BrexitBritain #Marr #Article50 #OpenBritain #No2EU #EUSpring #Brexit  
Jeremy Corbyn: "We are not challenging the referendum. We are not calling for a second referendum."  
#NickClegg the #Brexit saboteurEx #LibDem leader is branded undemocratic#Remainers #OpenBritain #BrexitBritain 
don't Brexit this one 
UK austerity agenda was underlying reason behind Brexit vote, says Sturgeon  via @AOLdotUK 
This is excellent. No excuse nor reason for extremism whatever your stance is on Brexit.  
JK Rowling has the perfect response to Daily Mail's homophobic attack on Brexit judge:  
Let's just give the keys to Nicola SturgeonShe's the rock of sanity in the sea of Brexit turmoil#Remain 
Dangerous & ignorant, @CllrBSilvester. Judges not stopping Brexit, just giving Parliament the sovereignty Brexiters claim to believe in.  
EU now knows all they need is pretend that free market access will be revoked and UK MPs will block Brexit.Quislings. Call GE Theresa. 
Once again, Corbyn absolutely on point when it comes to #Brexit negotiations to work for the many not the few. 'Moderates' should look&learn  
Its remaining that's important to me, everything else is just a tactic to make Brexit fail completely. I think Soft Brexit is also crap etc  
Decision to hold EU referendum appears to have misjudged deeper discontent in society, creating cauldron for intolerance, prejudice & racism  
"Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit" I'm glad we're seeing a proper pro single market stance from Corbyn, so many opportunities and jobs must be saved 
In using an outlandish argument to justify your position re Brexit, you have actually given a solid argument against FPTP   
"PM says UK will get worse deal if forced to get parliament’s mandate" Really? Worse than her planned Hard Brexit?  
#ieWorld UK PM Theresa May looks to strengthen trade ties with India before Brexit -  
Good for Theresa May! Why I will not allow the British people’s vote for Brexit to be sabotaged  
And people say he isnt a strong leader, I love this:Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit ultimatum to Theresa May  
Parliament must accept Brexit vote was legitimate: UK PM May  
'I'll BLOCK Brexit' Corbyn vows to collude with Remain MPs unless PM agrees to HIS demands  general election now!! 
Ah shut up Catweazel)... I will only accept Brexit on MY terms, Corbyn tells Theresa May  @MailOnline 
Depressing to watch @UKLabour sleep-walking through Britain's greatest post-1945 crisis. #Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
Brexit: an advisory referendum allowed to morph into majority demand, irrespective of the consequences. ( See  ) 
Westminster & Brexit "potentially undermining the Good Friday Agreement"#ReverseTheReferendum 
Brexit was bad enough but it never occurred to me that a new PM would decide our future direction with the EU by themselves without a vote. 
Today's 538 elections podcast. At the Neptune Diner with @ClareMalone @farai talking Latino turnout, Brexit and more  
Nick Clegg and the rest of you TRAITORS Read This 
No: woman behind Brexit legal battle *claims to have received* death threats.BBC should get evidence/confirmatrion before reporting as fact  
Defiant Theresa May takes on the Wrexiteers as brazen Nick Clegg BACKS elite's plot to derail will of British people 
Corbyn: Labour to vote against PM triggering Art 50 unless demands met eg gov cover any lost EU investment w #Brexit  
Why I will not allow the British people’s vote for Brexit to be sabotagedBy Theresa May  via @telegraphnews 
Nigel Farage's Brexit rage just got destroyed - in 19 words  
They were happy to let DM do it during Scottish #indyrefMail and Express Brexit case front pages spark outrage   
BrexitRise in hate crimesNHS funding and a system reaching crisis point etc etc etcBut @jeremycorbyn sticks with his agenda 
Theresa May has accused MPs and peers looking to frustrate Brexit of "refighting the battles of the past".  
OUR VIEW: At this moment in time, Theresa May is the best person to deliver #Brexit and she has our full support  
Theresa May appears to have lost all control over Brexit. Corbyn at least has plan, and it's a very good plan for UK business and workers!  
Prime Minister warns over tying her hands in Brexit negotiations  
Theresa May faces angry backlash over 'fascist' attacks on Brexit judges and democracyFull story in tomorrow's paper 
Whoa. Internal polling showing Michigan has tightened - and they've ALL decided to spend the final day of the campaign in Michigan. #Brexit  
History doesn't repeat itself, but it often rhymes.#brexit 
Even Donald Tusk an EU President said UK will have either a Hard Brexit or No Brexit — soft isn't on the menu… So full fat Brexit please  
To get an early general election  May would need a vote of no confidence in herself.  And the Brexit chaos might go on.. My @newsundayherald 
Anti-Brexit ruling reveals staggering arrogance of liberal elites  via @SteveHiltonx #brexit 
The Observer - Comment on #Brexit  
UK's Labour has 'bottom line' for supporting Brexit vote: Corbyn  
"Nobody knowingly votes for their own immiseration" @JananGanesh #Brexit  via @IrishTimesWorld 
It is very worrying when our prime minister supports racism, xenophobia, anti-immigrant sentiment and attacks on the judiciary. Fascism? 
J.K. Rowling responded perfectly to a headline about the Brexit High Court judge being 'openly gay'   
Theresa May: Why I will not allow the British people’s vote for #Brexit to be sabotagedThe lady's not for turning!  
NEW Michael #Fassbender on #brexit (#BritishGQ, 2016) #Interview #GQ #GQUK #Europe #nobrexit 
Trade between Colombia and the UK could grow after Brexit, the country's president says.  
Colombia president welcomes Brexit trade prospect  
BREAKING: UK Labour Party leader Corbyn says party will vote against  Brexit Article 50 if there's no guaranteed access to EU single market 
Britain has become tinged by hate & intolerance b/c of austerity, Brexit & growing supremacy of right wing propaganda found in our tabloids 
The next time you hear someone say that the Tories "have a mandate" or that the "nation has spoken" on Brexit, remember this...  
BREXIT: “The people have made their democratic decision and I intend to use that to do whatever the fuck I want” Theresa May tells critics. 
Don't get lax, y'all. #brexit  
Nigel Farage set a threshold for the EU referendum... 52-48 wasn't a done deal he said  
I say we march on the streets if the Establishment try to revoke Brexit, will you join me? 
People made their democratic decision and a principle is at stake, Theresa May tells Brexit critics  
Theresa May can talk all she likes about the legitimacy of the Brexit vote once she makes good on the promise of £350m a week for the #NHS 
parliament voted 6-1 to allow the referendum.. Now they won't accept result.. 
Proud of Gina Miller. We must leave but the govt should have no monopoly on how we #Brexit and on what terms  
There is no majority for any realistic implementable Brexit. There is no chance of a successful Brexit. There should be NO Brexit.  
While everyone was in hysterics over Brexit this week, 240 people died in the Mediterranean   
TELEGRAPH: May: I am not for turning on Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Every time I think about posting something I imagine how I'd feel if Carnage started lecturing me on Brexit so I just shut the fuck up. 
remainers in all parties should fill vacuum to oppose Brexit knuckleheads if necessary stand as block in any election outside Tory & Labour 
Bad news for crisps fans as Walkers plan to hike prices by 10% - and Brexit is to blame  
I keep hearing anecdotal "Britons thing Trump will win because Brexit taught them a lesson" but only 8% tell YouGov they expect a Trump win.  
told him as a British girl who's being affected by Brexit, thanks for encouraging everyone that every vote counts   
Jeremy Corbyn is taking the fight to the Tories over Brexit negotiations.   
Well said. This govt is condoning mob rule fuelled by non-dom millionaire press tyrants. #blamethetories #brexit  
Ah but the flights will not. Once Brexit happens flights will get expensive. It's one of issues that helped push for Brexit.  
Facebook group for @UKIP supporters claims Jews conspiring against Brexit, prompting calls for Jews to be gassed  
This country is falling into the pit of newspaper & Brexit anarchy when even the Lord Chancellor will not defend the rule of law & judiciary 
Witness start of the right's stab-in-the-back myth where blame 4all the problems of Brexit r heaped on everyone else  
Labour showing itself unable to respond to a historical crisis by doing nothing more than help the Tories in Richmond Park#Remain #Brexit  
A second referendum on Brexit is the democratic option   
...polls didn't see the 2014 Republican wave....oh, and what about #Brexit?  
If I have to explain one more time to some Brexit banana that the High Court Judgement does NOT block Brexit or their 'will', So help me... 
Britain’s curry houses voted for Brexit and now massively regret it   
Brexit, Cubs, Ireland, Trump.The four most unlikely horsemen of the apocalypse. 
Referendum was advisory. Read the Bill. We do not govern by plebiscite. Sovereign parliament with the members of the Parliament deciding.  
Frank Walter Steinmeier a German minister has warned #Remain supporters not to put Britain in limbo over #Brexit.  
Corbyn calls for more transparency over #Brexit  
The judges are not overriding referendum result. They are affirming that parliament cannot be ignored intriggering exit process 
"Unless it again produces what we think is the 'wrong' result, in which case a third referendum will become the 'democratic' option"  
I get the feeling, the people who voted for #Brexit are the same bunch voting for #HoneyG This is why the British shouldn't vote #XFactor. 
I was frightened of what Brexit might do to me. (Which began sooner that I expected.) But now I'm TERRIFIED of what it IS doing to the UK. 
No- a referendum based on blatant lies is wrong... bye!  
"Judges don't have to consider anything but the law." Maajid makes a very important point about the Brexit ruling.  
.Italy is no longer a democratic Country. #PMRenzi is the most unwanted & unpopular leader of history. #Florence #Riots #Referendum  
We need a #Brexit that works for ordinary people, not a chaotic Tory #Brexit that will increase inequality.  
Gina Miller Does what's best for Gena Miller 
Protesters turn out in Florence over Italian referendum  
TRAITORS TO THE BRITISH PEOPLE 
Does anyone have any ideas how to get rid of this Traitor?Nick Clegg - Whitstable oysters are at risk from Brexit.  
Nigel Farage's Brexit rage just got destroyed - in 19 words  
"The #2016election is a referendum of what women can be-and what men can get away with." -@CharlotteAlter 
Mr Brexit! British Towns Are Burning Effigies Of Donald Trump  via @jimwaterson @BuzzFeedUK 
Yes - even I'm prepared to go there to stop #Brexit bigotry. Things can only get better - I want Cool Britannia back - not Cruel Britannia.  
Russia got the Netherlands to attack Ukraine through GeenPeil and a weak referendum law. Now Russia has the Dutch attack Canada. #PutinAtWar 
Jeremy Corbyn issues Brexit ultimatum to Theresa May  
History lesson for the R wing press and those baying for blood German newspaper 1933Daily Mail 2016#brexit  
There were hundreds of Albertans in Brooks today standing up to demand a Carbon Tax referendum today. Let’s stand together. #ableg 
Facebook group for @UKIP supporters claims Jews conspiring against Brexit, prompting calls for Jews to be gassed 
Nick Clegg vows to block Theresa May’s Brexit  
#Brexit is a bit like Nitromors. It strips off the paint and shows you what the wood's really like underneath. 
EXPERT #BREXIT TROLLING just now by Southwark Council fireworks team: launched event with Ode to Joy then "Little Britain" by Dreadzone  
#brexit #remain #leave #exit Jacob Rees-Mogg: "If we're really leaving, we *have* to be out of the single market." 
If Judges can frustrate a referendum outcome, why not the result of a general election that isn't to their liking? 
Jeremy Corbyn calls for transparency over Brexit plans  
Theresa May's entire premiership will rest on her ability to effect Brexit. Think about that before you lose heart. Her legacy is at stake. 
This woman led the Brexit challenge. Now she’s fending off rape and death threats  
Whenever anyone says "The British people voted overwhelmingly for #Brexit" just show them this via @indy100 
How we on social media are shaping opinion of the anger of a nation#Brexit #BrexitBritain #Article30 #LeaveEU 
The Criminal Bar Association's damning criticism of Truss's response to the attacks on the judiciary#Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
Why Parliament voting on Brexit IS what Brexiteers wanted.  
The is no political leadership to fight Brexit. It has taken a non MP to take action. MPs too scared of "will of the people" bollocks 
While everyone was in hysterics over Brexit this week, 240 people died in the Mediterranean  
Tony Blair has called for a second referendum. We think he should #RespectTheResult 
RT: 85% of our followers said they would ignore party loyalties to vote for a #Brexit supporting MP  
Politicians need to #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum  
Theresa May is going to Delhi to pick the fruits of Brexit. As I suggested in this old column, India doesn't see any  
Jeremy Paxman launches stunning take down of David Cameron over Brexit  
Will BBC, SKY, ITV and C4 start to scrutinise the right wing media and esp their behaviour after the judge's decision last week? #Brexit 
Former attorney general Dominic Grieve described the attacks as “smacking of the fascist state”.#Remain #Brexit 
More and more Scots are feeling the same. Your welcome to join us. The kettles on! #indyref2 #Brexit  
We hate 'experts' so no one cares about the damage Brexit is already doing to UK universities  
A second referendum on Brexit is the democratic option  
Trump at rally in NC: "This is going to be Brexit, this is going to be special...we're winning everywhere"  
He's such an idiot. Brexit was ahead. Reluctance to believe it.  
Trump in NC, "This is going to be Brexit!" He might be right. Unless you get to the polls and stop him. 
A reminder of what the polls predicted before Brexit:Brexit. 
Trump says he's going to win, touts NC polls, then says, "This is gonna be Brexit!" Which implies defying the polls. 
Racist attacks on Gina Miller disgusting because succeeded in court in ensuring Parliament has say on Art 50 #brexit  
Britain’s curry houses voted for Brexit and now massively regret it  
An incredible %64 turnout among under 25s in the UK could not stop Brexit. Tuesday is on you, millennials. 
The People Have Spoken? We Don't Give A Damn:  'Brexit #Ginamiller #politicalclass #Davidicke 
MPs should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum and not seek to delay or frustrate the result  
@mitchellvii From 26:08, BrandsEye (which predicted Brexit) finds 90% of ppl online in FL pro-Trump or anti-Clinton  
We were promised a 'Common Market' but got a 'Federal EU' promised a referendum on Lisbon but denied, finally we have a mandate and now this  
FACT: Had the Remain campaign won the 2016 EU Referendum. They, supporters and judges would have declared it a mandate, and not advisory. 
Good to have clear, strong @UKLabour policy on biggest question facing country from Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer 
Hahaha. #Brexit = a donkey with a strap-on. Alex Bicknell, you are my hero!  
BREXITERS: Simulate Hard Brexit and celebrate Guy Fawkes night at the same time by burning down your local industrial estate 
READ @GiselaStuart's compelling article on Brexit for @ProgressOnline  #ChangeBritain 
Bill Maher on Brexit48% voted for Sense and Sensibility52% voted for Pride and PrejudiceSpot on in so many waysFeel I've lost my country 
"Nobody in UK wants barbed wire & armored cars back on N Irish border. Yet Brexit is meaningless without them" 
Juncker warns European industry not to cut own Brexit deals  
A note to @LTHLondon and other folks on how the country actually works.It's not reality tv.via @thetimes#Brexit 
A second referendum on the Brexit deal would be fair – and democratic | The Independent  
Cat, meet pigeons. Sinn Fein haven’t taken their seat in Westminster for 98 years. Now they could to block Brexit  
There's a rise in xenophobia in this country a hateful evil political agenda pursued through anti immigrant ideological Tory Brexit 
As a practising QC & legal writer I frequently say that #judges have got it wrong but I don't doubt their integrity #Article50 #Brexit 
If #brexit is partly about deciding who we want to be as a nation let's at least agree we don't lynch people for doing their job 1/3 
Will 'taking back control' cost us our freedom? In this week's issue, @DenisMacShane explores 10 freedoms we will lose post-#Brexit  
Taken 48 hours for UK government to back #Brexit judges targeted as "enemies of the people"   
Lots of people including me will be very happy to see this lot go up in flames tonight. #LewesBonfire #Brexit #BonfireNight 
Brexit is not working for all the British people, #Scotland help the #Remain camp to #stopBrexit  
Out in Crewe campaigning for by electionPeople are very angry at the Judges trying to stop #Brexit and Lab wanting 2nd #EURefOUT means OUT 
Yup, that's on point. Paxman says Cameron terrible. In referendum, made no case for staying in.  
Brexit and UK universitiesGreat article by @lindakinstler for @TheAtlanticquotes from @acgrayling @anandMenon1: 
Germany is desperate not to lose Britain's intelligence-gathering capabilities in the #Brexit negotiations  
If @theresa_may thinks the bulk of the public wants a hard Brexit she must believe we are a nation of irrational far-right dunces. We aren't 
David Lammy is on the loose again. If all MP's voted like that then Brexit wins, Remain loses; Huge own goal for him  
Tweet of the Week: Quote from anonymous Leave campaigner on 14 July in @GaryGibbonBlog's Breaking Point #Brexit book  
US sports presenter Gina Miller mistaken target of online Brexit abuse  
White riot - How racism and immigration gave us Trump, Brexit, and a whole new kind of politics:Via @voxdotcom 
Today -5 november 1688-Dutch Prince William landed in Brixham, Torbay. Starting 'glorious revolution' which made him King of England #brexit  
Don't give up on pushing back against the ignorance and xenophobia that caused #Brexit. Remember Jo Cox. Think of future generations.  
There was a slim majority for a collection of incompatible promises, fantasies & lies. There is no majority for any real #Brexit#Remain 
‘Unforgivable’ David Cameron put Tory interests first with referendum, says Jeremy Paxman | The Independent  
#UK 'more flexible' out of #EU: #Chinese investors say #Brexit has opened up major opportunity!  #BBC #SKY #ITV #NEWS 
MESSAGE to all #MP's in #Westminster If you defy the people & stop #Brexit, I promise you will be sorry!  #BBC #TORY 
Mischief-making behind the High Court ruling will merely strengthen support for #Brexit. Just like project fear did  
"Judges don't have to consider anything but the law." @MaajidNawaz makes key point about Brexit ruling backlash . 
Half those who voted Brexit are considering changing their minds after truth and consequences revealed. Brexit is DOA. 
Brexiteers said trade with India would improve after Brexit. They were wrong  
A sure sign that people are getting sick to the back teeth of Elsie and her constant whinging & moaning & threats of a referendum.  
I've seen a lot of Americans joke about Brexit; mother fucker your next president is either trump or hillary. 
Write a letter to your MP saying you voted for #Brexit, knowing full well what Leave meant, & you want the UK out of the Single Market ASAP  
Lord chancellor bows to pressure to support Brexit judges  
If the @theresa_may government thought it has the competence to negotiate a good Brexit deal they would drop the appeal & go to Parliament 
If a bored spoiled rich woman can question a referendum on behalf of her hairdresser in High Court then Britain has become a joke. #Brexit 
UK backs judicial independence after judges face Brexit heat  
Show this chart to anyone who says Brexit is the 'will of the British people'  
And we're off! Unlike Brexit, the talking is over. Let's go to work  #rugby #rugbyunited #BARvSA 
We must constantly hammer home the point that there is no majority for any realistic implementable #Brexit plan. #Remain #YesEU 
How many Frigates would have been built on the Clyde if the SNP had won their deceitful independence referendum in 2014?ZERO.  
Leave morons seem incapable of grasping that the High Court judgment on Article 50 was not about the pros and cons of Brexit but procedure. 
My impression is that it is only now after June 23 that a large grassroots pro-EU movement has emerged.#Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
tRuthLess Davidson shouting about how #indyref  divided ScotlandBut has nothing to say about the huge UK divide caused by her Tory Brexit  
After Spectator gave him Lifetime Award,now Times picks Nigel Farage as Briton of the Year. Without him there would have been no referendum.  
Head of India’s largest business association: 'Trade with India will suffer a “double hit” because of the Brexit & decline pound' Eat that.  
Right #TheresaMay Put THIS in front of Parliament next week and call the #Remoaners bluff. No more hesitation - #Brexit now.  
My legal eagles are studying the High Court judgement and will prepare a case to be submitted to police against the three judges. #Brexit 
We will achieve #Brexit if it takes an election purge of Europhiles or 1,000 new peers to get there  #BBC #TORY #UK 
new Lab candidate in #RichmondPark on article 50/Brexit, y'day. still line? Good attitude, maybe.But not corb policy  
The British pound has not yet recovered from Brexit. What do you fools think Trump will do to the dollar? 
Why isn't our PM condemning the Daily Mail? Perhaps because she's working hand in glove with Dacre #brexit 
What an absolute mess Cameron, worst Prime Minister in living memory, left behind him. I really do hope he isn't sleeping well. #brexit 
This week in effect three people decided that millions may have to vote again if Brexit is to actually happen. 
Good piece by @SteveHiltonx on how our vile Establishment is gearing up to overturn referendum result.  
Rather brilliant on the judges, parliament and Brexit, by @YvetteCooperMP 
Liz Truss finally speaks over backlash to High Court Brexit ruling. Fails to actually defend judges  
So it's ok for parliament to cede sovereignty to the EU for 45 years, but not to delegate a single decision to the British people #brexit 
One of the most annoying things for me in the Brexit aftermath was realising that some Brits pronounce Theresa as 'Treeza'. So irritating. 
How is upholding the Brexit referendum "anti-democratic"? Neocon doublethink at work here.  
The decision of the three unelected Judges on #Brexit has turbo charged the support for @UKIP 
Lawyers ask UK Lord Chancellor to publicly back ruling that Parliament must ok the start of Brexit talks  
A UKIP councillor is demanding "peaceful demonstrations" at the homes of the 3 judges behind the #article50 decision#brexit  
Law on ##Brexit case is not clearThe 3 Judges just part of establishment attempt to delay then stop BrexitPeople are seethng with anger 
Remainers have to accept the referendum vote, Brexiters have to respect parliamentary process. Can we all calm down a little? 
Brexit: barristers urge Liz Truss to condemn 'unjustified' attacks on judges  Staggering silence from Truss 
It’s winner takes all on Brexit island, because the audience demands it | Marina Hyde  
Jeremy Corbyn: government must reveal Brexit plans ‘without delay’ – video  
German economists hope "constructive" talks will avoid Brexit, despite referendum result  
Someone should inform Nicola Sturgeon that if UK Parliament can block Brexit it can also block a Yes vote 
The woman behind the Brexit legal challenge says she’s received death threats   
2. The judgement is NOT an attempt to prevent Brexit. It simply sets out the process by which it should be done. Parliament not exec.#bbcaq 
#wheresLizTruss trends on Twitter, mocking Justice Secretary for delay in defending judiciary over Brexit ruling 
If you were hoping the leader of the Labour Party would say something important about Art 50, Brexit etc today - look at news and despair. 
Post-Brexit UK: Factions of govt colluding with media, causing a constitutional crisis.Sound familiar, USA? 
"Now I feel like I'm behind a wall put up by the Brexit lot" - well said Mr Elliott, millions of us feel the same @TheNewEuropean 
Brexit is jeopardizing Britain's intellectual legacy  
We were deceived – only a second referendum on Brexit can fix our democracy  
PM's approach to Brexit unravelling. The economy must be a top priority. @Keir_Starmer @Classthinktank #classconf16 
"The personal vilification of the judges .. this week has been appalling":  @Keir_Starmer on the Brexit legal ruling #classconf16 
No BREXIT? NO TAX! Judges & MPs expect us to pay them while they defy our wishes. We will stage the biggest TAX REVOLT in British history.  
Brexiteers said trade with India would improve after Brexit. A business chief disagrees  
Is this the end for Brexit?  
'Will of people' rhetoric worrying.Of course,respect referendum to pursue Brexit.NOT to consult people & MPs on what it means, undemocratic 
With #brexit stalling@UKIP need strong leaderIf possible who would you vote forRe-tweet please 
Why the High Court got it wrong about Brexit  
What Judges did is all part of establishment's plan to delay & then stop #BrexitThe elites think us plebs are thickWe have got them sussed  
Keir Starmer tells @skynewsniall press attacks on High Court Brexit ruling "completely unacceptable" & government should "loudly condemn it" 
Brexit: barristers urge Liz Truss to condemn 'unjustified' attacks on judges  
"Burn the Witch": Today's cartoon on the fallout following the Article 50 ruling by the High Court #Brexit  
Why not let May & the press decide what #Brexit means?Who needs a parliamentary democracy or judiciary anyway? So 20th C#enemiesofthepeople 
The vicious assault on UK judges by the Brexit press is a threat to democracy | Charles Falconer Media muckheads.  
News: SNP MSP responds to claims they were gagged by Sturgeon over Brexit views -  "Mmmf pmfhhh mmn nmupfh!" 
If the EU were a proper union run like a civilised entity it would help rather than hamper Britain leaving it. #Brexit 
Warnings about risks to London's clearing business and 100,000 jobs "are no exaggeration"  
Brexit is going to happen - and the judges aren't stopping it #Premium 
Britain’s curry houses voted for Brexit and now massively regret it  
A second referendum on Brexit is the democratic option  
"Nobody said it was advisory."Tweet below,from fortnight before referendum.  
This is good.  Labour can't get its act together on Brexit  
Anti-Brexit parties would win 150 fewer seats than pro-Leave parties at a general election, analysis suggests  
Will #Brexit affect our long-term political influence in Europe, Peter Hoare wants to know:  
Jeremy Paxman hits out at David Cameron over 'unforgivable' Brexit vote  
This is no longer about Labour - a dire refusenik opposition leader is bad for the Country especially in constitutional crisis of Brexit.  
The vicious assault on UK judges by the Brexit press is a threat to democracy and a huge cost to our freedoms: 
Romanian Ambassador crystal clear at #Brexit conference: 'Romania will insist on free movement of persons.' This is political, and personal.  
Would you take to the streets in protest if May doesn't bring in BREXIT by March?  - Pod 1 -  #FreeSpeech 
How about pressing for no Brexit? How about being effective opposition? You useless man. 
Theresa May responds to calls for her to defend the Brexit judges from personal attack...  
We need this man back as UKIP leader. He is the one with the balls to stand up for the people who voted BREXIT!  
A snap general election is the only way we can heal our Brexit wounds | @janemerrick23 
Please RT to support Bar Council call on #Lord Chancellor to condemn media attacks on Brexit ruling judges  
May's immigration dilemma: Delhi expected to demand visa liberalisation as price for post-Brexit trade deal.  
There is no realistic version of Brexit that's not going to leave significant numbers of Leave voters feeling massively aggrieved/ betrayed. 
The whole point of the Leave campaign was to let people believe they were getting whatever their personal fantasy version of Brexit was. 
judges being threatened for having had the audacity 2apply UK law to a UK legal question #brexit  
The vicious assault on UK judges by the Brexit press is a threat to democracy  
Brexit's delay is met with fair, balanced news coverage (just kidding)  
Almost all the political predictions of Brexit have come true: the collapse of the centre, the deterioration of language, the creation of an 
MPs: it is your duty to vote/act in national interest. You must not abide by vote of advisory referendum if you believe country will suffer 
Devastating & unnecessary austerity, a referendum that has split the country...all courtesy of? The Tory party. Their interests before yours 
Barristers urge Liz Truss to condemn attacks on Brexit ruling judges  
Retweet if you believe @nick_clegg should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum  
If the referendum had been a general election, the Leave Party would have a majority of 166 seats #RespectTheResult 
Here are the #brexit judgment facts. Why are MPs, commentators and newspapers on all sides not saying this to the public? #WheresLizTruss 
 Bar Council calls on Liz Truss to condemn 'serious and unjustified attacks on the judiciary' after Brexit decision 
Homophobic attacks have increased by 147% in the three months after the Brexit vote  
PACK IT IN CLEGG: Now Lib-Dem MP insists OYSTERS are under threat from Brexit .THIS GUY NEEDS TO GET A JOB..#MORON.. 
"t’s winner takes all on Brexit island, because the audience demands it" by @MarinaHyde . 
We'll talk #Brexit and #Article50 when @RichardBurgon joins @Jo_Coburn on #bbcsp (Sunday 11am BBC1) 
It's v amusing that unionists are angry that SF may take their seats in parliament in order to, y'know, back the referendum decision of NI 
Jeremy Corbyn diving into the Brexit debate like...  
Bar Council urges Lord Chancellor Liz Truss to condemn "unjustified attacks on judiciary" over court Brexit ruling  
@oflynnmep at @BrugesGroup "I hope everyone here will agree with me that if was not for @Nigel_Farage we would not have had referendum" 
@BrugesGroup Listening to @oflynnmep at the "What #BREXIT Means!" conference. Without Nigel & UKIP we wouldn't have had an EU referendum  
In 20 mins on my @LBC show 1) Judges &Brexit 2) Celebrity Clintonites 3) Rotherham cover up. Listen globally via app  
#Breaking Bar Council calls on Lord Chancellor to condemn "unjustified" attacks on the judiciary following High Court Brexit decision  
Bar Council calls for Justice Secretary Liz Truss to condemn "serious attacks on judiciary" after Brexit ruling  
Scotland must be at the forefront of the battle to block Brexit, writes Henry McLeish in @ScotNational 
A Dutch referendum could derail the ratification of #CETA,  #TTIP #ICS @janycemcgregor @stevenchase @TNInstitute 
Defend democracy - end chaos and secrecy in the Brexit process - speech to @Classthinktank 
District of Columbia to hold referendum on becoming 51st US state  
Freedom or 'fool's errand'? D.C. to vote on statehood referendum  
Show this chart to anyone who says Brexit is the 'will of the British people'  
UK 'more flexible' out of EU: Chinese investors say Brexit has opened up major opportunity  
Bar Council has condemned press attack on judiciary following High Court's ruling on Brexit and calls on Liz Truss to make public statement 
Dr Naushad Forbes of the CII is highly optimistic about the Brexit opportunites for enhanced UK-India trade  
We shouldn't be having a Brexit at all, @jeremycorbyn. Thanks in part to a weak Labour leadership we are in this mess. 
Vitriol and stupidity of some #brexit supporters on vivid public display : 
Judges ruling didn't say that #Brexit shouldn't happen or be delayed but that, "Brexit must be done constitutionally not unconstitutionally"  
Gilsela Stuart on must stop talking about Brexit as if entire country voted for it. It's irresponsible. 37% of electorate voted for Brexit 
November Surprise: How the markets are playing the risk of another Brexit   
The best Brexit in the nation's interests is no Brexit, Jeremy. You can't help people if UK is broke. You need to fight it 
"Tory MPs call on PM to speak out on 'chilling' media coverage of Brexit ruling"  # via @HuffPostUK 
401 out of 632 MPs represent constituencies which voted for #Brexit in the referendum.  
The vicious assault on UK judges by the Brexit press is a threat to democracy | Charles Falconer  
Worried about Trump & Brexit? In Turkey they already have fullblown tyranny. This is appalling news  
Has anyone else noticed that all the hatred and threats come from the side who "won" the referendum?  
Nigel Farage's Brexit rage just got destroyed - in 19 words  
Idea for Jeremy Corbyn.Government’s in chaos over Brexit; people calling to overturn rule of law; hatred being stoked. Maybe get involved? 
This by @1jamiefoster on the wretched bloody lawyers trying to subvert Brexit is a must-read  
If you liked Brexit, wait till you see Stockholm  
Isn't a shame Guy Fawkes couldn't blow up parliament now. Serves those MPs opposing brexit right. 
Reading Craig Oliver's book on Brexit. George Osborne scathing about Stronger In team, wonder if they regret not setting up two campaigns?  
Fearless judges  protect the rights of all citizens. Brexit judgment demonstrates judicial independence. Should be praised not hated. 
MPs demand Theresa May take action over Brexit media 'inciting hatred'  
.@jeremycorbyn at #classconf16 - we must have accountability in parliament for Brexit plans & no secret deals for individual companies 
UK lawmakers demand end to attacks on Brexit ruling judges  
Fair point. This is a more accurate depiction of #Brexit being on track  
.@jeremycorbyn demands @theresa_may sets out her #Brexit plans "without delay" following High Court ruling  
You can't have a Brexit until you depose the monarchy. Now go back to being good little serfs and STFU. 
Ask anyone in #Greece or #Spain if they think the #Euro has been good for their Country?#Brexit #BrexitBritain #remain #OpenBritain #No2EU 
My #Brexit tweet yesterday seems to have caused a bit of a stir - here it is again in case you missed it.  
Please share widely. #Brexit call for papers. Email submissions to @DrAishaKGill a.gill@roehampton.ac.uk. Deadline 16th December 2016. 
Brits don't get they are subjects, not citizens. Brexit kerfuffle hopefully disabuses them of this false premise.  
BREXIT LATEST: Apparently, the High Court had no constitutional right to even rule on the 'Btexit vote' as the issue is non 'judiciable'. 
Sterling soars on Trump jitters and Brexit hopes  
Show you won't be bullied!Tshirts £20Hoodies £35Tote bags £1010% to Help RefugeesDM to order.#brexit  
Hedge fund manager says stocks may plummet 80% and Britain is destined to have a recession  
Ukip has a vested interest in creating a betrayal myth around Brexit. Their future depends upon it. Something to bear in mind. 
Parliament SquareSW1A 2 London, United Kingdom.....................................PRO BREXIT DEMONSTRATION 23 NOVEMBER   1300 hrs  
Picture 2 should now become the official Brexit logo  
RT the British people will not stand by while The High Court Betrays Brexit Vote, Destroys Theresa May’s Plans -  
The People Have Spoken? We Don't Give A Damn:  #Brexit #Ginamiller #politicalclass #Davidicke 
The EU has a track record of rejecting referendum results. We must not allow the will of the British people to be ignored or delayed#Brexit  
Theresa May told to act to calm Brexit ‘mob’ anger  
Brexit means defending UK laws & courts - even if this annoys Brexiteers. Spectator leader:  
Do you believe Parliament is sovereign? Should they decide terms of #Brexit when triggering #Article50? Retweet after casting your vote. 
There is rise in xenophobia in this country a hateful evil political agenda is being pursued through ideological Tory Brexit @CriminologyUK 
The prayer of St Augustine of Brexit"O Lord, please give us parliamentary sovereignty, but not yet" 
Tory MPs call on PM and justice secretary to speak out on 'chilling' media coverage of Brexit ruling #wheresLizTruss  
PM @Theresa_May urged to calm #Brexit court backlash 
Nicola Sturgeon: David Cameron told me not to be silly when I warned he could lose Brexit vote  vía @scotnational 
Stephen Phillips MP resigns over May's Brexit strategy.  
#Brexit- the Movie: Tom Cruise is an openly gay, ex Olympian fencer, branded an enemy of the state, now on the run from the law he upholds. 
In an early General Election, would you lend your support to another party to ensure a #Brexit  supporting MP won your local seat? 
My cartoon - hard #Brexit in a nutshell  
Having LOST the #Brexit vote, the howling left scream that we MUST let Parliament decide on it They don't get how democracy works, nor care. 
Parliament delegated the decision to the people in a "leave or remain " referendum. That's it.  
Anti-Brexit parties would win 150 fewer seats than pro-Leave parties at a general election, analysis suggest  
May told to act to calm Brexit ‘mob’ anger, So 17.4m citizens outraged at their will being subverted is “a mob”?  
This conversation continues to strike a chord. Watch James O'Brien illuminating chat with an angry Brexit voter.  
Exactly when did ANY Remain campaigner warn "BTW, whatever the Referendum result it's not binding & we'll need another vote in Parliament"? 
The vicious assault on UK judges by the Brexit press is a threat to democracy | Charles Falconer  
Calm down! @TheTimes reflects on the volcanic over-reaction to Thursday's #Brexit judgment  
#Brexit is so far no more than a hand-waving slogan. There is no sign of majority support for any implementable #Brexit plan#Remain #YesEU 
Daily Mail Article 50 #Brexit court case headline  inspires Soho Bikes chalkboard message  that went viral  #cycling 
Nick Clegg says he will amend Brexit legislation to force both a 'soft Brexit' and a referendum on the final deal.  
Brexit is Jeopardizing Britain's Intellectual Legacy  
Now clear @TheSNP &Nicola's credibility as champion of Scotland's #Remain voters is in tatters after news that wing of party backed #brexit 
Trump, Brexit. Shite, jobby. 
L.Chancer Truss swore an oath to protect the judicial system but does zero to protect or stand by these Brexit ruling judges- Disgraceful.  
All this Brexit crap about "elites". When you're on the operating table do you want a surgeon or a binman holding the knife? 
Indeed. The @EconForBrexit group is growing - like the economy - not quite what Economists Against Brexit predicted  
Big news revealed on @thetimes letters page today. It appears that members of "Economists for Brexit" group are now into double figures.  
Jeremy Corbyn says Theresa May must reveal full details of her plans for Brexit 'without delay'  
Ministers are preparing for an early election. We cannot let Brexit be stopped by our current pro-Remain parliament 
New post | Courts, democracy and Brexit: Some home truths  
Where are these nasty Remainiacs dug up from and this is a nurse my god @willowbrookwolf #Brexit  
PRO #BREXIT MEDIA POLL-Plz RTShould elements of the media incitingXenophobia/killings & intimidating judiciaryEnd their self policing? 
The House of Lords has suddenly come into its own – white knights in ermine could rescue us from Brexit yet  
BREXIT ELECTION: If a General Election is called, the British will once and for all send a message to Parliament that Brexit MEANT Brexit. 
My bit on Brexit Island  
PM urged by Tory MPs to defend independence of judiciary after attacks on High Court judges who ruled over Brexit  
'They feel rejected': how Germans in Britain are dealing with the Brexit vote  
Hilary Benn talks calm good sense on Brexit row on R4 Today, a chip off the chippy old block, but a wiser, more honest chip 
#ProjectFear?FTSE GDPExportsTourismJobsManuf PMIRetail SalesInflationHouse PricesMortgage ap#Brexit 
Bonfire of the Sanities... Today's @thetimes  cartoon. #highcourtruling #enemiesofthepeople #brexit #GuyFawkesnight 
In this climate...makes total sense. And then you add the whole Brexit nonsense on top?.... I'm surprised it's not all thunder sticks  
Jeremy Paxman launches stunning take down of David Cameron over Brexit  
Interesting to hear #Brexit plaintiff Gina Millar suggesting on @BBCRadioScot that @ScotGov involvement in case would be helpful 
'Unforgivable' David Cameron put Tories before UK in Brexit, says Jeremy Paxman  by @BlewettSam 
#Brexit give us our sovereignty back. Just not yet. We don't like the answer. Cartoon by Ben Jennings  
Never forget. This man created #Brexit chaos because of an internal Tory party feud. He then knighted his mates  
Snap Election:Huge Leave MajorityLabour Wipe Out Hard BrexitH'mmm..there's a thought 
BREXIT UPDATE: General Election Would Bring Landslide For Brexiteer MPs As Remaniac EUrophiles Would Be Decimated  
To those who voted Leave out of concern immigrants would take their jobs, fear not. Brexit will destroy your jobs before they get the chance 
Have you seen this woman? last heard on #r4today, didn't turn up to defend judiciary under attack #LizTruss #elizabethismissing #brexit  
There is nothing good about #brexit 
If the PM needs a General Election in order to deliver Brexit and take back control from a EUrophile Establishment Judiciary, then so be it. 
While everyone was in hysterics over Brexit this week, 240 people died in the Mediterranean  
Selling newspapers by pandering to people's fears & prejudices whilst pretending to be anti-establishment #brexit  
Letters: The mischief-making behind the High Court ruling will merely strengthen support for Brexit  
OWEN SMITH CALLS FOR 2ND REFERENDUM !BUT HE IGNORED THE RESULTS OF THE 1ST ONE ... WHAT IS THE POINT OF A 2ND ?#Brexit #LeaveEU #EUref 
I say Corbyn must set out anti-Brexit plan without delay  
The regressive left think you enter a negotiation by declaring your hand to the other party. Cosmic grade stupid #brexit 
Jeremy Corbyn tells Theresa May: the court has ruled - now set out your Brexit plans 'without delay.'  
Those posho ponces at the Beeb want Theresa May to pacify us while shitehawk judges rob us of our Brexit victory.No chance, Sundance! pic.twitter.com/lJ22CnPYIR 
Revealed: Brexit appeal judges' EU links  via @telegraphnews 
This woman led the Brexit challenge. Now she’s fending off rape and death threats   
Daily Mail call Brexit judges enemies of the people. Let it be known D Mail is enemy of us all the most undermining institution 
Be honest. The Right Wing toffs who fight for Brexit don't care about immigration. They want a captive state that does their bidding on tax. 
SNP in bid to 'gag' MSPs over Brexit vote  
The whole torment over #Brexit and democracy underlines the fact that it's difficult to fit in a referendum within a parliamentary democracy  
Brexit issue reopens-air hostess from Norfolk says 'Is Court supreme or" !Court wants parliament vote..Uncertainty!  
While everyone’s distracted by Brexit, Theresa May drops a privatisation bombshell (privatise BBC radio)  
The political Left are outraged that those of us who voted to instruct the Govt to Brexit are outraged they want to stop us #hypocrites 
Impossible to disagree with this. Cameron is a Twat. Jeremy Paxman brands David Cameron ‘unforgivable’ over Brexit  
PM is "confident" that the govt will win its appeal against a High Court ruling on triggering Brexit talks. Will she deliver a full Brexit?  
Nigel Farage wins lifetime achievement award for Brexit role at Parliamentarian ceremony  
Jeremy Corbyn calls for more transparency over Brexit plan. Here's the deal, Jeremy. The plan is we leave. Period   
PM urged to calm the backlash against Brexit ruling. How DARE we feel outraged when our decision is subverted?  
Brexit has caused havoc already. Now parliament must save us  
The Right-Wing Press Is Using Brexit To Beat Anyone Who Doesn't Agree With Their Single-Minded Rhetoric  
The #Brexit side don't have legal arguments so they attack the judges personally in a wholly unacceptable and dangerous way.  
Another referendum is on the way that could topple a PM and shake the EU  
Of all the attempts to reconcile residual unease about the EU & a landscape of Brexit angst within a single Genesis analogy this is the best  
Martin McGuinness ‘refuses to rule out Sinn Fein taking Westminster seats for first time to block Brexit’  
Dear @jeremycorbyn. Can you pls give us an analysis of why the Left must facilitate Brexit and not challenge the most malign Tory Govt ever? 
The vicious assault on UK judges by the Brexit press is a threat to democracy | Charles Falconer  
Corbyn urges May to set out Brexit plans 'without delay'  
Brexit was powered by journalism. My trade cannot be allowed to run roughshod over the courts as well as the polity 
Judges rocked by backlash after Brexit ruling in @ftwestminster And still nothing from the Lord Chancellor @trussliz 
There were some very good reasons to favour Brexit. It's just that you don't know themTry reading David Owen,the former Foreign Secretary  
Good readLocation, location, dislocation: banks in #Brexit office dilemma  @JudithREvans #fintech @ft 
The High Court Betrays Brexit Vote, Destroys Theresa May’s Plans -  
lmao larry hey how's your brexit going  
#Brexit means a new trade deal with the inter-dimensional Hell realms. Goodbye second homes in Provence, hello to a cell in Pandemonium! 
It appears we have a movement ... Get up, stand up: don't give up the fight !#Brexit #LeaveEU #leave #EUref #Votedleave #VoteLeave 
I'm ashamed of the British Establishment.The soul of the UK, the thought that people matter ... has gone.#Brexit #LeaveEU #EUref #leave 
First Brexit. Then Cubs win World Series. Feels like 2016 is year of miracles. Foreshadows Trump win on 11/8/16. Angels helping America.  
"Martin McGuinness ‘refuses to rule out Sinn Fein taking Westminster seats for first time to block Brexit  
Britain’s Elite Does What Ours Expects to Do to a #Trump Presidency  #Brexit #Elections2016 
PM urged to calm the backlash against Brexit ruling  
The remainers should have challenged the process before the referendum if they weren't happy.Not simply because they lost.#Brexit  
The illusion that Leave won Referendum by a large majority, (actually 1.99%)  needs constant debunking. 
Thank you, thank you. We're stronger! Support for EU exit and implementing Article 50 booms after 'Brexit betrayal'  
WTF BREXIT? Loving the @CNN Snapchat Discover voice. News by young people, for young people. 
HRC is in panic mode. Spending the last weekend in states that Barry won. Big Brexit Brewing. #tcot #ccot #gop #maga 
UKIP leadership favourite Paul Nuttall would hold a referendum to bring back the death penalty. Should we be appalled at the idea of this?  
2 Tory MPs resign over Heathrow & Brexit but 0 over savaging social security, failed austerity experiment or gagging 3rd sector  #priorities 
Brexit can be an opportunity to develop the macroeconomic, adaptive and shaping capabilities global firms need  
In the year of Brexit, the US of A can follow 2 terms of the first black President by rejecting Trump & electing the first female President. 
If you're thinking about voting for #Trump & think it won't matter, remember: no one thought #Brexit would pass. And now UK melting down. 
How did the British feel the weekend before Brexit? 
The vicious assault on UK judges by the Brexit press is a threat to democracy | Charles Falconer | Opinion |   
'Terrible' Cameron put party before country with Brexit referendum - Jeremy Paxman:  by @BlewettSam and @magicbathtub 
Nicola Sturgeon: David Cameron told me not to be silly when I warned he could lose Brexit vote  
Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn will call on the government to bring its plans for negotiating Brexit to parliament...  
Jeremy Corbyn calls for more transparency over Brexit plan  
We will achieve Brexit - but the judiciary is causing an unnecessary constitutional clash  
The British High Court may have just killed off Brexit. #IntelGroup 
Had enough of politics. elections & #brexit Moya chicks? Some welcome distractionGet mesmoyarised@simplymoyer @keriqbaum @IshipOLICITY80 
I enjoy fighting Brexit fascism, I really do. But sometimes it'd be nice to have some help. You know ... from the leader of the opposition 
Given the fury of #Brexit'ers over past few days, I'm bloody glad @Nigel_Farage is in no position to change laws 
Brexit will be a Titanic success... Spoiler alert! :) 
I just dont get why #Remainers support the big #EU machine run by big banks & multi-nationals ?#BrexitBritain #OpenBritain #LeaveEU #Brexit  
Does @UKLabour even have a leader? Is #Corbyn at home making jam or at a Stop the War boot camp? Does anyone care? # Brexit 
Gisela Stuart again being an idiot. There’s nothing from the EU referendum that #Brexit *must* mean leaving Single Market  
(Free) For Corby, eastern European workers are a vital cog in the local economy. But Brexit may change that  
Very thorough piece >> "How racism and immigration gave us Trump, Brexit, and a whole new kind of politics"  
If Brexit voters can’t respect the rule of law, what’s the sense of the respect they claim is owed to them & their vote?  
my whole world view has been shattered, this is worse than brexit  
After the U.K.'s High Court's Brexit decision  
Please read this No 10 response re the #brexit court setback. If it does not make you laugh you can have your money back.  
New post | Courts, democracy and Brexit: Some home truths  
I fear what is about to happen to E. Aleppo while we’re preoccupied with #Brexit & #USElection.Those Russian ships aren’t there for a cruise 
We get it Jeremy, you (your team) are down with the kids but you know #brexit , the homeless, disabled.  
Scandal: it turns out all 11 Supreme Court Judges and *all* the lawyers in the #Brexit case have links to the EU. They're all EU citizens! 
Erm, how do I put this?Since EU Ref, I do not TRUST or have ANY FAITH in the BBC on Brexit or anything else#Remain 
This. And remember what happened with protest votes and Brexit.  
MPs condemn newspaper attacks on judges after Brexit ruling   
"The vicious assault on UK judges by the Brexit press is a threat to democracy"  
Remember Remember a Third of NovemberRemayners & Lawyers Do PlotDishonourable Members, Democracy's embers,Nay! Brexit the People may not!  
I'm told there's a lot more to Corbyn's speech tomorrow - it will clear up some of Labour's Brexit policies.  
Can only now fully understand passion of pro-indy Scots in their #indyref. Britain doesn't feel like my home either, now. #brexit 
#Brexit transmuting into rule of a right wing media mob . #Gary Lineker leading. Where are Corbyn and his coterie? 
Right now, we don't need you to talk about Snapchat, funeral costs or tax credits. Right now, we need you to talk about Article 50 & Brexit.  
The PM should bring the opposition leader into the Brexit negotiations as part of a national effort to get the best deal for Britain #Brexit 
The House of Lords has suddenly come into its own – white knights in ermine could rescue us from Brexit yet   
Who would have thought that a blue dress and a few emails could destroy Clintons. Brexit HRC. #tcot #ccot #gop #maga 
Red plastic flowers are now racist, because Brexit or something.  
Anti-Brexit campaigner Gina Miller receives online rape and death threats  
The EU is a huge gravy train for our parasitic legal profession. No wonder they're so keen on remaining. #Brexit 
They complain about the tone of #Brexit debate becoming more toxic. Can they really be so stupid as to wonder why? 
Thousands of you have watched James and a furious Leave voter debating the Brexit ruling. See it all here:  
Only 37% of total UK electorate voted to leave EU. 1979's Scot devolution referendum reqd 40% so #brexit should also be repealed #equality 
The Guardian front page, Saturday 05.11.16: May told to act to calm Brexit ‘mob’ anger  
Revealed: Brexit appeal judges' EU links  via @Telegraph #Brexit 
Remember, remember! The 5th November#GuyFawkes #GunpowderPlot #brexit  
While everyone was in hysterics over Brexit this week, 240 people died in the Mediterranean   
Those "in the know" - in Westminster Village - always understood referendum was only advisoryCameron at fault for misleading British people 
Jeremy Paxman tells the #latelate he thinks @David_Cameron was a terrible Prime Minister #brexit  
Martin Rowson on newspapers' reaction to the Brexit high court ruling  
The real #enemiesofthepeople #tabloids #brexit #Article50 
The Mail front page is sinister. Judges have only said that the Uk Gov should do Brexit legally.Brexit will happen but law must be respected 
So Theresa May's #Brexit plan is going well then ... 
Wearing a poppy is racist. Because of Brexit. And muslim festivals aren't shown on TV. Or something.  
Brexiters Gisela Stuart & John Whittingdale here saying Hard Brexit must occur regardless of damage to people's lives/livelihoods. Madness  
Praying the US election won't b like brexit where I was so sure it wouldn't happen nd it did 
The US political system has too many veto points, but at least states can't withdraw from it by a simple majority referendum like with EURef 
There WILL be an early election over Brexit warn Tory MPs  
But Brexit wasn't a polling error! More final month polls had #Leave ahead; it was more of a 'refuse to believe polls' error 
Friday's INDEPENDENT DIGITAL: "Brexit 'spinning out of control' warn bosses" #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
FT WEEKEND: "Pound rebounds after Brexit ruling" #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers(via @hendopolis) 
"The Referendum was important politically, of course, but had no effect in law" - Lord Chief Justice  
J.K. Rowling responded perfectly to a headline about the Brexit High Court judge being 'openly gay'  
So that is what we have come to: stand up for the rule of law and you face violence and abuse. The Brexit mob have a lot to answer for.  
"The Court went on to note that all parties in the case agreed the 2016 EU Referendum was advisory only" 
@thelastleg  Please clarify, only 40% of the population voted in Brexit, 52% of them voted to leave, not 52% of the country. #BrexitNo! 
Jeremy will be saying more about Brexit as soon as Ken Loach has made a film on the subject. 
That lower court Article 50 ruling is no more than a small bump in the road to full #Brexit @Independent 
.@iainlee & Jonathan - They've Cancelled Brexit (DCDJ Electro Edit)  
Why doesn't anyone tell the truth any more? Referendum was advisory and had no validity in law, as just shown. It was a con. 
Theresa May told to act to calm Brexit ‘mob’ anger  
#Brexitno If we can’t have boaty mcboatface they can’t have brexit. 
Of course MPs must scrutinise Brexit terms. But the triggering of Article 50 should not need their consent. It's what people voted for. 
Tonight's poll! Should the #Brexit still go ahead? Tweet your vote with the hashtag #BrexitGo or #BrexitNo! 
Former attorney general likens the "#Brexit mob" psyche &UK press to Mugabe's Zimbabwe. Not far wrong. #brexitjudgement #ImWithGina #UKIP 
Alex Neil on Brexit suggests senior SNPers know their moment is passing, that they're on the wrong track, and it's time for an internal war 
THE BATTLE OF BREXIT: Sirens heard. Carnage all around, and devastating costs spinning out of control!  
I'm from Holland and I endorse #TRUMP  because we can be united only in freedom, sovereignty and rule of law.#DrainTheSwamp#Brexit  
Theresa May told to act to calm Brexit ‘mob’ anger  
A hard Brexit? The markets aren't as worried any more.  
.@OwenSmith_MP calls for a referendum on the actual #Brexit deal, once we can see what #brexit really entails:  
We need a referendum on whether we want the MOBOs to continue or not. 
England's most deprived area talks of betrayal after Brexit ruling  
BREXIT U-TURN: Voters' views on EU membership have changed with Remain now having majority  
Moronic and dangerous.Enemies of the people: MPs and press gang up on the constitution over High Court Brexit ruling  
FINANCIAL TIMES FRONT PAGE: 'Pound rebounds after Brexit ruling‘ #skypapers 
Brexit ruling savaged by MP: Parliament AGREED Article 50 would be triggered IMMEDIATELY  
"Don't like the judges' decision? You could always appeal to the European Court of Justice!" Comedy gold from Ian Hislop. #hignfy #brexit 
"Many powerful interests are working systematically to obstruct #Brexit at every turn" LIVE @talkRADIO 
"#Article50 is not up to Parliament. It's automatic result of vote by Parliament to hold Referendum giving people final say" @talkRADIO 
Tory MP Stephen Phillips quits over Brexit 'policy differences'  
Don't remember, when I voted for Brexit, seeing any fine print about "subject to that dickhead Clegg fannying around with it". pic.twitter.com/yQueTX5wK3 
Major decisions do not happen in this country without Parliament having its say. If you thought #Brexit would be different you were foolish. 
#REMOANERS #CRAWLED out of the woodwork to hide behind their real motives #KEEPING THEIR #SNOUTS FIRMLY IN #EUTROUGH #BREXIT @ukreloaded 
"The Speech" everyone in #UKIP is talking about @JohnReesEvans on #Article50 #Brexit #UKIPLeadership #UkipDirectDemocracy #JRE4Leader 1/3 
Just finished All Out War,Tim Shipman’s Brexit book. Stonkingly good: if you’re vaguely interested in politics,buy it. It won’t be bettered. 
BREXIT BRAKE: Brexit hardliners branded a 'laughing stock' by German paper Tagesspiegel and French paper Le Figaro  
.@Lin_Manuel here's your Skimm on Brexit:  
Tonight's ShowClinton's PanicShifting State of RaceRe-Thinking Early VotingMr. Brexit Fading Market/EconomyElectoral Map Crunch 
Revealed: Brexit appeal judges' EU links  via @telegraphnews 
UK 'more flexible' out of EU: Chinese investors say #Brexit has opened up major opportunity #BrexitBritain #No2EU 
Only 24% of the electorate consented to any referendum taking place by voting Tory in GE 2015. How about respecting the 76% who didn’t? 
What kind of idiot thought that an advisory referendum would bypass the final decision of Parliament? It was always going to be this way. 
Thank god hard Brexit blocked. It would destroy our beautiful country.  
The judges have not stopped #Brexit They overturned nothing. Not to see this is to misunderstand the way this country works. Wise up people. 
Please, not another advisory referendum!Proper majority margin of 60% minimum and turn out of 75%. and staying in EU on offer as an option 2  
SNP senior figures, voted for Brexit.Just proves that what they say in public, isn't what they actually believe.Charlatans.  
Whereas what we experienced was a smooth pack of lies ( later abandoned)by a bunch of public school snake oil salesmen without a Brexit clue  
Pound hits four-week high after traders bet that Government's Brexit timetable will be derailed.  
I'm not asking for much.... all I want is to get our country back#WeWantOurCountryBack#Brexit #Article50 #BrexitBritain #OpenBritain 
The House of Lords has suddenly come into its own – white knights in ermine could rescue us from Brexit yet  
BREXIT BLOODBATH: The spectre of Brexit could emerge as major cause of uncertainty impacting on consumer confidence  
RUBBISH!#GinaMiller acted out of sheer #MONETARY #GREED - runs large #Hedgefund + #husband.Backed by other #millionaires -#BREXIT #BREXITNOW 
INDEPENDENT DIGITAL: Brexit 'spinning out of control' warn bosses #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
.@RoisinMurphy talks feminist backlash, Brexit & why "a vote for Trump is a racist vote"  
Every time I hear 'soft Brexit' / 'hard Brexit' my neurons present me with this image. #Breggsit 
#bbcaq #Brexit is *not* the will of the people. It's the result of one vote based on a false prospectus. #Remain #eu @BBCAnyQuestions 
#StopFundingHate: Twitter users demand Daily Mail boycott over Brexit ruling coverage  
We can't let Brexit be derailed by City slicker and Brazilian crimper via @MailOnline 
I want to live in a world without Brexit and Trump and price comparison websites with annoying ad campaigns that just seem to run and run. 
The rampant hypocrisy. Tories are divided over Europe, and their arrogance and incompetence brought us to Brexit. :( 
Martin Rowson on newspapers' reaction to the Brexit high court ruling  
It’s winner takes all on Brexit island, because the audience demands it | Marina Hyde  
'No-one said MPs had right to VETO Article 50' Law expert warns against betraying Brexit  
Many of the same sentiments behind Brexit are here, but the country's really more anti-Hillary than anti-establishment. #PodestaEmails29 
Thrilled to have my copy of Bad Boys of #Brexit and thrilled to have it signed by so many of the campaign's heroes.  
#Germany delivers frosty warning to Britain's Johnson on #Brexit: "Dear Boris, you have to understand..."  
Hear, hear: vicious assault on UK judges by the Brexit press is a threat to democracy | Charles Falconer  
"There is no point in 'soft brexit'. The 'Norway model' means no #Brexit at all. No thanks." LIVE @talkRADIO 
WeeklyPostNG: BIAFRA: Utter confusion in Aso Rock as APC leader dares Buhari, calls for referendum (Watch Video)  
Great to be paying a flying visit to @nyuniversity to talk about #Brexit & #indyref with @edvaizey @Ed_Miliband @JohnRentoul 
Dear @jeremycorbyn. As my MP, in a constituency that voted overwhelmingly to Remain, will you stand up against Brexit for your constituents?  
We shouldn't have had a vote on the EU because voters aren't wise enough, says David Attenborough  #Brexit 
I want no part of this fascist Better Together #Brexit Britain: #indyref2 ASAP! 
This must be what #TheresaMay meant when she said #Brexit is on track  
Where have the opposition been on Brexit? Would an election spell defeat for Corbyn? #AndrewOnLBC 
While everyone was in hysterics over Brexit this week, 240 people died in the Mediterranean  
Top business leaders say Brexit is in danger of ‘spinning out of control’  
Is #Labour any more use than a chocolate tea pot? Any of them going to really make a stand?#Brexit #Corbyn 
After the farce in the lords yesterday and the elites ramshackle approach to Brexit as of today I pledge my allegiance to UKIP #UKIP 
The first rule of Brexit opposition is we don't talk about Brexit opposition. 
"From the day we voted for #Brexit there has been vast conspiracy to undermine our decision. Now there is a legal mechanism" LIVE @talkRADIO 
Brexit all about blaming people who aren't responsible for problems caused by the Tories so this is entirely consistent. 
The Establishment won’t give us Brexit, we need to get on streets, exercise our democratic rights and protest!Pod 3  
My bit on Brexit Island, the new reality format  
Every 1st year law student grasps concepts of The Rule of Law and Sovereignty of Parliament.Unlike some politicians.#brexit 
It is not about Brexit or Remain, it's about your ethics @Morrisons @Asda @IcelandFoods @Lidl @British_Airways. You choose. #StopFundingHate 
"Lords don't have to face election. What's to stop them vetoing #Brexit ? They're there for life, more fool us for tolerating it" @talkRADIO 
"What the hell are the Express talking about?” Darren Adam gets stuck into those controversial #Brexit front pages  
In Britain, "remainers" find hope in Brexit court decision  
.@TheGinaMiller May I apologise on behalf of the good people of the UK for these Brexit idiots. Utter cretins.   
"Tony Benn, Bob Crow, God rest their souls, that's the banner I marched under when I voted for #Brexit" LIVE @talkRADIO 
The Guardian view on Brexit ruling | Editorial  
Brexit legal challenger Gina Miller subjected to online death and rape threats  
This week's @theipaper cartoon on the angry reaction to the high court Brexit ruling #bonfireweekend #enemiesofthepeople #brexitjudgement 
The woman behind the successful High Court challenge on triggering Brexit is receiving rape and death threats online  
#StopFundingHate: Twitter users demand @DailyMailUK boycott over Brexit ruling coverage: 
Brexit...  
The Article 50 judgment is a triumph for the rule of law – and no threat to Brexit, say @FraserNelson & @JGForsyth 
I suddenly with alarming dismay  that I understand how Germany slipped into #Hitlers ways.#brexit #GinaMiller #trump it's happening 
She's Laughing at all of us Brexiteers 
#StopFundingHate: Twitter users demand Daily Mail boycott over #Brexit ruling coverage  
In 24 hrs the Govt has lost in the High Court, lost its Brexit strategy & lost an MP. And throughout, Labour's leader has been invisible. 
'She is vile' Outrage as 'disgusting' NHS worker hopes children of Brexit voters fall ill  
Someone explain to me the latest Brexit court twist in one tweet?Or is that the whole thing, that one can't? 
Please can the US election be over and HRC be pres and the UK stop Brexit and Labour be a real party and OH GOD JUST MAKE THE WORLD STOP 
This Brexit vote, perhaps ironically, seems to have made Britain a lot more European. Just a pity that it seems to be Europe c.1932. 
Ex-Cameron adviser: Anti-Brexit ruling reveals staggering arrogance of liberal elites | via @SteveHiltonx 
The vicious assault on UK judges by the Brexit press is a threat to democracy • Charles Falconer •  • 
We will achieve Brexit if it takes an election purge of Europhiles or 1,000 new peers to get there  @telegraphnews 
Millions voted for Brexit after being told they could vote out (of EU) but stay in (single market). Forget NHS: biggest lie of the campaign. 
May & the #Brexit press should understand that referendums don't abolish laws which ensure governments can't abuse their powers#Remain 
The government wants to shackle the British people to the June 23 vote regardless of how opinion changes.#Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
Odd timing but welcome recognition of what was said during the #Brexit referendum by both sides  
Soft #Brexit.  
The People Have Spoken? We Don't Give A Damn:  'Brexit #Ginamiller #politicalclass #Davidicke 
Evening @theresa_may 17 million people voted for Brexit, I wasn't one of them, but you have let every one of them down. No plan, no idea.  
Michael Rosen: Brexit Day  
'No-one said MPs had right to VETO Article 50' Law expert warns against betraying Brexit  
Sterling soars on Trump jitters and Brexit hopes  
Everyone not on the far right should unite against the largest & most ruthless extreme right project in modern history.#Remain #Brexit 
#StephenPhillips #Tory MP resigns as he does not like #Brexit. Jog on Stephen, close the door on the way out.  
If you support #brexit, then hit him where it hurts, Please retweet #BoycottPimlicoPlumbers. Get it viral. 
EU leaders seem content to sit back and watch Britain's Brexit scramble  
Nick Clegg says he will amend Brexit legislation to force both a 'soft Brexit' and a referendum on the final deal.  
I'm more concerned you are trying to overturn the will of the people. #Brexit  
Daily Mail 'reveals' an 'openly gay judge' ruled on #Brexit. So what?    @ParliOUT @LGBTTORY @LGBTLD @LGBTLabour 
Brexit: Shakespeare Was Dead Right About Lawyers...  
In the next general election how will you vote? #brexit please RT 
Baroness Wheatcroft who is leading Tory Lords revolt to delay Brexit joins me on @LBC from 7. Should an unelected peer delay Brexit 
A Non British National is able to take our EU Referendum result to High Court...??? What a bloody outrage & farce!!!  
Brexit flashbacks are haunting traders as they brace for the U.S. election  
The vicious assault on UK judges by the Brexit press is a threat to democracy | Charles Falconer  
This #brexit thread reads like a Monty Python script.  
Why this billionaire hedge fund manager is treating Election Day like Brexit 2.0:  
Dominic Raab on the High Court Decision - 'What you're allowing is die hard remainers to try and frustrate the referendum...'  
Nick Clegg vows to amend law before Article 50 so public has final say on Brexit deal  
In my opinion, the Daily Mail is inciting hatred against the judiciary and the plaintiffs in the Brexit High Court case. 
#UK Court overrules people opinion. Says #Brexit will need Parliament vote. Was UK's #EU entry Parliament-approved?#BrexitJudgment 
The Three Judges pub in Glasgow is under siege from a bus load of angry imbeciles from Tunbridge Wells wielding burning Daily Mails #brexit 
Why Labour can't get its act together on Brexit. By @Gabriel_Pogrund.  
Gina Miller targeted by online trolls over Brexit ruling  
Angry Brexiter; reads tabloid; believes 3 judges have "prevented Brexit". Herein lies the explanation for many of this country's woes. 
Brexit fallout was nowhere near as bad as the hysteria peddled by the media.  
Stephen Phillips MP seems v confused. Backed Leave in June; resigns now because Brexit being implemented. What's wrong with these lawyers? 
'Those who make peaceful revolution impossible will make violent revolution inevitable.' John F. Kennedy #BREXIT #Article50 
I predict that by the time we leave the EU, 40 bilateral free trade pacts will have been set in train that can be sealed soon after Brexit. 
What do they want?BrexitWhen do they want it?As soon as possible without due diligence and legislation to protect our interests 
Will people complaining about Jeremy's failure to comment on the Brexit crisis PLEASE just let him get on with promoting Ken Loach's films? 
The High Court’s ruling means a better Brexit  
Top City of London Law Firm Mishcon de Reya - started by a son of a Rabbi - Working on Stopping #Brexit 
The vicious assault on UK judges by the Brexit press is a threat to democracy | Charles Falconer  
Canada's recent free trade deal with the EU is a potential blueprint for Britain's negotiations.#Brexit  
Even Leave-voting Tory MPs have had enough of Theresa May’s Brexit strategy now  #brexit 
Until Corbyn goes May, Murdoch & co and the Tory extremists have a completely free hand to do exactly as they wish.#Remain #Brexit #YesEU 
Here’s Boris - and no gaff. He said it and meant it. #brexit is designed to sink without trace in the fog and cold waters of NO EXIT from EU  
Corbyn must go. He is facilitating the largest and most ruthless far right wing project in modern history. #Remain #Brexit #YesEU 
The appeal against the Brexit high court ruling was the 'final straw' for Tory MP Stephen Phillips  
TAKE NOTE To those Remoaner MPs 
Over 30 countries incl. USA, China, India, Korea, Canada, Australia want bilateral Free Trade Agreements w/ UK.Impossible without #Brexit! 
Brendan O'Neill has changed his name on Facebook to 'Brexit O'Neill'  
With Shadow Secretaries of State for Brexit (Sir Keir Starmer) and Northern Ireland (Dave Anderson) earlier in Leinster House on #brexit  
While Sinn Fein consider their last sacred cow, abstentionism,  @SDLPlive MPs will vote against Brexit. No question. 
Nick Clegg now demanding second referendum. Like I say, everyone is going bonkers. 
I'll be on @StephenNolan's show talking about Brexit just after 10pm. My liver thanks his producer for the invitation. Do call in! 
'No-one said MPs had right to VETO Article 50' Law expert warns against betraying Brexit  
Bye-bye #Brexit? Britain’s bid to rid itself of #EU membership may fall flat (Op-Edge) 
didn't take #Brexit Britain long to expand "not real Brits" to include gays did it.  
US sports presenter has been flooded with online abuse after being mistaken for Brexit campaigner Gina Miller  
.@theresa_may bids to regain control of #Brexit after yesterday's High Court setback  
Let's be clear..17 million IS NOT 'the British people'! #No Brexit 
.@TheLastLeg MICRO PIGS are back tonight! 2-0 up on the pollsters in predicting the #Referendum & #GenElection Will it be Hillary or Trump? 
Several SNP MSPs voted for BREXIT, ex minister reveals  via @MailOnline 
We all know the type of person #NicolaGorb is.Nasty, intolerant, spiteful...We've seen them on #bbcqt before. Planted by BBC.#Brexit  
Caroline Lucas: I will not vote to trigger Brexit if deal is not right -  
While we are distracted by Brexit, Theresa May drops a privatisation bombshell - if it's private why should we pay?  
So a 'number' of SNP MSPs are pushing for a second independence referendum on the basis Brexit is a disaster - yet voted for it.Principled 
On @SkyNews #WinR 8.30 @JayneSeckerSky, me + a Brexit @toryboypierce condemning democracy then cheering Orgreave police yobbery. He lost it 
While everyone’s distracted by Brexit, Theresa May drops a privatisation bombshell  
maybe you should spend a bit of time working on your response to Brexit and A50 instead of this down-with-the-kidz nonsense? 
#SinnFein haven’t taken their seat in #Westminster for 98 years. Now they could to block #Brexit  
As the #brexit scam continues behind the obfuscation of ‘exit’ the @Conservatives dictatorship is slowly assembled in plain sight under May 
Tory MP who quit over May Brexit row brands Conservatives 'Ukip-lite'  
The pound just had its best week since 2009  
Why the High Court got the law wrong about Brexit | Head of Legal  
"Democracy does not mean you give government of the day unqualified rights" says @nick_clegg on #Brexit ruling  
Cardinal Vincent Nichols hits out at hatred for foreigners since the EU referendum and politicians' "Leadership based on fear" #BBCNewsSix 
"'Brexit' is arguably politics' most important contribution to the English language...since the Watergate scandal"  
Why #EnemiesOfThePeople is trending after the Brexit court ruling  
My cartoon - government to appeal Article 50 High Court ruling#sovereignty#Brexit#r4PM 
Russian hackers have already influenced elections in Germany and Brexit in England. Don't let that happen here. #trumpsTiestoRussia 
.@theresa_may "confident" of winning #Brexit Article 50 case appeal  
More hilarity.  Sinn Fein considering taking up its seats in Westminster. Old enmities wilting in face of Brexit.    
If you stand in front of a mirror and say 'brexit' five times an article about Nigel Farage appears. 
A few months ago, I woke up to Brexit. Here's my advice to US voters | Stephen Moss  
'We will achieve Brexit, even if it takes an election, a purge of the Europhiles or 1,000 new peers'#premium 
While everyone’s distracted by Brexit, Theresa May drops a privatisation bombshell  via @thecanarysays 
Talking #Brexit & #Article50 & judges "putting themselves above democratically-elected Commons" IDS tells @afneil  
So another week ends of the UK government bouncing off the walls of reality on Brexit.Next week, much the same. 
'Brexit' named word of the year; 'Trumpism' not far behind  
What does Brexit mean for property@asianwealthmag @PWNews 
FM #Steinmeier to @BorisJohnson: Your gov't has taken a clear+unambiguous decision w/ regard to #Brexit. We regret but respect this decision  
The courts have not reversed Brexit. They cannot.  
Should not be near children protection of children act sack her. NHS worker hopes children of Brexit voters fall ill  
I'll be discussing the media coverage of the High Court #Brexit case with @michaelwhite just after 5pm tonight on @BBCRadio4 @BBCPM prog. 
Says the man that isn't opposing the Tories & welcomes 'hard brexit'  
Appalling - This woman led the Brexit challenge. Now she’s fending off rape and death threats  
"This setback will not derail our #Brexit strategy because we don’t have one.” Close to the bone on Tory chaos.  
Pro-European forces are warming to the idea not of stopping Brexit, but of softening it.  
Dan, you are an over educated Peruvian disgrace. Judges ruling is about lawful process, not Brexit decision, as you know 
We will achieve Brexit, even if it takes an election, a purge of the Europhiles or 1,000 new peers to get there  
If the government has to put legislation to trigger Article 50 to the vote - could pro-Remain MPs see off Brexit?  
The referendum was not 'Shall we abandon parliamentary democracy?' 
Nick Clegg to @itvnews: @libdems will try to amend legislation before #Article50 so the UK has a NEW REFERENDUM on the final #Brexit deal 
The fury of Hard Brexiteers They were never going to be happy-did they think there would be no scrutiny on the detail or type of Brexit? 
We have all forgotten how we committed to mature politics in light of Jo's murder. Papers today aren't just mad, they're dangerous. #brexit  
Blimey in all the fuss about Brexit and Trump I nearly missed the week’s most important story (tnx @zoealicia101 & @BestoftheMail) 
Enemies of the people.'Out of touch' judges  'declared war on democracy' by defying 17.4m Brexit voters. 
PLEASE RETWEET TODAY'S POLL - Would you take to the streets and protest if May were to not bring in BREXIT by March? 
High court doesn’t care If the people want Brexit: @NoahRFeldman via @BV 
People aren't going to be getting what they voted for if Brexit happens anyway seeing as the campaign was based on false promises and lies 
The Daily Mail had the worst response to the Brexit ruling  
#brexit was getting to depressing to tweet, but today's #Article50 headline in @TheNewEuropean made my week. Thanks to Gina Miller and team! 
Got a letter from the UK today. Pretty cool that they postmark all mail with a congrats to Paul Beatty...totally makes up for Brexit  
Resignation of Stephen Phillips reinforces that Hard Brexit is not the "will of the people". Many leavers assumed continued SM membership. 
Noticed the difference in language on either side of the #Brexit debate? Traitors, enemies as against parliamentary sovereignty, rule of law 
Image of the day #brexit #enemiesofthepeople #UKinEU 
Martin McGuinness ‘refuses to rule out Sinn Fein taking Westminster seats for 1st time to block Brexit’  
Andrew Joyce: Jews and the legal fight against Brexit 
Pro-‘Refugee’ Tory Rebel Quits Parliament Over Govt. Brexit Stance  
Ironically this is true. #brexit  
Just realised Brexit is a combination of "Britain" & "exit". Makes you wonder if they've been hiding this all along 
Among the abuse and mutterings of civil unrest, the rational voices for Brexit have been drowned out - @alicevjones 
Emotions are running high over the @Brexit ruling  #EnemiesOfThePeople 
'Truss urged to speak out amid press onslaught on Brexit judges' | @LawSocGazette - including by myself  
'The children of ppl who voted Brexit should suffer when ill'.Nice to know the inner mind of the hateful left wing in the UK.#brexit 
This would be an unexpected twist to the Brexit tale, in the unlikely event it were ever to happen.  
Boris Johnson: "Brexit means Brexit and we are going to make a Titanic  success if it" pic.twitter.com/3sUe3VOYAW 
The UK's largest nursing union @theRCN says the NHS won't cope if #Brexit sparks a mass exodus of staff from the EU  
The real #enemiesofthepeople- a rich #racist right-wing elite running the #fascist media #DailyExpress #DailyMail #TheSun #Brexit #Article50 
The high court judges have neither right or jurisdiction to decide on matters pertaining to Brexit.They cannot prove they are neutral. 
you cannot defend the post Brexit ruling coverage. Incitement to hatred 
British liberals: Corbyn hung out with Gerry Adams, unelectable, wahBig Martin: we'll stop BrexitBritish liberals:  
1 of the greatest ironies of Brexit British nationalism is how it has boosted the causes of Scottish independence & Irish unification. 
If this appeared on #EUref publicity it was a lie. Referendum nul & void. Government had no power to implement.  
We would never have been in this mess if the excellent Dominic Grieve had not been sacked as Attorney General under DC. #Brexit #Article50 
The UK court ruling on #Brexit is a perfect mix of "judicial activism with political hypocrisy."  
Poll—77% want Parliament to drop Brexit and stay in the EU, after High Court ruling that Brexit will require parliamentary approval: pic.twitter.com/Hmb39X7O9Y 
At the car wash. In here there's no Brexit, no Trump, no Murdoch or Westminster. The beautiful, beautiful car wash.  
Welsh opposing UKGov in court. Spain claiming Gibraltar. Ireland open to unification. #indyref2 on the table. Brexit going well so far... 
Tensions in Theresa May’s own party over her handling of Brexit erupted with the resignation of a Tory MP  
Martin McGuinness ‘refuses to rule out Sinn Fein taking Westminster seats for first time to block #Brexit’  
May'd my day #Brexit  
Match of the Day isn't the only place to see balls from the right wing. #Brexit  
Ukip leadership hopeful Suzanne Evans says judges should face threat of being sacked by MPs after Brexit legal case  
I won't vote to make my constituents worse off, @OwenSmith_MP tells @daily_politics on prospect of #Brexit vote in Parliament  
What Brexit does and doesn't say about Trump's election chances  via @MattSingh_ @BV #election2016 
"It has to be managed, or the UK will lose a bit of it's appeal" - @Bliautaud on Brexit & tech in @standardnews 
Here come the remainers REAL voting intention. Debate article 50 and demand remain in single market amendment . . MILLION MILES FROM #brexit  
.@JohnReesEvans takes a step closer to the #UKIP leadership as @prwhittle withdraws from contest. Grassroots clearly behind JRE. #Brexit 
British Airways' owner put orders for 38 new planes "under review" as Brexit hits earnings  
Sinn Fein haven’t taken their seat in Westminster for 98 years. Now they could to block Brexit  
Brexit Patriotic Populism Pepper Sprayed in eyes of the masses through Daily News as blinded people rage  
Nicola Sturgeon claimed to speak for all of Scotland on Brexit - she didn't even speak for her own group of MSPs  
Was Brexit really a vote to hurl abuse at judges, to hold in contempt people who are 'foreign-born' or 'openly gay,' to be forever furious? 
The pound's fall since Brexit has hurt investor appetite for European IPOs  
Great meeting today on #Brexit with @UKLabour colleagues @Keir_Starmer & @DaveAndersonMP chaired by @Domhannigan 
STATEMENT: We strongly refute any allegations that we manipulated, lied or misrepresented the story of those evil EU judges stealing Brexit. 
Brexit legal challenger Gina Miller: 'Defending democracy is the best way to spend my money'  
.Brexit will be watered down. Our borders will stay open.We will be swamped with 3rd world,raping murdering Muslims 
#Brexit & #Parliament. Problems are complex. Solution is simple. Proportional Representation. Pls sign the petition:  
Where is Lord Chancellor Truss's defence of the independence of the judiciary against outrageous attacks by Daily Mail and Brexit fanatics? 
Gary Lineker leads the charge against tabloids' 'barmy' fury over Brexit legal challenge #enemiesofthepeople  
I really don't know what to say ...#Brexit'You Wanted British Law, You Got British Law. Why Are You Cross?' @LBC 
Steinmeier said Germany waiting to see what kind of Brexit Britain wants. Johnson put the lunch menu in his pocket  
A referendum to bring back hanging? The hangers win. Wouldn't we want the Gov. to over-rule a democratic decision? 
Daily Mail accused of 'attack on the rule of law' amid criticism of tabloid Brexit legal challenge coverage  
"Prime Minister?""Attorney-General, I want new approach for Supreme Court.""Yes?""You are to say Brexit is Brexit until they give in." 
Very foolish for @Number10gov to stoke hostility to judiciary, rather than trying to damp things down. #Brexit  
“I think Nigel Farage is despicable”: Woman behind Brexit court case takes aim at the Ukip man in LBC interview  
Higher prices in shops, more expensive holidays & less money for public services. How #Brexit could affect you:  
Never mind the Brexit judges, Twitter has been highlighting the REAL ‘enemies of the people’   #enemiesofthepeople 
Rees-Mogg, ‘Brexit Will Happen, Even if it Means Appointing 1,000 More Lords’  
240 people died in the Mediterranean – yet we spoke about Brexit 
Part of UKIP's strategy to deliver Brexit appears to be organising a mass boycott of Match of the Day. Good luck, lads.  
Remainer wishes illnesses on babies of Brexit supporters.The "tolerant" left strikes again. 
A sad day - the vitriol an anger caused by this damned referendum seems magnified, It's destroying our country. Thank you Dave, Nige, Boris 
The contradictory attacks of the Brexit-loving press  
Funny how people that've spent four months telling others to 'get over it' appear inordinately incapable of taking their own advice #brexit 
RT @BarnabyEdwards: I wish people would stop saying that the majority of the country is pro #Brexit. #bbcqt #EU #EU 
2m people working in financial services need greater clarity on Govt's Brexit plans: full debate in Parliament here  
Theresa May can ignore the Scottish parliament on Brexit, say lawyers 
majority of electorate - 48% Remainers and 20%-40% of Leavers who want moderate Brexit - without a political voice. 
Truss urged to speak out amid press onslaught on Brexit judges:  
Why not simply set economic conditions for any Brexit plan & insist they are met. Make govt state exactly how many ppl it is willing to see 
7: With all that, polls can simply be wrong. But to a significant extent the whole 'the polls missed Brexit' line is myth. 
-20% for SNP?! A lot of fisher folk in Banff, potential reaction to Brexit and Sturgeon banging the indy4eu drum?  
Gives up on SM membership, ECJ jurisdiction and FoM, then says: No hard Brexit. Well you pretty much just advocated hard Brexit mate. 
Brexit UK deadend for all - indyscot can set example for England to follow 
Well keep up the good work at sky ! Since the referendum the media elite have been working v hard - it will be pitchforks & torches soon !  
1. With the 'Brexit miss', there are three things to keep in mind. First, the polls didn't really miss Brexit. The polling avgs showed ... 
.@timfarron - it is important we come together as a country. Some parts of the debate around Brexit has taken on a nasty tone 
The contradictory attacks of the Brexit-loving press  
Incidentally - the perversion of Brexit by the political elite ( inc , judges ) was always on the cards. Now the anger will build  
The SNP's 'secret Brexiteers' urged to come forward after former minister reveals he voted Leave:  #Brexit  
.@timfarron is talking to Sky News about Article 50 ruling yesterday - the British people must be able to have their say on any Brexit deal 
This is largely a myth. Polls did not really miss Brexit. People were ignoring the polls.  
FM #Steinmeier on #Brexit: Important to set out conditions for negotiations asap. Stalemate is of no benefit to anyone. @BorisJohnson 
Another Ukip MP? @SuzanneEvans1 targets quitting Tory MP Stephen Phillips' seat in HUGE Brexit-voting area  
It is blatantly clear that this government wants to use #Brexit as a sledgehammer against legal and parliamentary scrutiny.#Remain 
Labour condemns newspaper attacks on judges after Brexit ruling | @OwenBowcott 
Brexit challenger Gina Miller blames lies by Nigel Farage and tabloid media for death threats  via @IBTimesUK 
What utter drivel. MPs voted 6 to 1 for a referendum for the public to decide . They delegated the decision ....  
They  try to sabotage #Brexit at every turn, yet  still have the cheek to say they are not trying to change the outcome of the #Referendum 
Britain's economy is like Wile E. Coyote, according to a top Irish banker  
It's almost laughable that HRC would bring this up. She's surrounded by sickos. Brexit the Skank. #tcot #ccot #gop #maga 
Brexit's going well isn't it?  
Brexit's delay is met with fair, balanced news coverage (just kidding)  
Great letter in today's Scottish Farmer.Brexit is far too important for the SNP's pathetic mischief making  
The UK was already short of curry chefs. Now the Brexit vote has made it worse | Rupa Huq  
Spoiler alert: tonight's @iainlee podcast will be entitled 'The Brexit Bumshell'.You may now return to your business. 
I just tried to get this bag of  Tayto crisps out of the work vending machine & it said they were £650. Is this because of Brexit or...?  
Listen up dummies!Voting to leave the EU and staying in the single market is NOT leaving the EU.You are still bound by THEIR rules #Brexit 
Enemies of the People #DailyMail #Brexit #Murdoch #Farage #Hopkins #Ukip 
The unhinged backlash to the High Court's Brexit ruling  
If you think the High Court interfered with democracy with its Brexit ruling, you have no idea how Britain works  
Am not opposed to Brexit in principle, but it ain't going to be achieved the way Theresa May is trying to do it. 
.@Arron_Banks urges PM to call snap General Election and "advocate a clean Brexit; no Freedom of Movement and no Single Market Membership".  
Some people step up to the line, some even step on the line however @TheEastMercian stepped over the line by some margin #Brexit #Remain 
Didn't realise it was a camera Just glancing at the questions on autocue! Join the discussion #NHS & #Brexit  
The issue for PM: Mandate she inherited from Cameron (which Phillips+ shared) not fully reconciled with mandate she assumes from Brexit vote 
If the Daily Mail puts you on the front page and calls you a 'traitor' then you're probably doing everything right #StopFundingHate #brexit 
The legal profession in Britain is overrun by loony liberals with nasty agendas who should not be allowed to undermine #Brexit 
Brexit outrage, Poppy-gate & US presidential elections.Meanwhile, on Twitter:  
BBC on Stephen Phillips MP's resignation: 'On child refugees, aid money, handling of Brexit, he dissented from party heading to the right.' 
Will gov't waste money pursuing undemocratic Brexit? Brexit is fast becoming an expensive egomaniacal vanity project we can't afford.  
Grinning EU federalist who "felt sick" over Brexit vote yet claims her effort to usurp democracy is 'not political'.  
Labour condemns newspaper attacks on judges after Brexit ruling  
The contradictory attacks of the Brexit-loving press  
We will achieve Brexit, even if it takes an election, a purge of the Europhiles or 1,000 new peers to get there  
Our concerns exactly. Let's have a debate, and a vote, but do not try and block Brexit! pic.twitter.com/UWmbppnMfm 
If a Tory MP is resigning over the process of Brexit, goodness knows what would happen if we actually had to vote on the terms of it 
BBC Newsnight just delivered a colossal ‘f*ck you’ to bonkers Brexiteers [VIDEO]  #Brexit #Newsnight 
Cameron created this mess. Promised a referendum that was binding. We voted. MP's agreed to the vote. They are now unhappy .too bad 
#brexit reminds me of that time everyone got a U2 album they didn't want. 
Tory MP Stephen Phillips quits over Brexit shambles - will BBC news finally begin using the word "beleaguered" to describe Mays government? 
Judiciary in the crosshairs of the right wing. This is very, very worrying if you know your history. #Brexit #enemiesofthepeople #wato 
With all the legal experts working for government, why weren't legal challenges envisaged and addressed before referendum. 
Is Labour really going to roll over and vote with the hard Brexit Tories?  
Farage Slams ‘Unelected Judges’, Will Resume ‘Full-Time Campaigning’ if Brexit Blocked...  
The sense I get about Stephen Phillips quitting is growing anger over his party, the Government, the Brexit campaign & politics in general 
Great Ormond Street Hospital worker stuns Question Time audience by wishing illness on the children of Brexit voters  
The House of Lords has suddenly come into its own – white knights in ermine could rescue us from Brexit yet  
BREAKING: British foreign secretary says he doesn't think UK High Court ruling will interfere with Brexit timetable. 
FT readers are having their say on the UK High Court's Brexit Article 50 ruling  
Farage Slams ‘Unelected Judges’, Will Resume ‘Full-Time Campaigning’ if Brexit Blocked  
Some of Britain's top selling newspapers are spewing hatred over Thursday's landmark #Brexit ruling  
As a nation, have we ever been angrier? Brexit + poppies seem to have sent many over the edge. 
German Foreign Minister on the court ruling: An impasse on Brexit would not help either side – Germany wants to see quick action 
Interesting that Brexit is ailed as democracy in action but parliament voting for or against Brexit is not. Am I missing something? 
#Brexit is a contract between the people and their government. Parliament has nothing of value to add to the process. Not needed. Not wanted 
Judges' ruling will NOT slow down Brexit, May to tell EUWe need Farage back full time as UKIP Leader to pressure PM  
.@BorisJohnson on High Court Article 50 ruling: I don't think it will interfere with the Brexit timetable  
If the referendum had been a general election, the Leave Party would have a majority of 166 seats #RespectTheResult #Democracy 
My letter to Liam Fox about Government inconsistencies on #Brexit, access to the single market & the important life sciences industry.  
BREAKING: Liberals promise to hold a referendum on electoral reform if everyone promises to vote "yes." 
I am confusedParliament voted by 6-1 that we should have an EU referendum. #Brexit won it So why are they now having a further vote? 
I've written a basic law lesson for those criticising judges about the #brexit judgment. Judges are not #enemiesofthepeople 
Now the venture capitalists are looking for those Brexit subsidies.  Suggesting they're collectively useless 
My cartoon - government to appeal Article 50 High Court ruling#sovereignty#Brexit#wato 
Callers furious about #Brexit being cancelled @BBCRadio2 
Labour condemns newspaper attacks on judges after Brexit ruling  
Then why actively support Brexit?  
Brexit is an existential threat to our NHS  
Phillip's friends tell me the decision by No 10 to appeal a "clear cut" legal defeat on involving MPs in Brexit was the final factor yday 
.@MMFlint calls Trump supporters "Brexit voters": "If you vote for Donald J. Trump, you're essentially voting for America to leave America"  
If anyone doubted Brexit was a highly-toxic process that poisons British society, just look at the various news reports today on all sides 
Brexit mob rule + latest Tory resignation will help Lib Dems in Remainer Richmond Park. Goldsmith should worry it's bigger than Heathrow 
The People Have Spoken? We Don't Give A Damn:  #Brexit #Ginamiller #politicalclass #Davidicke 
Tory MP Stephen Phillips quits over Brexit 'policy differences'  
So @prolifecampaign couldn't even get UCD to go neutral on #repealthe8th, never mind antichoice. No wonder they fear of a referendum so much 
#Brexit Cognitive Dissonance #enemiesofthepeople 
The sunny utopia of Brexit that Vote.Leave promised, has been a lie. Parliament must say no to #chaotictoryBrexit.  
These are but a few #enemiesofthepeople . We need to #DrainTheSwamp in Europe as well. Down with #EU, down with the anti-Brexit judges  
How racism and immigration gave us Trump, Brexit, and a whole new kind of politics  
The right-wing press goes batshit as the Brexit judges overrule Theresa May [IMAGES, OPINION]  #brexit 
This article says Russia caused Brexit, and right wing success in Germany. Nope. People are sick of globalism. #TrumpsTiesToRussia 
I thought #Brexit-ers wanted British courts to determine British law? You got your cake, now eat it FFS.   
Just like w/ Brexit, they're promising economic calamity if you support Trump. Don't fall victim to fearmongering. 
Forget poppies, Brexit, Farage, Corbyn, Southern Rail and outrage over everything: this is what makes Britain quite a good place to live in.  
Stephen Phillips resigns over 'undemocratic' Brexit process  
@lilyallen  this is the guardian pre referendum fact check. 
Sinn Fein haven't taken their seat in Westminster for 98 years. Now they could to block Brexit  
ICYMI: yesterdayon #wato, @patmcfaddenmp welcomed the High Court ruling for giving Parliament a "meaningful say" in #Brexit talks  
By branding High Court judges 'enemies of the people', the Brexit media proved it's finally lost touch with reality  
"Could you tell us.... what the Labour Party position is?" @afneil "No" @OwenSmith_MP#Brexit #Article50 #bbcdp  
Why didn't someone question the legality of referendum in court before it happened and before we spent 10's of millions of pounds on it. 
Owen Smith on daily politics blantant he will frustrate Brexit anyway he can, words of a dictator 
This is a terrific line-by-line dissection of the Sun splash on the Brexit court case (via @paulmasonnews)  
Will Brexit ultimately lead to #indywales? Piece on LSE blog 
Dear #Westminster I don't want to change from being a #Brexiteer to freedom fighter. #brexit -get it done #Article50 
SNP MSPs voted Brexit but said nothing because they're essentially scared of the leadership. Just a weird, weird party. 
Any commonwealth country citizen resident in UK could vote for Brexit.U stupid or what?PS:No response needed. We know the answer  
"Proper scrutiny of Brexit" has now become as meaningless as "Brexit means Brexit". 
#FascistEpidemic is coming to town #GrandHôtel #Stockholm #Hess #SD #Racism #Europe #EU #Brexit #Ukip #Putin 
Going through yesterday's judgement. This bit is the answer to a million Twitter arguments about Brexit and sovereignty.  
#EnemiesOfThePeople is trending after newspapers ripped into the Brexit court ruling  
Stephen Phillips's resignation conclusively demolishes the nonsense narrative that EVERYONE voting Brexit voted for hard Brexit. #bbcdp 
When #Tory MPs who voted to leave the EU are abandoning the party, you know #Brexit is a disaster. Utter madness.   
1. SNP MSPs vote for #Brexit2. SNP MSPs campaign for #indyref2 due to #Brexit 
2. If you had a referendum on "Are you in favour of world peace? Yes/No" I reckon Yes would win. 
Enemies of the people: The Brexit campaign is now putting lives in danger  #enemiesofthepeople 
.@LeaveEUOfficial ok, just tell me what 'Brexit' actually means, in detail, without using the word 'Brexit' 
After raging against imaginary unelected EU bureaucrats wouldn't it be delicious if they lost their hard Brexit due to real unelected Lords? 
Welsh Government to apply to have voice in proposed Supreme Court appeal against High Court #Brexit decision  
Tory MP quits - objects to hard Brexit and government ignoring Parliament:  
@pollytoynbee incurs the wrath of hordes of #brexit trolls in the comments. She must have hit the nail on the head.  
Brexit crisis: Corbyn breaks silence. 
Government 'confident' of winning Brexit court case appeal  
The application from #Leave supporting MP Stephen Phillips, who has just resigned, for an emergency #Brexit debate:  
Gary Lineker Leads Backlash Against Daily Mail And Daily Express Article 50 Front Pages #Brexit  
In what demented cry-wank fantasy did you think winning a referendum entitled you to some racist dystopian Morris-dancing Weimar Republic? 
May tells Merkel and Juncker she will stick to Article 50 deadline despite High Court #Brexit ruling  
Germany fears UK may quit spy programme because of Brexit  
#Brexit named word of the year by Collins Dictionary beating 'Trumpism' and 'hygge'  
The concept of the "Will of the People" sounds very democratic, but in practice it is used to justify the suppression of opposition#Brexit 
Daily Politics coming up - on BBC2 NOW!!!! Latest on Brexit and much more. 
Is Brexit A Computer Simulation? Why Some Scientists Say It's More Likely Than Not #Brexit pic.twitter.com/Cwic87OfeA 
Tory MP quits over Brexit mess. Not re-standing, unlike the sham surrounding Goldsmith (who I bet re-takes Tory whip if re-elected)  
If a early election was held:Would you rather support a party that pledges to support the #Brexit vote, or a 2nd referendum?Pls RETWEET 
The mood in 2016 in the world of politics #Brexit #USElections 
RT @AndrewBloch: Pub Sign of the Day#enemiesofthepeople #highcourtruling #brexit  
Launching ‘The Stuarts: 1603-1714’  useful for Brexit context? 
When we decide to have a referendum we give back to the people that sovereignty - they decide the issue. #FrankField 
Leave MP Stephen Phillips resigns in protest at Govt resistance to giving parliament a say in #Brexit. Shows conviction. May others follow. 
The Brexit court decision may give Brits a 2nd chance to let cooler heads prevail, says @don_pittis 
Brexiters: stop saying "will of the British people". It's not true and you know it. #Brexit  
UK government "confident" Supreme Court appeal against #Brexit ruling will be won, @theresa_may spokesperson says 
Being a retired lawyer I can say the law is an ass especially in this case. we voted Brexit and we want it.  
U.K. Government Confident It Will Win Brexit Appeal: Spokesman Greg Swift, "planned timetable for triggering Article 50 remains the same" 
Can we have some sort of Venn diagram between Brexit Priesthood, Poppy Fascists & Bullingdon Club? 
Tory MP resigns - voted to leave #EU but disagrees with govt’s attempt to negotiate #Brexit without parliament  
Stephen Phillips's "irreconcilable differences" with Govt included Brexit court case and child refugees 
The great Brexit betrayal has begun. But I know the British people won't let it happen says @Nigel_Farage 
REPLAY: Here's Stephen Phillips MP talking #Brexit on #bbcdp with @afneil last month 
Dear @BBCTwo, now would be a PERFECT time for a history doc about the 17th century constitutional crisis between crown & parliament #BREXIT 
Vote on Article 50  not about whether to leave, but about how - & what post-referendum future looks like - will judge decision on its merits  
The British people are not going to put up with the establishment's Brexit betrayal.  
Can't help but wonder what the Brexit bill will mean for yes, you guessed it, Lords reform (•_•)<)   )╯ /    \ 
Stephen Phillips MP has allegedly resigned over government's unwillingness to engage with MPs over Brexit process  
PM has spoken this morning on phone to German Chancellor Angela Merkel & @JunckerEU to explain the shambles that is also known as #Brexit 
Incorrect on all counts. Parliament voted to let the people decide. They also voted in the referendum. How many voted do they want?  
By-election is in safe Conservative seat but further proof (if any needed) of the PM's looming #Brexit nightmare - she can't please everyone  
BREAKING: Tory MP Stephen Phillips quits in protest as Theresa May refuses to accept High Court's Brexit ruling  
Burke "Your representative owes you ... his judgement; and he betrays, instead of serving you, if he sacrifices it to your opinion."#Brexit 
Daily Mail branded ‘homophobic’ after ‘outing’ #Brexit-blocking judge  
Final SU Abortion referendum Result: Total Poll 4761, Yes: 1,726 (36%) No: 3,036 (64%) #UCDnews @UCDSU @UCDYes4Neutral @UCDProChoice 
So let's get this straight: Gina Miller launched a High Court case against #Brexit because her Portuguese hairdresser was offended by it. 
BREAKING: Tory MP Stephen Phillips resigns from Parliament over Theresa May's handling of Brexit  
Tory MP resigns over government approach to Brexit - politics live  
TIME mag: "The 2016 election is a referendum on what women can be -- and what men can get away with"  
The judges’ ruling confirms it – Brexit must go ahead, no ifs or buts | Simon Jenkins  
Troubled by the Minister's use of "wherever practical" in his response to my questions on how workers' rights will be protected from #Brexit  
Tory MP Stephen Phillips QC resigns over "very significant policy differences" with PM over handling Brexit. Note, he campaigned for Leave. 
This guy nails it better than I could. #highcourtruling #brexit  
#enemiesofthepeople Under no circumstances must @theresa_may allow the likes of @nick_clegg to undermine #brexit. if she does = revolution!  
FT View: The court ruling on Brexit and Article 50 puts parliament centre stage, where it belongs ? 
Stephen Phillips - pro leave but not pro leaving the single market - wanted greater scrutiny of Brexit 
A soft Brexit option is no option as it means free movement of population. The promotion of it is an insult voters.  
Worth revisiting this piece by Stephen Phillips QC MP as he resigns in protest of gov policy on #Brexit  
Hard Brexit? Only if it's free  
Independence offers a brighter future for all Scots, not just the wealthy British elite that flourish in the UK #indyref #indyref2 #Brexit 
Businessman @PimlicoPlumbers tells @emmabarnett Article 50 Brexit newspaper coverage is 'disgraceful' #5liveDaily #enemiesofthepeople 
Gina Miller has received death threats after the legal decision re Brexit. The judges have been vilified. This barbarism MUST be resisted. 
First Tory to give up seat over EU Referendum??  
What we're seeing now is an attempted COUP designed to overthrow the will of the British people  #brexit  
NIGEL FARAGE: Brexit has been HIJACKED and now only Ukip can save us  
The English Defence League and planning to incite a riot #brexit  
Why the Daily Mail is wrong about the judiciary -My piece for @TheLawyermag #Art50 #Brexit #HighCoutt 
The @WelshGovernment is to apply to intervene in the proposed appeal against the High Court #Brexit decision, @MickAntoniw1 says 
Gob like a slit in a pie. A cold fish and a Brexit Trojan horse. Keeping 16-18 year olds from voting was crucial.  
Rumour: Tory MP Stephen Phillips to resign and force a by-election over Brexit 
The plot to stop Brexit: the judges versus the people  #brexit  
That the EU ref was advisory only and required enabling legislation was in "European Union Referendum Bill 2015-16" HoC 2015 briefing paper.  
The judges’ ruling confirms it – Brexit must go ahead, no ifs or buts | Simon Jenkins  
Astonishing - British newspapers react to judges' Brexit ruling: 'Enemies of the people'  
Quite possibly my favourite #Brexit tweet so far...  
Margaret Thatcher regarded the Rule of Law as central to our democracy & liberty. The #Brexit right holds the opposite view#Remain #YesEU 
Ireland's Enterprise Minister has said the UK's Brexit negotiators "do not know what they are doing." 
Here's what so many people angry at the High Court Brexit ruling are getting wrong#EnemiesOfThePeople 
A setback for May's clumsy approach, but not for Brexit.My @FT op-ed today. 
The Counsel General intends to make an application to intervene in the proposed Article 50 appeal before the Supreme Court #brexit 
Margaret Thatcher: "The late Lord Attlee was right when he said that the referendum was a device of dictators & demagogues,"#Remain #Brexit  
This is the REAL @theresa_may response to the #Brexit ruling … Hilarious and Spot On :-)  
A new low for UK newspapers: the most hysterical frontpages on the Brexit court ruling  
Rape, death & racist threats at a woman for upholding Parliament is vile Brexit bile. Discussing with @toryboypierce on @thismorning in a mo 
Donald Trump is giving election-betting markets a @Brexit feeling  
Former SNP government minister, Alex Neil, has revealed that he and several other SNP MSPs voted for Brexit.  
EXCLUSIVE: Theresa May responds to Article 50 High Court ruling  via @HuffPostUKCom #Brexit #Ukip #Article50 
Should May act like Egypt's Sisi, sack or bend judges or like Erdogan by crushing all those who oppose hard Brexit? Is that the next step? 
In debate yday on Brexit & financial services Treasury Minster said Trade Minister wrong on passporting. This is why MPs scrutiny vital  
UKIP Needs to finish the job we started 
Even more relevant now:The Brexit vote wasn't democracy in action. It was populist ignorance on a grand scale.  
The British people did not vote for #Brexit. 37% of a gerrymandered electoral franchise voted for a slogan, not a practical project. 
"We will seek to amend the legislation... that we should pursue a soft Brexit not a hard Brexit" @nick_clegg on High Court ruling #r4today 
This woman led the Brexit challenge. Now she’s fending off rape and death threats  
Brexit means using hatred of others as a tool for power  
Why @ZacGoldsmith has a big poll lead in Richmond Park byelexn so far. Superior leaflets, simpler message. LibDems making Brexit a mere 'PS'  
The Mail hack who outed a high court judge's sexuality over the Brexit decision is @RichardSpillett. Just saying ... 
Germans estimate 8,000 finance jobs will move from City of London to Frankfurt due to #Brexit  
What is the Lib Dem Brexit position?Me: Do you want to stop Brexit?Lib Dem spokesman: We are not going to give a running commentary. 
The type of hard Brexit, UKIP influenced, isolated, anti immigrant UK, Scotland will be expected to continue to inhabit is truly frightening 
"It's all well and good, Stephen Kinnock saying 'Trust us'. Believe me Mr Kinnock, we don't!" @Nigel_Farage @GMB #Brexit  
When it all comes down to it:The EU wasn't the problemMigrants aren't the problem#Brexit isn't the problemThe Government IS the problem 
The #Brexit doctrine: The 'will of the people' must prevail over all institutional, legal, constitutional obstacles.That's fascism.#Remain 
Goldman: "The probability of “hard Brexit” has shrunk, which could see GBP/$ settle around 1.26 in the near term" 
Watch – James O’Brien on High Court decision regarding Brexit -  
REVEALED: ‘Anti-Brexit judges’ think Michael Gove is as much of an arsehole as you do.  
It looks like Blair will get his way. Unless, of course, we all stand up against him and his plans to destroy our beautiful country.#Brexit  
Just to put things in perspective for all those claiming that #Brexit voters were lied to during the #EUref. #Thebiggestlieofthemall 
Our government spent 9 MILLION POUNDS pushing this LIE into every #UK home.Find parliament vote there!#Brexit 
HEROINE!!Brexit challenger Gina Miller blames lies by Nigel Farage and tabloid media for death threats  via IBTimesUK 
They're so angry! #Brexit #Article50 #Ukip 
#EnemiesOfThePeople Here's the front page of the #DailyMail if they told the truth - #HighCourt #HighCourtRuling #Article50 #Brexit  
High Court Judges welcome here today @DailyMailUK #Brexit  
Clearly @FT believes that Brexit Britain succeeding is a problem that needs solving  
Thoughts on the Brexit judgment and esp the reaction of press and (some) politicians: 
A number of legal academics I respect think there is a decent chance Brexit ruling will be overturned in Supreme Court. So watch this space 
Emotions are running high over the Brexit ruling  #EnemiesOfThePeople 
This is no longer just about #Brexit. This is about how does #Britain want to be governed. @Jon_Danzig’s commentary:  
Brexit: Shakespeare Was Dead Right About Lawyers…  
Nigel Farage said he would return in the event of backsliding on #Brexit. Backsliding is occurring. #ukip 
It may have been a slip of the tongue, but yesterday the good ship #Brexit smashed head first into a giant iceberg.  
it is becoming more clear to me that #brexit is not endgoal but a means to an end, and the end is dangerous for minorities, migrants, poor 
Please RT. Whatever your views on #Brexit no one deserves such abuse for seeking justice in the courts. #ImWithGina 
Can we just get a little perspective here? Brexit is one thing, but tomorrow @Westfieldsfc1 are playing in the first round of the *@FA Cup*. 
To those constituents asking me to vote against #Article50: vote will be about the terms of Brexit, not whether or not we leave the EU. 
What does the High Court's ruling on Article 50 mean for Parliament and #Brexit? Read @commonslibrary's blog to find out more. 
After judges' #Brexit block now your country really needs you: We MUST get out of the EU  
We've survived a Civil War, World Wars, Abdication, the Great Depression. One more constitutional crisis we can take in our stride. #Brexit 
This is language which might be intended to provoke civil conflict or precede a coup, it has no place in a democracy. #Remain #Brexit  
Brexiters who invoked Parliamentary Sovereignty as reason to vote Leave in the referendum, want to now abandon it for triggering article 50?  
You Brexit, you buy it. 
My girlfriend and I's favourite sexual position is 'Brexit'. Spend ages deciding on a position, fall out over it, fuck a European instead. 
NOW is the time for true patriots in parliament to stand up, be counted, and support the Brexit mandate delivered to the Govt by the people. 
I bought your Brexit book, @IanDunt - do you think they can send it in plain packaging so my Grantham neighbours just think I'm buying porn? 
Have you been mis-sold Brexit?Call our Sovereignty Protection Reclaim hotline NOW!  
Discussing British press coverage of Brexit after 10 on Al Jazeera. The translator into Arabic will earn their money today... 
Serious. Fascist Brexit group to launch 'Operation Beacon' if Parliamentary sovereignty doesn't trigger Article 50. (via @sturdyAlex) 
If the Daily Mash isn't one of your go-to media outlets for Brexit coverage, you're doing it wrong. At least 4 shots out of 5 on target.  
Alex Neil's #Scexit overestimates our options. The choices are: bid 4 #indyinEU before final Brexit. Or: we go down with the UK's wreckage. 
Commonwealth wants bilateral FTAs w/ UK:IndiaCanadaAustraliaMalaysiaPakistanSingaporeNZSri LankaGhanaImpossible without #Brexit! 
Very odd that no one seemed to know that, constitutionally, a referendum is only advisory. How come I knew? 
Nick Clegg vows to block Theresa May's Brexit  
If you try to strike Brexit down, it shall become more powerful than you can possibly imagine  
ReesMogg who backed Brexit because EU was 'undemocratic' opposed AV & Lords reform & now thinks we should make 1000 peers to push it through 
Sadly this is now pretty unsurprising: Gina Miller subjected to racist abuse after Brexit legal victory  
.@TonyGallagher, it wasn't a "printing error." You chose to darken a woman's skin you wanted readers to identify as a '#Brexit enemy.' #Scum 
Soft #Brexit.  
"Something about Britain succeeding post-Brexit because of our high quality, independent judicial system" - Brexiters before the referendum 
Legal challenge to Brexit and Guy Fawkes night by Matt - political cartoon gallery  
Watch – James O’Brien slams May on High Court decision over Brexit  #enemiesofthepeople #highcourtruling #brexit  
The job of judges is to interpret+apply the law.The reaction of many British commentators to the #highcourtruling on Brexit is unintelligent 
This woman led the Brexit challenge. Now she’s fending off rape and death threats  
Gina Miller receives rape and death threats after High Court Brexit ruling  
Or maybe just its fifth paragraph, which explains very clearly what the judgment *doesn't* do (ie prevent Brexit)... 
Well said.Too much negativity around.Also keep voting @UKIP to show the #REMOANERS we won't be cheated out of #Brexit.  
Murdoch's @TheSun editor @TonyGallagher gave the OK to darken the skin of this woman for its front page. Racist Sun Scum. #brexit  
"We're appealing #Brexit ruling" - @DavidDavisMP  
Despair seeing morning headlines on Brexit judgment. Judges themselves are thick-skinned, but damage to rule of law considerable. 
I think Brexiters might secretly prefer the glorious outrage of a Great Betrayal to the detail and disappointment of delivering #Brexit 
The great Brexit betrayal has begun. But I know the British people won't let it happen  
Brexit still might not happen and this is the reason why  
A fiery Nigel Farage demands Theresa May calls an early General Election following the High Court Brexit ruling  
Think that High Court judgment about Brexit is 'interfering with democracy'? You don't understand how Britain works  
Brexit is now even messier, writes @StephenFidler1. He explains the complicated legislative process   
Why can't the 17 million who voted for #brexit just accept the wishes of the South African who took this legal appeal to remain in the EU? 
The #Brexit voters who claimed it was about sovereignty but now shout #enemiesofthepeople proving it was about racism all along! 
EU ref was based on crystal ball assumptions. When details of Brexit are confirmed, we should be given the opportunity to vote on it. 
Grateful to the local Green Party. This election is a real opportunity to hold the Government to account over Brexit, Heathrow and the NHS  
They aren't 'thwarting' - It means there will be proper scrutiny of #Brexit deal. You know, British govt taking back control.  
Shouldn't be surprised - the First Minister kept telling supporters we'd have another #indyref if we voted Brexit.  
First Carney, then the Chancellor, now the judges. Everyone is being ordered to bend their jobs by the self-appointed Brexit priesthood.  
This illustrates the depths the UK has descended into the sewer in the last few months #brexit  
One thing we may all agree on is that we are back to full-on Brexit v Remain antipathy. A result of Govt refusing to get on with things IMO. 
Timescale for new frigates announced.Alex Neil spikes SNP #brexit grandstanding.#indycamp being cleared.Not a great 24hrs for nats. 
With a right wing Tory Gov in charge Europe, refugees, foreign nationals and now rule of law all fair game . #Brexit  
Theresa May is still vowing to trigger Brexit in March despite the High Court ruling  
Boris Johnson summed up Brexit Britain in 13 miserable words  
Parliament voted 6-1 to give the people a referendum & promised to implement their decision so how can 3 Judges give MPs a vote on Art 50. 
FASCISM. British Conservative press thinks THEY have the power to rule NOT independent judges. More #Brexit lies.  
No, the referendum wasn’t binding.Yes, it would be daft to ignore the result.No, we don’t elect judges.Yes, we do have a constitution. 
The #Brexit High Court judgement has been slammed as a 'betrayal of democracy' by MEP @BillDudleyNorth  
British newspapers react to judges' Brexit ruling: 'Enemies of the people'  
Brexit media has lost its mind. Has there been a more depressing time for Britain in our memory?  
Isn't it wonderful that to Brexit or not to Brexit is left to same folk who thought Keith Vaz worthy of a place on the Justice Commission? 
Maybe the real Brexit was the rise of street fascism we made along the way. 
Weird that the Brexiteers are so angry about the High Court - its ruling only means  Parliament may get a chance to influence Brexit details 
Brexit a Patriotic Populism Pepper Sprayed into the eyes of the masses through Daily News as blinded people rage  
17,400,000 of us, in a record high vote,voted for #brexit.Nobody voted for the Judges. 
Those Telegraph, Mail & Sun front pages aren't just about the judges. They are about giving Brexit-sceptic MPs a taster of what is to come 
Hey look at this old referendum leaflet. No, don't look at the one which says the NHS will get £350m extra a week. I SAID DON'T LOOK AT THAT 
Will #Brexit struggles mean @theresa_may calls an early election? @bbclaurak asks  
#enemiesofthepeople ? The Sun, Daily Maul, Express, Nigel Farage, Facism, The Far Right, Donald Trump, Climate Change deniers, Brexit liars. 
Well played Nick Clegg.The EU referendum was a vote on lies & hunches.Another referendum will be a vote on detail.  
The Brexit legal challengers should drop the facade that they are all about defending parliamentary sovereignty  
I remember hate coverage,character assassination from before the Yugoslav wars. Floodgates will be hard to close, society damaged #Brexit  
Nick Clegg's Sheffield voted for Brexit. Call an election now so they can dump this  arse licking EU drone! 
I imagine that a referendum to make it Christmas everyday would result in a majority Yes but would Roy Wood have a real plan for #xmas365 ? 
Clegg and Lib-Dems now seeking 'soft Brexit' which would mean NO control over borders and NO UK trade deals.This is NOT what we voted for! 
Pro EU judges making decisions on the Brexit case in the UK, and they have the cheek to tell us Russia is corrupt.#Article50 
Rights of British citizens in Europe after a hard Brexit. Prof Elspeth Guild explains the common immigration policy  
Former Scottish Government minister: Several SNP MSPs secretly voted for Brexit  
Who are the judges who ruled that MPs should vote on Brexit?  
November 2019: UK gov't still working out what Brexit means. Anyone wearing a poppy smaller than their head declared an enemy of the state 
.@nick_clegg: Lib Dems will seek to amend legislation to avoid a damaging hard Brexit and give British people a say over the final deal 
.@theresa_may bids to regain control of #Brexit after yesterday's High Court setback  
My fear is we now get half Brexit. Establishment will try and lock us inside single market. Would be a total betrayal!  
.@Nick_Clegg on #r4today: Govt must come to Parliament and set out what kind of Brexit they want, including on key issue of Single Market 
.@GaryLineker leads the charge against tabloids' 'barmy' fury over Brexit legal challenge  
#enemiesofthepeople ? Enemies of Democracy is the Right-Wing ! Lest we forget who supported the Nazi Regime #DailyMail #brexit  
Nick, willing to vote against the outcome of the referendum. So no honour, integrity or respect for the electorate.  
NIGEL FARAGE: Brexit has been HIJACKED and now only Ukip can save us  
'The great Brexit betrayal has begun. But I know the British people won't let it happen.' @Nigel_Farage @Telegraph 
Never seen a tweet that so accurately describes Brexit.  
 "This had to be done" says Gina Miller, the woman behind the Article 50 #Brexit legal challenge  
here's how much people trust #judges compared to journos and politicians #brexit #Article50 
Never forget. This f***er, who knighted his mates, created #Brexit mess simply because of internal Tory party feud.  
In 140 characters this is how the elite intend to undo the first referendum result  
#Brexit The Movie: The Sequel.  
BBC News Irony=MP's & Lawyers that want to stop Brexit, wearing poppy's that stand 4 those that died to give Britain freedom and democracy. 
Fury over 'out of touch' judges who defied 17.4m Brexit voters  
Memo to my constituents: I will never vote to block Brexit. But I simply don't trust Boris Johnson to negotiate on behalf of the North West. 
We cannot stand by and let the dangerous forces of populism and ignorance prevail. This must never happen again #Brexit  
No: no #Brexit, thank you.  
My cartoon in today's @thetimes #Article50 #highcourtruling #brexit #TheresaMay 
#Article50 / #Brexit case. Those Government pleadings in full.  
Clegg implying support for a 2nd referendum on terms of departure, which as he knows will incentivise EU to make those terms unacceptable. 
After the latest #Brexit court ruling, we are passing these leaflets around on our buses.  
I thought the whole point of Brexit was to return sovereignty to Parliament? 
It would be a "constitutional outrage if unelected Lib Dem peers stood in the way" of the referendum result says Theresa Villiers 
This vile rag learned nothing from the tragic murder of Jo Cox. They (& anyone buying it) should be ashamed of themselves #Article50 #brexit  
In threatening to block Brexit without a second referendum Nick Clegg is going beyond any High Court judge 
Clegg says parliament should amend Article 50 Bill to instruct ministers to pursue soft Brexit and guarantee public have say on final deal. 
Nick Clegg says Lib Dem MPs and (more importantly) peers, wd amend Brexit legislation to force 'soft Brexit' and public vote on final deal. 
Deselect the Remain MPs. If that is not possible, defeat them at the next general election by voting for a candidate who supports Brexit. 
23rd June Brexit=more NHS cash & power to parliament. Brexit now = collapsing £, higher prices, fewer jobs. 2nd thoughts beat first thoughts 
NEWS! High Court Brexit decision to be written on the side of a bus  
Wait til Brexiters realise that Brexit means British judges applying British laws in British courts... 
What kind of government allows our Parliamentary representatives to debate & vote on Brexit only when forced to do so by the High Court? 
"Democracy does not mean you give government of the day unqualified rights" says @nick_clegg on #Brexit ruling 
This man correctly predicted Brexit and the Socttish referendum. He says Donald Trump will next week  
#Brexit ruling is a "good thing" as "judges have said parliament has a role" - @nick_clegg  
Good grief, Nick Clegg on Radio 4 talking about the Brexit court decision. Not sure my radio will survive this. 
This man speak speaks for me. So much passion. We need people to listen. #brexit #hero 
.@Nigel_Farage tells @GMB that @theresa_may should call an early general election to avoid a #Brexit 'betrayal'  
Let's take back control from horrible EU institutions & give it to UK Parliament & UK courts. OK, MPs and Courts want debate on Brexit. NO! 
This was the process for #Brexit. This is what the High Court subverts and which now emboldens Europhiles. No ambiguity. Implement Now  
[Extremely Tory Voice]CostsNHS: £0Arts: £0Science Funding: £0Brexit: MillionsSomeone who is good at economy help, my country is dying 
Fucking hell. What is happening? An MP was killed this year. And men calling for more killing over Brexit.  
The brexiteers have taken matters into their own hands at the channel tunnel #brexit  
Be under no illusion. Too many in Parliament want to erode the essence of #Brexit to the point it becomes #Remain in all but name. Traitors 
My cartoon - government to appeal Article 50 High Court ruling#sovereignty#Brexit#r4Today 
Brexit is going to happen   
A sovereign Parliament and an independent Judiciary were surely two of the Great British institutions that Brexit was supposed to protect? 
A long shot just now, but could #Brexit eventually pave the way for an independent #Wales? Good piece @lsebrexitvote 
Brexit has caused havoc already. Now parliament must save us | Polly Toynbee  
Politicians and journalists whipping up hatred against judges and the rule of law are undermining the very basis of democracy. #Brexit 
Theresa May expected to tell EU boss Jean-Claude Juncker Brexit will not be blown off course by High Court ruling…  
The Brexit judge's 7 most damning attacks on the government  
What do we want?BREXITWhen do we want it?NOWWhat should that entail and how should it be best done?TRAITORS!#sigh 
We start the day with the BBC exultant about the High Court subversion of the expressed will of the British people over #Brexit 
How sad that in our lifetimes the UK has become the world's poster child for stupidity and right wing populism by voting for #Brexit 
First, they rejected European judges...Now @DailyMailUK& @Telegraph apparently reject the rule of law itself as elitist.Brexit means..?  
#Brexit court ruling: Your questions answered  
There could be a snap electionEssential for all in Labour to be disciplined & to unite behind Corbyn leadership & @Keir_Starmer on Brexit 
Hi, the Daily Fail and all who read you. Personally I'm delighted that an unelected gay fencer told Brexit where to shove it. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg proposes creating 1,000 new Peers to push Brexit through. Ah the sweet smell of democracy 
#Brexit High Court's #Article50 ruling is "frustrating" democracy says Dominic Raab  
Threatening to kill people who don't agree with you..I worry about what democracy means to #Brexit loons #GinaMiller 
This headline has to be one of the most dangerous things I've read. Whatever your views on Brexit, this is not the way #enemiesofthepeople 
So, government did not even understand the extent of its own powers over Brexit?British government is a laughing stock in EU 
9 of the 12 'regions' of the UK voted LEAVE at the EU Referendum:EMWMEASTYORKS & HUMBERNENWSESWWALES 
Fault is Cameron's Should have TOLD the people that referendum was not binding & the final word would be for MPsMan was a disaster for UK 
Brexit Patriotic Populism Pepper Sprayed into the eyes of the masses through Daily News as blinded people rage  
Impressive, temperate comments by Gina Miller. The abuse exemplifies worst elements who feel empowered by Brexit.  
After this Brexit ruling, MPs must seize their moment | Martin Kettle  
Laugh, sneer, tell the employed working class that they just don't understand, block Brexit. Then get ready for an earth shattering backlash  
UK: European Union Membership Referendum, BMG telephone poll:Remain: 51% (+3)Leave: 49% (-3)#EUref #EUReferendum #Brexit 
Brexit just became even more complicated, thanks to High Court   
Quite extraordinary U-turn by the Bank of England - Brexit no longer an economic disaster -  
On R4 Barnsley Brexit voters sound angry & ignorant on H Ct ruling. No wonder when they read such Trumpish headlines  
Can't see an outcome where court judgement yesterday "stops Brexit". Delayed a bit perhaps. Yet many papers suggesting will of people defied 
WrongBREXIT can be done over night with the repeal of the 1972 ECAArticle 50 is formal permission to the EU Commission to muck us about.  
Regardless of your position on Brexit we should all be horrified by a newspaper calling judges 'enemies of the people' for upholding the law 
I agree"Brexit block will spark 'riots and revolution', activists warn"Go visit a 'working mans pub' in N. England 
Nigel Farage on #Brexit latest: "I don't trust parliament on this. The neatest way to finish this off is for May to call an election" 
After judges' Brexit block now your country really needs you: We MUST get out of the EU  we must fight for our nation 
Contrary to some headlines, the three judges did not block #Brexit. They ruled govt cannot invoke Article 50 without Parliament's support. 
'Enemies of the people': British newspapers react to judges' Brexit ruling  
Sir James Dyson dismisses EU tariff fears of hard Brexit "The £ is artificial low having been talked down" 
Whatever one thinks of #Brexit, the Daily Mail is a threat to democracy and the rule of law   #dailyFail 
Everyone has lost the plot. The ruling does not stop Brexit. And a single Mail headline does not mean we are becoming Nazi Germany. 
Enemies of the people? #brexit  
'This had to be done': Gina Miller on her Brexit legal challenge   
Greece's TV licence row doesn't look that serious today... #Greece #Brexit  
Welcome to #brexit Britain where even legitimately applying the law can get you awful, xenophobic, death threats  
If there was a civil war because Brexit gets blocked I reckon we'd be fine. All the Leave voters are old as fuck. We could take them. 
Strong and clear @FT editorial on the High Court 'thunderbolt'  on Brexit and parliament  
Things #Brexit people don’t seem to like:- UK Law- UK courts- UK MPsAnd yet they want sovereignty? 
Boris Johnson at last explains Tory Brexit plan -  
Brexiteers: UK courts for UK lawsUK HC: Brexit must follow UK law and go to parliamentBrexiteers: We didn't mean that law 
Seven years ago Britain didn’t have a Supreme Court. Now it has to rule on Brexit  
Americans are wondering if polling is accurate or if we’ll see a Brexit-style shock  
'She is vile' Outrage as 'disgusting' NHS worker hopes children of Brexit voters fall ill  
Not a word in the papers about the politicians who 'omitted' to inform people as to the 'advisory' only nature of the referendum. 
Frankly disturbing UK front pages this morning on ruling that parliament must vote to begin Brexit  
Brexit. Harambe. Cubs. This election. One post-apocalyptic day, my kids will ask me what the year 2016 was like. 
Parliament will now get a say in the UK's Brexit plan. What should it push for?  
5 calls to action - civil, useful acts you can take to prevent destructive #Brexit before Brexit breaks Britain 
Boss reiterating that the Tories don't have a scooby what to do about #Brexit, which is why they want to do it in secret. #SNP 
Honesty at last? Former Scottish Government minister: Several SNP MSPs secretly voted for Brexit  via @telegraphnews 
After judges' Brexit block now your country really needs you: We MUST get out of the EU  
Re: Brexit Instead of vilifying your judges you should deify them for trying to save yourselves from yourselves. 
Even Brexit's chief strategist thinks Out-ers critical of court ruling are 'babbling nonsense'  pic.twitter.com/EEJuvMmRQ4 
The stab in the back myth will start here (in the event that Brexit does not deliver unto us a land of milk and honey).  
HUGELY ENJOYING walking past #Brexit paper headlines apoplectic about functioning of rule of law & constitution.1st uplifting news in ages 
Disgraceful journalism #brexitshambles RT 'Enemies of the people': British newspapers react to judges' Brexit ruling  
With the UK's High Court ruling, the murky politics of Brexit just got a lot murkier  
Morning friends smile it's Friday #fridayfreedom Have fun #brexit @Carollsweett @StarikVox @Isobg69 
We forget Brexit is not of PM Mays doing - this is the tide mark of the worst PM in decades Cameron, honours for mates then clears of. 
Just like #Brexit the critics of the High Court decision don't understand the consequences of what they are saying.#r4today 
Press is scary this morning. Parliamentary sovereignty is fundamental to UK law. Judges have to uphold UK law. #brexit will still happen. 
Sir James Dyson dismisses EU tariff fears of hard Brexit  
The brit parliament has once again let England down.Want Brexit?Strive for an English Parliament,working for and accountable to England. 
Heard something about #Brexit and the British High Court but can’t make sense of it? We’ve answered some common Qs.  
2 minutes silence for all idiot NRIs who voted for #Brexit thinking it would keep out East Europeans and Muslims  
This says Brexit now unlikely in light of high court ruling. Bit bizarre.  
"Enemies of the people", you know, because they sided with the wishes of 16.1 million people.#brexit #DailyMail @DailyMailUK 
exclusive club card referendum disqualified for using memes from last decade... not actually but they should have been 
May bids to regain control of Brexit after court setback  
U.K. has uphill task overturning decision Parliament must weigh in on Brexit  
For over a thousand years, Common Law has been our law of the land here. Not 'Corpus Juris'. Common Law based on precedent. Abide by Brexit. 
High Court doesn't care if the people want Brexit  via @BV 
In case of Global scenario,#Brexit is a small event compared to elections in world's most powerful eco&military.Brace urself for uncertainty 
Trains, politics #Brexit #MichaelPortillo on Brkfst this morning @BBCLeeds ahead of @CityVarieties one man show tonight. 
Character assassination on judges who simply said parliament is supreme.  Something Brexit was meant to be about  
U.K. government to appeal Brexit ruling handed down by top court   
PTU must read some brilliant set of tweets on #China & #brexit by @RenukaJain6. Her command on Financial Mkt is 2nd to none@sgurumurthy 
Since the BREXIT Vote LGBTQ Attacks Have Risen 147%-Now Donald Trump is Inspiring Attacks!  
BREXIT NEWS: When an anachronistic self-serving careerist Parliament rides rough-shod over the Will Of The People, you have a dictatorship. 
BREXIT LATEST: Apparently, the 'judge' who made the anti-democratic ruling is some sort of unelected arch-EUrophile Reprobate. So that's why 
Noel Whelan: Enda Kenny seems intent on making mess of Brexit  
Gillian Tett: Markets prepare for a vote that makes Brexit look basic  
Divisive Tory Brexit ref has ripped the Uk apart much more than Scottish Indy ever would haveShe has lost the plot as England splits apart  
Donald Trump wants you to believe that he's "Mr. Brexit" and that he'll win against all odds.We're here to tell you why that's BULLSHIT. pic.twitter.com/zCVwuhu7s4 
Aston Martin boss calls for other car manufacturers to get same Brexit deal as Nissan  @AndyatAston #ukmfg 
I have read the #Article50 #brexit judgment of the #highcourt in its entirety. Here is my concise summary. 
'Enemies of the people': British newspapers react to judges' Brexit ruling  
A Dave Cameron ran PP can't even Brexit their own zone properly 
May to assure leaders she still has finger on Brexit trigger  
This election is a referendum on our national values. Institutionalized  corruption vs a guy that says inappropriate things. #ThinkPlease 
The PM is to tell Jean-Claude Juncker Thursday's Article 50 ruling will not derail her Brexit schedule.  
May to tell Juncker Brexit plans not derailed by court  
Remember the morning after the Brexit vote, UK voters wanted to take it back? Wake up America, you won't be able 2take it back either!  
We can't let Brexit be derailed by City slicker and Brazilian crimper  via @MailOnline 
The results are in. Thank you to everyone who voted for this SRA by-election and referendum questions!  #McSU 
Don't look now, but #Brexit might not happen after all:  
Collins Dictionary names ‘Brexit’ word of 2016  
'She is vile' Outrage as 'disgusting' NHS worker hopes children of Brexit voters fall ill  
#Brexiteers twisting the truth again!The High Court didn't rule against #Brexit.They ruled Parliament should invoke it & not the Executive 
What's still reported as "Turkey post-coup attempt crackdown" is (no longer) related to the event. Is crushing of dissent before referendum. 
Britain MUST leave the EU and avoid getting 'bogged down' by Brexit, ex-Cameron aide says  
Gold is in its best run since Brexit on investor concern that Trump may triumph  
High Court Brexit ruling is TREASON! Britain is no longer a democracy! Listen to Pod 1 - #FreeSpeech 
Excellent read, @DanielJHannan. I certainly recommend anyone, Brexit or Remain, putting the time aside to read.  
This woman seized the momentum after a key Brexit ruling  
This has nothing to do with the referendum. Or the result. It's to do with the democratic process. Which Cameron, May, UKIP tried to subvert  
The Brexit might not happen after all  
Britain: Court Rules Lawmakers Have to Vote on Brexit #Article50  
‘Brexit’ is word of the year  
As discussed on No Agenda the Brexit vote will turn out to be a scam perpetrated on the British public. "You ain't going nowhere, slaves!"  
'This had to be done': Gina Miller on her Brexit legal challenge  
Hopping on @FOX4 with @heatherhaysfox4 in a few minutes to discuss...of all things....my #Brexit experience!  
UK's Brexit cannot pass without parliament approval  
Let's hope this pair of incompetent fools go down with the ship. They really have made a pigs ear of Brexit  
This really does sum up the utter farce that the Shifty Unelected PM May is making of Brexit!!!  
#NigelFarage under #pressure for #permanentreturn as #Ukipleader as he hints at #comeback #BREXIT #BREXITNOW 
Brexit note: government, its officials, agents,individuals and private entities are all accountable under the law.  
hope this doesn't turn out like the brexit vote. Or Colombian farc vote. Ferocious defense of democracy is not happening 
Brexit flashbacks are haunting traders as they brace for the U.S. election  
Brexit: Theresa May may call for snap General Election to trigger Article 50 | UK | News | Daily Express  
Brexit sold so many lies that folk seem to have forgotten the truth.The truth about the UK constitution, democracy and the law. 
Article 50 invokedBrexit Bill writtenElection calledVote for the MP you wantNew parliament votes on the BillRepresentative democracy 
The plot to stop Brexit: the judges versus the people   via @telegraphnews 
Brexit: Constitution expert Professor Anthony King says:"Supreme Court will have difficulty overturning a judgment argued so emphatically"  
'NHS worker caused outrage by suggesting children of Brexit voters should suffer illnesses without a cure'  
The NHS worker on question time who wishes illness on people's children as revenge for voting Brexit should be sacked #bbcqt #vile 
Britain's High Court ruled parliament, not Theresa May, can trigger Article 50 for Brexit negotiations. Now what?  
Former Scottish Government minister: Several SNP MSPs secretly voted for Brexit  via @telegraphnews 
Whether you're a brexit or remain supporter the how, what and when holds so many variables 
Daily Mail use judge's sexuality to denounce him "The judges who blocked #Brexit" article:  
Dear America, counting on you to not brexit this.  
BILL MAHER: This year's election isn't just about selecting a new president, it's a referendum on decency.  
With no real evidence, I was still holding out some tiny hope #Erdogan might return to pragmatism after referendum.  That hope died tonight 
I'm now going to sleep but I really do urge people to actually read the Brexit judgment, to see what it was actually deciding and why. 
: And the Mail seems to overlook that the judges were not overruling the Brexit vote, but on the mechanism to effect it. 
Whatever Brexit/Remain views, you cannot sensibly do anything other than condemn utter gutter "journalism." I'm embarrassed for the press.  
From a friend's Facebook page: 1859 Rajah of Tanjore judgement cited by the high court in London in the Brexit case  
I have to say, if Labour - despite the obvious damage #Brexit will do - don't grow a pair and fight, they've lost my vote forever. #bbcqt 
Today's a bad day for the constitutionNot because of #Brexit case but attacks on independent judiciary & rule of law  
Jeremy Corbyn says Labour will not block Brexit  
Can UK boost trade with India post-Brexit?  
Brexit is on the ropes.  A few more blows and together we can end this hideous spectacle. We have plans. Join us  
Would The Daily Mail's front page satisfy the UK Government's definition of extremism? #Brexit #article50 #dailymail 
The 48% of British who voted against Brexit are feeling a lot better about things now  
MY OFFICIAL RESPONSE TO THE BREXIT RULING.  
The notions of the 'people' and their 'will' are by far the most dangerous things to emerge out of #Brexit. #Remain #YesEU 
#Brexit crisis #Turkey #USElection #Aleppo #Mosul #Kashmir etc. Time to double check the Book of Revelation again. Just in case. #Apocalypse 
Clinton once again making election referendum on Trump...  
"Brexit is a simple thing. Three men chase a dream for 9 months and at the end, the Germans win." 
Front pages of @MailOnline @TheSun & @Telegraph #Brexit #Article50 via @ezralevant 
Go Dimbleby: "Referendums are only advisory unless we say they are compulsory. You didn't say it was." Eat that, #Brexit Quitlings. #bbcqt 
1/Andrew Sullivan's Clinton hatred poisons all he says. The election isn't a referendum on the Clintons. It's a test of our intelligence. 
The Commons will not risk blocking Brexit. They will have the Lords do it for them. 
"...and the third is an openly gay ex-Olympic fencer" #Brexit  
Oof, RW press are super angry that the High Court thinks we should use the same diplomatic process on Brexit that we do for everything else. 
A stable kingdom can only be built on the foundation of good laws, not upon the vagaries of "the will of the people". #Brexit  
Clinton and Trump battle in the final stretch, U.K. court deals blow to Brexit plans, and more top stories   
People urnae seriously thinking that MPs should overturn the Brexit referendum are they? I voted Remain, but that would be a bad move.  
Vox Sentences: Brexit? More like Brex-maybe.  
PM was wrong to have attempted to sideline Parliament: now needs to subject her Brexit approach to proper scrutiny.  
A disgraceful attack at the separation of powers. Regardless of your views on brexit, this kind of attack must be aggressively challenged.  
Remember on Sunday to set the clock back one hour and then on Tuesday to not set the country back 50 years #elections2016 #brexit #usa 
The Daily Mail using not merely the language of tyranny, but the language of totalitarianism. #Brexit #Remain #YesEU 
Isn't Brexit fascinating? Good night. 
The Brexit judge's 7 most damning attacks on the government  
The PM herself should lead such condemnation. Not doing so sends a negative message about the probity of the legal system.#Brexit#Article50  
Brexit: Judicial Review - round one ... now wait for the real verdict ...  #Brexit.  
U.S. calls for "flexible" Brexit  via @POLITICOEurope | Getty 
Good grief! Hold on!Judges have simply said that MPs need to vote on Brexit!A tad over the top from paper owned by pornographer Desmond...  
I hope that when #Brexit comes, for it surely will, I sincerely hope it costs these self-serving parasites everything.  
IF the EU referendum was only advisory,  surely the 1975 referendum was advisory too, if so, surely our membership of the EU is illegal 
OR independent judiciary, separation of powers & basic checks & balances. Oh and much loved 'parliamentary sovereignty'. #brexit  
Sterling soars after UK court gives Parliament power to block #Brexit  
It's hard to tell from this #bbcqt audience that a/ The Conservatives WON the 2015 election and b/ The UK voted for Brexit. Such bias. 
#ImWithGina 'This had to be done': Gina Miller on her Brexit legal challenge  
The traitor trying to use her wealth to stop #Brexit!Gina Miller is off my xmas list!#WeAreLeaving 
This is fascist hysteria: Better Together  #Brexit Britain has gone completely mad!  
We haven't changed our minds. West Midlands voters still want to leave the EU #brexit  
Don't think I've ever seen the Tory press in such a paroxysm of blind rage#brexit  
I am going to ask Boris to choose my lottery numbers. Yesterday he inadvertently predicted Brexit would hit a legal iceberg, after all! ;-)  
If you still don't like the way the Brexit cookie is crumbling, you can always appeal to the European Court of Justice. I dare you. 
Momentum is building for my bill next week calling for a referendum to keep our water in public ownership.It...  
'Stop betraying Brexit!' Fury as judges rule that MPs SHOULD be able block our departure from the EU   
"Brexit means Brexit" - now "democracy means democracy" says a man on #bbcqt 
James O Brien has delivered his devastating verdict on the Brexit High Court ruling  
The High Court judges who made the Brexit ruling today won't be intimidated by newspaper front pages. That's why they're High Court judges. 
Love the use of inverted commas. The Mail way to basically insult ppl & infer someone else said it. May as well put 'bastard' judges #brexit pic.twitter.com/6NHc8qZkIk 
I notice the openly gay Brexit-blocking judge has a cold sore on his big front page moment. Can us queens not catch a break?  
Of all post referendum things I thought might happen, wasn't expecting Gary Lineker to become the nearest thing we have to an Opposition. 
General #Election at #Christmas . Who would you vote for? #brexit #EU #UK #Britain #bbcqt 
The referendum isn't being overturned because not enough MPs if any will be prepared to risk a £74k-a-yr cushy job for the sake of a ruckus. 
This slipshod /tragic #Brexit mess is  because Cam thought he'd shut down his Right-flank AND #Farage by using #Remain.He lost.And so did we 
Funny to think that a few free market liberals actually supported Brexit once, isn't it?  
The judges didn't 'block Brexit'. They ruled that our 'sovereign' laws state our 'sovereign' MPs can order it by a simple vote. Get over it. 
Today two friends, both longtime Labour voters, have joined Lib Dems mainly because of Corbyn's response to Brexit. 
These judges were asked a legal question. They answered. They're not blocking Brexit. Parliament itself could do that. But it won't. #bbcqt 
Brexiteers appear not to be very keen on UK law. And I thought it was EU law that they had a problem with. #Article50 #Brexit #bbcqt 
I get more disgusted by post-Brexit Britain by the day - clueless, hopeless, worthless. I need better for my kids' future #bbcqt #Indyref2 
#Brexit will happen. But not overnight and not without consequences.And once again-the poor -the working poor & the young will pay for it.  
Struggling Tory Sajid Javid says "there are no plans for an early election".There are no plans for Brexit either. #bbcqt 
The British people voted for #Brexit  naw correction  the English and the Welsh did . #bbcqt   And that gentleman Is  correct IT'S A JOKE 
Judges said nothing about whether #Brexit should/shouldn't go ahead. Merely that Parliament should scrutinise ... because that's its job. 
Imagine if the House of Lords blocked Brexit. The Leave majority would then call for them to be abolished. WIN - WIN! #bbcqt 
Friday Daily Mail front page attacking judiciary in a way that would be approved by Putin or Mugabe. What horror Brexit has unleashed.  
Ha! Tory MP demands that the BBC plays 'God Save the Queen' to celebrate Brexit, so #Newsnight obliges by playing out with Sex Pistols.  
Re Brexit discussion Why are there no representatives from the countries that voted to remain in the EU Looks like EVEL BBCQT#bbcqt 
#Brexit: always going to have legal issues. Cam didn't bother to make sure there were none-because he thought he'd win!This is #ToryMadness 
Tomorrow's newspapers on Brexit - we're where we're at coz of internal Tory party politics - that's the democratic deficit & why I'm now Yes 
"The use of the law to stymie Brexit is a naked, elitist assault on democracy."  
@snazdoll Let's not forget many people who voted Brexit were duped by fake NHS promises or had no idea what they were doing. 
• Referendum: purely advisory• Parliament: has executive duty• Law: is supremeYou really should know this stuff  
Another one. Today's the day that Brexit goes mad. We're now at the 'Judges vs the people'.   
Interesting that the 1975 referendum to enter the EU was never questioned yet the referendum to leave the EU is #questiontime #brexit #bbcqt 
.@lisanandy says Government must be transparent about its Brexit plans, which will have a profound effect on people's jobs and lives #bbcqt 
Woah there. "Great Ormond Street NHS worker" wishes illness on #BBCQT panel's kids as Brexit punishment. Someone is getting fired tomorrow. 
Magnificent Steve Bell cartoon on the high court's Brexit ruling – political cartoon gallery  
BILLY BREXIT. Look at the size of the poppy on the fucker. #bbcqt pic.twitter.com/AcDsIa7LJJ 
Embarrassment for Sturgeon as former cabinet minister reveals that he and several other SNP MSPs voted for Brexit.  
Interesting. If UK Gov is forced to produce a Brexit Bill, even if it passes in the HoC, it needs an LCM in the Scottish Parliament. 
What bothers me most about Remoaners is the arrogant assumption that we were duped into backing Brexit. We made an informed decision #bbcqt 
Compare and contrast Nazi Illustrierter Beobachter 1933 and the Daily Mail 2016. #brexit  
Such a critical matter as the UK leaving the EU should NOT be decided by a referendum result based on huge, outrageous lies #bbcqt 
I don't often depart from the NHS topic but really! These judges ruled on UK law, not on Brexit. Shameful reporting from @DailyMailUK 
"Populism is dangerous" Brexit in a nutshell #bbcqt 
"We the people" are split, we "the people" have not unanimously voted for Brexit. "We the people" have been lied to and hoodwinked. #bbcqt 
The Daily Mail wanted Brexit to give power to British judges. It now calls those same judges 'the enemy of the people'. Go figure.  
The pound was boosted after the High Court ruling on Brexit #bbcqt  
Could the ruling on Brexit mean that Theresa May calls for an early general election? #bbcqt  
Nazi Germany did the same to its judges, before sending them to camps #brexit 
Genuinely wish we could just delete 2016 as a year. The referendum has turned Britain more vitriolic and has divided it completely. 
Judges didn’t say they object to referendum result. They said government can’t trigger Article 50 without parliament involved (1/2) #bbcqt 
The author of Article 50, Lord Kerr, said that Brexit is not inevitable #bbcqt  
If Parliament decides to remain in the EU, in defiance of a national referendum... Things could get tense.  
Politicians are *still* not getting it.The more they piss around with #Brexit - the more disgruntled people will get...#bbcqt 
#Brexit vote did that. Markets strengthened today. But you know what you're getting as soon as you see "traitor".  
Terrible year, 2016. So tired of ignorant people being given copious airtime to whip up the tempers of useful idiots. #bbcqt #brexit 
Steve Bell on the high court's Brexit ruling – cartoon  
Proud of our nation's independent judiciary. #HighCourtRuling re #Brexit is not about politics but its integrity vis a vis legal process. 
Ha - Dimbleby reminds Sajid Javid that Tories themselves ruled that parliament had to have the last say after a referendum. #bbcqt 
The plot to stop Brexit: the judges versus the people  
Today's Brexit confusion clarified by the invaluable @DavidAllenGreen  
Top @simon_telegraph scoop -- SNP MSP reveals he backed Brexit, says other colleagues did too.  
Perhaps it's years of referendum obsession, but some Brexiteers seem to lack a basic understanding of British institutions/system. 
First came Whitehall, then the central bank, now the judiciary. Do Brexiteers have respect for any independent institution? #Brexit 
Hartley-Brewer - who had clearly not bothered to read the judgement - made a complete fool of herself on #Skypapers @juliaHB1 #brexit 
The irony of papers owned by unelected billionaires attacking the British judiciary is astounding #DailyMail #brexit 
#GinaMiller will everybody please note that she is married to a hedge fund manager…the ones most effected by #Brexit!  
One of the sad features of recent years is the slow transformation of the Conservative party into a Brexit party.  
This front page is a  throwback to @DailyMailUk #Nazi-condoning past#DailyMail#HighCourt#Brexitpic-@hendopolis 
#Skypapers Julia Hartley-Brewer is willing to go to prison if Brexit is overuled. Can someone please make that happen? 
An MP was murdered over Brexit and the Mail have put the judges on the front page of their fascist-ass paper. Fuck this dystopian bullshit. 
According to @Daily_Express, the prospect of MPs debating the details of Brexit is as "grave" as the threat of invasion by genocidal Nazis.  
The judgment is about how Brexit can happen lawfully; not about whether Brexit should happen. 
Michael Moore spouts absolute bullshit about Brexit to attack Trump. FULL VIDEO:  pic.twitter.com/mX9BKpyzz5 
Amazing the Mail showing itself to be even more ignorant than the Express. To repeat. The judgement does NOT stop BREXIT.  
Friday's I: "Brexit plan in tatters" #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers (via @hendopolis) 
RTing this from earlier because the wilfully ignorant are now in full flow. No, the High Court has not "blocked Brexit".  
Britain on verge of a constitutional crisis… because three judges protected Parliamentary Sovereignty.  #brexit #Article50 #dailyfail 
Man who demanded sovereignty of parliament outraged by sovereignty of parliament. #Brexit #Article50 #Ukip 
Huge respect to @andree_frieze, who stood down as Green candidate in Richmond Park to facilitate #progressivealliance against Brexit Zac. 
Tomorrow's front page: Handful of EU-based campaigner spark fury after throwing Brexit plans into chaos  
Brexit is not blocked it just means it has to be debated and voted on in Parliament LIKE EVERYTHING ELSE. Stupid headline 
Papers leading with "Judges blocked Brexit" must know it's untrue. So why are they trying to undermine public trust in courts? 
Abandoning #Brexit would be ‘political suicide’ for the Conservatives  
These people are out of their tiny minds. (Brexit will still happen, as it must.)  
Good Grief.Several SNP MSPs voted for Brexit.What a bunch of 2 faced deceitful charlatans. 
a life changing referendum where all the debate took place after the vote. Shameful on all of us, especially those elected to lead 
Alex Neil's comments drive a coach and horses through SNP leadership's attempt to co-opt Brexit verdict into their indyref2 campaign 
Friday's GUARDIAN:"Turmoil for May as judges rule parliament must decide on Brexit" #tomorrowspaperstoday 
TIMES: May is urged to call snap election over Brexit ruling #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
The referendum he called to keep his party together now looks likely to tear apart the country and... er... his party. Nice one Dave.  
It's no surprise that people don't vote anymore when when they win their decision is overruled #itvnews #brexit 
"3 judges blocked Brexit"No they didn't. They said parliament must trigger article 50. This shit passes for news. pic.twitter.com/DjVyzVYW43 
The pound is rising after the High Court Brexit ruling, and the reason will infuriate hard Brexiters  
I know the judgement today doesn't stop Brexit but God it's fun watching the dafter Leavers have a tantrum. 
Brexit just became even more complicated, thanks to High Court   
Promising “Best Analysis” of #Brexit feat. Hannan, Farage and IDS. No joke!  
No... 'The great Brexit betrayal' began when newspaper owners & editors decided honesty was less important than sales.  
Contrary to Brexit myth, Parliament has always been sovereign. Odd that May government now wishes to trash that constitutional bedrock 
the worst thing about brexit is hearing people say 'breggsit' 
The judges didn't block Brexit. Why are the press allowed to misinform?  Could lead to another Jo Cox, or riots? 
Support for EU exit and implementing Article 50 booms after 'Brexit betrayal' court ruling>> 
So far the most ignorant front page of the night but then it is the Express.The judgement does NOT stop BREXIT. It is about process  
Reminder that this mess was caused by gentlemen amateurs who thought they were born to rule. #brexit 
My amazing MP. She is truly the definition of an honest politician looking to protect the interest of everyone. I'm so proud of her! 
Well well. This puts a lot of the SNP's overblown rhetoric on #Brexit into some context  
Attorney General Jeremy Wright under pressure to quit after shock High Court defeat over Brexit timing  
Former Scottish Government minister: Several SNP MSPs secretly voted for Brexit  
Harsh words for Theresa May from James O’Brien as he reflects on what the Article 50 ruling means for Brexit  
GUARDIAN FRONT PAGE: 'Turmoil for May as judges rule that parliament must decide on Brexit' #skypapers 
Bookies have slashed the odds of a 2017 General Election after the Brexit ruling 
Article 50 ruling: the EU referendum was only ever "advisory" #bbcqt 
This man correctly predicted Brexit and the Scottish referendum. He says Donald Trump will win next week     
The man who wrote Article 50 says Brexit can still be stopped  
There are Remainers who want to fix Brexit and Remainers who want to destroy it. Me for @CapX 
Could the Brexit ruling be a blessing in disguise for Theresa May?  
A cross party group of Conservative & Labour MPs met today to discuss how to force the Government into revealing its Brexit aims. #Traitors 
INDEPENDENT DIGITAL: The verdict that rewrites the rules of Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
A @SkyData poll shows the public believe Theresa May should be able to trigger Brexit without involving Parliament  
Govt itself had said #referendum not in itself legally binding,so their protests about court ruling are hypocritical 
Brexit put on ice. Europe under mass muslim invasion. America being urged to embrace the Clinton criminal cartel. Interesting times 
METRO FRONT PAGE: ‘Odds cut on Brexit election in spring’ #skypapers 
No. That was the #Brexit vote.This was just a boring thing called the rule of law. Remember that?   
.@LiamFoxMP why are you disappointed that #ParliamentisSovereign ? it's what you campaigned for in referendum. @KristiinaCooper 
My heroes- Gina Miller, all the claimants and lawyers. Thank you for reaffirming parliamentary sovreignty.  
However much Brexit supporters disagree with the High Court judgment on Article 50, threatening the lives of the judges is beyond despicable 
Brexit can be an opportunity to develop the macroeconomic, adaptive and shaping capabilities global firms need  
Why bother with a lengthy and expensive appeal when it'll result in a vote in Parliament anyway? Just do it and let's move on. #Brexit 
The People voted Brexit, it will happen, can we trust May?  via @telegraph #telegraphios 
Guardian front page, Friday 4 November 2016: Turmoil for May as judges rule that parliament must decide on Brexit  
Nigel Farage's Brexit rage just got destroyed - in 19 words       
I blame Yessers for the No vote, Remainers for Brexit, and for the impending election of Trump I blame entitled millennial cunts.  
Those Remainiacs hoping that an early General Election would block Brexit have to ask themselves: "Do you feel lucky punk?"  
What kind of government allows our Parliamentary representatives to debate and vote on Brexit only when forced to do so by the High Court? 
Because if the EU referendum was run under First Past The Post, Leave would win a huge landslide.  
17.4m people voted to Brexit. 420 MPs oppose this.Traitor's Gate needs reopened. 
Support for EU exit and implementing Article 50 booms after 'Brexit betrayal' court ruling  
White old men in wigs? Entrenched establishment pawns - filthy rich elitists... not the usual kind of "left-wing" anti-brexit hero is it.  
Court ruling means act of parliament would be needed for #Brexit, says May  
Jeremy Corbyn reacts to the High Court judgement on Brexit.  
Could Brexit ruling be a blessing in disguise for PM Theresa May?  
Tonight's ShowFBI & ClintonMedia's Blocking NewsWill Of People? Brexit LosesTrumps Silent ArmyUS Prosperity CollapseSwing State Mayhem 
The Brexit betrayal has begun. But I know the British people won't let it happen, writes @Nigel_Farage #Premium 
FINANCIAL TIMES FRONT PAGE: ‘May’s Brexit calendar in turmoil as judges rule MPs must have say’ #skypapers 
Let's remind ourselves that parliament had its say when MPs voted by 544 to 53 to give the people an EU referendum on 23rd June! #Brexit 
Yes - this will put pressure on the govt and politicians who backed 'Vote Leave' to fulfil Brexit promises by the campaign. Pile it on.  
Now we know what they meant when they said "we want our democracy back" #brexit  
At last.  High Court reminds us we are a parliamentary democracy #Brexitjudgement #brexit  
Clinton and Trump battle in the final stretch, U.K. court deals blow to Brexit plans, and more top stories:   
"If MPs have any guts and integrity, they will vote against Brexit until there has been a 2nd referendum." – top QC  
Brexit is about to make university even more expensive  
This is the reason we need Brexit - these rotten amoral people can go ruin Europe - leave UK alone  
The free world needs @realDonaldTrump to WIN this election. Read tweets 1-22 @hectormorenco page. More at stake than just BREXIT, right now.  
The 48% of British who voted against Brexit are feeling a lot better about things now  
Too scared of the responsibility Parliamentary Sovereignty gives, are you? #Article50 #Brexit  
In Britain I felt always like a fellow European, rather than a foreigner. Brexit changed that.  
The Vote was advisory-MPs have to do their duty to vote for what's best for BritainBrexit has caused havoc already. 
Supremacy of Parliament is the whole point of Brexit, writes Ambrose Evans-Pritchard #Premium 
In Brexit Britain, being a foreigner suddenly marks me out  
British billionaires media trawling private lives of British judges, their family members, who dared to uphold British sovereignty #Brexit 
We cannot allow this to happen, Brexit was the majority rule we need to show these " hands in the EU pockets"MPs OUT means OUT  
Could the high court ruling today on #Brexit be positive?! Is a #UTurn possible long term? 
The referendum was advisory. MP's surely now understand it's not in UK best interest to leave EU. @DavidGauke 
Anyone care to explain how the hell @HillaryClinton is STILL in this election race?#brexit #USElection#CrookedHillary #TrumpPence16 pic.twitter.com/QKWFUivwJe 
#Commons voted overwhelmingly to put #KeithVaz on the Judicial Committee. And you expect that lot to handle #Brexit responsibly? 
How times have changed. The left support bankers want globalisation & hero worship Gina Miller wealthy wife of a Hedge fund manager.#brexit 
#My #GOVERNMENT DID NOT MAKE IT CLEAR TO ME AND MILLIONS MORE THAT THIS VOTE WAS '#ADVISORY #LIAR #POLITICIANS #BREXIT #BREXITNOW #DEMOCRACY 
The key section of the Article 50 judgment today. Hard to see what grounds of appeal there are.#brexit  
Michael Moore compares the Trump/Clinton Election to Brexit...  
Today's Brexit verdict came from an Ystradgynlais born judge. Being an Ospreys fan you think he'd be used to seeing an early European exit. 
Anti-Brexit coalition needed now ! @NicolaSturgeon  the whole of the UK need you, not just Scotland. 
'Openly gay judge blocks Brexit' wails the Daily Mail, while reminding a whole country just how disgusting their politics actually are. 
If there is an early general election before Brexit,we must ensure max no.of #Brexit MPs elected to ensure that Brexit happens.  
Parliament is sovereign, and when it delegates responsibility to decide key issues back to the people, the people must be sovereign. #Brexit  
Cataclysm 2016: Cubs Win, Brexit Point to Trump Victory  
What is condescending is when remainers say "people who voted brexit didn't realise what they voted for"  ......we did so STFU ! 
#brexitjudgment Obvious to all but the rich 1% who want a hard Brexit, that Brexit was a mistake. Today's ruling gives some hope. 
Britain's gaffe-prone Boris Johnson hits an iceberg  He said Brexit would be a "titanic success" 
Brexit delayed by a year?Just think how many more Remainers there will be in a year! #ReverseTheReferendum 
Pound surges to four-week high after High Court ruling raises hopes of 'soft Brexit'  
.@Keir_Starmer Acting in the national interest surely means finding a way to reverse Brexit, to stop it happening? 
Tory London Assembly members being loudly booed for saying Brexit is going well. #PQT 
Brexit reality... #everythingsnotawesome 
Still thinking about Farage saying Brexit had passed “without a single bullet being fired" literally days after Jo Cox was shot and killed. 
High Court's ruling that Parliament must vote on #Brexit has won a warm welcome from Cambridge's MP @DanielZeichner 
the #EU has devastated the British Fishing Industry#WeWantOurFishBack #Brexit #bbcqt #BrexitBritain #No2EU #OpenBritain 
The transformation of Gary Lineker from a likeable guy into a weapons grade throbber continues apace. #Brexit 
Of course it was. This referendum was enacted by Parliament.  
A top lawyer says MPs can halt Brexit if they have 'guts and integrity'  
Over at the Mail the Brexit ruling has already got 20,000 comments under it! 20,000!! That's more than @wossy's Halloween party generated. 
Zac Goldsmith warns MPs that it would be “dangerous” for them to overturn Brexit, risking “a political revolution"  
REVEALED: Books on the shelves, unlimited iPlayer access, foreign food takeaways; inside the gold-plated EU lifestyle of anti-Brexit judges. 
UK Prime Minister David Cameron promised on 23 January to offer Britons simple ‘in/out’ referendum choice on whether to stay in #EU #BREXIT 
Disagree. Ardent remainers are relieved, even if we do #Brexit, to move away from chaotic, non-parliamentary Brexit 
If you thought Brexit was more to do with Tories removing obstacles to their own unchecked power, you were right:  
Fault is Cameron's He should have TOLD the people that referendum was not binding and the final word would be MPsMan was a disaster for UK 
The race seems to be a dead heat! @realDonaldTrump 's winning formula: stay out of the news and make this a referendum on Hillary 
So, British government did not even understand the extent of its own powers over Brexit?British government is a laughing stock in EU 
Gerard Batten destroys all the legal arguments for Brexit legal challenge  
6. But all day Tory Brexiters insisted on prosecuting an argument that restoring parliamentary oversight is really about stopping Brexit 
On Brexit and Trump:  
Nigel Farage: "Our political class do not accept the Referendum result" 
Whatever happened to English law decided by English courts? All this backsliding is making #Brexit fans look a little hypocritical #UKIP 
To be fair to Alastair he is at least open about his endgame. Many in parliament who are determined to stop #Brexit are hiding their intent  
I trust the UK parliament to respect the will of the people. I have no doubt that #Brexit will happen. 
Unelected judges…. #Article50 #Brexit  
Why does anyone in their right mind want to part of a failing & corrupt #EU ?#Brexit #EUcrisis #Article50 #bbcqt #EUSpring #BrexitBritain 
We will get Brexit. Whatever it takes. 
Here's what you need to know about the High Court's ruling on #Brexit.  
Today was the day the EU IS EVIL brigade finally discovered what their beloved parliamentary sovereignty isAnd they no likey #brexit 
My analysis of today's #Article50 Judgment - it's no surprise and it will STRENGTHEN not stop #brexit:  
Mr. Brexit?  
Anyone complaining about today's court decision is effectively admitting they did not vote for sovereignty, but against immigration. #Brexit 
the pound spiked today... has it not crossed any leave voters minds that the pound only spikes when there's hope of Brexit not happening 
The S&P 500 is about 1% away from its 200-day moving average. The last time it was this close? Brexit: $SPY $VOO 
Kate as usual is so right! ALL remainer MP's will be routed out by the Brexit Constituents! If it is the last thing we ever do!  
The High Court Brexit ruling is TREASON! Pod one live from Florida #FreeSpeech 
Queen of Omnishambles @theresa_may as Boris Johnson said 'We are going to make a Titanic success of Brexit'  
Reminder that homophobic  violence rose 147% in the three months after the #Brexit referendum.  
After this Brexit ruling, MPs must seize their moment | Martin Kettle  
Will the article 50 ruling stop Brexit? | The panel  
Sorry guys but #brexit won't be halted by this Judgment:  
keep the faith Nigel .... you have at least 17.4m people who agree with you#No2EU #Brexit #Article50 #bbcqt #BrexitBritain #GreatBritain 
Ref electorate was 46m. 17m Brexit vote is neither a majority will of the people nor in UK best interest. Sovereign parliament must reject. 
James O Brien has delivered his devastating verdict on the Brexit High Court ruling  #brexitjudgment 
It's time for change. RT if you agree the political elite should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum  
Today's High Court ruling is not anti-Brexit, it's anti-making-things-up-as-you-go-along. 
Support for EU exit and implementing Article 50 booms after 'Brexit betrayal' court ruling  
Brexit block will spark 'riots and revolution', activists warn  
Curious what Mr. Brexit AKA @realDonaldTrump thinks of this. 
Brexit is now on hold, as British court insists that Parliament should have a say:  
Nigel Farage's Brexit rage just got destroyed - in 19 words     
Just to be clear, there's nothing wrong with saying you'll pull out, then changing your mind.Yours,G. Quagmire#brexit #brexitshambles 
If Leavers really wanted out of Europe they should've allowed José Mourinho to manage #brexit 
Who are the judges who ruled that MPs should vote on Brexit? | Politics | The Guardian  
High Court Brexit ruling could trigger early general election  
High Court ruling on Brexit - first bit of good news this year. Opened a bottle of wine on the strength of it... 
Awful stuff. The exact reason Brexit passed. More of the dismissiveness from the political elite. 
Bookings go downhill as Brexit makes it more expensive to ski  pic.twitter.com/Vgmr8myKLt 
Shit like that is why I hate Brexit and Trump. Not all their supports are like that, but it validates their position and brings them out. 
After this Brexit ruling, MPs must seize their moment | Martin Kettle  
Are people still brushing aside the fact that a good honest British MP was brutally murdered in the street in broad daylight because Brexit? 
Great Britain wants to be Brussels & Berlins slave? Has the anthem changed? "Britain will be EU slaves". #Brexit#DrainTheSwamp 
Just heard Farage on LBC acknowledge referendum was legally advisory! I nearly crashed my car. Advisory it was, binding it isn't. 
Would be interesting to read the whole judgement on #Brexit by The High Court. Almost certain it's seriously flawed. Will look into it. 
What are Brexit MPs scared of? No one believes Parliament would stop Article 50. It's as if they're afraid of ... words & discussion  
Maine's referendum on #RankedChoiceVoting could solve the worst problems of our voting system - even the negativity.  
James O Brien has delivered his devastating verdict on the Brexit High Court ruling  
Top City law firm behind Brexit bid l won't reveal its fat cat backersWho is bankrolling this?  
Article 50 ruling: the EU referendum was only ever "advisory" says @acgrayling 
Globalists Attract Fewer than a Dozen Supporters to their Anti-Brexit, Anti-Trump London Protest  
Brexit plans in turmoil after court defeat  
You got to love the logic of Brexit...  
FT View: The court ruling on Brexit and Article 50 puts parliament centre stage, where it belongs ? 
MailOnline mocked and derided after targeting Brexit judge for being ‘openly gay’  
It's time for Farage to return to lead us all into the election. New candidates in every constituency under a hard Brexit mandate. 
Gordon Brown says Brexit cannot be left to a "few ministers talking in a committee room" #SkyNewsTonight 
Take your mind off A50 for a moment ant think what Brexit does to the public finances  
How will Brexit affect UK startups? Find out at TechCrunch Disrupt London, Dec 5-6  #TCDisrupt 
Worker shortages for UK food industry reach worst level since 2004  #Brexit 
First, #Brexit. Then, @Cubs win the #WorldSeries. Now @realDonaldTrump becomes POTUS!!!  #TheySaidItCouldntBeDone #MAGA #DrainTheSwamp 
Maybe the 17.4m who voted #Brexit need to pay Parliament a visit to remind them they serve us? 
MPs say they respect Brexit choice but then say your decision isn't final as MPs must scrutinise deal even though we gave you the ref vote. 
The Daily Mail is very upset because an 'openly gay judge' ruled on Brexit  via @PinkNews 
Isn't it astonishing how many people don't seem to understand the difference between a General Election & an advisory opinion? #Referendum 
Mum found this in a bookshop today! #brexit #enidblyton 
Should article 50 require a vote by MPs before Brexit is triggered? 
That awful moment when you realise that all the lies might come to nothing. #Brexit #Brexitchallenge #UKIP #TheGreatBetrayal 
Boris Johnson: "Brexit means Brexit and we are going to make a Titanic success of it." No further comment required.  
Brexit means Brexit but also not Brexit but kind of Brexit but that Brexit maybe this Brexit but with a hint of Brexit 
Theresa May has made a total mess of the Brexit process from the outset, not least by appointing clowns to the key jobs. 1/2 
The High Court has decided to subvert the expressed will of the British people. 17.4m want #brexit now and we must have our wish respected 
All my life I've known that facism and bigotry are a lurking danger to guard against - the scale of the threat today is terrifying. #brexit  
Great question! Why don't we have a national referendum on it next week?  
Bank of England needn't pretend they made Brexit forecasting errors. They didn't. These were deliberately misleading political interventions 
RETWEET if you agree MPs should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum and not seek to delay or frustrate the result  
Two thirds of MPs will be ignoring a Democratic Vote they themselves gave us As it wasn't the answer they wanted They will stop BREXIT 
"As far as Brexit goes, I'm proud again to be in the minority." - @Johnny_Marr 
#Brexit We will unapologetically vote against any proposal to leave EU, says SDLP leader Colum Eastwood  
High Ct decision isn't about blocking Brexit, it's about the rule of law. UK may have voted Leave but we haven't suspended the constitution. 
If the Brexit Vote was a Party! the Brexit Party would have a 166 seat Majority based on the constituencies results! of 242 to 408 for Leave 
Referendum: advisoryParliament: executiveLaw courts: supremeThis is what #sovereignty looks like. You wanted it. You got it. 
I do wish the media would stop saying a 'clear' or 'overwhelming' majority voted for #Brexit. 51.9% is neither clear nor overwhelming 
We already have the best of both worlds: inside the EU but outside the Eurozone and the Schengen area. #Brexit offers nothing. #StrongerIn 
Please bear with us. I'm working on a Brexit opinion & will be back soon -unless of course I don't take another short break in the meantime  
Bravo to #GinaMiller for standing up & making the Government realise they have to have a proper debate in our sovereign parliament! #Brexit 
WATCH: James O’Brien’s stinging response to Nigel Farage calling the Brexit ruling “a betrayal"  
There could be a snap election over Brexit issueNow is time for all Labour to be disciplined and to unite behind Corbyn and @Keir_Starmer 
All this crap about dodging #brexit we need  this guy @Nigel_Farage as Chief Brexit OverLord please RT if you agree  
Farage warns MPs of public outrage if high court defeat stalls Brexit  via @MailOnline 
Nice to have your death threat on record. I see you like Brexit & Trump. What bit of British parliamentary sovereignty do you most dislike?  
Since #FBI reopened criminal case against #Hillary betting odds in #UK for @realDonaldTrump have halved.Biggest betting event since #brexit  
So, the men who wear women's underwear under their black robes took it on themselves to challenge the will of the people. Nasty! #Brexit 
.@dkahanerules @davereaboi I'm actually surprised that the UK govt didn't just let the EU court overturn Brexit. 
University is about to get even more expensive thanks to Brexit  
Sterling soars on court ruling, BOE signals subtle change — @WSJCity’s Brexit briefing:   
while all this nonsense trying to keep #Britain in #EU goes on, we are still giving the #EU Millions of pounds daily ?#Brexit #Article50 
we can't just assume hillary will win. everyone in the uk assumed brexit would never happen n look how that turned out. voting is important. 
.@LeaveEUofficial why are you using Govt EU leaflet to *back* your case today, when you called it “wrong on all counts” in April? #Brexit  
I agree with @LouiseMensch about something #brexit related. I need to lie down  
Nigel quitler farage forms the union of #brexit facists and threatens revolution but is secretly glad hes got a new betrayal angle  
Ireland, France, Denmark and the Netherlands have all been ignored don't let Britain's voice be next.  #Brexit Article 50  
14. If Brexit means Brexit, the govt should get on with explaining what Brexit means to Parliament. 
If #Brexit supporters hate unelected people ruling over them so vehemently, can i propose a referendum to abolish the monarchy? Go on! 
'Brexit has made me ashamed to be English. I’m ashamed of the England of Farage & his xenophobic yobs.' Dawkins:  
Is the ultimate twist of #Brexit pantomime that Gov goes to Supreme Court, loses again, then takes case to Europe, and wins...? #Article50 
Just wait for the gloating on #bbcqt as the BBC celebrates the demise of #brexit 
The pound has hit its highest level for a month against the US dollar after Brexit court ruling  
It looks like they call it demo-cracy because it's a demo version. In order to get the full version you need to pay. #brexit 
The road to #brexit  
I see Arron Banks has pulled out of #BBCQT. Only wanted to go on against a backdrop of High Court victory? #Quitter #ukip #Article50 #Brexit  
I RT this every time I see it to remind people of the lies that were told during the euro referendum!  
Brexit means ignorance, low self-esteem, vulnerability to propaganda, economic decline, small-minded nationalism. #Brexit 
Any #brexit deal must include £350mpw 4nhs tarriff free trade and immigration controls as promised by vote leave b4 parliament ratifies it 
Good morning all, especially to those stalwart Britons mobilising for a renewed battle for #Brexit & freedom from the Brusselstaat  
MPs have a duty to do the right thing, not the popular thing. That's why national interest comes before public opinion over #Brexit. 
Who banked the most on the markets bonanza sparked by Brexit?  
Vexed Brexit types venting their spleen with some old fashioned British racism and sexism against Gina Miller. Who'd have thought it? 
It doesn't mean the end of #Brexit, it means the beginning of even more confusion and uncertainty. #Article50 
I believe 'you lost, get over it' is the preferred nomenclature. #Brexit  
#Brexit ruling - The Establishment has really shown its contempt for real people! Listen to the @neilwallis1 show -  
I was a Remainer but I find the possibility of #Brexit being thwarted disgusting & disturbing. It must happen. It's the will of the people. 
The woman who brought #Brexit legal challenge: 'We have to respect our parliamentary sovereignty'   
British people have the right to self-determination just like everyone else. And they've exercised it on 23 Jun. #Brexit must happen. 
Brexit has hit Britain so hard that all people do is sell £5 notes on Facebook  
Ulster Unionist Leader @mikenesbittni meeting with Taoiseach @EndaKennyTD and @CharlieFlanagan to discuss #Brexit  
Cataclysm 2016: #CubsWin, #Brexit Point to #Trump Victory  @DRUDGE 
I've wrecked the UK Economy, Lost AAA Rating, caused race hatred, and now off to live in France ... #brexit  
It's all slogans and "we voted for it, get on with it". So don't be surprised people are thinking the court is blocking Brexit. 
Brexit, belonging and home are at the forefront of @BriteTheater #Hothouse (Can This Be) Home. Read more:  
Listen to any radio phone in on Brexit, and you'll be struck by the complete lack of grasp of detail and nuance. 
‘Brexit’ Requires Vote in Parliament  Just go. EU better off without whining UK. Independent Scotland welcome. 
Northern Health Minister Michelle O Neill agus mise meet media after meeting Taoiseach  @ Stormont about Brexit.  
No #GinaMiller as someone who voted Brexit you do not speak for me!!! 
I have to say the Mail's 'openly gay' line on one of the Brexit judges was one of the lowest things I've seen from UK journos in a while 
Just as well govt took no notice of Labour bloke who called on ministers to trigger Art 50 the morning after the referendum. His name again? 
We are inside the margin of Brexit 
The vote on Article 50 gives Labour a chance to make Brexit less terrible  
You can't blame Remain voters for #brexitshambles. Blame Queen Of Omnishambles Theresa May and the Brexit bunglers 
.@PennyNowhere @AuthorSingh @davereaboi the Brexit vote stands, the haute monde have simply decided to ignore it. 
The High Court ruling proves we treated the Brexit vote with a respect it didn't deserve  
If there is a GE early next year it will be all about #Brexit. #Remainers have to unite and back the pro EU candidate in each constituency. 
If Brexit is reversed and Trump loses... will Bowie come back? 
$SPX S&P 2080 looking like triple-support...downward and upward channel bottom, 200 MA, below that Brexit lows back in play  
This man correctly predicted Brexit and the Scottish referendum. He says Donald Trump will win next week  
From the comment section in the Independent - sums up the geopolitical cost of Brexit.  
Majority says PM should be able to trigger Brexit - poll  
Lest we forget! "Nigel Farage wants 2nd referendum if Remain wins by 52-48." Daily Mirror. #brexitshambles #Brexit #Article50 
The pound is rising after the High Court Brexit ruling, and the reason will infuriate hard Brexiters  
Ignorance among Brexit about the High Court decision reinforces that they hadn't the slightest idea what they voted for in the first place. 
Looking to labour on Brexit is like expecting a half dead, one legged, blind, deaf, incontinent guard dog to protect your home. #Brexit 
Brexit court defeat for UK government  
6 Brexiters who suddenly think parliamentary sovereignty is a bad thing  #Brexit  
3 judges who blocked Brexit are led by founder of group dedicated to furthering European integration. This stinks!   
The hypocrisy and doublethink is stunning. #ginamiller #Brexit #Davidicke 
UPDATE: White House urges Britain and EU to continue to be flexible in handling Brexit. More:  
Thread on stepping back and taking stock of the truly bizarre position we are in with Brexit...  
Brexit is a series of accidents. Ukip weren't expected to surge. Tories weren't expected to win a majority. Leave wasn't expected to win. 
Britain's High Court throws Brexit into disarray. Is this thing ever going to happen?  
A court ruled Prime Minister MayMust wait before breaking away.No triggering #brexit Till parliament checks itAnd MPs have all had a say 
Adult "It's veg or poison for tea."Kids "Poison, poison, we want poison!"A "You can't have poison, it's veg."K "We voted poison!" #Brexit 
What enrages me about #brexit is that for a generation Britain will be immersed in it & unable to improve wages housing education, childcare 
Why Brexit might have just been completely blown off course  
Grt to see @NorwichAirport is a @LivingWageUK employer. Heard today, like many firms, its delaying investment & preparing to whether #Brexit  
Preach. Now 4 of the 7m who voted for Brexit have signed a petition wishing to "take it back." Doesn't work that way. VOTE PEOPLE.  
Stop complaining about the High Court's Brexit decision – this is your democracy in action  
Brexit in a gif...  
If there is another Referendum, or election based on Brexit terms, millions of teens who saw the rise of hate crime could tip the balance 
The Brexit vote wasn’t democracy in action. It was populist ignorance on a grand scale: #brexitshambles 
Doesn't prevent #brexit at all but it prevents the Govt sidelining Parliament  
Brexit ruling today bad news for Zac GoldsmithVoters in Richmond overwhelmingly Remain and the issue now takes on more significance for MP 
Nigel Farage's Brexit rage just got destroyed - in 19 words   
Globalists Attract Fewer than a Dozen Supporters to their Anti-Brexit, Anti-Trump London Protest  
Thinking that in light of events today that @UKIP should cancel contest & allow @Nigel_Farage back in as leader #Brexit @paulnuttallukip 
There is something rotten at the heart of Brexit and it's the rancid Tories. 
Parisian authorities reap the whirlwind from Merkel's disastrous EU Open Door Migration policy #Brexit  
In issue 18: Brexit will strip 65m of European citizenship: @Bonn1eGreer makes a plea for a world that seeks to expand not restrict horizons 
The Brexit legal challenge isn't going to make any difference to Brexit, Government says  
I just published “The High Court’s Brexit judgment means the government must be far more open”  
Key point from today? Chances of Brexit being soft, not hard, have increased significantly -  
We must remember our #brexitshambles was caused by the Tories & their right wing media  b/c they allowed referendum & had no plan afterwards 
Any wonder Remainers won? Article 50 judge founded EU INTEGRATION group  #brexitshambles #Brexit #brexitjudgment 
This was the post from a few days after referendum which led to to the court decision today.A rather significant legal blogpost...  
What to know about the Brexit ruling against the U.K. government  
Supreme Court will echo this Judgment & Brexit will be thwarted-unless there is a serious political mobilisation of democratic minded people 
Key lesson from Brexit was surely that overly-demonising opponents helps not harms them. Clinton camp making exact same mistake as Remain. 
Brexit in a single gif  
Gunpowder, treason and plot #Article50 #Brexit  
This is exactly the kind of absurdly partisan, sneering treatment that led to Brexit in UK & may help Trump win. That's my point.  
At the risk of repeating myself.. #highcourt did not block #Brexit. They stopped @theresa_may being a #dictator.#Article50 #brexitshambles 
I can't wait for brexit to happen just so I can start using "I'm more triggered than article 50 right now" 
Brexit can begin only when the UK government invokes Article 50. Here's what that means.  
Theresa May has a Brexit divorce dilemma on her hands.  
Church: I LOVE BREXIT!Price: Elder...you LOVE #Brexit?Church: SURE! Pop-tarts are the most important meal of the day.Price: *downs latte* 
So, the British government did not even understand the extent of its own powers over Brexit?British government is a laughing stock in EU 
Have written about race and Brexit for @TimesBusiness . Which basically means I have to get off internet for while. 
FACTBOX: What happens now after UK government loses Brexit court case?  
My ideal day: hunt six Nazis, cheese sandwich, Brexit cancelled, Trump disgraced, foot massage, two episodes of Bergerac, warm milk, bed. 
Hubby leafleting for #Snp tonight & guy approached & said he voted no in ref but is now Yes after Brexit, BT lies & reading Wee Black book  
MPs are playing dangerous games with democracy#Brexit 
Why the fuss? As someone who voted for Brexit, just cannot get annoyed by the courts and parliament doing their job. 
Do people not realise that the court ruling on article 50 doesn't stop brexit.It stops Theresa May Bulldozing over parliaments sovereignty 
Superb fm Brendan O'Neill at @spikedonline:Use of the law to stymie Brexit is a naked, elitist assault on democracy 
There's something massively karmic about the fact that the Brexit slayer is a rich well educated professional brown woman immigrant  
This alliance of corrupt judges and millionaires who've assumed power over our lives is quite frightening. Where will it end? #Brexit 
#Iran #News UK court says Brexit needs parliament's approval, complicates government plans  
Brexit is about deregulation – not immigration. An open letter to Leavers …#article50 
My view on the Court's #article50 decision. We must ensure we deliver on the democratic referendum #brexit result.  
Tony Blair has called for a second referendum. We think he should #RespectTheResult 
WATCH: Zac Goldsmith tells @IainDale it would be “dangerous” for MPs to vote to overturn Brexit result  
Of course I saw this a mile off which is why UKIP must unite until we are out.Leave your policy punch ups until BREXIT has happened.  
Are senior Tory Party members targeting the NHS for a sell-off after Brexit? #Article50 
Gina Miller is a hero. Getting abuse just for wanting "proper, serious, grown-up debate" about all the factors that will influence Brexit  
The damage Brexit has done will take years to repair, if it can be repaired at all.  
I'm sorry, I thought we had a referendum? Would MP's go against the clear will of the British people? I hope not. #brexitshambles 
What the U.K. court decision means for Brexit   
'Titanic' is actually the correct word to use Boris, because 'Brexit' itself is sinking!  
If Theresa May is serious about #Brexit call a General Election NOW and use the resounding majority to force #Brexit through Parliament 
In UK, w unelected judge deciding Brexit vote of the people will be overridden by govt, is a reminder of importance BIG Trump victory here 
If they're allowed to overturn brexit I think Noel Gallagher should overturn his decision and reform Oasis 
What Brexit entails - a reminder. All of this MUST happen#Brexit #OpenBritain #Article50 
What #Brexit reveals about politics today:  @alexander_betts 
Following the High Court ruling, maybe we'll get fewer journos asking "So what is UKIP for, now that you've won the Brexit Vote?". 
Britain should just use Article 51. The one where you blame Brexit on a bunch of alien voters and beg to remain in the EU. 
Read the words of Theresa May on our relationship with the EU - and why Brexit isn't in our best interests  
Paris is on a charm offensive, trying to win over businesses fleeing London's Brexit chaos  
New Kaneing up now: The High Court Blocks Brexit. Click here to see it: 
Gina Miller does NOT speak for me. #Brexit has the largest mandate ever in British history. 17,410,742 people voted to LEAVE the EU. 
£30,000 raised in less than 5 hours by @ChallengeArt50 for their Supreme Court defence  #Brexit 
A fascinating case of mistaken Twitter identity involving Brexit and....me. Thanks, @scottcampbell, for the time! 
Brexit ruling savaged by MP: Parliament AGREED Article 50 would be triggered IMMEDIATELY  #Brexit 
Gina Miller has stressed her challenge is not an attempt to overturn the referendum decision 
In Brexit Britain, being a foreigner marks me out as evil  
the referendum was all drunkenly boasting about how we could throw a shoe over the pub and now we're outside hurling shoes at the wall 
If there is no Brexit I will never vote again, nor indeed will I write about politics. What would be the point? 
Judging from today's Twitter bile... Leave supporters are really bad losers too. #Brexit #Article50 
High Court trio who blocked Brexit led by Judge who founded European Integration group  See how it works? 
The POTUS race #s have now actually entered into the realm of real Brexit-like surprise.  
UK car industry risks slow-burning 'death by a thousand cuts' after Brexit by lack of new investments: 
FYI I am not disputing the result of the EU referendum, just asking for some perspective. Only 27% of 'the people' voted to leave 
If High Court says Westminster can overrule a vote for Brexit then it can clearly equally overrule a vote for Scottish independence. 
What a comment on Cameron, the Tory party, the civil service & everyone else: that the const'l basics of Brexit were obv barely looked at 
Yes, please go vote, but also remember the narrative will never be like Brexit, but like ten brexits and forty-one predictable blowouts.  
UK Brexit debate has now descended into a row over what was said on a leaflet vs what was said on the side of a bus 
The government may have to go to the European Court of Justice to appeal for Brexit  
Globalist anti-democratic forces: Farage warns of 'public anger' after Brexit delayed  #MAGA #TrumpPence16 #Dobbs 
I think Theresa May should have to belch the entirety of Article 50 in order to trigger it. Rule one of my #Brexit was always keep it fun. 
The Government lost a huge High Court battle over Brexit today. This LBC Fact Check with @FullFact explains why:  
Women's rights, gay rights, climate, access to health care, a referendum on compassion, a serious place in the world. That's what's at stake 
'Lords and Commons will have to approve Brexit'  
SCUM #Labour #MP vows to use #Article50 ruling to force SECOND referendum on #Brexit  #BBC #SKY #ITV #RT #UK #NEWS 
Aaron Banks Statement.Establishment declare war on the people. #brexit  
James O Brien has delivered his devastating verdict on the Brexit High Court ruling  
To non-mkt types - IMO GBP jumped today not because Brexit might not happen, but because MPs might not authorise dafter versions of Brexit.  
Whatever happened to this?! An affront to Democracy, EU style. Disgraceful decision from the High Courts. #Brexit  
Fascinating piece by @JolyonMaugham on how #Brexit plays out now. Btw everyone here says Art.50 is reversible  
High Court decision on A50 nothing to do with "overturning Brexit" merely allowing our sovereign parliament a say ( like you voted for )  
The pound is at its highest in a month against the dollar   
Tonight's This Week Roundup: Brexit means Breakfast!  
The post-referendum fall in the value of the pound has triggered a surge in luxury watch sales  
Scotland could have been looking at this Brexit fiasco from a distance, not being dragged into hell with it. Cheers Gordo   
Equity Derivatives Flash Brexit-Like "Panic Signal"  
BREXIT really means BREXIT...&LTDA really means TFL#ubered 
Brexit is like when you were all "I'm leaving you" and you spent 3 weeks single and realised you're a loser and begged her to come back. 
Opinion: #Brexit is going to happen, but the 48% now have a voice  
Theresa May 'likely' to call snap General Election to get Brexit plan through the Commons  
BREXIT: A preview of tomorrow's Daily Mail front page has been released following the #Article50 ruling. @malcolmcameron7 @MisterCS 
"Gina miller the one taking on Teresa May on brexit" no she is taking on 17.5 million British people 
What kind of government allows our Parliamentary representatives to debate and vote on #Brexit only when forced to do so by the High Court? 
High Court Throws a Spanner in the Brexit Works  
They calling it the Great British Betrayal: But it nothing more than islam invaders controlling parliament. #Brexit  
In post-truth Brexit, don't expect consistency or logic; sovereignty to Brexiteers is only what delivers them the policy what they want 
Nicola Sturgeon just fully exposed the ‘chaos’ of Theresa May’s Brexit, in under 15 seconds  via @thecanarysays 
Pound turns higher on Brexit court ruling and Bank of England report  
Mass civil disobedience must be implemented if the ruling classes renege on #Brexit 
So what happens next? #Brexit chaos explained as PM told she can't invoke Article 50 alone  
Soros witchWho is Gina Miller? The woman leading the Brexit legal battle   
The #Brexit omnishambles  continues apace. But remember it's not causing any uncertainty or division  
Boris on Brexit  
British laws for British people.Taking control back.Parliamentary sovereignty.Isn't that what you wanted?#Brexit  
Brexit Ruling: O'Brien's Stinging Response To Farage @LBC  
The Brexiteers claimed that Brexit was about getting sovereignty back. This judgement proves up to a point that we never lost it #Article50 
Obama working his patronising magic on the stump today. Wonder if it'll be as successful as his attempt to make Brits vote against Brexit. 
If you're not happy about the #Brexit court decision, easiest way to let all MP's know is by joining #UKIP today! RT  
Portraits of a nation contemplating a #brexit. Stunning piece of photojournalism from @AFergusonPhoto  
Parliament sovereign over royal prerogative. Decided when we beheaded the king in 1649. I know, I was there  #Brexit 
Ukip's Suzanne Evans calls for High Court judges to be sacked over Brexit ruling  
Leavers: "UK laws over EU laws!"UK High Court: "Brexit must follow UK law & go to parliament."Leavers: "Everything but THAT UK law." 
#BrexitOh the irony of Brexiters demanding 'parliamentary sovereignty', THEN see it in action & start bemoaning parliamentary sovereignty! 
UKIP supporters are abusing an American sport's commentator called Gina Miller #brexit  
@DavidDavisMP This is the Gov't leaflet sent to every home during referendum campaign, couldn't be more clear....  
SDLP Leader @columeastwood met with @UKLabour Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer and @DaveAndersonMP this afternoon. 
Some interesting observations here. I'm also not against brexit in principle, and starting to feel govt is really out of its depth.  
Poll: majority of British voters now want UK to remain in EU #Brexit 
If you think this election is going to be a blow away, you’re wrong. Vote.Eerily similar to Brexit narrative.  
The only good thing about today is that the blubbering has stopped from the #remain camp. For Now Anyway #BELIEVE IN BREXIT 
#Sturgeon would not miss a chance to take a stab at #Brexit.UK political system needs some SERIOUS overhaul!  
Govt in Dublin plans funding to entice academics in light of Brexit, while joint appointments with UK also an option  
I’ve seen some weird things on Twitter, but spinning Johnson’s use of Titanic as size, not boat, to explain #Brexit is really something.  
Boris: "Brexit will be a Titanic success." You just know he'd be that guy who snuck onto a lifeboat after instigating chaos. 
Reaction on #Brexit news - parliament must vote on triggering article 50 - from @GoodwinMJ. 
These 7 MPs oppose PR & cite the AV Referendum. But *ALL* of them voted against giving public a say on PR in 2010!  
So many positive visions for UK ag have emerged from Brexit - let's make sure today's ruling is just a bump in the road to a new ag policy! 
Confused by people thinking Parliament vote on Brexit is undemocratic. You know everything in this country is decided that way, right? 
U.K. court says #Brexit needs Parliament's approval, complicates plans.   
6. Unless UK changes its approach then Brexit may not work.  May's approach so far should be seen as a failed, first attempt./Ends 
Brexit Ruling Just Latest Tactic to Block Will of the People  
5. The UK parliament (and the UK courts) should be central to Brexit, both operationally and symbolically. 
Threat of terrorist action if parliament blocks #Article50#Brexit @Otto_English @Scientists4EU @UKIPNFKN @Far_Right_Watch @pperrin 
4. Entire "no running commentary" approach is not going to work. If Brexit is going to work then it needs an open and collaborative approach 
You're right John. A guy offering a second referendum and making cock jokes would have been dynamite at a general election.  
2. May is the wrong pilot for the Brexit plane. Decision not to have a Bill but to litigate instead is the latest unforced tactical error. 
If you ask James O’Brien, when it comes to Nigel Farage: “fraudulent is no longer strong enough a word"  #brexit  
1. As am not against Brexit in principle, here fwiw are some (random) thoughts about the significance of the judgment today. 
Brexit was a professionally managed mainstream campaign, not a pitch for a TV network. And not everything in the world is about America. 
Fury amongst UK voters as £100 million Gina Miller tells them they are wrong to back brexit - send her back to south america 
All the places that voted leave should leave. All that voted remain should remain. Sorted.  #Brexit  
I will be on Channel 5 @5_News   news between6:30 and 6:45 this evening talking out the Court's ruling on Article 50 #brexit 
We told you repeatedly before the referendum that there were substantial legal obstacles to #brexit but it was all dismissed.Bloody experts! 
Top Merkel Advisors Demand Germany Blocks Brexit  
"MPs have already shown they're willing to be difficult over #Brexit"- @bbclaurak looks at today's high court ruling 
All of the pundits, pollsters, and prognosticators said #Brexit would never happen. It did. Trump is America's Brexit.#ThursdayThoughts 
No reason at all why the Government shouldn't later change its policy and withdraw the A50 notification: Brexit would no longer mean Brexit.  
for me appeasing brexit is appreasing the british state. it feels like another countries referendum 
As I said many times Brexit is good because it gives me much more to write about. Brexcema - come out in a rash if things don't go your way  
When Boris says he will make a Titanic success of Brexit I just get this sinking feeling. 
#Farage:"Our political class...do not accept the 23rd of June referendum result"WHY SHOULD WE ACCEPT THEM?#Brexit 
Pound surges after Government loses key Article 50 Brexit ruling at the High Court  
Trying to understand the complex outcomes of today's successful challenge to the Government's plans for Brexit? Our timeline might help...  
This ruling will not stop #Brexit. All it will lead to is prolonged bickering among MPs who have fuck all idea what they are talking about. 
What does the High Court ruling actually mean for #Brexit? @andybell5news explains 
Law laid down in the 1200s century has halted #Brexit, so let's all sing the Horrible Histories Magna Carta song   
#ietmvalencia opening «We need people from the cultural sector with visions to overcome the current crisis in Europe» #brexit #Crossroads 
UK car industry risks 'death by a thousand cuts' after Brexit vote  
Lord Chief Justice Lord Thomas branded the government’s legal Brexit arguments as “divorced from reality” and “flawed at this basic level”.  
Leave Votes: Clegg - Sheffield: 51%Soubry - Broxtowe - 55%Osborne - Cheshire E - 51%#Brexit #OpenBritain #Art50 
Nicola Sturgeon just fully exposed the ‘chaos’ of Theresa May’s Brexit, in under 15 seconds  #Brexit 
Globalism is when some Polish men throw bacon at a mosque and are sent to prison by an English court and then #Brexit is blamed for racism. 
If govt presents a Brexit bill - presumably authorising them to trigger A50 - it gives both Houses an opportunity to debate, amend. 
Did not take long...Same #MSM that opposed #brexit startred re-selling the same pre-brexit scaremongring lies. 
'The new guard': Consul General @AntoniaRomeoUK talks diplomacy, Brexit & the #specialrelationship in @BritishVogue  
The Daily Mail is very upset because an 'openly gay judge' ruled on #Brexit...  
High Court's ruling on Brexit is a blow to the U.K. government's plans  
Remember when Brexit was a thing but not really a thing and then became a really big thing but now might not be so much of a big thing? 
The @MailOnline seems upset that one of the #Brexit judges is gay.The left is the original headline. It has since been amended (right)  
Promising news about Brexit today. Let's hope it doesn't happen. We're better together. There's no ifs or buts about it.  
#ArronBanks on #BBCQT tonightGo Get'em Arron ..!!!@Arron_banks #Brexit #Article50 #BrexitBritain #UKIP 
The Brexit judge's 7 most damning attacks on the government  
Gov't leaflet sent to every home in referendum campaign was very clear that the decision of the vote would be implemented, no halfway house. 
A few grabs to give you an idea of how the Brexit Central Facebook group feel about Gina Miller.  
As I have said before, I stand with the people of Hornsey & Wood Green, and I will vote against Brexit in Parliament  
I predict there will be the biggest ever riots on our streets if politicians stop Brexit vote #powderkeg waiting to go off 
International: Brexit upgraded from shit sandwich to all out clusterfuck following High Court ruling 
The Daily Mail is very upset because an 'openly gay judge' ruled on Brexit  
Theresa May Not more like. Who voted for her? Oh that's right, no one. Haha. #Democracy #Brexit 
Um, #Boris? Maybe you should have finished watching the film before you used that reference... #Brexit #Bremain #Referendum #BorisJohnson 
Anything which makes Liam Fox "disappointed", Farage "angered" & is a "major setback for Theresa May" HAS to be good! #Brexit #Parliament 
Legal challenge to govt over #Brexit won't stop it happening, but will ensure the agony lasts even longer than it would have. #GinaMiller 
It's all kicking off now. Time to put on The Trumpton Riots by Half Man Half Brexit  
Tough times ahead for new constitutional law students #Brexit #Article50 
Regardless of your #Brexit vote-what future for our democracy if Government cannot act on clear will and instruction of people? @ToryWorkers 
I think this is an attempt by our political class to affectively water down what the people of this country voted for#NigelFarge #Brexit  
WHEN JESU SAYS BREMAIN NOBODY CAN'T SAY BREXIT.  
After the #Brexit vote, UK was left with uncertainty. Now we don't have the certainty of uncertainty. Even our uncertainty is now uncertain. 
Britain's plans for #Brexit have just been thrown into disarray. What happens next?  
I care nothing for #brexit but I do care about democracy. If the #Leave vote is overturned because some didn't agree, then democracy dies! 
High Court ruling complicates UK #Brexit plans. Via @ReutersTV 
Brexiters who wanted parliamentary sovereignty are now against parliamentary sovereignty. #Article50 #Brexit  
Remain camp have had months to plan the sabotage of Brexit. This latest move is clever but also disrespectful of the British peoples will 
The folly of trying to push through a massive & irreversible change on the strength of a slender majority on one day#Remain #Brexit #YesEU 
It is.But when in an Act of Parliament we decided in this instance to accept the result of the Referendum, we are bound to do that.  
Nicola Sturgeon: UK government lacks ‘coherent position' on Brexit – video  
Why appeal against HC's #Brexit #parliamentary #approval judgment to @UKSupremeCourt will bring litigation to #ECJ 
I must remain politically neutral about #Brexit and Article 50 so I'll just celebrate #NationalSandwichDay with this bratwurst baguette. 
Britain's High Court ruled parliament, not Theresa May, can trigger Article 50 for Brexit negotiations. Now what?  
message to all MP's in WestminsterIf you defy the people & stop #Brexit ,I promisie you will be sorryPlease RT#BrexitBritain #Article50 
Opinion poll shows a 45% to 43% majority in favour of #Remain#Remain #Brexit #YesEU 
The Brexit paradox: when you voted for the sovereignty of Parliament but you don't want it exercise against your interest #Article50 
So now Brexit was a vote not against the EU, but against the rule of law. Odd, I didn't see that on the ballot.  
My telegraph article:why Kremlinology is not the way for parliament or the country to scrutinise the Gov Brexit plan  
Surely there will now be a general election in 2017. #Brexit #highcourt 
While Europe watches Brexit more than 200 refugees have died in the Mediterranan Seaby @lizziedearden 
Corbyn reveals his true colours today. Labour is backing Brexit. Labour no longer deserves the support of the 16 million who voted Remain 
23,992 voters in SNP Westminster leader Angus Robertson's constituency of Moray (49.9%) voted LEAVE at the EU Referendum. Fascinating. pic.twitter.com/Fhhzl1nZLz 
Brexit morons are are saying 'unelected judges', of course they are unelected you idiots cos they are neutral from govt&politics #Article50 
My #Brexit in 1534 united all England behind one simple idea -- we weren't going to make a muck of things with voting. #TeamMonarchy 
VG debate on Brexit & financial services - 2m jobs, 2/3 outside London, £66bn in taxes, 12% GDP. Govt must provide clarity for jobs & growth 
Can we still prevent #Brexit? @Nigel_Farage should be furious now. Please don't trigger Article 50. #thisiswhy 
Nigel Farage's Brexit rage just got destroyed - in 19 words  
People in the UK planning to have Trump/BREXIT parties on November 8th. MAKE DONALD TRUMP THE PRESIDENT OF THE U.S. MAKE #Nov8th a party 
I wonder if today will be remembered as the day  #Brexit died.  
Such a critical matter as the UK leaving the EU should NOT be decided by a referendum result based on huge lies. Article 50 #Brexit 
Jeremy Corbyn hasn't even had a meeting with Keir Starmer & his shadow Brexit team since JC appointed them, Corbyn is so inept! #Article50 
A step-by-step guide to what will happen next on the long and winding road to Brexit  Via @AlannaPetroff 
High Court says MPs knew that the EU referendum was "advisory" when they voted on it.  
What a mess.  At least everyone in the U.K. is unhappy now #Brexit 
Nigel Farage hints at public revolution if parliament stops Brexit PEOPLE POWER WILL OVER TURN ANY GOVERNMENT 
Had David Davis just conceded defeat ahead of Supreme Court appeal over Brexit ruling ? 
Commentator snaps at Labour MP Hilary Benn for 'wanting to derail Brexit'.  
Any MP who attempts to block Brexit will frustrate the will of the people.  
People Power is Stronger than any government BREXIT MEANS BREXIT 
Methinks  a Brexit Bill cdl allow Scot Govt to argue the Scot Parl also has to give its consent to Article 50 #justsaying 
Farage warns MPs of public outrage if high court defeat stalls Brexit  via @MailOnline 
People slating Gina Miller for being wealthy & 'trying to buy a referendum decision' who support UKIP, a party propped up by Aaron Banks.  
This man correctly predicted Brexit and the Scottish referendum. He says Donald Trump will next week  
This is excellent by @stephenkb on Brexit turning the clock back in Britain  
For perspective, the last time the Cubs won a World Series, the UK High Ct. had not yet ruled that Parliament must be part of Brexit process 
There is no "Brexit that works for Britain", @jeremycorbyn - there's only a shambolic right-wing #brexit  
Today's High Court #Brexit ruling summed up in a paragraph by @FT 
Brexit (n.) noble Crusade to render Parliament SOVEREIGNArticle 50 (n.) nefarious Calumny render'd by Westminster PLACEMEN 
Nigel Farage will be gutted to learn that if there's a civil war before Brexit, EU H&S Law means we'll have to use foam padding & weaponry  
Just what the hell is going on with the UK government’s Brexit court defeat  
Please take a moment off from #Brexit storm to sign this important petition about NHS funding. #NHScrisis 
The Govt cannot trigger #Article50 without Parliament's consent. @DrHannahWhite looks at what happens next  #Brexit  
Brexit has become a shambles and many Europeans laughing at us, although not the Americans - they might still out-Trump Britain next Tuesday 
Today's High Court decision is a victory for democracy and common sense. Read our statement here. #brexit #yesEU 
Boris Johnson likens Brexit to the Titanic. Well that's reassuring. Now parliament must save us | Polly Toynbee  
428 of the 650 parliamentary constituencies voted LEAVE at the EU Referendum, including a majority of Labour-held seats. 
#Brexit is turning into one of those times when you dramatically storm out, slamming the door, only to then have to go back to get your keys 
We've just contributed - if parliamentary oversight of the Brexit process is important to you, please share!  
For 40 years establishment turned a blind eye to upholding our constitution when it was in their interest  #Brexit  
#brexit UKIP supporters call for the murder of Gina Miller  
The Daily Mail is very upset because an 'openly gay judge' ruled on Brexit  
Tim Farron: MPs must be given a vote on leaving the EU in order to "say no to an irresponsible hard Brexit".  
parliament was already free thanks to our Brexit heroes, now the high court have put it in a kind of freedom jail, made of too much freedom 
Brexit ruling will not derail article 50 timetable, says No 10  
Here comes the next European political crisis ... Smart piece on Renzi's referendum by Pierpaolo Barbieri:  via @WSJ 
The last thing I will ever post on Brexit bollocks but for those saying to me earlier that it's in democratic etc, watch this...  
Ladbrokes has slashed its odds on a general election next year to 2/1, following today's #Brexit court ruling 
Government lawyers to appeal High Court #Brexit ruling  
THESE THREE SCUM BAG #JUDGES HAVE TRIED TO STOP YOUR #BREXIT VOTE! #TREASON HANG THEM!  #BBC #SKY #UK #ITV #EU #TORY 
Can we just stop saying Brexit though? It's a wanker of a word, and it makes you sound like a prick. 
This is why you shouldn't allow independent courts #brexit 
David Allen Green of @Law_and_policy on Tories tripping up over the very 1st Brexit hurdle.  
Could the US election polls be wrong? We looked to the UK and Brexit polling to find out:  
Brexit Secretary David Davis says High Court ruling WILL require an Act of Parliament. 
Stop complaining about the legal challenge to Brexit – this is your beloved democracy in action  
This was the formal promise of the government. Brexit will not be killed by delay. #RespectTheResult 
Would YOU take part in a pro-#Brexit demonstration? Answer my poll here and retweet please:  
It's heart-warming how Brexit turned hardcore lefties into fans of free-trade deals and currency watchers. We're all neoliberals now. 
Agreed.  The Court has set back May's daft model for Brexit, not Brexit itself.  
#Brexit #LeaveEU DEMOCRACY IS DEAD. I'M DISGUSTED.The People Voted To Leave..  
The attempt to subvert #Brexit proves once again; it is the globalists who run our lives. Votes are pleasantries. 
Does anybody remember voting to open the borders and bring an end to our culture & civilization?No, me neither.#DrainTheSwamp #Brexit  
Unbelievable. Thank God the court has given pro-science MPs like Zeichner a say, rather than empowering only the tiny band of Brexit nuts.  
European-level tolling by the EU parliament's lead for Brexit.  
WATCH: @mrjamesob delivers his devastating verdict on the Brexit High Court ruling about Article 50  
Companies Shouldn’t Wait to Prepare for the Post-Brexit World  
In the light of today's ruling is it worth ever voting in a Referendum again? if Parliament can ride roughshod. What's the point. 
"I used parliament for my Brexit".  
Americans and Brits rally in London to urge Americans to vote for Hilary, say Trump victory would be the equivalent of a US Brexit @Ruptly 
Congratulations to all the crowdfunder backers, lawyers, claimants and everyone else who have reaffirmend that UK parliament is sovereign. 
They're a nice lot, Brexit voters, aren't they? Reasonable. Polite.  
Theresa May trying to overturn 400 years of history with Brexit plan  
Important UK Parliament is closely involved in #Brexit negotiations, as is already the case for @Europarl_EN 
Modern MSM hacks of mostly liberal left persuasion talk and write with confidence about things they know nothing about. #Brexit 
Today's main headlines: #Brexit ruling, #highcourt #Inflation #OlympicStadium 
Relatable brexit tweet 
Opinion: After the High Court’s Brexit decision, forget about activating Article 50 in March  
The Remain voters to the EU today #Brexit  
Brilliant piece explaining Brexit by @DanielJHannan  @newcriterion 
BREXIT GROWTH: Bank of England UPGRADES economy forecast and admits doomsday failings  
Socialists are celebrating a hedge fund lady in league with big banks and unelected lords 'winning' over the little people. Morons. #Brexit 
.@sinnfeinireland should end their  abstention from Westminster & represent their voters in commons #brexit debate.  
.@UKParliament has legally unassailable powers to make the laws it thinks right. The  Executive is at risk of overreaching itself. #Brexit 
Brexit court ruling further clouds the horizon for companies   
Let's end the Brexit confusion with a final vote.Do you against or aren't you in the EU for British sovereign membership (anti-parliament)? 
How can it be legal for the UK to leave the EU via a referendum vote based on huge lies? #Brexit Article 50 
Been a grt wk for democracy. First we have that sleazebag #keithvaz moving into a Justice role & now unelected judges screwing with #brexit 
Awkward... #Brexit #Art50 #EURef 
Who gave Gordon Brown the right to trade away our rights in Lisbon? We certainly did not. We were refused a referendum. 
British courts have blocked #Brexit. Theresa May should fight the ruling in the European Courts. Oh wait..... 
Nigel Farage: Half Man, Half Brexit. #brexit 
Solid and clear from @instituteforgov on what happens next after today’s Article 50 court ruling. #Brexit  
The decision is repudiation of May's strategy, not of the referendum. Politicians & press who are going after judges = wildly irresponsible. 
Today's High Court ruling on Article 50 explained by @ProfKAArmstrong  #Brexit #Article50 
If you need a #Plumber in #London dont call #CharlieMullins of #PimlicoPlumbers#Brexit #Remainiacs #OpenBritain #BrexitBritain #Article50 
6 Brexiters who suddenly think parliamentary sovereignty is a bad thing  #Brexit  
Brexit challenge: Court ruling is voter betrayal, says @Nigel_Farage 
If Parliament overrule Brexit,say goodbye to Britain & hello to thousands of 3rd world Muslims ready 2 re-populate UK You r allowed to weep  
The pound is jumping back up after the High Court Brexit ruling  
It's not Remainers that Brexit voters should be angry with, it's May. She should have gone to parliament right away. 
Independence of judiciary also essential. And, fundamentally, this is not a political decision; nor will it stop Brexit. Might change route. 
Last night that Boris Johnson said "we will make a Titanic success of Brexit" - this morning: #Article50 court ruling. Amazing timing. 
Here's a picture of the HMS Brexit colliding with democracy  
First Minister responds to court ruling that UK must seek parliamentary approval before triggering Article 50 for #Brexit  
Everyone just chill out. There's no need to worry about Aritlce 50, Bjørn's on standby...#brexit  
The SNP arguing to revoke a referendum is beyond parody. 
My #Brexit in 1534 was a plan that worked for all! And when I say all I mean me! 
Such a critical matter as the UK leaving the EU should not be decided by a referendum result based on huge lies #Article50 
On what basis will the government appeal? Was the court decision unduly influenced by a big lie on the side of a bus or something?#Brexit 
If #brexit proves one thing it's that opinions are like toilets. We all prefer our own and the public ones are bloody awful. 
Please RT RT email mayt@parliament.uk today do it now! Show respect and demand full and unconditional #Brexit @theresa_may you must provide 
Historic #Brexit judgement, but the case isn’t over yet. @ChallengeArt50 are raising to defend Supreme Court appeal  
Did you see sociologist Frank Furedi's immediate reaction to today's Brexit breaking news...#wrightstuff 
Today's news proves @UKIP needed more than ever. It demands UKIP's eye on the ball on Brexit, not squabbles. @paulnuttallukip will unite us. 
Over 30 countries have stated that they want post-Brexit bilateral free trade agreements with the UK. We need to Leave the EU to seal them! 
The Heros of #Pakistan one is #AAP Ka #ArvindKejriwal among themNajeeb Ahmad #AskSushant Jantar Mantar #Brexit #India #USA #Canada #Europe 
Arron Banks said yesterday Farage would only return if we didn't get Brexit...that's about our only hope to rescue the situation IMO 
34 Hilarious Tweets That Perfectly Sum Up Brexit  via @BuzzFeedUK 
Judges who blocked Brexit: One founded an EUROPEAN law group and a second charged the taxpayer millions for advice. 
BREXIT LATEST: No judge or elected Member of Parlament, either jointly or severally, can override the democratic will of The British People. 
Brexit has caused havoc already. Now parliament must save us | Polly Toynbee  
PSA: your 2017 Brexit departure has been delayed due to the wrong sort of sovereignty on the line. 
Brexit Riot  
James O Brien gives his verdict on the Brexit High Court ruling. Powerful.  
The establishment are going against the will of the people to try to stop #Brexit happening - So much for democracy! 
Brexit has caused havoc already. Now parliament must save us | Polly Toynbee | Opinion | The Guardian  
Battlefield: #Brexit @HealeyCartoons 
Adding MPs to the 28 countries in Brexit negotiations will only make it harder for May to succeed - @LiamWardProud  
Until we fix the problems that caused #Brexit including right wing media manipulation-Britain will be a divided house. #SupremeCourt 
Brexit riots wd be worst stroke risk in U.K. since the disbanding of Pan's People  
Nicola Sturgeon says Brexit ruling "underlines the total chaos" in government 
Regarding the the solution to the elite's decision to abrogate the Brexit vote  
You demanded parliamentary sovereignty - You have parliamentary sovereignty - Stop sobbing like petulant children. #BREXIT 
It's time for change. RETWEET if you agree the political elite should #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum  
Investment manager Gina Miller is the lead claimant in the case to get Parliament to vote on starting the Brexit...  
James O Brien has delivered his devastating verdict on the Brexit High Court ruling  
Just out of curiosity, given the #Article50 news today, and with regard to your own vote in the referendum and where you stand now: 
Unelected and unchallenged, out of step with their country and its people,The High Court judges rule on #Brexit 
Vile Daily Mail changes headline after attacking Brexit-ruling Judge for being gay  
Recapping a setback for Theresa May as court says MPs must vote before #Article50 triggered  
@Change_Britain And here's what the Referendum Bill actually said.  
I am supposed to have faith in the House of Commons judgement on #Brexit but it just appointed Keith #Vaz to the justice Committee. 
A look back at the hits and misses of #TheWorldIn: our prediction on Brexit  
Sturgeon: Holyrood might join Brexit court case  
Time for parl to save us from Boris's Brexit Titanic.High Crt ruling shows MPs duty to keep country from econ abyss 
"When we decide to have a referendum, we give back to the people that sovereignty - they decide the issue." @UKLabour's Frank Field. #Brexit  
I've always been lawful, paid my taxes, never wandered outside the law, worked hard. If Govt fails to deliver #Brexit, that's it! Had enough 
Daily Mail huffs about 'openly gay' #Article50 judge - before line disappears...   #dailymail #gay #brexit #highcourt 
Hmmm How does ones sexuality effect ones opinion on brexit  
The Daily Mail is not a newspaper it is the political tool of a non-Dom tax-dodging billionaire undermining our democracy.#Remain #Brexit  
Whatever your views on Brexit, This defence of parliamentary sovereignty must be a good thing. It really is taking back control. 
Huge important stuff going on with Brexit and article 50 today and quelle surprise the Daily Mail runs with this headline.  
Tony Blair has called for a second referendum. We think he should #RespectTheResult 
The law made by politicians was the EU Referendum Act which allowed for #Brexit if the people voted for it. They did.  
The Great British Betrayal: Brexiteers May Need to Take to The Streets To Ensure We Leave  #LEAVE #BREXIT 
I say we take off and Brexit the entire site from orbit. ... It’s the only way to be sure 
Just read this on FB. Amen, @Scientists4EU. Stronger In were worse than useless. #Article50 #Brexit #BrexitShambles pic.twitter.com/pqkMm3s4AG 
Britain's love-hate affair with #Brexit just got even more complicated, uncertain and full of legalese  
Constitutional crisis averted? #brexit  
Brexit: current status  
Yes, we voted to Brexit but not stupidest Brexit possible. Not Brexit hitting workers hardest. Not Brexit without oversight #Takebackcontrol 
It is hard to believe, but this is a perfect summary of the mindset of British political & media elites days before the Brexit vote:  
@MailOnline has already started with the judges. Not being foreigners, the accusation is being gay. #Brexit #Euref 
Withdraw? Stay in? Withdraw fully? Partially? Should we ask Parliament? OMG this is either Brexit or the weirdest date ever. #Article50 
David Attenborough suggests voters aren't wise enough to decide on Brexit. The populous are wiser and smarter than the House of Commons. 
The one that won the referendum  
#Brexit before & after headlines from Daily Mail. Even they belatedly realised 'he's gay so his opinion shouldn't count' no longer washes.  
Brexit ruling savaged by MP Jacob Rees-Mogg: Parliament AGREED Article 50 would be triggered IMMEDIATELY  
Brexit means...now hang on, I had it written down on a piece of paper somewhere... 
Fellow #Brexiteers don't join the moaning game. #Brexit still means #Brexit 
UK's High Court ruling doesn't derail Brexit timetable, says @theresa_may's spokeswoman:  
MailOnline mocked and derided after targeting Brexit judge for being ‘openly gay’  
Three 'unbiased & impartial' judges have overruled democracy, by deciding MPs get an effective 'veto' over the result of the EU referendum!  
Retweet if you would like a Labour leader who opposes Brexit 
The cry of "unelected judges" is the last refuge of Conservatives everywhere who feel they don't have to follow the law. #Brexit  
Appears #Brexit not gonna happen without a lot of bloodshed this what happens when let islam invade. @Poppy_Fields1 
UK Gov has signed EU/Canada trade dealDid REMOANER MPs call for a debate/vote on that?NoThey are just interested in stopping Brexit. 
To any remainers shouting at me that the referendum result was only ever advisory. Please translate the govt literature below. I thank you.  
On face of it, it's right parliament should oversee #Brexit but reality is many diehard Remain MPs will use endless votes to try & thwart it 
Considering  #brexit vote occurred b/c of media manipulation by press barons & outright lies by politicians it's wise #Article50 is debated. 
A top lawyer says MPs can halt Brexit if they have 'guts and integrity'  
Politicians need to #RespectTheResult of the EU Referendum. They are representatives of the people. #Democracy 
Brexit isn't to do with Europe, nor even immigration. It is a reactionary spasm which touches all areas of personal freedom. 
After the ruling on #Brexit and #Article50 does Corbyn have a responsibility to Labour members to push to stay in the EU?R/T after voting 
brexit is canceled because parliament is too busy trying to think of a more british word than "bin lorry" 
I cannot possibly see how parliament can override a referendum. If country had wanted MPs to decide we wouldn't have needed a referendum! 
Getting parliamentary approval may delay the process, but hard to imagine Parliament ignoring outcome of referendum.  
that David Cameron was planning to send Article 50 letter the day after the Referendum, & no-one noticed that was against our constitution 
I voted to Remain. But I respect the democratic result of the referendum, so I would vote for Art50 and making the best of leaving. 
FACTBOX: What now after UK government loses Brexit court case?  
UK High Court rules that Brexit will need parliament's approval:  
One judge blocking #Brexit founded European law group that works towards 'enhancement of European legal integration'  
Brexit is not the will of the British people – it never has been  
 What the court challenge ruling just did for the pound. The economy doesn't want #brexit @Number10gov #dumpBrexit 
Rejoice, @DanielJHannan: the judges have heeded your earnest plea to make parliament supreme! Haha!! #Art50 #Brexit  
1wk remains & a #TrumpWins is pending while world watches #Brexit #Article50 & a #WorldSeries #CubsWin we will #MAGA3X. #ThursdayThoughts 
Businesses & workers need certainty about Brexit: my @timesredbox article about today's debate due to start soon 
Brexit has caused havoc already. Now parliament must save us | Polly Toynbee  
Hate to tell you this but @Nigel_Farage, you gotta get back in there and see #brexit through. I'm sure #trump will help after he wins 11/8 
Truly appalling from the Mail. It seems Brexit empowers, encourages and endorses not just racism but homophobia.   
Disgusted a rich South American Lawyer Gina Miller stops the will of over 17 Million British people for Brexit because she does not like it 
Parliament gave the people the right to vote in a referendum. Where did it say they would nonetheless have the last word. Bastards. 
Openly gay or not, you have to admire anyone who's worked their way up from erecting fences to being High Court Judge.#Brexit 
#Hygge, #Brexit and #Trumpism are among the Words of the Year for 2016, according to dictionary publisher Collins 
Pound rises as High Court rules against Theresa May triggering Article 50 without Parliament. #Brexit  
Brexit here we come!  
"Nobody voted to make this country poorer" - Labour MP & leading Open Britain supporter @SKinnock on today's High Court #Brexit ruling  
Brexit has caused havoc already. Now parliament must save us | Polly Toynbee  
My guess - Govt would win if admits reversibility. Would totally transform Brexit politics & diplomacy though. Tusk told me was reversible  
If there's a more perfect summary of Brexit I'm yet to see it:  
& so it starts, the process to overturn a democtric referendum, a desperate attempt to break #Brexit, the EU has a proven track record. 
Theresa May: 'Brexit Means Brexit'High Court:  
Russian TV asked me to comment on the absurd decision by The High Court to torpedo #Brexit Will be on at 16.00. Will be scathing. 
How is this man our Foreign Secretary?!  “Boris claims Brexit will be a 'Titanic success'” 
CORRECTION: UK Parliament should vote on whether government can begin formal Brexit process, court rules  
New poll. REMAIN would win new referendum  
As the full implications of Brexit unravel, I suspect any anger over today's court ruling will be confined to a declining number of people 
UK parl is now central to brexit why won't SF represent the 56% remain voters in NI and finally take their seats in the commons @FineGael 
Lawyer behind Brexit challenge says Brexit negotiation result mightusefully be put to 2nd referendum  
it's just a hunch but maybe the Brexiteers didn't think this #Brexit thing through. 
"We've had enough of that saga" - Mark Carney's response when asked about his future  
Personally, think Gov wrong to appeal. Shld hold vote asap and prepare emergency Elxn plans if pro-Remain MPs/peers seek to redefine #Brexit 
Things that have gone up today:Chance of General Election.Chance of A50 triggered later than March.MPs scrutiny of Brexit.Sterling. 
Are we any closer to defining what Brexit means? Asking for a friend. 
We can reverse brexit either before or after. NOW we FIGHT. We must engage with 'floaters', fly your EU flags, post them here. The Mafia. x 
The Daily Mail is very upset because an 'openly gay judge' ruled on Brexit  
Can anyone else feel anger welling up inside you?Good, channel it. We'll need it.We won the battle, but now comes the war...#Brexit 
Labour MPs in Leave constituencies must now go out & say: Brexit is a xenophobic project. We reject it. Join us or examine your conscience. 
Brexit will still mean Brexit after Article 50 ruling - my @FT take  
Brexit chaos deepens as court tells U.K. it must consult lawmakers  pic.twitter.com/yTit13pX2C 
decided to read the news as "brexit is cancelled" in order to allow myself one tiny piece of hope in the carcrash that is 2016 
Now even the domestic UK formalities of Brexit - not to speak about the substance - are getting complicated.  
421 out of 574 English and Welsh constituencies probably voted to Leave at the EU Referendum. 
Brexit might not happen and Brexiters are throwing a huge tantrum  
'Brexit means Brexit' Erm...  
Brexit ruling savaged by MP: Parliament AGREED Article 50 would be triggered IMMEDIATELY  
The High Court - a good result, but we can't keep relying on it to defend democracy  #Brexit 
The more we learn about this brexit stitch up the more obscene it becomes. Off your arses and look to your futures. 
The three judges who 'blocked Brexit' Were any from the working class areas that voted overwhelmingly for #Brexit? 
Join the Crusade Join UKIP The Only Party That Can Save Britain  
Brexit to require parliamentary approval in setback for Theresa May  A MAJOR set back for UKs right wing 
UK High Court rules lawmakers should vote on whether gov't can begin formal Brexit process by triggering Article 50  
.@DavidLammy Either respect the democratic will of the people in a NATIONWIDE referendum and vote for Article 50.... or resign as an MP. 
Judges who decided against Brexit all EU arselickers. Why did May not object to them ? 
As far as I can tell Brexiteers wanted parliamentary sovereignty. They've just been given..erm..parliamentary sovereignty #Article50 #Brexit 
Brexit still means Brexit. But sovereignty means sovereignty too. 
Judges who blocked Brexit include1who founded a EUROPEAN law groupa 2nd who charged taxpayer millions for advice 
Theresa May: BREXIT MEANS BREXIT!!High Court:  
Brexit ruling savaged by MP: Parliament AGREED Article 50 would be triggered IMMEDIATELY.  
UK exhausted from arguing with Brexit f**kwits  
Theresa May's reaction as Boris Johnson vows to make Brexit a 'Titanic success':  
Brexit's idiot in chief fails to understand how democracies work: Elected MPs make laws. Judges make sure the government keeps to those laws  
New @time cover by @CharlotteAlter: Election 2016 is a Referendum on the Treatment of Women  
A global event we should noteThe Brexit will need a new voteBy puppets in powerWe're nearing the hourWhen Global Elites need a moat 
BREXIT: A preview of tomorrow's Daily Mail front page has been released following the #Article50 ruling. 
Now, in London: “Don’t get Brexited, vote!” warning from Brits to Americans! #Brexit #USelection 
BloggedThe Brexit case: can the ECJ get involved?  
Corbyn's response here is absolutely rightAs was his appointment of @Keir_Starmer as Shadow Brexit minister  
If Brexit gets overturned, Lampards goal crossed the line in 2010. Therefore England and Germany have to replay the 2nd half at 2-2 
“A revolt of the regions”: Could Gordon Brown’s federal UK plan become Labour Brexit policy? @Anoosh_C reports:  
In a shock ruling, the British government was told it must win a vote in parliament before enacting #Brexit decision  
LEAKED! Brexit High Court documents reveal why they made their Article 50 judgment  #brexitshambles 
The government will appeal, but #Article50 ruling is a massive boost for those fighting a destructive, hard Brexit  
Daily Mail: we would have got away with #Brexit if it wasn't for those pesky homosexual, europhile, Olympian fencers  
Retweet @talk2meradiouk poll  High Court Brexit decision just proves we need to #draintheswamp in UK too. Establishment ignoring us 
Queen Of OmnishamblesTheresa May And The Brexit BunglersHT @WillBlackWriter 
Referendum should have 66% majority like EU countries Norway; Germany; Italy and Hungary Sweden 75% Parliament supreme! Yes 
Anyone remember the Scottish Parliament voting after the Scottish Independence Referendum? 
Mark Carney explains why Bank of England has raised inflation outlook  
Oh well that explains it then doesn't it @DailyMailUK?! Of course one of the "judges who blocked #Brexit" is gay. Christ. #Article50 
This country is FINISHED if we are to have a "parliament flavoured #Brexit".half in/half out meaning DEAD IN WATER! 
Remain 2 points ahead if new referendum – BMG poll  
The uncertainty of #brexit right now is embarrassing. Pick a side & deal with the consequences of that decision in full 
Who is Gina Miller, the woman leading the Brexit legal battle over Article 50? 
Irony remains dead as DUP calls parliamentary scrutiny of Brexit 'undemocratic' in same breath as pledging to thwart equal marriage majority 
Imagine if parliament stops Brexit and Hillary wins - it would feel like the world was almost back on its axis again. 
"The Government will seek the approval of Parliament to implement what you decide."Nope, I didn't read that either.#Brexit  
An openly gay judge!! Imagine that. A judge who is open about his gayness. The Dailymail readers will just be exploding right now #brexit  
To the tune of Eleanor Rigby:Brexit means BrexitBrexit means Brexit means Brexit means Brexit means what?Not a whole lot. 
I should have called it ‘Brexit: How to make your father-in-law look a twat at Christmas’. Missed a trick there. 
Remember what Vote LEAVE said the referendum was about.  
This brief geezer writes on Brexit process and legal/const issues like few others. Or none. Read and concentrate  
Shadow Brexit secretary says the Prime Minister is trying to "avoid scrutiny"  
Quote from anonymous Leave campaigner from @GaryGibbonBlog's Breaking Point, his Brexit diary, entry for 14 July  
The three judges who 'blocked Brexit'  
Brexit: What the hell happens now? is out from Canbury Press in a couple of weeks. You can pre-order here  
FM: Boris Johnson yesterday said Brexit would be a Titanic success. It's probably the truest thing he's said in a long time #FMQs 
FM: I can't understand why Tories, who before the referendum were so supportive of the single market, are silent now #FMQs 
Fine to disagree with #Brexit decision, but don't impugn integrity of the two most senior Court of Appeal judges & one of the best other LJs 
“Labour will be pressing the case for a Brexit that works for Britain, putting jobs, living standards and the economy first." @jeremycorbyn 
Cameron MISLED Britain people into thinking their vote would decide Brexit rather than the truth, it would be MPs' votesDereliction of duty 
I guess the UK Government could ask the European Court of Justice to over-ride the High Court's decision for #Article50 #brexit  
The rational view: "Imagine...the public mood towards Brexit has turned ugly..": @JolyonMaugham 
Will the article 50 ruling stop Brexit? | The panel  
Opinion:  Brexit will still mean Brexit after Article 50 ruling  
All this pish about the "democratic will of the people" is a bit iffy when you consider many of the people voted Brexit based on false info. 
when the non-binding referendum is non-binding  
UK government loses High Court battle over Brexit plans  
The referendum wasn't legally bindingI guess Michael Gove forgot to explain that because he was so busy not explaining anything else 
Economic slowdown signs are "notable by [their] absence" for British households post-Brexit  
The government may have to go to the EU's highest court to appeal the Brexit ruling  
Former Australian PM John Howard is confident Britain will make a success of Brexit and boost UK-Australia ties  
'An advisory referendum cannot circumvent legal & democratic procedures.' My response to High Court ruling.  #brexit 
Sterling soars after UK court gives Parliament power to block #Brexit #Art50 Article 50 Supreme Court Gina Miller #BrexitShambles #May #RT 
63% of @SKinnock 's constituents voted to Leave. If there is a GE caused by his Brexit disruption I trust that same number will against him. 
Brexit ruling will not derail article 50 timetable, says No 10  
.@NicolaSturgeon says High Court ruling on #Brexit underlines "total chaos and confusion" at heart of UK government #FMQs 
Every single one of us must put pressure on our elected leaders -to fulfill the referendum result.  
#Farage,17,410,742 Brits CALL YOU!REBUILD #Ukip!LEAD this country into #Brexit!TAKE CONTROL from the rotten elites!WE WILL SUPPORT YOU!  
Britain’s High Court ruled that the prime minister can’t start brexit without approval from Parliament  
Music world reacts to high court Brexit ruling  
If there is to be a Parliamentary vote on Article 50, it should be UNANIMOUS for #Brexit. No 'ifs'. No 'buts'.The people have spoken. 
Brexit and its consequences, with a critique of the economics profession's role. @rethinkecon #econocracy ... 
How dare those British Judges in British courts tell the British people that Britain is a parliamentary democracy! #Article50 #brexit 
This is the line folks. Referendum meant nought in face of judicial ruling. We should get over it or be accused of being 'American'  
Actually, Parliament organised a NON-BINDING referendum. Parliament could have made the referendum binding if it wished. #Brexit  
The High Court ruling on Brexit proves we never should have treated the vote with a respect it didn't deserve  
It's hilarious watching #Brexit'ers fuming, calling 'the law' - British law! - an arse, when they were so adamant they wanted it! #bbcdp 
Boris: "We'll make a titanic success of Brexit". Osborne: "The Titanic sank!". Full speech:  
brb writing steamy fanfiction about Brexit-blocking, openly gay masters of the sword  
The Mail is apparently no longer furious that one of the High Court judges behind the Brexit ruling also has the audacity to be openly gay  
Openly gay!!! How can he possibly reach an independent legal decision on #Brexit!!! Traitor homos in our midst!  
Ukip's Suzanne Evans calls for High Court judges to be sacked over Brexit ruling  
"Labour will be pressing the case for a Brexit that works for Britain, putting jobs, living standards and the economy first."- @jeremycorbyn 
Want to know what surrealism is? try to imagine the UK Supreme Court referring this Article 50 case to the ECJ for guidance. #Brexit 
Brexit, Parliament, sovereignty and Article 50: The great paradox of our age. Those who wanted to regain sovereignty now argue against it.  
Openly gay I can cope with. But a FENCER?! I'm getting my pitchfork... #brexit #Article50 
Pound surges after Government loses key Article 50 Brexit ruling at the High Court  
While Plaid Cymru’s Brexit spokesperson, Jonathan Edwards, welcomed today's High Court ruling  
She only did it for the people. Sure she did - she's a 'national hero'. We must preserve democracy - when it agrees with us. #Brexit  
Perhaps Boris was right when he said yesterday that Brexit would be a Titanic success  
First minister of Wales, Carwyn Jones, says Brexit votes should take place in Cardiff, Scotland and Northern Ireland as well as Westminster  
#FMQs @RuthDavidsonMSP scores spectacular own goal?...brings up indy uncertainty on day uk courts question brexit!  
Brakes on Brexit...  
NOW is the time for REAL Labour MPs to Stand Up for our rightsBe brave & OPPOSE Brexit#Remain 
SEB .. from the UK .. hi , Magna Carter .. is the will of the population .. Brexit must be upheld , or rewrite history !! 
UK: Brexit means Brexit but not Brexit.SCHRODINGER:Well played. 
Everything you need to know about the court case that could stop Brexit from happening  
Goes back to the real lesson of Brexit (and GOP primary for that matter.) Polls weren't bad- CW just didn't heed them. Unthinkability bias. 
Brexit-blocking judge has close links to Tony Blair  You couldn't make it up.#Brexit 
. @Keir_Starmer-QC:Shadow #Brexit:  will hold #ThreeStoogesOfBrexit feet to the fire. No one on their side- leading- has his legal brain 
The pound is not the only thing benefiting from the High Court Brexit decision  
A black woman just halted Brexit, for now  
Imagine all the stuff we could all be getting on with if Brexit hadn't happened 
Bookies now think Brexit might not happen   
Courts rule parliament must vote on article 50, and an hour later the Bank of England raises UK growth forecasts - BOOM! In your FACE Brexit 
Breaking: Bank of England plays down chance of rate cut, with Brexit forecast to weigh less heavily on economy   
Wtf is with the Daily Mail clearly using 'openly gay' as a slur #brexit  
#Brexit update  
Sterling soars after UK court gives Parliament power to block #Brexit  
Senior kipper shows total contempt for the rule of Law. That is the road to tyranny. #Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
.@NicolaSturgeon says it's hypocritical of the Tories to talk about constitutional uncertainty because of #Brexit  
Relieved Brits say there's "finally some hope" after new Brexit ruling   
The man who blocked Theresa May's Brexit  
Jun24 Brexiters: We want our parliament's sovereignty BACK!Nov3 Brexiters: No, no, that's way too sovereign. #Brexit #BrexitShambles  
FT Alphaville: After the High Court’s Brexit decision, forget about activating Article 50 in March  
.@RuthDavidsonMSP suggesting it's @theSNP that is causing uncertainty whilst dark cloud of #Brexit floats over her head. Laughable. #FMQs 
Key extract from Article 50 Brexit challenge judgment, which was handed down by the Lord Chief Justice in the High Court this morning  
"Will (PM) finally give in to the temptation of calling an early election?" asks @bbclaurak #brexit #bbcdp 
Irony of the year as @RuthDavidsonMSP brings up constitutional uncertainty on the same day that Tory Brexit 'plan' is ruled illegal. #FMQs 
MPs have already had one vote on Brexit, on the same day as everyone else. We are seeing a self imposed elite trying to suppress democracy. 
The High Court ruling on Brexit proves we never should have treated the vote with a respect it didn't deserve  
Another example of an exciting BREXIT opportunity  Colombia delivers Brexit boost to Theresa May  via @MailOnline 
So a handful of judges have effectively decided that a binding referendum result was just advisory & needs ratifying by 330 MPs? #Article50 
Retweet High Court Brexit decision just proves we need to #draintheswamp in UK too. Establishment Elite ignoring wishes of the people again 
After the High Court’s Brexit decision, forget about activating Article 50 in March -> @JolyonMaugham  
Pound jumps yet again after Bank of England raises inflation forecast and holds rates  
[BREAKING] Gina Miller wins #Brexit challenge: The businesswoman has succeeded in halting Britain’s exit from EU  
Brexit has highlighted how underdeveloped people's understanding of how the country works at a very basic level is, which is terrifying. 
I dare Theresa May to use the European Court of Justice to challenge the ruling of the UK high court on #brexit Article 50. 
Following the High Court's decision on Article 50, here's how MPs said they intended to vote in the EU referendum#Brexit  
The Referendum was not 'advisory' There was a straight forward statement that the Gov will implement whatever the voters decide.  
Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson prompts laugher by predicting a "Titanic success" of Brexit.  
"I'm not racist, I voted #Brexit to give power to back to British Courts"*British court makes decision on Article 50*"KILL THE TRAITORS" 
At least everyone's unhappy now. #Brexit 
Labour will be pressing the case for a Brexit that works for Britain, putting jobs, living standards and the economy first.  
Unbrexit! Parliament must vote on triggering article 50: the 8 funniest, most ironic reactions#brexit #unbrexit 
Who needs parody when the Brexit case could end up in the European Court of Justice? 
If the referendum had been a general election, the Leave Party would have a majority of 166 seats #RespectTheResult #Democracy 
This decision by the high court to give MPs a vote on Art. 50 is about giving Parliament a "meaningful say" in #Brexit says @patmcfaddenmp 
how to undo a referendum result you don't like without undoing future referendum results you do like 
If there's an appeal and they lose, will Brexit campaigners take their case to the European Court of Human Rights? Hilarious. #brexit 
Owen Smith says, if there is article 50 bill, Labour should amend it to include 2nd EU referendum -  
The government may have to go to the European Court of Justice to appeal for Brexit  
Ironic that foreigner had to tell him #brexit #sovereignty #ukip via @AJS_2010 
Judge who blocked #Brexit founded European law group that works towards 'enhancement of European legal integration'  
BREAKING: High Court ruling on BrexitBREAKING: Public votes didn't matter, Brexit might not go ahead after all 
"We are Parliament Men" 
Labour MP Paul Flynn just suggested MPs were more mature than Brexit voters. For the record, his Newport seat voted 56 per cent to Leave. 
Twitter is mocking Boris Johnson after he compared Brexit to Titanic:  
British curry restaurants say the Tories betrayed them on Brexit 
tfw you go for a swim because you're stressed out but spend 20mins fully dressed in the changing room tweeting mad shit about Brexit pic.twitter.com/YtmOaKvhLx 
MPs must not give in to Brexit mob intimidation. Ref was a vicious Tory party political device that went wrong. Reject & restore democracy. 
Most MPs - including me - respect referendum result & would vote for Article 50 to be triggered, but want reassurance on Brexit plan (1/2) 
Absolute bollocks, what was the point on the EU referendum in the first place if they aren't going to give the people what they voted for? 
Perhaps someone should have asked the high court *before* the referendum. Oh well. Mustn't grumble.  
Seems the courts don't think Brexit means Brexit is anything more than specious tautology and Parliament deserves better. Quite right too. 
I kinda wanna make a video on brexit and article 50. It's interesting important stuff 
Not a single person voted for a right-wing Tory Brexit. It wasn't on the ballot paper. It's not 'democratic' to let them do what they want. 
Oh god, the "referendum was advisory only" people are in my mentions.  
Oh man this is funnier than when Brian Harvey ran himself over after eating too many jacket potatoes.#brexit #Article50 
Successful people make mistakes, but they are quick to recognize them, and don't stubbornly cling to bad decisions.#Remain #Brexit #YesEU 
Astonishing that after months where it's clear that the Brexit morons had no idea what it means, they're raging that it might not happen. 
When the government inevitably rocks up at the European Court of Justice to fight its legal battle over Brexit  
Brexit legal challenge: FTSE 250 jumps as High Court delivers hammering blow against Theresa May's Brexit plans 
It would be a mistake to challenge such a clear ruling, says @fmwales on #Brexit court defeat for UK government 
The S&P 500 just traded at levels last seen in July. Right after Brexit. That's 4 months of gains gone.@StockTwits 
Government "disappointed" over a High Court ruling that the Prime Minister cannot trigger Brexit alone  
EU-27 is the real Brexit constraint - we could end up with hard Brexit because they cannot agree on anything   
British Court Deals Blow to Brexit Plans; Government Will Appeal  
It's okay Leavers, no one is trying to stop #Brexit, we just want to boost the pound long enough so that we can sell up and run away 
Paul Scully MP asks Minister in International Trade Qs for update "on progress in securing new post-Brexit trade deal with Israel" @scullyp 
The rest of the world outside the parochial bubble of British politics and media sees #Brexit for what it is - self-destructive stupidity.  
Brexit has the largest mandate ever in British history. 17,410,742 people voted to LEAVE the EU.  
"Those who brought this case today are clearly trying to tie the process up in legal knots, delay or even prevent Brexit" says @isaby 
Appointed judges should never rule on matters relating to people exercising their will through a democratic process. #Brexit 
To Brexiters sharing this image from the Govt’s referendum leaflet, just remember, these things aren’t true unless they’re written on a bus  
Why I picketed Mishcon de Reya over Brexit – and why you should want Britain to leave the EU immediately  
this is how i see whats happening with Brexit today #brexit #Article50 
"Brexit means OH SHIT"An article I wrote about Queen of Omnishambles Theresa May and her Brexit bunglers pic.twitter.com/sR9dozD8WG 
Brexit more like Buttshit. SUBSCRIBE NOW FOR MORE SATIRE! 
High Court tells Theresa May where to shove Brexit.  
When Brexiters vote for parliamentary sovereignty and get....parliamentary sovereignty #Article50 #Brexit  
“When she came up with Brexit means Brexit, Theresa May even got that wrong”: @mrjamesob on Article 50 court ruling  
The UK government loses a legal challenge to officialy start the process to leave the EU without parliamentary consent. #Brexit 
Brexit people: “give control to parliament.” Judicial Ruling: “give control to parliament.” Brexit people: “this is a disgrace!” 
An act of Parliament passed the referendum to leave EU & now Parliament are attempting to scupper a fair democratic vote in their interests. 
The High Court rules that Parliament must vote to trigger the Brexit process  
this should always have been a decision for parliament not a referendum. That's why we have a parliamentary democracy 
Wait, so Brexit doesn’t only mean Brexit, it means an end to rule of law and separation of powers too?  
#Brexit has the largest mandate ever in British history. 17,410,742 people voted to LEAVE the EU. Article 50  
In some ways it's quite pleasurable to see the enraged elites still seething that we the people spoke against them in the Brexit referendum. 
Brexit court case: Government loses, May cannot trigger Article 50 - Sky News #brexit   
Beyond ironic there is speculation the High Court ruling on Brexit could be taken to the European Court of Justice..... 
Don't cheer too soon Tim Farron. If #Brexit is blocked you are likely to lose the rest of your MPs in the next election. 
'The high court ruling on Brexit should never have happened - judges should stay out of politics'#premium 
Still don't know what "Brexit means Brexit" means, but it's been confirmed "parliamentary sovereignty" means "parliamentary sovereignty". 
They already HAD ONE. By giving the referendum, which then you should ACCEPT the result! 
Man who demanded sovereignty of Parliament outraged by sovereignty of Parliament  #Ukip #Brexit 
The pound surged more than 1% against the dollar after a U.K. court ruled Brexit must require parliamentary vote   
Well it kind of is outrageous when you go against a referendum. 
LOLOLOLOLOLOLOLOL #Brexit  
Brexit chaos has completely shattered any illusions that the United Kingdom can continue to function in its present form. #indyref2 
My statement on the High Court ruling on Article 50 #brexit  
Brexit may have to receive parliamentary approval before going into effect. Hey, can they also approve our election results? #Kidding #Kinda 
MPs voted for a referendum in the first place to allow the British public to have a voice. We must honour the result! #brexit #article50 
A few thoughts:1. Brexit still means Brexit. MPs are very very unlikely to vote against leaving. 
IDS on sky shamelessly lying that the referendum was binding. It was not. #Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
Labour should amend Article 50 Bill to give the British people the final say on real terms of Brexit. Or I will seek that from backbenches. 
The judges who blocked Brexit  
Gotta love liberal democracy! Popular will: Brexit 1 Remain 0Constitutional rule-of-law: Brexit 0 Remain 1Parliamentary sovereignty: ?? 
Brexit thus far  
2016 is the year of jokes gone too far. Brexit, Trump, this prank where i hem my husband's jeans by 1/4 inch every day. They are jorts now. 
Astonishing #Brexiters believe a non-binding referendum can overun the Parliamentary sovereignty they shouted so loud to assert. 
Brexit must have parliament vote, rules High Court in blow to gov’t  by @kellyfiveash 
Is anyone else laughing pretty hard this morning at Brexit news? 
Part of Brexit argument was to return power to British Parliament so it must be right that Parliament now has a say in triggering Article 50 
There you go, @mrjamesob, pro #Brexit MPs now bemoaning "unelected judges"@LBC 
I want Farage, on every news outlet, demanding a referendum for Britain to leave Britain. 
@almurray "But if you're here, who's grooming the badgers ready for the #Brexit parade?""Brexit's off!"(Sorry) 
We should sack the judges who backed Brexit legal challenge, says Ukip leadership hopeful  
Corbyn responds to historic ruling: "There must be transparency & accountability to parliament on the Brexit terms."  
If anyone knows a better way to sort Brexit, i'd like to see it.  
LET’S HAVE A REFERENDUM TO LEAVE BRITAIN 
LATEST: We still plan to trigger #Article50 by end of March, Theresa May's spokeswoman says  
Brexit might not happen and Brexiters are throwing a huge tantrum  
RT #TheresaMay #APPEAL to #SUPREMECOURT NOW! #DEMOCRACY IS BEING MURDERED BY A #GUYANESEborn #GOLDDIGGER MARRIED TO #MRHEDGEFUND #BREXIT NOW  
What it is like to be 'foreign' in Brexit Britain | Joris Luyendijk  
#UKIP should stop squabbling over who its leader should be and start dealing with the coup against #Brexit instigated by The High Court 
Britain voted for Brexit to escape from... British judges?  
Remember the name Gina Miller she just helped save Parliamentary Democracy in Britain (with a little help from the supreme court) #Brexit 
New blog @royalsociety looking at Brexit and the international mobility of scientists:  #scipol 
So Nigel Farage thinks a non-binding referendum (i.e. a poll) should trigger Article 50 and not, you know, the parliament we voted for. 
Regardless of your views on Brexit, if a question is put to a referendum and parliament then overrules the will of the public, it's worrying 
Truly, totally, outrageous - the rich, the powerful, the judiciary, tell the 52% majority who voted Brexit "Get lost, you're not having it!" 
From Brexit to Trump, "white anxiety has fueled this year's political tumult in the West," says @amandataub 
READ: Statement from our co-founder, @Arron_Banks on today's High Court ruling re: #Brexit and Article 50.  
Brexit moans Brexit 
Paddy Power have halved the odds of second #EUref taking place before 2019, from 10/1 to 5/1, in light of art 50 court ruling. #Brexit 
Elite-front Moody's warns UK of credit rating downgrade  #Brexit  
brexit being a half-arsed compromise that we muddle through, moaning, is the most heroically patriotic thing I can imagine 
Brexiteers: "UK courts for UK laws!"UK High Court: "Brexit must follow UK law and go to parliament."Brexiteers: "We didn't mean that law!" 
Unsurprisingly, racist comments about #GinaMiller already abound. This is why it's hard *not to* associate #Brexit with racism. 
We should sack the judges who backed Brexit legal challenge, says Ukip leadership hopeful  
Gloating Remoaners hail Article 50 High Court ruling to block Brexit as REAL DEMOCRACY   
Live on @BBCNews discussing high court decision today on #Brexit. Article 50 must be triggered, but its right that @UKParliament has a say. 
What a shambles this whole Brexit thing has been 
Remainers are staging a coup against #Brexit but morons on #twitter are tweeting about #NationalSandwichDay Cretins! 
Interesting that it's possible that the only reason parliament voted for a referendum in the first place is because it was advisory  
#Brexit here we go  
Jeremy Corbyn responds to the High Court ruling on Brexit  
Burning in a fire with someone you hate so much that you laugh as you both burn. That's how I feel about brexit. 
#BREAKING: High Court rules the UK Gov. cannot trigger Article 50 on their own. Parliament must vote on #Brexit.   
So Brexit's been blocked by The High Court...It's still happening in #FM17 - and it's out tomorrow! -  
If brexit is so great why the fear of debate? 
Article50.The judges' Brexit ruling a small victory,but a victory none the less.hooray-a reason to smile today today! #takebackcontrol 
I propose a UK people’s constitutional convention & more power to the North to break through #Brexit deadlock, bridge North/South divide- GB 
UKIP's Nigel Farage has branded the High Court ruling on Article 50 a "betrayal" of Brexit voters  
Pound shoots up after government is told it can’t trigger Brexit  
#brexit It's like a TV show where the writers didn't expect it to get this far so have to pad it out with daft characters & cliffhangers. 
@Ed_Farmer_Ford shares @NFYFC perspective on Brexit at #EOEfc16 
This ruling another example of how Brexit really is a battle between the people v establishment . We beat them in June. We will do it again. 
On the 5 stages of grief, 32% of Remain voters are stuck in denial over Brexit. High Court ruling won't have helped!  
Brexit  
One of the greatest lies of the #Brexit campaign was that we had no parliamentary sovereignty. As #Brexiters have just had shown to them. 
YOUR COMMENTS: I think reader ‘CountryNotIndividual’ is making a pretty explicit threat here… #Article50 #Brexit  
I think Brexit just hit the iceberg in the High Court! Salvage vessels called. Supreme Court on standby! May loses. Never good for a PM.  
517 MPs voted for EU Referendum Bill, any who now vote against the result of that #EUref are showing they are unfit to be MPs! @afneil#UKIP 
Poppies. Brexit. People post the  emoji to 'win' arguments. Can Twitter not go back to simpler times and call football managers 'frauds'? 
Key passage in #Brexit judgment. *If* EU law rights are 'domestic law rights created by [statute]' & *if* A50 irreversible, the rest follows  
"Brexit means Brexit" #Article50 
'MPs will still vote for Brexit': readers on the high court judgment  
High court Brexit ruling: what does it all mean?  
UK reacts to landmark Brexit court ruling  
NEWS! “Brexit Means Clusterfuck” confirms Prime Minister  pic.twitter.com/squQEQAxsO 
Does today's high court ruling on #Brexit mean the NHS WON'T get that £350 million they were promised? 
The pound shot up by more than 1% against the dollar, immediately after the High Court announcement on #Brexit #Article50 
#Labour on A50 and #Brexit... 65 meaningless words. I don't pay my dues or taxes for this.  
After nearly yr NO ELECTIONS in Austria & now Britain court smacks down #Brexit. Both countries trying stop islam takeover.#DC Parliamentary 
If this isn’t overturned on appeal, a general election will sort out MPs who try to block #Brexit.  
Brexit Bill will let sovereign Parliament debate what kind of Brexit UK wants. That's what the Gov is really scared of 1/  
.@TimFarron: British people must be given a chance to say no to a hard Brexit that risks our economy and jobs  
The thing that British people have been missing for the past 20 years is that the #Commons has become an unelected chamber as well. #Brexit 
Brexit 2This time it's personal. 
Gina Miller I love you! Brexit challenge 'is about all our futures' #NoBrexit  
I welcome today's court ruling. Of course Parliament should have say. May has no mandate for hard Brexit; better for country to stay! #fb 
I feel sorry for Vladimir Putin. He put so much time and effort in project Brexit. And now this happens...  
Shall we now secure a multi-party agreement to block Brexit? Yes, I think we should.  
Meet the woman who has derailed Theresa May's Brexit  
Miller et ors v Secretary of State for Exiting EU [2016] EWHC 2768...#brexit#article50#emojieu. 
Twitter is mocking Boris Johnson after he compared Brexit to Titanic:  
Pound soars after government loses Brexit ruling  via @FT 
Markets are behaving re Brexit like a spurned lover seizing hope from even the smallest positive signal sent in their direction. 
The #Brexit war can still be won, but we must start fighting back  
Globalists using Judiciary to OVERTURN will of PEOPLE & revoke #Brexit.Britain NEEDS #PresidentTrump#DrainTheSwamp 
Invoke Article 50 NOW!'s statement on the #Brexit ruling  
THIS HIGH COURT DECISION WILL GO DOWN IN HISTORY FOR STARTING A CIVIL WAR IN THE UK.#Brexit #LeaveEU #VoteLeave 
This case is plain attempt to block Brexit by people who are out of touch with country and refuse to accept  result 
Article 50 Has Opened A 'Brexit Cafe' In Durham And It's Offensive AF #Article50 
Theresa May must consult Parliament before triggering Article 50 to leave EU – High Court  #Brexit  
Parliament must vote on the UK starting Brexit process - good decision for representative democracy  
I'm going to have to dig out my favourite bit of drama about the rule of law again aren't I:  #Brexit 
It would've been nice if The High Court had told us this before we had the expense of a referendum you know, that we can go F*ck ourselves 
CORRECTION. BES polling showing LEAVERS more likely to regret referendum result than REMAINERS  
Here are the full details of the court ruling forcing the UK government to hold a vote of MPs before starting Brexit  
Triumphant Gina Miller, the campaigner who spearheaded Article 50 High Court legal battle reacts to the ruling#Brexit  
Scandalous waste of public money for Government to appeal to Supreme Court to stop our sovereign Parliament considering #Article50 #Brexit 
The Great Betrayal Begins. #Brexit  
Majority are betrayed I can't see BrExit happening given the March deadline all I see is smirking faces of remainer MP's ?Planned from day 1  
UK needs further devolution to prevent Brexit anger, says Gordon Brown  
Brexit might not happen and Nigel Farage is basically hinting at a revolution  
The High Court is committing treason and pushing Britain to civil unrest. It should be dissolved at once. It's a coup against #Brexit 
Very big development on "Brexit:" Parliament must vote on leaving the EU; we can't just be led out by Theresa May  
The pound is not the only one benefiting from the High Court Brexit decision  
The High Court Ruling is yet another sign that we can't trust the establishment to deliver on Brexit.  
Statement from student leader @FergalMcFerran who was part of @ChallengeArt50 in London on today's #Brexit legal challenge decision  
Brexit : SNP delighted about 'sovereignty of Parliament' decision. Unless a parliament tries sovereignty over a Scot Gov Act like OBFA... 
The first full guide to Brexit. I'm calling it #ProjectFact 
So, Brexiters, what you really fear is democracy...Parliamentary democracy. Busted. #Brexit 
In carrying out the expressed will of the British people re Brexit @theresa_may deserves the backing of all who believe in democracy. 
Isn't Brexit fascinating? 
.@GoodwinMJ The PM could use parliamentary defeat on Brexit to force early election to bring 'clarity, stability., certainty' 
Here's the link to the full Brexit case judgement - Rolling reaction:  
Brexit legal challenge: Pound rises as High Court rules against UK gov't triggering Article 50 without Parliament 
BREAKING: Court rules Britain’s Parliament must vote on Brexit, throwing EU breakaway plan into disarray   
High Court ruling big defeat for Theresa May who said government alone would trigger #Brexit process. Now MPs need to approve. Gov to appeal 
Pound surges on Brexit ruling  
I thought Brexit campaign was all about the sovereignty of parliament? They should be pleased! 
Brexit means more courts cases and and lots of legal arguments. 
STEP 1: BOYCOTT EUROPEAN BRANDSSTEP 2: VOTE OUT REMAINERSSTEP 3: BE AWKWARD ... PROTEST EVERY COUNCIL PROJECT#Brexit #LeaveEU #VoteLeave 
MP´s really are special people. They get to vote in the referendum and now get to vote again. Bent legal system. 
A sincere thank you to #GinaMiller (and I assume her team) for injecting an iota of rational thought into the process of brexit. 
FTSE 100 falls as the pound strengthens after #Article50 court ruling on Brexit  
What's the point of the SNP holding a consultation on another independence referendum?They'll ignore any responses they don't like anyway.  
I'm not sure the political elite realise how much anger this ruling will create. The people have been lied to, I see unrest ahead #Brexit  
Leading Open Britain supporter  @patmcfaddenmp on the High Court Article 50 decision to give Parliament a say on Brexit  
The Brexit mess just got messier. British court rules Theresa May must let Parliament vote before any exit.  
BTW, I predict Commons will not in the end dare to derail Brexit, but anyone's guess about the unelected House of Lords. 
MPs won't vote down Art 50 but now have bargaining power with govt to scrutinise Brexit negotiating strategy (If ruling not overturned) 
Neither the Supreme Court nor parliament have supremacy over a referendum and if they try to block it they should be dissolved. Article 50 
Hats off to Gina Miller. She stood up to the fund industry. Now she's standing up to the Government on Brexit. We need more people like her  
“Brexit doesn’t even mean Brexit!” Here’s James O’Brien’s reaction to the High Court #Brexit verdict  
On 25th June I said "Parliament now needs to decide whether we should go forward with Brexit". Article 50 judgement good news for democracy 
High Court rules that Brexit will require parliamentary approval, what do you want them to do? 
This is a critical point. If HMG believes #Brexit to be the national interest, it has nothing to hide.If not… then needs to come clean.  
Woman from the Empire challenges Boys for #Brexit  
Labour finally comment and spell Corbyn's name wrong !! #Brexit  
A 2017 general election will be a referendum on 
It was Farage himself who said he wouldn't accept a 48:52 loss if vote went against #brexit. He seems to have forgotten that #Article50 
MPs now have power to scrap Brexit, rules High Court: 
Does anyone else think the judiciary must be rubbing their hands in glee at all this extra work from Brexit? Taxpayers money down the drain 
Haha! #UK court rules against government on Art50. @Nigel_Farage throws a fit. Norwegian @stigeidi sets him straight. Wonderful! :-) #Brexit  
“A betrayal may be near at hand” Nigel Farage reacts to the High Court Brexit ruling  
Brexit means Brexit - but possibly not if you ask the High Court about Article 50 
Brexit just got a whole lot more interesting  
#Farage threatens violence if he doesn't get his way, just like the #TangerineTwat #Trump#fascist#bbcnews #EUref #Remain #Brexit  
Forget that bus. The biggest referendum fib was sent out to every home by HM Government. “This is your decision”.  
Can we appeal the referendum, while we're on the subject of gracefully accepting results we don't like? #brexit 
Pound surges after Government loses key Article 50 Brexit ruling at the High Court  
Oh for fuck sake the Brexit saga continues. It'll go to a fucking coin flip at this rate. 
Nigel Farage hints at public revolution if parliament stops Brexit  
Pound shoots up after government is told it can’t trigger Brexit  
Brexit means  
The news -- and there will be none bigger, short of a shooting or an indictment -- is that by court ruling parliament must vote on "Brexit." 
It will be hilarious if #brexit case reaches the European Court of Justice... 
Here is the #Brexit judgment of Lord Thomas LCJ, Sir Terence Etherton MR and Sales LJ  
Glad to hear the Brexit saga has been resolved comprehensively to the satisfaction of all parties, and we won't be hearing any more about it 
In case the gov is confused, HC clarified "2015 Referendum Act passed with clear briefing paper explaining it wld have advisory effect only"  
Sorry, folks, but you can't have this one both ways. You either respect the result of a referendum or you don't. 
We elect politicians to do our will, not to change things when it doesn't suit them. #BREXIT means we voted OUT. Get on with it.  
Brexit horror story: The sovereignty was coming from inside the House 
Excellent coverage of the bombshell #Article50 ruling by the @guardian:  #Brexit 
Pound jumps by most since August after #Article50 court ruling on Brexit process  
Brexit legal challenge wins: UK gov't must get Parliament approval to trigger Article 50, High Court rules 
And if this turns on irrevocability of Art50, a potential reference to the European Court to determine. Operation Pause Brexit?  
OUR GOVERNMENT & LAW MAKERS REFUSE TO DEFEND THE DEMOCRATIC WILL OF THE PEOPLE ... THEN WE REMOVE THEM & GET SOMEONE WHO WILL.#Brexit  
One of the considerations in the High Court was loss of rights in a #Brexit - this & other key points to be emphasised in persuading MPs. 
"A Titanic success" #brexit 
Govt loses Brexit challenge - and the judgment is all about the rights of British citizens, writes @adamwagner1  
People upset about the British High Court ruling?Almost as if Brexit wasn't about returning sovereignty to British democracy at all... 
An election fought purely on Brexit would logically suggest Tories & UKIP not contest the same seat. Would raise interesting possibilities 
It's Judicial Activism vs The People. #Article50 High Court blocks #Brexit. The will of the people 2nd to the will of the establishment 
Tbf "Brexit means Brexit subject to numerous legal challenges and a possible parliamentary vote" is a slightly less snappy soundbite 
London High Court ruling on #Article50 triggering #Brexit (full text) → Summary ↓ 
"We will appeal this judgement, the country voted to leave the EU in a referendum approved by Act of Parliament." - PM office statement 
Theresa May humiliated by High Court ruling that says MPs MUST be given a vote on Brexit  
If it didn't relate to the country I actually live in, the sheer drama of Brexit would be incredible 
I don't really get this. Just means a delay, but it'll still happen, am I right? Parliament willnae go against referendum would they?  
Article 50 judgement not a rejection of BREXIT but of Theresa May's strategy for dealing with it. She is today's big loser 
BREAKING: Brexit could be STOPPED by Parliament after BOMBSHELL Article 50 ruling  the corruption runs in their vein 
Looks like #Brexit news has gone down well with Daily Mail readers  
BREAKING: U.K. High Court: British Parliament must trigger #Brexit  
No statement from the SNP on the Article 50 ruling yet. If a hard Brexit is now less likely, so is #IndyRef2. 
Didn't want an early election, but I do now.Call it, put the MPs who wish to steamroll the wishes of the majority out of parliament#Brexit 
what a surprise: Establishment in the form of our out of touch judges vote to try to block Brexit. they can'tr bear  democracy 
British Court Rules That Parliament Must Approve Brexit Plans  
The Latest on Brexit: UK government "disappointed" with ruling.  
"titanic success" #brexit 
"Brexit means Brexit"  
I might add @nick_clegg that in an intelligent political world you would accept the will of the people & stop trying to wreck #Brexit 
The Courts, in full knowledge that #Parliament will overturn #Brexit decision, decide against Democracy.WE MUST MAKE A STAND FOR BREXIT.  
So the whole Brexit vote was completely worthless and the elite will now simply annul it exactly as I predicted. 
UK government must hold vote in Parliament before triggering formal Brexit process, court rules.  
#APPEAL #BREXIT #BREXITNOW #GinaMiller +husband run #HEDGEFUND. #PARLIAMENT #LAUGHING at the #BRITISH #PEOPLE -#MONEY #WINS #DEMOCRACY LOSES 
That rise in £ vs $ in context since the Referendum #Article50 #brexit  
We have been lied to. Disgusted. Time to make our voices heard once and for all #Brexit  
Fair to say this #Brexit debacle is one large Eton Mess! 
In an intelligent political world the gov would have made this decision, not a court. We now need a coherent #Brexit plan that works for all 
Wow. UK High Court: #Article50 invocation to trigger #Brexit must be via Parliament, no prerogative power to invoke.  
BREAKING: The UK's High Court has ruled government is not allowed to trigger Brexit without approval from parliament  
If courts and this parliament does not give executive the right to start Brexit talks, executive will seek a new parliament in an election. 
Thank the judges for using common sense on brexit. Our Prime Minister must understand she can't be a dictator in a democracy. 
Good job this referendum business is over. Now we can go back to packing the country with economic, muslim refugees. 
Is this a good day or are we keeping hope too painfully futilely alive? I have a pint of emotion left &need to know what to do w/ it #Brexit 
Think about this: British billionaires media now furious judges have decided to uphold parliamentary sovereignty over #Article50 #Brexit 
Some of the language the High Court uses to describe the Government's various legal arguments in the Brexit Article 50 case:  
The rules of ReferendumRule 1. Never trust the Tories. Rule 2. Never forget rule 1.  
The woman leading the campaign to force the government to get approval before #Brexit has won her battle (for now)  
Here's what sovereignty looks like. Dry your eyes #brexit voters.  
Parliament has already voted on Brexit - when they passed the 2015 EU Referendum Act that handed a decision they couldn't take to the people 
Brexit was all about taking back control. Now Theresa May is fighting to take it from her MPs  
The article 50 ruling is going to lay bare the differences in Labour. A pro Brexit leadership versus an anti Brexit PLP & Labour voters. 
If there are people buying sterling cos they think that there is a majority in the Commons to overturn Brexit, they are in for a shock. 
If MPs truly represent the people they serve, the Commons would allow #Article50 to be triggered by a margin of 52% to 48% #brexit 
The Government says it is "disappointed" at the High Court decision and "is determined to respect the result of the EU referendum" 
Ministers will appeal against a High Court ruling that Theresa May does not have the power to use the royal prerogative to trigger Brexit. 
The verdict was damning of the govt's case & therefore damning of May's claim that the appellants were "subverting democracy"#Brexit #YesEU 
Fair enough #brexit  
Memo to #TheresaMay Call a General Election NOW. Banish Labour. Then, with a huge majority, implement Brexit. 
Meet the woman who has derailed Theresa May's Brexit  
LATEST: Government says it'll appeal against #Article50 ruling  Bloomberg's @PatrickGower reports from the court: 
don't worry -if the Supreme Court overturn this you can go to European Court of Justice who could decide - #irony #brexit #ha 
MPs have already used their parliamentary sovereignty on the EU referendum. They voted by six to one to delegate the decision to the people. 
Court rules Parliament, not T. May, gets to pull the trigger on Brexit. Sterling rises 2% in half an hour. Markets think we're saved. + 
The quagmire of 'Brexit' has just changed to political quicksand for British Government with the High Court decision today 
Dominic Raab: This is a clear attempt to block Brexit by people who refuse to accept the result.  
Liam Fox says government will appeal Brexit decision to supreme court - Politics live  
Gobaith!No to HARD Brexit."Parliament must vote on whether the UK can start the process of leaving the EU" 
If they lose at the Supreme Court... Will the government appeal this Brexit ruling to, er, Europe? (!) 
British government loses Article 50 court case:  #Brexit  
Setback for Theresa May as high court says MPs must approve Brexit  
Turnout was 72%, result was 52% for Brexit. That's 37.4% of voting population that voted out. Not quite "whole country". 
Brexiters: "How dare Parliament have a say after a referendum in which we campaigned to give Parliament more of a say!" 
A reminder that the SNP is already in discussions with MPs from other parties to block Brexit in parliament.  
So in a confusing twist, High Court sticks up for parliamentary sovereignty on #Brexit...which was about returning sovereignty to parliament 
BATTLE OF BRITAIN WILL BEGIN NIGEL FARAGE Needs to return So we can stop those MPs from overturning the Referendum Democracy Has DIED in UK 
Total random coincidence! Just like it was total random coincidence when it fell off a cliff after the Brexit vote! Everything is fine!  
It's not about reversing the referendum, it's about doing what's democratically best for the UK. 
Brexit must be approved by U.K. parliament, high court rules  
Don't vilify MPs at this moment. Encourage them. En-COURAGE them. Most are actually on our side re no-#Brexit: help them make it possible. 
WHAT IF BREXIT DOESN'T HAPPEN AND HILLARY BECOMES PRESIDENT AND NOBODY WE LOVE DIES IN 2017???? 
The referendum itself was a political manoeuvre from a guy who isn't even our Prime Minister anymore and we're left to clean up the mess. 
Theresa May can't trigger #Brexit without putting it to an MPs' vote the High Court has ruled  
Brexit will require parliamentary approval, high court rules  
YAAAAAAY!!!  #Brexit #schmexit Government loses Article 50 court fight  
Excellent Parliament will have vote on #Article50. Let's now prevent a hard Brexit that will hurt UK innovation, science and jobs. 
A great moment for Parliament: a free vote, with MPs acting from courage & conviction, to stop #Brexit. If ever a time for this, it's now! 
When you learn that Brexit might not mean Brexit after all...  
BREAKING. The High Court has determined Article 50 cannot be triggered unless Parliament agrees. It won't. Brexit has just been cancelled! 
MPs and peers already voted to give power to decide on Brexit to the UK people in a referendum. Political class skating on very thin ice. 
Brexit’s in trouble. Maybe 2016 is going to turn out fine. Trump will go back to the casino/steak game and Bowie will rise again. 
Huge question for Corbyn now: will he set out red lines for Brexit + impose 3-line whip opposing Article50 trigger if Govt fails to meet em? 
World is going mad!US election madness, Brexit confusion, endless ME war, threats of WWIII, millions of refugees, corruption everywhere   
High Court judgement exposes a huge issue: flagrant abuse of royal prerogative by successive prime ministers. Pre-democratic powers. #Brexit 
Brexit court ruling means Parliamentary vote must be held before #Article50 is triggered  
I now predict the 'You lost, get over it' crowd will suddenly lose their enthusiasm for zen-like acceptance of unfavourable results #brexit 
To be clear - especially for all sending vile tweets to me just now - vote on #Article50 is about what kind of Brexit, not whether we Brexit 
Brexit means Brexit. Now we have a real chance to decide what we want Brexit to mean. 
Now we shall see which MPs respect democracy, and which MPs need to be ousted at the next General Election. #Brexit #Art50 
What the High Court Brexit decision did to the pound  
Keen to speak to international/EU students about living in the UK post-Brexit vote. Get in touch rebecca.ratcliffe@guardian.co.uk 
Last night at the Spectator Awards I had a distinct feeling that our political class do not accept the 23rd of June referendum result. 
It's all about to kick off in the UK!  “Parliament must vote on Brexit, High Court rules” 
Loving the folks who voted #Brexit to make Parliament sovereign, now fuming at the mouth after High Court confirms Parliament is sovereign 
Theresa May's Brexit plan crashes directly into a High Court ruling. She now needs parliamentary approval to trigger Article 50 negotiations  
If Labour cld secure economic conditions on Brexit plans (like those Brown put on Blair's desire to enter eurozone), this could conceivably 
I wrote a quick post explaining the Brexit judgment and linking to key resources  
421 constituencies backed #Brexit - a landslide representing 65% of all seats. MPs must vote with their constituents. #Article50 #Democracy 
UK: We might #BrexitEU: Stay with usUK: #Brexit it is!EU: So be it, when?UK: I'll keep you postedUK: Before MarchUK: WaitUK: Hello? 
The UK owes Gina Miller a debt of gratitude in preserving parliamentary democracy and parliamentary sovereignty over Brexit 
Govt loses over Brexit A50.Good that parliament (which is sovereign) gets more control, worrying that govt screws up  
UK government must be given vote on triggering Brexit, court rules  
High Court tells UK government that Brexit requires a vote in Parliament 
This ruling is very impressive. Must have known the hate it would trigger from Brexit MPs and newspaper editors. Did it anyway. 
Big decision. Ironic that "unelected judges" have to tell elected parliament that it is sovereign in #Article50 trigger. #Brexit  
The High Court has upheld Parliamentary sovereignty over Brexit vote, in a move so ironic it threatens to destroy the fabric of spacetime. 
Is this the point at which Parliament takes back control? #Brexit 
Raising a glass to Gina Miller and all those who took this case. It's only a small step but an important one. Parliament must control Brexit 
you'll get your brexit...... if you can trigger article 50.... in THE HOUSE OF COMMONS  
High court rules parliament must approve Article 50 - constitutional crisis here we come. #Brexit 
Value of the pound shoots up following Brexit ruling  
And remember Theresa May said that the Article 50 claimants were "subverting democracy" Tory disrespect for the Law#Remain #YesEU #Brexit 
Labour should make its "red lines" the basis of the A50 vote: no guarantees, vote it down. Entirely within spirit of referendum 
BIG #BREXIT NEWS! Government loses Article 50 court fight  
Not a snowball's chance in hell that MPs will block Brexit; but the right to trigger Article 50 could give them more leverage over its form. 
BREAKING: British court deals major blow to government’s Brexit plans  
Wow. Well that's the whole applecart overturned. If Parliament has to vote for #Brexit, everything might change.  
It’s right that parliament has opportunity to debate & vote on what sort of Brexit we want - not just Ministers at the top table #Article50 
"A huge setback for Theresa May": Parliamentary approval needed for Brexit, high court rules  
Brexit means Brexit but also not Brexit but kind of Brexit but that Brexit maybe this Brexit but with a hint of Brexit 
#BREXIT fightback begins: Government doesn’t have prerogative power to trigger Art 50 - Parliamentary approval is needed.  
So looks like there's going to be a vote. People of the UK - email your MP and ask them to vote NO to invoking Article 50/Brexit.  
A50 ruling could actually harden Brexit if it leads to General Election and a Tory landslide. Theres no definitive outcome from this. 
Parliament must trigger Brexit, realise High court. MPs not government must trigger Article 50#brexit  
.@BBCNormanS reacts to the Brexit High Court ruling. Follow our live coverage here:  
Campaigners - including one from #Gibraltar - have won High Court battle over PM's decision to use royal prerogative in UK Brexit strategy. 
I really hope Theresa May is sitting somewhere quietly thinking, "Thank fuck for that." #brexit 
BREAKING: UK government loses court #Brexit battle  
High court rules that Parliament must vote on Brexit negotiations - Pound up 1%. Government likely to appeal. 
Omg brexit isn't necessarily happening!!! Time to transfer all my dollars over before the pounds return  
Brexit means proper media scrums  
BREXIT: Fury as courts undermine democracy by ruling in favour of democracy. #Article50 
Hearing about the #Article50 court case but unsure what it means? Here's a guide  
If handled correctly it could wrestle control of Brexit process away from more extreme elements, towards more moderate, consensual approach.  
"Shambolic Tory Brexit" - Jeremy Corbyn proved right by Article 50 court ruling that MPs must vote. Humiliation for May 
As pressure & vitriol against politicians will ramp up on EU vote,can I ask that we remember the murder of a politician during referendum 
Boris Johnson summed up Brexit Britain in 13 miserable words  
#brexit  legal challenge wins how delighted brexiteers must be that   Parliamentary sovereignty has been upheld  
Brexit Ruling: U.K. Government Loses Lawsuit Over Article 50 Vote. Judicial activism vs the People. People lose  
UK Government Loses Article 50 Lawsuit; Brexit Needs Parliamentary Approval High Court Rules: Pound Surges  
High Court case shows the Government must give Parliament its say on #Brexit  
BREAKING: High Court rules Theresa May can't start Brexit without giving MPs a vote  
'Brexit court challenge succeeds' via @BBCNews 
£ reacts against the $ after #brexit #Article50 ruling 
BREAKING NEWS: High Court rules against the government on Article 50. Follow live updates here  #brexit 
I'm confused. Wasn't Brexit all about returning sovereignty to the Commons?  
Listen. All we need is for Parliament to block Brexit and Hillary to win next Tuesday and we might still be able to salvage 2016. 
Pound rises after UK government lose Brexit court case over #Article50 vote. Parliamentary involvement thought likely to soften the #Brexit.  
Difficult to imagine scenario in which govt loses vote on A50, but verdict allows Labour & moderate Tories to make demands on Brexit. 
What's the phrase? 'You lost, get over it'? #article50 #brexit 
May the Builder.Can she Brexit?May the Builder.Actually, no she can't without a vote in parliament.   
Parliamentary approval needed for Brexit, high court rules  
Key point: MPs may have won a say over Article 50 but my guess is they would be very wary of voting to block Brexit outright 
Brexit means Parliamentary sovereignty and taking back control from a Prime Minister afraid of MPs. High Court ruled Article 50 needs a vote 
Here's how Sterling reacted to that #Article50 #brexit court ruling:  
 BREAKING: Britisches Parlament muss Brexit zustimmen  
UPDATE: UK Government seeking permission to appeal #Brexit court ruling on parliamentary approval to trigger Article 50. 
As expected, UK Government confirms it will appeal to the Supreme Court. #Brexit #Art50 
Judges uphold parliamentary sovereignty. A game changer for May. Worth a few quid on Brexit never happening. 
BREAKING: The UK government must consult Parliament before it can trigger the #Brexit process, the High Court rules 
Look at what happened to the pound after Brexit court ruling on Article 50  
A complete dog's brexit. 
Hey, Brexit!  
#BREAKING: The High Court has ruled against the Government in #Brexit case, and MPs must vote on the issue 
The High Court just put the brakes on Brexit  
PM cannot trigger Brexit, says High Court  
Govt loses Article 50 Brexit challenge. Full judgment  press summary  
Court case causes real problem for many Tory Brexit MPs who have long said Parliamentary sovereignty is supreme. 
Blimey. In just 5 minutes the High Court has blown away the Prime Minister's plans for Brexit. 
Theresa May cannot trigger Brexit  without Parliament vote, High Court rules  
Pound rises after U.K. government lose Brexit court case over Article 50 vote  
The government has lost the Article 50 case! A triumph of law over the abuse of executive power.#Remain #Brexit #YesEU 
Parliament must trigger Brexit, high court rules  
Campaigners have won their High Court battle over Prime Minister Theresa May's decision to use the royal prerogative in her Brexit strategy 
BREAKING: British government loses Brexit court case over Article 50 vote  
Breaking: Brexit does need Parliament's approval, senior judges rule in landmark challenge 
The man who wrote Article 50 says Brexit can still be stopped  
The Brexit vote deserves the same respect as Boaty McBoatface, says @PaulFlynnMP  
The High Court verdict in the Brexit challenge case is due shortly. Live coverage and reaction-  
We have chased all the way back to the beginning. Parliament was involved. They voted for a referendum.  
Mark Carney has a new set of Brexit problems to solve  
Interested in the keeping an eye on the post-referendum economy? Maybe this (API driven) dashboard will help...  
#Brexit A liberal tolerant outward country transmuted into an illiberal intolerant inwards looking one 
Around 20 counsel in the front two rows of court 4 for the Brexit article 50 judgment. No word yet on the outcome. 
So were is this certificate@G_AbdulazeezAnd why can't PMB call for a referendum instead of this killings 
Tales From Brexit: It Now Looks Like Clinton Can't Get The Obama Coalition Back Together  
Shocking that 5 unelected, unaccountable media owning billionaires have far more power over Britain than the EU #Remain #YesEU #Brexit  
In Brexit Britain, being a foreigner marks me out as evil | Joris Luyendijk  
Boris said this morning we're going to make a Titanic success of Brexit. I agree.....  
Could the US election polls be wrong? We looked to the UK and Brexit polling to find out:  
Palpable tension in Court 4. Claimants' benches full. Press benches full. Government's - not yet....... #Art50 #HighCt #Brexit 
Brexit will be Titanic success, says Boris Johnson  
We're about to find out if Boris Johnson's "Titantic success" of Brexit is about to hit a High Court shaped iceberg 
Remember Vote Leave to save the British curry, we'll get more immigration from Commonwealth? Not happening #brexit  
Actually bilateral deals are done pretty quickly. It's the blocs that fail. So Brexit will actually ENHANCE our trade status.  
Essay Question 1=============Boris Johnson: "Brexit means Brexit and we are going to make a titanic success of it."Discuss. 
Somewhere in the RCJ the Lord Chief Justice is repeating to himself: 'Don't say breakfast, don't say breakfast.' #brexit #Article50 
"News is what somebody somewhere wants to suppress, all the rest is advertising." So you'll forgive me for reporting Brexit-related facts. 
I've always happily worn a poppy but the Mail seems hellbent on making it ugly and divisive, like a Brexit badge. 
How will Brexit affect UK startups? Find out at TechCrunch Disrupt London, Dec 5-6  by @mikebutcher 
So Boris thinks Brexit looks like this?....He's finally got it!!  
Germany's leading academics urge Angela Merkel to block Brexit  
My latest video.US election vs Brexit  Give it a listen, RT if you like and please subscribe to my Youtube channel! 
Boris Johnson says 'Brexit' will be a 'Titanic success' and some think it may not have been a gaffe  
Niglel Farage wins lifetime achievement award for Brexit role | UK | News | Daily Express  
BREXIT has been revealed as the 2016 Collins Word of the Year #CollinsWOTY 
Brexit has had a shocking effect on this Village People tribute act.  
Brexit downsides: job losses, soaring prices, falling pound, racism, loss of influenceUpside: National anthem on TV 
Trump's gonna win, UK become a US colony as post-Brexit economy crashes, and US/Russia begin phony eternal war. Orwell was 32 years out 
There was an even clearer majority (6 to 1) among MPs to hand the decision over to the British people in the EU referendum. Job done.  
The pantomime continues. Tory MP calls for BBC1 to mark Brexit with national anthem at the end of each day  via @_ade 
Britain's High Court will rule later on whether MP's should have a vote on Brexit: Here's what you need to know.  
The man who wrote Article 50 says #Brexit is not inevitable  
"Fate of world at stake, warns Obama" - BBC.OMG. Barry just went Full Brexit. You would have thought he had learned his lesson by now. 
The UK making a 'titanic success' of #Brexit  
For.Sec #borisjohnson likens #Brexit to the #Titanic ... a flawed and doomed ship which sank #BrexitReality 
Boris Johnson: "Brexit means Brexit and we are going to make a titanic success of it.” 
Libs keep giving away our money, they trap our resources in the ground, and they are taxing us to death. But yeah... #Brexit  
God Save The Queen!!!!and the Brexit Regime.There is no futureIn Tory Dreaming  
Hah! Cue plenty on jokes in my twitter stream on how this will be dealt with in Brexit Britain and a return to Imperial units anyway. 
What you need to know about a big day for the Bank of England and for Article 50: 
Following Brexit, BBC1 should restore tradition of playing the national anthem each night says Tory MP, reports @Laura_K_Hughes 
Those wanting the government to win this morning are not cheering on, at law, a referendum result but the use of the royal prerogative. 
Another referendum is on the way that could topple a PM and shake the EU  
#NI #Brexit case to be appealed to UK Supreme Court - hearing in Dec 2016  via @irishlegalnews 
Why are people laughing at Boris saying #Brexit is going to be a Titanic success? It’s about the truest thing he’s said in months. 
The prospect of stagflation could loom if Brexit affects productivity  
#Brexit has been described as politics' most important contribution to the English language since Watergate  
.@BorisJohnson has just claimed #Brexit will be a "Titanic success"  
J D Wetherspoon shares plummet as sales growth slows in the wake of Brexit. Their pro-Leave owner blames… the EU.  
When did any British government take the most important national decision since entry into WWII ( no vote on that) on a foolish referendum?  
These are the people behind the Article 50 court case that could derail Brexit  
High Court to rule on Brexit legal battle and Theresa May's decision to use the royal prerogative  
Far from dividing us, #indyref2 can unite the country in a journey towards a fairer, socialist, independent Scotland #indyref #Brexit 
"Brexit will be a Titanic success," says Boris Johnson...The metaphor continues...  
The problems of populism: from #Trump to #Brexit, @JMorganTHE on the challenges of a new global political climate  
Brexit just bankrupted the Irish mushroom farming industry.  
Brexit legal challenge set for court ruling   
Sod it, I'm calling for channel 4 to mark Brexit with a repeat of Eurotrash at the end of each day. I will not rest until this happens.  
#Hygge, #Brexit and #Trumpism are among the Words of the Year for 2016, according to dictionary publisher Collins 
Very true words.Europe simply must deport all, ALL, migrants from the Middle East. Yes, 1st, 2nd generation as well.#DrainTheSwamp #Brexit  
Theresa May is lucky prime minister. I'm sure she's thrilled to talk about FIFA instead of Brexit, Syria, refugees, homelessness. 
"Brexit means Brexit and we are going to make a Titanic success of it" - #BorisJohnson #Brexit 
Lord Kerr of Kinlochard calls for either parliament or the public to be given a chance to stop Brexit.   
This man correctly predicted Brexit, #Indyref and the 2015 Election. He says Donald Trump will win the US Election  
In our Brexit bulletin: Judges rule on Article 50 and it's a Super Thursday for Mark Carney  
Nigel to return as Ukip leader? Donor hints at shock comeback for Farage IF NIGEL RETURNS I WILL REJOIN 
Tory MP calls for BBC 1 to mark Brexit with national anthem at the end of each day  
The ‘People’s Challenge’ decision is due at 10am: does Theresa May need Parliament’s approval to trigger Brexit?  
it's absolutely disgusting how Brexit and a British high court are in the same sentence. The country voted leave. So we LEAVE 
Six of the biggest myths about immigration we've heard since Brexit, debunked  
The pound rises for a 5th day before Bank of England decision and Brexit court ruling  
Brexit will put UK's access to life-saving new medicines at risk, warns former health minister  
The Brexit war can still be won, but we must start fighting back | Will Hutton  
I've been speaking to the man who wrote Article 50 - Lord Kerr - he says the #Brexit process is "not irrevocable"  
It's decision day for the Bank of England  
Brexit bitterness on display as Theresa May spars with Osborne and Johnson at awards ceremony pic.twitter.com/OwI12ehxX6 
Prevent Brexit or face political fallout, German economists warn EU  
Brexit named word of the year, ahead of Trumpism and hygge  
Big squeeze on living standards in the pipeline: Bank of England to highlight looming Brexit inflation hit for UK  
Boris Johnson says 'Brexit' will be a 'Titanic success'. Freud vindicated.  
Big tits and tiny minds. Carry on Brexit Britain - you're an embarrassment pic.twitter.com/OsBezbxFjn 
Remain means remain: Nicola Sturgeon cannot be ignored on Brexit | British Politics and Policy at LSE  
London's High Court ruling today could block May from triggering Article 50 and stop Brexit  
Five Irish mushroom farms have gone out of business since the referendum. More are expected to follow by Christmas.  
High court to declare verdict on whether UK government has right to trigger Brexit  
Mark Carney has a new set of Brexit problems to solve  
If the Good Ship #Brexit does sink like the Titanic, you can be sure Cap'n Boris will be on the first lifeboat. 
Brexit vote stemmed in part from damage to public trust in politicians in wake of Blair's war in Iraq - Greenstock  
BBC excited at the prospect of the High Court scuppering Brexit this morning. Radio 5 presenters acting like kids on Xmas eve, 
'Brexit' is Collins Dictionary's Word of the Year 2016. Sharenting, dude food & JOMO also make the cut. Which other words should be added?  
My late-night thread asking some of the questions related to this morning's #Art50 judgment & #Brexit, also in my #LRB piece. 
The #Remain campaign was factual, the #Brexit campaign was deliberately misleading and fictitious.  
Brexit-backing Wetherspoon boss threatens2stop selling European beers GREAT.HIT THEM WHERE IT HURTS,IN THEIR POCKET  
Brexit talks may well get "quite vicious," Irish prime minister warns  
UK still popular regardless of #BrexitBerlin #fintech startup @SpotcapGlobal launches in UK   @tech_eu 
An outstanding Guardian editorial on Brexit: MPs must raise their game, hold executive to account & govern Britain.  
Brexit a marvellous opportunity to deregulate the City. Has this been tried before, anyone? How did it work out?  
Brexit is bad for exports. Not just because of UK's direct sales to EU. But because UK's other world sales also made through EU trade deals. 
Boris Johnson says 'Brexit' will be a 'Titanic success' and it looks like he'll be true to his word for once  
Brexit won't mean more low paid Bangladeshi immigrants, after all. The promises were lies. Who'd ever have guessed?  
A Trump win would have a bigger global impact than Brexit, Westpac strategists say  
Well done Suggs for standing up against Brexit. More and more celebs are speaking out against xenophobia. Great !!! 
BREAKING NEWS: The 2016 Collins Word of the Year is - BREXIT #CollinsWOTY  
If Brexit has taught us anything, it’s not to listen to what a majority wants. Stop designing based on data and go with your instincts. 
Clippers? Knicks? Undoing Brexit? GOTV?  
Definitive Brexit update by Lord Kerr. Read & reflect on Brexiteer hyperactivity. Article 50 is NOT a one way street 
2016: Two blown 3-1 leads, Leicester win EPL, Brexit, Colombia peace deal rejected. Don't take anything for granted & go fucking vote. 
#WorldSeriesBrexit.Cubbies Win.Now for the trifecta.  
1...BREXIT 2...CUBS 3...? 
Merkel says Brexit talks must not impact Swiss-EU negotiations  
. UKIP Leader @Nigel_Farage wins lifetime achievement award for Brexit role at Parliamentarian ceremony  
People's Challenge pyrrhic victory if MPs see Brexit as mandate  @acgrayling @MikeH_PR @nickreeves9876 @Dr_Jim1 @trevdick @solange_lebourg 
What did we expect?UK #fintech finds EU barriers emerging after #Brexit vote | @Reuters 
Nigel Farage wins lifetime achievement award for Brexit role at Parliamentarian ceremony  
just like brexit 
AUDIO: Boris: “Brexit means Brexit and we are going to make a titanic success of it”. Osborne: “The Titanic sank”  
To my #USA friends remember the disaster that is #Brexit many here voted for a clown and now we have him #Boris 
The Next President of the USA@realDonaldTrumpTIME FOR AMERICAS BREXIT#November8th#MAGA 
Very much like #Brexit. Only DT IS doing better than #Leave was 6 days out. @Pretefunkera @tommy1775 @commonguy123 @PpollingNumbers 
'Brexit' named word of the year, ahead of 'Trumpism' and 'hygge.' by @alisonflood  
Collins Dictionary has chosen "Brexit" as its Word of the Year for 2016. There are better ones.  
Wow!...is there anything sport can't do? Maybe it can help broker Brexit?.. Solve the housing crisis?... Change the brake fluid in your car? pic.twitter.com/8b7PFQnRD1 
I blame Brexit for Russia. 
Brexit is a false comparison. Different country. Different polling practices. Referenda are more difficult to poll.   
So #Brexit caused an 18% fall in the pound and inflation predicted to go to 4% next year and this is a good idea.What would be a bad idea? 
Obama says 'fate of the world' at risk if Trump wins. Remind me, what did Cameron say about WW III & Brexit?  
oh my god did you know that there are mortgage refinancing ads that invoke brexit 
The High Court will give its verdict in the historic legal challenge to the government over Brexit.  
hi @SusanSarandon. If you think it's helpful to make strange vagina cracks to the BBC, why didn't you and your vagina try to prevent Brexit?  
The court battle that could decide Brexit: Here's what you need to know.  
Boris Johnson says Brexit will be a 'Titanic success'....yes, really. You can't make this up.  # via @HuffPostUK 
Brexit named word of the year, ahead of Trumpism and hygge  
"We're going to make the Titanic a Brexit success," they said, once, probably. 
This is *so* Brexit. Like when the British PM claimed a vote against EU membership would lead to World War 3. LIES!!  
Boris Johnson claimed that the Tories will make "a Titanic" success of Brexit. Granted it's a long film, but has he watched it to the end? 
This is brilliant. On journalists and Trump voters (applies to many articles written about Brexit too):  
My Brexit advice: Stop pretending that nobody in Scotland voted for it; start making common cause to get the best deals and opportunities...  
Here it comes, Brexit style fear-mongering! Cannot wait until this POS leaves the White House.  
Parliament has already voted 6-1 to proceed with Brexit. They cannot stop the Govt from implementing it now:#Brexit #OpenBritain 
What Brexit could deliver to an independent, Remaining Scotland is an influx of businesses, workers and tax revenues.  
This is what Boris means when he says that Brexit will be "a Titanic" success.  
Just a little reminder of #Leave lies about #brexit :  
"Brexit means Brexit, and we're going to make a Titanic success of it" Boris Johnson, Foreign Secretary, UK  
.@BorisJohnson says government will make a "Titanic" success of Brexit. See @George_Osborne reaction 
Boris announces that "we are going to make a Titanic success of Brexit". Which is an interesting way of putting it 
Boris Johnson says at the Spectator Parliamentary Awards dinner that we will make a Titantic success of Brexit... 
Boris Johnson, "Brexit means Brexit and we are going to make a Titanic  success if it".  Perhaps worst speech he's ever made 
Congratulations to @Nigel_Farage for winning the @spectator Lifetime Achievement award for Brexit!  
Prevent Brexit or face political fallout, German economists warn EU.  
Compulsory patriotism isn't fascism? This topic is just a dog whistle to British "Trump voters" & Brexit types- old, uneducated, unskilled  
Objectivity is the enemy of #brexit.  
The govt needs to act in the national interest in Brexit talks: not the 52% or the 48% but the 100%. We all have a stake in our future.  
Brexit.... Trump.... Spurs being shit.... 2016 is a right wing dream 
Oh this again. Remember Project Fear with #Brexit?  
remember when we all came together to roast Britain after Brexit?? please let's not give them an opportunity to return the favor on the 8th 
Think you might have been mis-sold Brexit? Our friendly staff are here to take your call  
At what point does Westminster MPs spectating on Brexit become Westminster MPs colluding WITH Brexit?#Remain 
The post-referendum fall in the value of the pound has triggered a surge in luxury watch sales  
And whatever the ruling, MPs must engage with the contents discussed in court: destruction of basic UK rights of citizenship by Brexit.  
The referendum result was a protest vote. That doesn't mean I have to respect  or accept it being hijacked to destroy my country. No Brexit.  
MPs need to think not of the 'will of the people' on June 23, but of the wrath of the people when they realize that they were duped#Brexit 
Brexit is about taking away the rights of the British people to be treated equally in Europe. 
Brexit war can still be won! 
Tim Martin is a serial whinger. #wetherspoons will suffer like everyone else thanks to his insularity & short-sightedness. Tough.#Brexit  
Judges are due to rule on the Article 50 court case. We explain what's happening  
Gosh, this whole Brexit dung-heap demands a satirist of the statute of the late Tom Sharpe too skewer it. Alas, he’s dead … 
All MPs Who are trying to keep us in the EU Should not be members of parliament if your not prepared to give 100% Loyalty to Britain RESIGN 
The govt has not produced a 10th of the useful public material that its counterpart in Dublin has provided #Brexit 
Ireland’s PM: Europe must "decide for itself in [Brexit] negotiations where it wants to be in the next 50 years."  
All Brexit proves is that white men are willing to BURN THEIR COUNTRY to the ground & ruin their economy instead of challenging bigotry 
Will Hutton: We must get passionate about fighting the self-destructive madness of #Brexit#Remain #YesEU 
What was the perception of the UK in France post Brexit vote?#TheExchange 
The Guardian view on Brexit: British government and politics is increasingly living in a fool’s paradise  
Theory: England is a planetary bellwether, from Magna Carta to Civil War to Industrial Revolution. Brexit implies a global change in mood 
The Guardian view on Brexit: MPs must raise their game | Editorial | Opinion | The Guardian  
The court battle that could decide Brexit: Here's what you need to know.  
The Brexit war can still be won, but we must start fighting back | Will Hutton  
Prevent Brexit or face political fallout, German economists warn EU  
Brexit boost: The Colombian President says his country is ready to strengthen trade & investment ties with Britain.  
How is #brexit progressingPlease vote and re-tweet 
#Remain #eu Good article from Will Hutton: Time to fight back against Brexit  
Europe in danger of 'losing the plot' if it obsesses over punishing Britain for Brexit, says Irish prime minister  
If you plan to Vote Trump then you better liquidate your assets before you head to the polls.  Markets will make brexit look calm if he wins 
I'm starting to get the same feeling about the US election that I got about EU referendum; it's very disturbing. 
I'm boycotting this business & any other brexit supporting businesses.  
Pub chain Wetherspoon threatens to stop selling European beers if the EU imposes tariffs on Britain after Brexit. Do you support the tactic?  
Hacked emails show Clinton campaign communicated with State  Brexit HRC #tcot #ccot #gop #maga 
Really looking forward to 8 November, when I can stop worrying about Trump and go back to worrying about Le Pen and Brexit.  
One problem with Brexit comparisons is the polls swung toward Remain at the end -- unlike this race, where Clinton has always led.  
Europe in danger of 'losing the plot' if it obsesses over punishing Britain for Brexit, says Irish prime minister…  
Big brave racist thug punched a Polish woman to the ground on the Tube.Police need info.#BetHeVotedBrexit #Brexit 
You clearly fail to understand what the case is about. Not reversing Brexit but ensuring it's done lawfully. Taking control by UK courts.  
My life has been turned upside down by the Brexit referendum in which I was not allowed to vote. 
City should welcome Brexit, says report  
NHS in crisis, homelessness doubled, food banks, hard Brexit, Orgreave cover up, grammar schools, refugees shunned? No Thanks.#Labour4hope 
A $17 billion investment bank pulled every penny out of Britain because of #Brexit  
It's November!AMERICANS!REMEMBER: The British didn't think "Brexit" would happen, and look how that shitheap turned out.**PLZ VOTE** 
I hope you're right. The misery #Brexit is already causing is unbelievable. I never thought we would face this nightmare. #migrant 
Risible by Brexit-backing pub chain boss, blaming EU for possible tariffs resulting from his foolish Leave campaign  
Sturgeon humiliated by own DONOR as Stagecoach chief says Brexit could be GOOD for Britain  
If the referendum had been a general election, the Leave Party would have a majority of 166 seats #RespectTheResult 
All my life I have tried to be honest and decent. I have tried to pass on those values to my kids. And then along comes Brexit. 
America has joined the ranks of the over 30 non-EU countries stating that they want post-Brexit bilateral free trade agreements with the UK. pic.twitter.com/YAczNqrKdl 
#Brexit: Add this to the ever-growing list of consequences brought about by ignorant people who dislike foreigners  
Brexit will put the UK's access to life-saving new medicines at risk, warns former health minister  
91% of last-minute bets are for Trump, Paddy Power says  Exactly the same pattern we saw leading up to #Brexit #MAGA 
At launch of #fabianwomenscharter Great initiative by @FabianWomen good to see @Keir_Starmer @AngelaRayner holding govt to account on Brexit  
The UK High Court is to rule on whether Theresa May can trigger the Brexit process without a parliamentary vote  
@MayorofLondon @mragilligan @CarolinePidgeon @FloEshalomi - CSH more harm than Brexit for London business  
Nissan have been given a sweetener by May to absorb Brexit losses. UK corps will be lining up wanting theirs, this will cost YOU billions. 
"An Irish official has been appointed to the European Commission’s Brexit negotiating team"#ReverseTheReferendum 
6. A reference leading to a decision that an A50 notification was reversible would leave the question 'Brexit or no' an open sore for years. 
#NeverHillary #DrainTheSwamp #VoteTrump #MAGATales From Brexit: Clinton Can't Get The Obama Coalition Back Together 
UCL research shows human brain is predisposed to learn negative stereotypes. Music to ears of Express, Mail, Sun eds. ##xenophobia #Brexit 
-Free trade is actually benef..-NEOLIBERAL!-Brexit will come at a great pric..-PROJECT FEAR!-Trump is very danger..-CLINTON E-MAILS! 
Thatcher quoting Attlee @michaelwhite @AHenry57 @Thomasgordon01 referendums are "a device of dictators and demagogues"  #Brexit  
The Telegraph India: India and the UK are likely to informally discuss a post-Brexit free trade pact during May's visit to India on Sunday. 
Many of the same people who supported Brexit are also supporting Trump. I worry about some people's intelligence. I'll leave it at that. 
The S&P 500 just traded at levels last seen in July. Right after Brexit. That's 4 months of gains gone.$SPY:  
Reuters: US trade representative Robert Zoellick favours the USA signing a free trade agreement with Britain after Brexit. 
Hard Brexit would mean patients waiting years for new drugs – report  
DPP: European arrest warrant "absolutely vital" but will require adherence to ECJ rulings after Brexit  
Judges to rule on Brexit tomorrow. Remain must unite and support MP's who need our support to rise up. via @FullFact 
Is @simoncoveney hoping nobody will notice Sept homeless figures by releasing them late & during Brexit Conf? Very bad form Expected better! 
I really loved this chat with professor and historian Steve Davies. Here pat one on Brexit and Identity Politics:  
People wonder why there was a vote for Brexit.  
Voted EUref Remain, in Scotland, but don't want another Scottish referendum? You're not alone.SNP ignoring inconvenient truth (again).  
.If Judges rule that Parliament can vote on #Brexit & if Parliam't then defies the will of the people, I will call for an immediate election 
Christopher Lindop asks how university funding linked to EU projects will be affected by #Brexit  
Six facts you've heard about immigration since Brexit that are completely wrong  
Also joining the #bbcqt panel this week, a self-styled 'Bad Boy of Brexit': @Arron_banks (2/5) 
Best outcome of Brexit talks is to avert it: German experts  
We The People have done it before, and will overcome oppression once more. #LeaveEU #EU #Brexit #Nexit #Frexit #Swexit#DrainTheSwamp 
HRC lied to the press, she lied to American people and we will Brexit her Butt on November 8th. #tcot #ccot #gop #maga pic.twitter.com/7nOClWBLU3 
The self-appointed leader of the anti-Brexit insurgency, there  
We must look beyond the myths that are building around #Brexit at an alarming rate, says @steverichards14 
Lord Ashcroft: Donald Trump is like Brexit in 3 key ways  
Electoral map, polls scrambled in final days amid unrest. HRC is going down. Brexit her Butt. #tcot #ccot #gop #maga  
I encourage UCD students to #VoteNO in the referendum on silencing @UCDSU on #Repealthe8th. Voting will resume tomorrow @UCDProChoice 
Sophisticated eurodiplomat brexit black humour:  
Former Aussie PM John Howard gives a big thumbs up to Brexit Britain, insisting it can be a success  @IainDale 
Most bankers think London will remain Europe's main financial hub after Brexit, poll finds  
Brexit is so complicated, even Stephen Hawking won't touch it  
Former Australian Prime Minister John Howard tells @IainDale on LBC: "I've got every confidence" Britain will make a success of Brexit 
When somebody wants to leave a club, it is not normal that such a member wants to decide about the future of this club. #brexit  
3 judges are about to rule on a major Brexit court case. Here's a guide to what's happening  
Bless. Lawyers are worried about Brexit & how there might be a bit less parasite work when we leave. Chins up chaps.  
Ruined her own country, now she wants to ruin OURS. Angela Merkel's top economic advisors tell her to STOP BREXIT  
Brexit voters who shout down 'Remoaners' don't want a rational debate  
The view from Japan: #Brexit & the concerns about migration are mistaken & FoM is important to Japanese companies  
It's because Corbyn & McDonnell want Brexit. They don't believe in free trade. They want a closed economy.  
Great, now Brexit is preventing a Smiths reunion  
Maybe the Labour leadership should care enough about Brexit to organise its own meetings? Just blue sky thinking here. 
LSE chief says the scale of Brexit risk is no exaggeration   
Warnings about risks to London's clearing business and 100,000 jobs "are no exaggeration"  
Top SNP donor undermines Sturgeon and admits the effects of Brexit are "not as big a deal as people are making out".  
Corbynistas banging on about how shadow team should be going to Corbyn to organise Brexit meeting is extraordinary  
High Court to deliver verdict on constitutional right of UK Government to trigger Article 50 tomorrow, 10am. #Brexit  
Finding out what's happening in Brexit talks will probably require the FILTHY DIRTY FOREIGN Brussels FoI system  
#Brexit 2.0: Could the U.S. election roil equity markets? #WallStreet.   
My piece for @TIME on the parallels between Trump and Brexit:  
BREAKING: Brexit is biggest challenge Ireland has faced in 50 years says Kenny. So true! Apart from, to pick a random example, the Troubles. 
The south can veto any post-Brexit 'EU-UK trade deal'. If Britain imposes a hard border on Ireland then Dublin can block ratification! 
Well said @thomasbrake . I'm finding anger on doorsteps at @ZacGoldsmith Brexit views. #RichmondPark residents don't want a UKIP backed MP 
اللهم لك الحمد حتى ترضى و لك الحمد اذا رضيت و لك الحمد بعد الرضا  
¿Cuál es tu trabajo ideal?  
Yeayy (at Gerbang Tol Cileunyi) —  
Clooney made it 
"Valkyrie Crusade"!  #Valkyrie Crusade 
That has to sting a little coming from Jimmy Carter#neverhillary 
Tô @paysandu vergonha 
Normal, un besoin de greffe peut tous nous concerner hélas... 
美容院に行くとかいう死ぬほど難易度の高いミッションがある 
Salir? 
LA PARTIDA EXTRAÑA!:  vía @YouTube 
When Oscar calls me babygirl  
شكراً لرجل الصامت رجل المهمات الصعبه الامير فيصل بن خالد على كل ما يقدمه لأجلنا من أجل تحقيق الذهب والقادم اجمل لأهلينا 
I'm gonna go to the bathroom I chugged that tapioca 
All my songs for young children are at iTunes.  #preschool #kindergarten #baby #toddler 
こいつ動き回るから塗りにくい 
That's right 
Ive never had a stronger love/hate relationship with anything than I do with this video  
estaría necesitando plata, y mucha. 
